comment body,comment author,comment id,subreddit
"I mean, he's not wrong. But I wish he would have said it before they fired him. ",S_D_W_2,e9cfud6,conservative
"CNN started going to shit around 2005/2006 when Fox news started. 


Before then you had Larry King obviously as a great interviewer, Tucker Carlson on Crossfire, Robert Novak was very smart, Bernard Shaw was great at hosting, Christianne Ammanpour did excellent, hard hitting, investigative journalism. Anderson Cooper was decent too, so was Wolf Blizter. Aaron Brown did an excellent job on 9/11.


Nowadays, they've pretty much all left. We barely hear much from Ammanpour, Wolf Blitzer is well past his expiration date and doesn't have a clue half the time what he is doing, and you can somewhat say the same for Anderson Cooper.
",cbdb9,e9cu75r,conservative
"  

CNN is the cheerleader for left-wing extremism.

&#x200B;

Look into who owns it and who all the top people are.

&#x200B;

That will explain a lot as to why.",_Paradigm_Shift,e9crtte,conservative
It's nice to see Rick Sanchez again.  I thought he was treated poorly by CNN.,ChunkyArsenio,e9cjfo2,conservative
"Watch his interview with Dave Rubin on The Rubin Report

https://youtu.be/CxB8rQyQ2qU",djent_illini,e9cwl7n,conservative
Would love to hear someone like Jake Tapper give their honest opinion on political bias at CNN but that will never happen. It would discredit him when he occasionally tries his hand at real news and piss off his fans.,CarlosGrimes,e9d32e1,conservative
I wish more news anchors would say it. :/,Nodoxxing1234,e9d3vjb,conservative
I realized how bad their network was when they covered MH370 24/7 for a month straight,dlc_protocol,e9cvgmb,conservative
"First half was great, second half not so much ",i_floop_the_pig,e9cyl5u,conservative
"> I realized how bad their network was when they covered MH370 24/7 for a month straight

All MSM took a shit the day Bill Clinton got caught getting a blow job in the oval office.  That was the day real News died and 'Entertainment News' was born.  Shit has been on spin-cycle ever since",Jizzlobber42,e9d12cq,conservative
The man's 72 and still looks just like his B&W high school class picture.,somegaijin42,e9co0rj,conservative
"Huh, didn’t see this coming from the wheel of fortune man. ",dd1zzle,e9cs1ah,conservative
"I mean, I like the joke, but the Tea Party was a thing: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tea_Party_protests

Plenty of protests around the country when conservatives lost key votes (TARP) or to mark special days (tax day was a big one). 

There's nothing inherently unamerican or unpatriotic about protesting. It doesn't mean you have lesser work ethic or values. ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d0ft4,conservative
[removed],,e9cuy2m,conservative
[removed],,e9cqa5n,conservative
"This shows great work ethic for conservatives! 

But weren't these latest demonstrations (11/8) about The Attorney resigning (and writing that at ""your"" request, I will resign) after The President was looking to force him out, 

and that the resulting replacement was very much against the *originally* bipartisan probe into The President's affairs?

If I am wrong, I would appreciate hearing what anyone else has to say. ",Bignicky9,e9cvloa,conservative
[removed],,e9cwnlf,conservative
Pat Sajak is a national treasure. ,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9csigq,conservative
Well I got to work 😎,madnyss001,e9cpjtv,conservative
[removed],,e9ci1nc,conservative
[removed],,e9czw4j,conservative
To be fair we should all do demonstrate if they manage to steal these Senate seats. Unacceptable. Obviously not in pussy hat fashion and harassment mobs. ,latotokyo123,e9cfj8u,conservative
He didn't have a button to 'fire AG',Jenetyk,e9d2zpj,conservative
"My crippling student loan debt and medical bills aren't going to pay themselves, you know",Eazy_DuzIt,e9d351k,conservative
"Not to be a party pooper or anything, but these polls are statistically wrong because people have the option to vote or ignore it.",Kry_S,e9cwzu3,conservative
Some of those sky-screamers and demonstrators are at work. That's their gig.,dasiba,e9crpsc,conservative
I don't work on Wednesdays though :/,usertoad3,e9cth7e,conservative
"This sub makes me so happy. When I see posts like this and view the comments, people can use logic to pick apart bad political commentary and don't start shit slinging like in t_d or extreme left wing subs.",rsm927,e9cytwf,conservative
"In 2014 we had an employee we used to work with desperate to attend a demonstration in downtown LA (2 hours away). There was a political rally of some such nonsense and he could not find anyone that day to cover his shift. He of course did the only reasonable thing, left worked sick and drove to the demonstration. Thing is he submitted sick time for the time lost that shift and plastered his social media with his attendance and participation in said demonstration. Did the company I work for do anything? No. We submitted screenshots of his abuse of sick pay, still no. Infuriating. 

TLDR: Young lib, desperate to attend lib event commits sick time fraud and does not get fired. ",baileysontherocks,e9cy8s4,conservative
"Good old Rat Sajak!

*""Of course I'll go to work! I don't care about politics when I can slurp ricotta off my wheel!""* ",Theguygotgame777,e9cux3s,conservative
Just want to point out that the demonstrations happened at 5pm when most people are done with or close to finishing their work day. ,BeachedBeaver,e9d3984,conservative
Could you imagine what would happen to the economy if all the actual WORKING people decided to walk out even a day?!,StephenNesbit,e9cvu0r,conservative
What a great libertarian!!!,appolo11,e9cyz5b,conservative
Not as many mad comments as I expected. Booooooring,poly_atheist,e9cw007,conservative
I never noticed before but damn he does look young. He could totally pass for late 50s.,sob9,e9d0x2w,conservative
Money is a helluva drug,butt-mudd-brooks,e9cxhcw,conservative
"He’s pretty hard right wing, actually.",RetardedElmo,e9csfcr,conservative
"Completely peaceful protests that actually made policy points, conducted after Obama massively jacked up spending. They didn't scream at the sky, shout ""Not My President"", or throw trashcans through windows. Those mean evil conservatives even left the mall [cleaner than they found it.](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2013/10/there-was-no-trash-glenn-beck-pick-national-mall/309974/) Compare that to leftist protests, that leave [DC on fire.](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/local/wp/2017/01/25/thats-not-somebodys-honda-owner-of-limo-torched-on-inauguration-day-unsure-if-insurance-will-cover-damages/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.7a7e2dc76d73)",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d44io,conservative
"> I mean, I like the joke, but the Tea Party was a thing

To be fair, most of them were retirees. ",Silicon_Avatar,e9d1zpe,conservative
of course. democrats have to protect jeff sessions!,realtsuke,e9cw2m2,conservative
[removed],,e9cxk88,conservative
"The whole mass protest call to action was a sham from the beginning. They just want reasons to protest and to give the media pictures. 

Everyone and their mother knew Sessions would be fired after the midterms. Anyone claiming it was a shock is so retarded I would be amazed if they could form a coherent sentence. ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cyqj5,conservative
What states would those be?,CCpoc,e9cyzg7,conservative
"This number is so horribly flawed. California pulls in over 40% of the entire welfare capital, 1 state out of 50 shouldnt be pulling in that much. ",Xero03,e9cxdi4,conservative
[removed],,e9cqajt,conservative
"The democrats protested after something didn't go their way? Well I for one am shocked.

",DAmbro8,e9d0qia,conservative
"The question, though, was posed in the event of the Republicans losing House majority, which just about everyone saw coming. The kerfuffle in the Senate, though, is something else entirely, and indeed nothing to brush off.",AvdaxNaviganti,e9ck4h9,conservative
"Actually, I wonder what would happen if a subsection of the right decided it's time to show the left how ridiculous they actually are by doing exactly the same things as them, only with better rhetoric. Imagine hundreds of people standing outside Jim Acosta's house chanting ""we know where you sleep.""",Ed_Radley,e9cpvaf,conservative
"Weekends work best for me-given my full-time job, helping out with kids and my general lack of ambition to stand in a group of people holding signs for work commuters to honk at me because I can’t accept a loss, or just move the fuck on entirely. I was raised not to throw a fit on the floor of the toy store because I didn’t get what I wanted.

Maybe I’ll just go hunting instead.

",_BIG_BEAR_,e9cqag5,conservative
"Haven’t the seats been decided? Even Florida is fully counted, right? ",sleepyradio182,e9d22kh,conservative
Right. A proper demonstration is done with tiki torches. ,Lord_Boognish,e9d2dok,conservative
The president (which he said he’ll do) should launch an investigation of AZ and FL if it suddenly turns out the democrats win the senate in those states,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9cstec,conservative
Isn't that true of like... every poll?,DAmbro8,e9d0sxt,conservative
It’s a joke.,BigAl265,e9cy665,conservative
"Doesn’t it seem like paying people to protest should be illegal?  I’m all for people having the right to *peacefully* protest, but when you start paying people to rise up against the government...that sounds a little like sedition to me.",BigAl265,e9czwb1,conservative
Really? Surprising! Today I learned. ,dd1zzle,e9cstz5,conservative
I didn’t know this either. I’m surprised he still has a job.,bettywhitedidmedirty,e9cuopj,conservative
"I mean, in that same vein most of the liberal protesters are just students. Lots of free time.",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d2hm5,conservative
"I mean it’s fair to assume that since that makes up the bulk of the Republican Party. However, here’s a suggestion that this might not be entirely true:

https://nypost.com/2009/04/13/tea-parties-real-grassroots/

>	These aren’t the usual semiprofessional protesters who attend antiwar and pro-union marches. These are people with **real jobs;** most have never attended a protest march before.",iamelroberto,e9d2qha,conservative
[removed],,e9cx2sr,conservative
"Shhhh...don’t look up the word “satire”, you might get triggered.",BigAl265,e9cy9ql,conservative
"Yeah man someone undermining an investigation on themselves is totally fine, nothing to see here, people just want to complain. 

Grow up",TimboSlice96,e9cz4y1,conservative
"Knowing he'd be fired or not is irrelevant as the protests are over the fact that Rosenstein is no longer overseeing the investigation and now this new guy can shut it down. The investigation must stay open, regardless of what party you align with.",Mattoosie,e9d44xz,conservative
"New Mexico, Kentucky, Mississippi, Alabama, West Virginia, South Carolina, Arizona, Alaska, Montana, Louisiana, Indiana. Ranked from most dependant to least. I called Alaska blue. If not y'all claim the top 11.",phillipjfried,e9czbst,conservative
Throw a dart anywhere in the lower SE quadrant of a U.S. map,ericthedad,e9czad1,conservative
California is 39th on the list so thank you for your mental gymnastics and fake news Vlad. ,phillipjfried,e9czmpo,conservative
"The unemployment rate doesn't take into account those who aren't now currently looking for a job,  examples: whinging deadbeats and welfare burdens.",blade_of_illinois,e9cscpi,conservative
"The same thing that already happens. The news pushes it as ""right violence"", while ignoring *any* attacks from the left.",Juxen,e9crv2t,conservative
"It would only raise the temperature, and prove to the left that we're just as bad as them, so they would need to be even worse. We gain nothing by adopting their tactics. The right needs to be tough and on point, but stick to its law and order tactics.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d4bn7,conservative
Paying people to be disorderly is definitely an issue. Illegal? I'm not sure. I really just bring it up because it's fun to needle the left about it. ,dasiba,e9d1csk,conservative
An old white guys is conservative? Huh who would have thunk it? ,mary_pooppins,e9cxqwb,conservative
"> I mean, in that same vein most of the liberal protesters are just students. Lots of free time.

I didn't have enough free time in college to be going to ""protests"", getting into street brawls, vandalizing private property, and stalking/intimidating news hosts every other weekend. Then again, I wasn't going for a liberal arts degree, so maybe they just have more time.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d2qcd,conservative
"I completely agree that investigations of this nature to be allowed to proceed uninhibited.

But let’s be realistic for a moment.  Even if Hilary Clinton herself conducted the investigation and declared all involved to be 100% innocent, Dems would still find a way to shrug it off while still crying foul.  “They paid her off!  What a sellout!” or maybe “She must have been blackmailed into it!” or whatever.

Just like they did with Darren Wilson, nothing but a guilty verdict will suffice.",chickennoodleo,e9cyu9s,conservative
"First off the investigation is about Russian interference in the 2016 election. Not about Trump. 

Secondly, how is he undermining the investigation? ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cz96k,conservative
"The investigation's been going on for ~2.3 years (9 months under Obama, 28 months under Mueller), and it's found nothing regarding Trump. I don't see how anything's being undermined, but what are you afraid of? That they need exactly 2.4 years to find something?

How long does it go on without any results before you'll admit that's it's a partisan fishing expedition?",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3eqc,conservative
"Are you basing off percentages, actual number of people, or total amount of money spent?",CCpoc,e9d4dbm,conservative
"https://www.hiddendominion.com/50-reasons-why-california-sucks/

sorry heres some help for youre gymnastics.  Please remember cali is perging citizens cause the place is crap. ",Xero03,e9d0ghc,conservative
[removed],,e9ctev1,conservative
"Actually, I heard the unemployment rate is low because everyone has two jobs.",rAlexanderAcosta,e9cvoaj,conservative
"I mean, the WaPo [reported on the antifa mob in front of Tucker Carlson's house](https://www.washingtonpost.com/nation/2018/11/08/they-were-threatening-me-my-family-tucker-carlsons-home-targeted-by-protesters/?utm_term=.16ba6e852eaa), and it's their 2nd most read national piece currently. TIME reports on them being [investigated as hate crime](http://time.com/5449787/fox-news-host-tucker-carlson-hate-crime-protest/). CNN has an opinion piece that protestors [went too far](https://edition.cnn.com/2018/11/08/opinions/protest-at-tucker-carlsons-home-went-too-far-kohn/index.html). CBS reports that the protests [lead to a criminal investigation](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/tucker-carlson-home-protest-criminal-investigation-today-2018-11-08/).  
Even very partisan and liberal news like The Hill reported on [the police investigation](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/415773-police-investigating-protest-at-tucker-carlsons-home-as-possible-hate-crime), and Colbert [condemned the protestors](https://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2018/nov/8/stephen-colbert-antifa-mob-tucker-carlsons-house-s/). Of course you'll have some leftists on reddit, like over on r/ChapTrapHouse, celebrating the protests, but these guys are actual, not-an-insult-but-a-self-description communists.  

I think it's important to not get too stuck up in partisanship. Antifa is not the democratic party, Charlotteville's neo-nazis are not the republican party. Fox news' Shepard Smith has [repeatedly criticized Trump for fearmongering](https://www.youtube.com/watch?time_continue=1&v=zMF7WNyYU2Q), and this sub lauded Jake Tapper for being [very critical of Ocasio-Cortez](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9gxyhq/cnns_jake_tapper_to_ocasiocortez_im_assuming_im/?ref=share&ref_source=link).",reallyspecialdude,e9cu8qc,conservative
"This actually enrages me quite a bit.

There was a shooting during a BLM shooting in Dallas, a few miles from where I have relatives. BLM was chanting ""fry them up like bacon"" in reference to cops.  

6 cops killed, 11 wounded. The guy was caught, his Facebook was all pro-DNC, pro-BLM, anti-white, anti-cop, and this event was barely talked about, and nobody seems to remember it.

Everytime someone circlejerks about Charlottesville I bring it up and they have no idea what I'm talking about.",regollyek,e9cvzfe,conservative
"WH is a 10-minute walk from my campus. Lots of students are able to find time to protest because of the closeness. I also happen to have a couple kids, am married, and work full-time so I do not have time haha. 

Obviously, the other stuff was tongue in cheek, but I think most people who engage in that definitely have too much free time. ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d31gz,conservative
"The guy he’s replacing sessions with has spoken multiple times about how trump should replace sessions with someone who would cut funding so much that the investigation grinds to a halt.

Russian interference, particularly in the trump campaign.



",TimboSlice96,e9czeex,conservative
"""nothing has come out of it""

Except several guilty pleas from people directly involved with the Trump campaign and Trump himself, as well as a guilty conviction and subsequent guilty plea.

You know, aside from that nothing has come out of it.",LegendofDragoon,e9d4vlx,conservative
Well if there's nothing to be afraid why doesn't Trump say with all confidence that he will let it continue cause there is nothing to hide.,doitwrong21,e9d3pvp,conservative
Everything on that list just complains about taxes. California generates revenue for the country. It's not a drain on society like the states I listed earlier. ,phillipjfried,e9d2g83,conservative
So they're voting to end their own subsidies? Sounds like a fuckin hero.,JaXXXuP,e9cue80,conservative
Finally someone who is here to try to bridge the fucking gap and forge a bond between the 2 parties.,ionpies,e9d0vl9,conservative
I would normally agree with you on something like this but how they’re handling a mob at Carlson’s house who threatened him and his family and tried breaking down his front door is pretty weak. Especially when you juxtapose it to how they’re reacting to Acosta’s whole ordeal. One is being treated as a not so great thing with some blurbs the other is being treated as one of the worst moments in our modern political history and gets top of the hour headline news coverage practically.,absentblue,e9cvoxs,conservative
"You make some really great points. You put some effort and research to add credibility to your post.  Doesn’t happen often. Bravo... seriously. 
 
As a news consumer (junkie tbh) it’s not that these stories aren’t reported. Usually they are. I find often that these are the stories that don’t hit front page, don’t stay on front page but for a moment, aren’t shared by other sites. Yes, we reported on it, mostly because we have learned somebody is out there just waiting to say “gotcha” so we cover our bases, but then we bury it.  Fast. Deep. Protect the bubble. Protect the anger. Protect the division.

Read.. don’t watch political propaganda, read. Read a lot. Be selective. Read the other side, and the alternative, independent,international.... because ALL of them are BIASED and you have to look for the AGENDA and what they are NOT telling you. When you see what has been left OUT and contrast that too their known agendas, you get a much better idea of the TRUTH or at least who the crooks really are.",olafsonoflars,e9d44is,conservative
"There is a large disparity in the shrillness. A couple articles without follow-up mean nothing in comparison to the media blitz happening over Acosta and the doctored video. 

Quite frankly, did Acosta think he could be that big an asshole in the WH press corps indefinitely?

",billyjoedupree,e9cxf48,conservative
Has he done it?,Murican_Freedom1776,e9czgnp,conservative
How long should the investigation take?,TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3jbj,conservative
"For the same reason I wouldn’t want police digging into every aspect of my or your life. 

I think it was Stalin or one of his lackeys that said something along the lines of: “you give me the man, I’ll find a crime”. That’s what it’s beginning to feel like more and more. ",tathrowaway666,e9d4ugv,conservative
Hard to have when that's not what this sub wants. ,Fgame,e9d1iep,conservative
"No, but if it walks like a duck...",TimboSlice96,e9czjg0,conservative
"Yep, it walks like a duck alright. A partisan-witchhunt-shaped duck.

https://thehill.com/hilltv/rising/406881-lisa-page-bombshell-fbi-couldnt-prove-trump-russia-collusion-before-mueller

>""With that statement, Page acknowledged a momentous fact: After nine months of using some of the most awesome surveillance powers afforded to U.S. intelligence, the FBI still had not made a case connecting Trump or his campaign to Russia’s election meddling.
>
>""Page opined further, acknowledging “it still existed in the scope of possibility that there would be literally nothing” to connect Trump and Russia, no matter what Mueller or the FBI did.""",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3nlz,conservative
"So you're protesting something that may or may not ever happen? 

Like I said. A sham. ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cznxz,conservative
"With that logic pushing back against gun stricter gun control is also a sham - they’re not trying to take our guns, just “stricter control” - it’s called a deterrent ",TimboSlice96,e9czt9l,conservative
We protest the stricter control when it's called for or actively being pursued. ,Murican_Freedom1776,e9czxp8,conservative
The left has said they want to ban all gun ownership. Trump has *not* said that he wants to end the investigation to hide collusion.,TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3v3o,conservative
"If you don’t consider appointing the guy who has been pretty vocal about getting in the way of the investigation (literally, “trump should appoint someone who would cut funding so much that the investigation grinds to a halt”) pursuing then you’re a moron. ",TimboSlice96,e9d049z,conservative
"They just “found” another 15,000 ballots? Did somebody just happen to leave them in the bathroom so they could comfortably take a shit? WTF is that??",mikeygio,e9cqaa8,conservative
Im glad to see something being done. ,Isredditreal2009,e9ct2ok,conservative
Member when Detroit was ballot stuffing all over the place in 2016 and that barely registered in the news?,MackMizzo,e9d02lb,conservative
Can they seize Brenda Snipes while they're at it? ,somegaijin42,e9cvjuo,conservative
"Good. This shit has to stop. Both counties results should be considered tainted and set aside until they can be proven clean. I'm not sure if they can do that, but if they can't maybe it's time to come up with a new verifiable way of voting.",nateious,e9cym4f,conservative
"This will not go over well...If federal agencies were tasked to provide oversight, we may well have seen some legitimate vote tampering. If this happens, any claims of fraudulent votes will be immediately dismissed as Scott's desperation. ",el_muchacho_loco,e9d175f,conservative
This is a win win for the democrats. If Scott didn’t do anything they steal the election. Now that he’s doing this I guarantee people will be screaming “Voter Suppression” completely ignoring all the shady shit going on in Broward. ,Uncreative-name12,e9cyybt,conservative
"We need strong handed leadership like this, a full investigation into election fraud. Also prosecution, which never seems to happen to democrats.",Jebytu,e9d4wqa,conservative
"You’re kidding me...

Just curious how it takes 3 days to count votes ",MeatPumper69,e9cuf7j,conservative
guaranteed they just happened to find exactly enough to win the election. I mysteriously every one of the Lost ballast will be for a Democrat Democrat,ExpensiveMention,e9cw0vo,conservative
Me too!,cmiller1225,e9cxb25,conservative
Hopefully something being done means throwing in jail all those fraudsters.,sjwking,e9d4hw1,conservative
"I love how the left is saying, ""R's don't want vote's counted!"" 

No, we don't want late submissions or fake votes counted.  ",Roez,e9d1zoo,conservative
Idk how she isn’t in jail already but this hopefully puts her away for a long time,SanduskyTicklers,e9d0yu1,conservative
"Honestly, who gives a shit? No matter what Republicans do, they'll be demonized by the media. Lefties will always hate them. The optics will be no worse than any other time.

Republicans need to take control and actually enforce the law. Who cares about a bunch leftist whining? If that's enough to make Republicans puss out and bend over then the country is double-fucked. There's no reason to let biased media optics stop us from enforcing the law and keeping our rightfully-won races. Who cares if they complain? They lost.",diamondeyes18,e9czg76,conservative
"Who cares? Republicans could cure cancer and end world hunger and would be lynched for not doing it fast enough. No matter what the Republicans do, the left will cry foul.",Starky_McStarkface,e9d0xok,conservative
"“All votes must be counted.” And if you don’t count the ones that we’re not turned in when the law requires, or don’t count the ones that magically appeared after the results showed that the other guy won, you must be racist or something. ",justhere2havefun,e9d1mnt,conservative
And why is it only that county? Or it least 90% of the outstanding votes are there,SnickersReese,e9cwjd1,conservative
The issue isn’t even counting who the votes were for. They haven’t even reported how many votes were cast in total!,SanduskyTicklers,e9d0wcn,conservative
"It takes 2 months to get 25,000 LSAT exams scored... Getting upset that a disparate, out of date, analog system takes more than 8 hours is hilarious.",MorePointsThanShalov,e9cyz9c,conservative
"Yup, hard not to be cynical if Scott losses by 1,000 or 2,000 votes.  Votes that were not mentioned as existing or expected for three days following the election.  ",Roez,e9d22kv,conservative
Gerrymandering gets plenty of air time but potential voter fraud gets none. The most basic of voting regulations (Voter ID) gets shouted down. Wonder why.,MackMizzo,e9d23sx,conservative
">Honestly, who gives a shit? No matter what Republicans do, they'll be demonized by the media. Lefties will always hate them. The optics will be no worse than any other time.

>Republicans need to take control and actually enforce the law. Who cares about a bunch leftist whining? If that's enough to make Republicans puss out and bend over then the country is double-fucked. There's no reason to let biased media optics stop us from enforcing the law and keeping our rightfully-won races. Who cares if they complain? They lost.

Completely agree.  Fuck optics.  Enforce the law and prevent election fraud.  No chain of custody, no count.  Also, Snipes is under court orders from what I understand.  Enforce the laws already in place.  ",jedichric,e9d0t5d,conservative
"Proposed headlines after Republicans cure cancer:

Republicans Announce Plan to Terminate Millions of Health Care Workers

Cure for Cancer Disproportionately Affects Rich White Americans

How Socialism Cured Cancer

President Obama's Incentives for Curing Cancer Finally Pay Off

Curing Cancer will Increase the National Debt

Why Don't Republicans Care About the Heart Attack Epidemic?",user1492,e9d1zgr,conservative
"Agreed. Trump pushed for and got experimental drug use passed. You know, one of those ways to help with healthcare? Yet the left still claims GOP policy will kill millions somehow. ",justhere2havefun,e9d1j7c,conservative
Every other state manages. Heck the rest of Florida manages. ,MeatPumper69,e9czaim,conservative
All of the counties that were just blasted by a CAT 4 hurricane reported on time. Spare me. ,Natetendo83,e9d01i5,conservative
"Congratulations, this is the stupidest thing I’ve read today.  It’s still early though, but I’m rooting for you!",BigAl265,e9d0s5c,conservative
Dade county has more than half the pop and votes and yet managed... not a very bright comment there bud.,abuigues,e9d1xzz,conservative
The rest of the country was able to do it. Spare me with this bullshit. ,steampunker13,e9d1zpy,conservative
"You're trying to say something moderate in an extremist echo-chamber. God speed. Apparently they think every county in the country should finish counting at the exact same time, because they all have the same number of vote counters, the same equipment, the same number of votes, and definitely nobody ever gets ill or has a family emergency that might slow it down. These things are impossible to even consider.",Cautemoc,e9d48ff,conservative
"I was pretty upset over Kavanaugh, and I'm closing in on the same level of frustration now.  

This isn't even marginally acceptable.  What's worse, the D's are screaming the most BS, dishonest excuse trying to cover for it.  ",Roez,e9d2l2s,conservative
"Nah it would just be mostly radio silence with some headlines like ""Cancer Cured; Now Let's Cure Racism and Men""",sunder_and_flame,e9d4ilf,conservative
Bigger cities in Florida manage.,skarface6,e9d49et,conservative
I laughed my ass off when I first saw this.,ponmbr,e9cz1fn,conservative
"""A Proud Member of the Democrat Party Propaganda Department"".....",LVDave,e9d11qk,conservative
I'm surprised no one has used it on the PBS logo considering how similar they look,-Shank-,e9d4gqx,conservative
"I prefer PMSNBC, but this one is pretty good too!",Rabidraccoon76,e9cw3e7,conservative
I’m still partial to MSNBS.,GenericTexan117,e9d0vma,conservative
"Not gonna lie, I’m started to get tired of the NPC meme. It’s accurate, don’t get me wrong, but everyone and their dog is using it nowadays and because it’s so overused it’s being turned around on the people using it",i_floop_the_pig,e9d2i0n,conservative
"That's right Rubio, the Democrats are using brass knuckles, at the very least it's time for Republicans to start taking off the damn gloves. ",Rightquercusalba,e9crvn8,conservative
"Broward County is a shithole, but there maybe *A* reason for it:

> Bay County Population: 183,563 (2017)
>
> Broward County Population: 1.936 million (2017)

",Roidciraptor,e9d0rrq,conservative
"Odds are they are not ""counting"" -- they are ""printing"" ",Racheakt,e9d400y,conservative
Also Broward county has the shittiest election supervisor in the United States ,SanduskyTicklers,e9d14ax,conservative
"Why can almost all of the big cities in Texas have all the votes counted in a few hours after the polls closed here. Dallas county has 2.6 million people living in it, but it was one of the first counties to be counted. I call BS on both Florida and Arizona. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9d3l8p,conservative
I welcome a full and impartial investigation regarding all parties involved.,Nevaknosbest,e9byvy9,conservative
possible my ass.. there is,Delta_25,e9byvbk,conservative
Good.  Now for AZ and GA.,gbimmer,e9c0obc,conservative
"Thank fucking God.    
Those counties are notorious for doing this shit.  ",strallweat,e9c13y0,conservative
*That’s* my governor,YankeeBlues21,e9bxp68,conservative
We can not let Broward get away with this. Thank fucking God we have a solid conservative majority on the SCOTUS because this has potential to go straight to the top like Bush v. Gore. Broward and Palm Beach counties broke state law by not reporting the number of absentee ballots they had within 30 minutes of polls closing. This law is why absentee ballots are due several days prior to Election Day and the law exists to prevent this exact situation from happening. ,Tau23481992,e9c3ql1,conservative
"This shit https://www.thedailybeast.com/republicans-freak-out-as-new-ballots-threaten-florida-senate-win was shared on /r/politics, they think we are outraged because the counting votes process is slow. wtf",PapaGeorgio23,e9clwm9,conservative
"Breaking: 80% of Broward County register voters show up for the midterm elections, with 63% going for the Democrats /s",Kickmull,e9c9rp6,conservative
Shouldnt he recuse himself considering the fact that his senate race is in contention?For the sake of independence,T4mvv1lc0xx,e9chw2e,conservative
"The lawyer behind this, was the guy who got SNL Al Franken elected with 1,099 ineligible felon votes, the North Carolina Governors mansion. Also general counsel to John Kerry and Hillary Clinton’s campaign. Total partisan hack job. The guy is a treasonous snake.   ",Slippery____Pete,e9chgov,conservative
Good. He won this race. He should be fighting back.,1wjl1,e9c7ytk,conservative
"It's damn well time. Fuck broward. Florida belongs to the republicans, suck it the fuck up.",xJownage,e9c3gho,conservative
"The Democrats aren’t happy about *just* ruining CA and NY. 

The sad part is, people move from those places after they have ruined them by voting in liberal, then they *still* vote for liberal in the new places they live. 

I guess they think the places they moved from just did not liberal the right way. ",KKN0PP,e9ch9cj,conservative
Broward County government should be abolished and placed under direct administration of the state government until we can excise the rot in their bureaucracy.,0ttervonBismarck,e9cuj5c,conservative
"Democrats don't give af, they just want power. Heck, Broward wasn't hit by hurricane like other counties, yet they are still counting lmao.

",Saigunx,e9cpi89,conservative
These effing liberals. I swear to God... This has got to stop.,MyBestVersionOfMe,e9cnimz,conservative
One that will be argued and bickered over for the next 20 years.,GFZDW,e9cw01u,conservative
"Yeah... and if there’s rumors of voter fraud in a blue city like Houston in a red state like Texas that may help Democrats... I still want a full and impartial investigation.

This narrative being pushed that we only want to stop voter fraud where it helps us is completely inaccurate. Voter fraud is the tool of the left, not the right.

(The right will just purge you from the voter rolls 😏 I kid, I kid)",HuluForCthulhu,e9cw75j,conservative
"I have no knowledge of any of this, but broward county seems to come up a lot. ",wpiman,e9cjnz4,conservative
What's going on?,StupidAmericanRednek,e9ctpjw,conservative
"Ducey won by 17 points, but McSally is down as they keep keeping tallying these boxes of ballots.  Right.  This is normal.",nited_states,e9c8qsy,conservative
and CA,Delta_25,e9c77tj,conservative
"I just realized how much I hate it here in Broward after the election. Me and my boss are both thinking of moving up north. The blue wall in Broward doesn't see the light of day coming down.
",abuigues,e9cs4wg,conservative
Praise the Dark Lord!!!,freshSkat,e9cb7xo,conservative
Unfortunately.,Neuroleino,e9cijbr,conservative
"Absentee ballots aren't due several days before, they're due 7 pm election day",AllMyName,e9chd3d,conservative
The democrats do not believe in rules or laws anymore.,ozric101,e9c4aai,conservative
5-3 majority as of today,days_of_being_mild,e9caa92,conservative
"I'll be honest, I'm an independent that has a guilty pleasure of reading both this sub and the Democratic sub (r/politics). I'm having difficulty enjoying the show when I don't fully understand both team's motives...

I believe Democrats are angry that citizens' votes aren't being counted due to negligence or conspiracy. If conspiracy, they would believe some boxes were intentionally ""lost"" or turned in late in order to invalidate them. If negligence, then that's a loss for democracy that people that followed the law don't get their votes counted. 

While this sub... believes what? If there's a conspiracy, they are trying to validate fraudulent ballots? That they planned to make a mistake to try and demand a recount? 

I think either way, the anger should be at the voting process and the incompetent fools who are denying voters their votes, one way or another. ",jal0001,e9cs1bm,conservative
"Oh yes, outrage....remember when Republicans were rioting in the streets when their candidates didn’t win the electoral vote??? Oh wait....",blondemia88,e9cpejo,conservative
"The Google News section on this topic is worse. All sourced from HuffPo/Daily Beast/Washington Post, all making various statements about how Republicans are ""freaking out"", something about racism in Florida, etc. I'm fucking sick of it.",MackMizzo,e9d3sdd,conservative
"I have a hard time with this stuff anymore.  Kagan didn't recuse herself from voting on health care at the Supreme Court.  NJ just elected a Senator who was using under aged prostitutes and taking bribes, and the juror on his trial who acquitted him was at his election night party.

It's really hard to try to be straight and narrow when you're not so sure the other side is going to follow suit.  I would really, really like it if things returned to a sense of normalcy.  But, again, it's hard not to say, ""you first.""",Roez,e9cvc6r,conservative
"I'm ok with that, but who would step in and order that? These counties broke state law, and they should be objectively investigated.",peacekeeperBrew,e9cs059,conservative
"What would Scott recuse himself from? He's not doing the investigation himself. All he's done is rightfully order the activity of these election boards to be looked into by the proper authorities, and he's lawyered up like the Dems have. ",Hrendo,e9cu4lb,conservative
Happening here in Texas too.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0sdb,conservative
"THIS. So many people from NY move to Florida (Palm Beach County for example) and skew the numbers. If your government  is so wonderful, by all means, stay there. Please don’t come here and mess up ours.",blondemia88,e9cpi24,conservative
It's funny because the Democrats are accusing the Republicans of hiding these votes. Funny how something fucky always happens in Broward.,Demplition,e9cv0f5,conservative
its going to take some extreme measures that will make a lot of people very uncomfortable for it to stop. ,iwasthebeaver,e9cvzsq,conservative
So this puts you on the edge but what about Kemp suppressing voters in Georgia? ,Boltonlove16,e9d140v,conservative
"Who handles this stuff then? The Feds?  It ALWAYS seems to be Florida.  

Side note I would hate to be a regular family trying to live in Florida as the amount of retirement communities expands.  I have a profound disgust for them, they eschew good community standards and shift the focus of the local community from the good of the whole to the good of the retirement community with their solid voting blocks.",Falkamper,e9cxc0u,conservative
"Basically my stance too.  Gerrymandering?  Bad ballots?  Hacked booths? Double voting?  Illegals voting?  Dead voting?  Threatinging voters?

Investigate any and all of it. When I was younger I used to believe my vote didn't matter.  

It should be one of our highest priorities to ensure that voters feel that there's security in our elections.  We may not like the result, but there is no reason there shouldn't be oversight.

Particularly in federal elections such as presidents and congressmen. ",Lobo0084,e9d2891,conservative
"Not maintaining voter rolls is a mechanism for conducting voter fraud. Basically anywhere anyone advocates for worse standards and regulations you can bet they have ulterior motives. It's voting, it's important, why?",MackMizzo,e9d3107,conservative
This comment could be the title for the GOP mindset for two decades,stamosface,e9cuto4,conservative
"Broward keeps ""finding"" more ballots and they are all magically 90% democratic, and they won't tell anybody how many more ballots they need to count. ",iwasthebeaver,e9cvsol,conservative
[removed],,e9c7v3n,conservative
Come to Texas. We need more conservatives to stem the influx of libs.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0jvh,conservative
"I hate comments like these. Both parties are capable of wrongdoing and in these two years with Trump, republicans have been letting him get away with shit that they would never allow a democrat to do. Take your hypocrite ass somewhere else",RichysRedditName,e9cjwyc,conservative
They never did. Democrats supported communists in the cold war. They are the anti-america party.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9d1d1i,conservative
That's rich! LOL,BarackaFlockaFlame,e9cjmu7,conservative
This sub finds it highly suspicious that the same county that routinely fails to display competency on election days is where this issue is again happening. The current commissioner was convicted of election fraud for the 2016 election. Convicted. Of election fraud. She's still in that position. They are refusing to follow reporting norms by not updating the Capitol every 2-3 hours. They failed to report early voting totals now 2 days after the deadline to do so has passed. The chain of custody for some ballots is known to have been broken. Its a complete and total shit show in the same fraudulent county that is always a shit show. The fact that this one is possibly going to overturn previously called election results is causing the issue,sumgidan,e9ct7ep,conservative
"If you don't see a problem with the massive chain of custody issues here and the possible breaking of laws in a county with a history of election fuckery I'm not sure what to tell you. 

",Hrendo,e9ctoik,conservative
"That county is largely Democratic, so hiding stuff that already exists would hurt Democrats statistically.  

The concern--and I thought this was pretty clear from last night's thread-- is they are not keeping track, maintaining chain of custody, or reporting the various ballot numbers not yet counted.  People do not know why stuff is missing, being found, and so on.  That leaves room for someone to manipulate from inside the system.  

This process is supposed to be transparent, and that county has a ton of problems with fraud and negligence.  Here's a list of 12 things someone quickly jotted down:  https://twitter.com/SteveGuest/status/1060707597563637760",Roez,e9ctysc,conservative
I'm out of the loop.  What law did they break?,nearlygod,e9ct2ps,conservative
That has nothing to do with politics and everything to do with the weather,PragueNole09,e9csvrv,conservative
the Republicans have 0 power in the political machine in Broward. They couldn't hide those votes even if they wanted to. ,iwasthebeaver,e9cvykh,conservative
Like what?,nearlygod,e9d0yhc,conservative
According to what court?,chabanais,e9d24bl,conservative
"My running theory as to why we still see native Americans mocked in movies, comedy and pop culture is because they aren’t a significant voting bloc, so the left doesn’t give two shits about protecting them. Plus a good portion aren’t citizens and can’t vote",HuluForCthulhu,e9cxsd0,conservative
Classic Broward county. Who ultimately oversees elections? The state AG?,StupidAmericanRednek,e9cwv2y,conservative
[removed],,e9c97a2,conservative
"That’s a false dichotomy. This sub isn’t neutral politics, it’s conservative. However, the difference I think between here and total echo chambers like politics and TD is there isn’t complete fealty to the party. So, yeah, most here don’t have much in common with progressives and, of course, they’re gonna throw shade at them but that doesn’t mean that there isn’t self reflection either (there’s plenty of internal division, hell I vote mostly L and disagree with people here plenty). 

In the end, I believe there’s nothing wrong with rational discussion on conservative beliefs AND bitching about leftists. If people only talked about the things they never did wrong, nobody would have shit to talk about. ",gt4674b,e9cp07z,conservative
"Give one example of such, pls. ",ozric101,e9d4ojy,conservative
They democrats simply don’t. It’s an accurate comment ,Str8DonLemon,e9ck9cp,conservative
"Yeah, I do find it suspicious. I just thing Occam's razor would say it involves a massive conspiracy to produce a box of fake ballots or commit some sort of voter fraud. 

If this is a conspiracy by the county that's pro left, I'd guess they assumed they could lose the election and wanted to invalidate it? That's the only reasonable explanation I can come up with. 

They could also ""change"" ballots while not in view, but aren't there measures against that which would make it super obvious?

I just haven't heard any reasonable explanations yet. I only see people acting skeptical against (agreeably) suspicious people. ",jal0001,e9ctta8,conservative
"Oh, I agree! I just can't think of any grounded explanations on what the conspiracy would have been. Just that it's suspicious",jal0001,e9ctxcr,conservative
"They broke the law, by not reporting the number of absentee ballots within 30 mins of the polls closing.",peacekeeperBrew,e9ct9dg,conservative
"Breaking the law doesn't necessarily mean criminal law.  There are various reporting and chain of custody procedures (paper ballots for example are supposed to be maintained, stored, transported in a certain way).  

The purpose of those various rules and regulations is to maintain transparency and prevent fraud. The county has not been following some of those, apparently, and hence they are breaking the law.  ",Roez,e9cuehk,conservative
Number of absentee ballots is required by law to be reported no later than 30 minutes of the closing of the polls. They just keep finding more now and are refusing to report on how many.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0o58,conservative
Really? Why not move to California then?,blondemia88,e9cwh40,conservative
the inevitable [balkanization](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Balkanization) of the United states.  ,iwasthebeaver,e9d17u3,conservative
"Secretary of State here in PA, not sure about Florida, but I would imagine its a similar position. ",iwasthebeaver,e9cxine,conservative
Hi r/againstHatesubs wildly outrageous comment account. ,Knollsit,e9cbfa3,conservative
[removed],,e9cqxcj,conservative
You ever notice how conservatives tend to be more open about their bias? Examples are Daily Wire and Louder with Crowder who state they lean right and people should find left wing sources to get a full picture. Problem is left wing sources try to pretend they’re unbiased/moderate...then they’ll say they’re dedicated to progress or whatever ,i_floop_the_pig,e9cqyd4,conservative
"All they have to do is keep ""finding ballots"". This is not a huge conspiracy theory. Its assuming that a group that committed election fraud two years ago might be willing to commit election fraud today. ",sumgidan,e9ctygv,conservative
"In ohio, ballots have to be postmarked by election day so they could still arrive later in the week and be valid.  Is it different in FL?",nearlygod,e9cz6pw,conservative
Because Florida is significantly closer to NY then California is. If you're moving away from NY you most likely still want to be able to come back and visit family on a somewhat frequent basis.,dehshadow,e9cx35s,conservative
"I defend the use of hyperbole (which I consider this to be) in an environment of peers and which I consider different than speaking in a public square. My point of contention is that even with that, I believe this sub in general remains quite reasonable in their terms of rhetoric and self reflection. No one said we have to be neutral. 

Besides, look at the comments of the guy I replied to. Obvious shill. Possible perv...",gt4674b,e9cry8k,conservative
Yes. Anything not reported by within 30 minutes of the closing of the polls is not to be counted. They are ignoring that and counting them anyway and refusing to report on how many they have (also required by law to disclose this).,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0qw5,conservative
"I think that’s part of it. But Florida as a whole has a cheaper cost of living and lower taxes. If the only reason you move somewhere is the sunny weather, you need to re-evaluate some things about your life. Regardless, my point is, actual Floridians aren’t making up a lot of the Broward and Palm Beach votes. It’s people that moved here from somewhere else. ",blondemia88,e9cxnpu,conservative
"Cost of living and convenience would be the most obvious reasons. If you’re making a significant move 1k+ miles away and the #1 reason is politics, you’re weak minded imho ",PragueNole09,e9cxr2r,conservative
Shill confirmed... Fuck that guy.,abuigues,e9csad4,conservative
Older people moving to warmer weather is incredibly common.  Use some critical thinking skills here. Not everything revolves around politics is my point.,PragueNole09,e9cy0z7,conservative
I’m not referring to “politics” in the direct sense. I am talking about the way the states are run as a direct result of voters and politicians voted into office. ,blondemia88,e9d16di,conservative
"Right, but if we’re using critical thinking skills, it isn’t just the elderly that keeps moving here. ",blondemia88,e9d11pq,conservative
"They are pathetic bastards.  Wonder why packing the courts with lawless judges is so important to them.  Because even when they lose elections they cannot accept the results.  Though I believe the judges in Florida are lawful enough that in the end these slimes will be turned away in their upcoming ""count enough votes until we win"" scenario.  ",optionhome,e9cliux,conservative
This clown will probably have voter fraud evidence brought against her and not a fucking thing will happen to her.  And that's why these slimes continue to do this.,stancrouch,e9cuz6n,conservative
Just like 2000 votes are going to be counted and counted until the demonrats win.,mayargo7,e9d3cp8,conservative
This criminal makes $170k for doing a corrupt job.,SanduskyTicklers,e9d1251,conservative
"My rigger, my rigger!",Boon-Lord,e9cyexf,conservative
She should have been locked up already ,BeachCruisin22,e9d4wdq,conservative
"Explain like I'm five. Why should I spend well over $2000 a month in taxes, and not be allowed to vote? ",TheRealBMT,e9cm6pg,conservative
Are you a citizen of the United States?,mlmack,e9cslaa,conservative
And yet the internet saves everything. Amateur. ,cons_NC,e9czyl0,conservative
"Attempted home invasions are now a justifiable protest ""strategy"" against conservatives. There is no moral hedging for this logic. This is just pure evil.",MyWifeDontKnowItsMe,e9d0qv0,conservative
"Well obviously this Vox employee is a far right wing Trump supporter if he’s condoning violence, right?",justhere2havefun,e9d0hsp,conservative
The people supporting mob home invasions are the same people who want to take your guns away.  What a weird coincidence.  ,FelixFuckfurter,e9d18sw,conservative
"""No no no. Don't say the word mob!""

CNN",sjwking,e9d4o2g,conservative
"This is getting scary.  This and Arizona.  Thousands of ballots just ""Found?""  That, and the video in Broward county of ballots being split up amongst private vehicles and an Enterprise truck in the middle of the night.  There really needs to be a federal injunction here.  They need to stop this right now!  ",jdizzle161,e9cxg25,conservative
"""There isn't any election rigging!"" - The Ctrl-Left

""Russian's are rigging the Elections!!!"" - Also the Ctrl-Left

""It's not meddling if we do it, it's our 'Patriotic' duty!"" - Also the Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9d1dla,conservative
"If she returns it right away, they'll probably still count it! As long as she casts it for the right candidates, at least.",PubliusVA,e9cwgp4,conservative
"It's always Broward County, FL. Something should be done about that massive swamp already.",Millero15,e9d405v,conservative
"The Arizona stuff is a different situation. Arizona always takes this long to count ballots that’s why it’s never actually called got a few days. Also Arizona has total numbers of votes left to be counted. The Secretary of State in AZ who oversees the vote counts and is the one holding pess conferences is a republican. He has no reason to fudge the number. 

Now Broward County Florida. They are hiding shit and breaking state law. ",Zac1245,e9d1h11,conservative
"I shouldn't be surprised, but I amazed that the press hasn't been showing the video of them splitting up the ballots.  Guess that shows how ""objective"" they really are.  They are more obsessed with the Acosta video than voter fraud.",jdizzle161,e9d27f4,conservative
"Yeah if you go to my post history I posted a link with the votes to be counted in AZ. They have complete numbers. Around 550,000. The AZ Secretary of State is holding a press conference every night at 5pm until it’s complete. It’s way more transparent and open than whatever shit Florida is pulling in Broward. ",Zac1245,e9d2osg,conservative
fair enough.,jdizzle161,e9d2qnu,conservative
"3 days ago, the top minds downvoted [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9ucd1k/z/e93wkme) to -184.


They downvoted [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9u2bm1/this_is_how_it_happens/e90znlr) to -524 only 5 days ago. 


 And now they are crying about finding 5 that showed up in their thread that weren't even linked there. ",LumpyWumpus,e9cqvw2,conservative
"I was banned from that forum a few months ago. The mod responsible messaged me “Hail Satan.” as the reason.

Clearly good, well meaning, and mentally stable people. /s",_Hospitaller_,e9cr8dz,conservative
"What a fucking ditz. So if ANY conservatives AT ALL post in his precious sub it’s brigading?z


That’s like saying if I go to a college class and there are seven conservatives and 13 liberals and the conservatives speak they are “brigading” they classroom. 

Some mods are beyond reproach. ",Zac1245,e9cracv,conservative
"It seems like the more tools that Reddit's little Stalinists have to identify wrongthinkers, the crazier they get.",JaneTheThird,e9d0o55,conservative
"Ironic subreddit name, /r/topmindsofreddit",deathwheel,e9d1pms,conservative
Aside from that holy cringe that the Donald title,MegaBlastoise23,e9cv19e,conservative
They seem particularly hell bent on brigading here recently its pretty obvious im glad yall flaired me... The conservative only pist seem to be reqired more frequently,freedomhertz,e9cyxvs,conservative
"They pull that shit all the time. Any time I comment on a post that is near the top of r/all I get “go back to Le_Drumpf!” and “hehe le_Donald  is brigading again!”. It’s a post on r/all you idiots, perhaps everyone can easily access it and it’s not being brigaded? ",Knollsit,e9cypwt,conservative
I see it in my local subs too. If someone disagrees with the liberal hive mind it’s “brigading.” Or some topics where most don’t agree with the liberal viewpoint it’s a brigade and people are from the Donald. ,Zac1245,e9cz42f,conservative
"Even if it doesn’t hit all, do they not think that people with right-of-center opinions are in non-right wing subs? 
It’s so stupid when they claim “BrIgADe!!1!!1” in politics or news which have THOUSANDS of subscribers. ",tiredofyourshitrdt,e9czqbr,conservative
"I stopped going to my local sub altogether (r/ireland). They are super leftists. I was having a conversation about sports, not political whatsoever and was just talking about results of a game, the person I was talking to got a reply (in which I was tagged) telling him that I post to t_d and to ignore me. People are regressive cunts. ",Knollsit,e9cze4a,conservative
"I nodded my local sub (/r/WestVirginia) and they hated it. I dropped it because of disinterest and they immediately started lying about me, haha. Really sad snowflakes in there, with some good people mixed in. ",skarface6,e9d44r5,conservative
They really don’t because of how hard left so much of reddit is. ,skarface6,e9d46bs,conservative
It is mind boggling that this troll is still the supervisor of elections in that county. ,Meatball2112,e9cs8hs,conservative
"If you get convicted of molesting a child you don't get to keep your job at the daycare center, why is she allowed anywhere near a voting system?",BeachCruisin22,e9cu0tp,conservative
How long before the media (and by extension the DNC) goes into a “CRITIQUING HER IZ RAYCISS” mode?,Knollsit,e9cywjk,conservative
It's not bad enough that we have to deal with a lying media pushing the liberal agenda everyday and rinos working against us.  We have to deal with these horrible people simply trying to steal elections.  Starting with hrc is any democrat held responsible for breaking the fucking law.  It is the very fact that these bastards are never prosecuted that it keeps happening.,stancrouch,e9cxbaa,conservative
"She needs to be in prison for the rest of her life. Election fraud is no small thing, especially since she's seemingly done it about a dozen times.",deathwheel,e9d26cy,conservative
So what is he going to do about it? Someone needs to DO something to stop this nonsense. 2 counties in Florida...how many times now? Affecting national elections? Come on. Time to DO something about it.,cmiller1225,e9cx5me,conservative
"I guess there’s just a line you don’t cross in Cuban Americans.  Rubio might have seemed a little bit like a pushover before, but now that he sees this country being overtaken by Communism like Cuba, I think there is something ingrained in him that is kicking in.  ",ravenswin,e9cyua0,conservative
Don’t count these votes.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9cxnsj,conservative
"Election laws exist for a reason. That reason is for situations like this where you can’t just hold returns until they look the way you want. 

Can we just revoke Florida’s right to vote and agree that every other election they flip to the other party? I mean that’s about what we get anyway, and they turn it into a farce more and more each time. ",justhere2havefun,e9d0dan,conservative
"Rubio 2.0, seems a couple of Reps have been upgraded. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9d49gt,conservative
"I live in Broward and this is maddening. You know... After I've given it a lot of thought, I agree. They should disqualify all ballots that are not tabulated within the required deadlines. Further, if the reporting requirements aren't met, with zero-tolerance, all further returns should be invalidated.

I hate to say it, but that is what it's going to have to come to for this kind of fraud to stop. When the people of Broward have gotten sick of their votes not counting because of this nonsense, maybe they'll finally recall or replace Brenda Snipes.",mastaxn,e9d3qpi,conservative
How does she still have this job? How???,the-divine-comedy,e9bkzpa,conservative
"Right out in the open, and not only is she not in jail, she still has her job.

We talk about things like 'justice,' and 'the rule of law,' but neither of those things exist, and we all know it. If the other side doesn't like the result of the election, they'll simply change it.",NocturnalPatrol,e9blpyh,conservative
She's undermined our democratic process far more than Russia ever could ,BeachCruisin22,e9c1hep,conservative
Leftists who were flipping about Kemp and his “conflict of interest” are suddenly silent.,gster50,e9bmhch,conservative
Every time I talk about voter fraud I get downvoted. This shit happens.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9bznan,conservative
"Liberals- ""election fraud never happens""",zeldaisaprude,e9boy9q,conservative
Just ask Tim Canova about Snipes. ,nkn_19,e9bs36j,conservative
We’re descending into a banana republic ,true4blue,e9bt2xy,conservative
There’s systemic voter fraud going on in favor of the Democrats but any time you try and look anything up it’s just endless posts about how it’s all a Republican plot to reinstate Jim Crow or some other inane bullshit.,DocMilk,e9ccqib,conservative
How is she not in jail?,luccadeo,e9cbwdp,conservative
This is real voter suppression. Not that other shit they trot out there as such. ,Ruckus45,e9d2hrg,conservative
"so the Republicans are the Gerrymandering masters, and the Libs are torching ballots?  
Awesome",RobotXander,e9cnnk8,conservative
>Broward,JMB_was_a_god,e9bn4tc,conservative
We no longer have justice because the “investigate media” covers for Democrats. It’s disgusting.,the-divine-comedy,e9bmbvl,conservative
"Orange County has an all Republican Board of Supervisors but magically has only 2 of 7 congresspeople because of some fantastic work by the states ""independent"" redistricting commission. ",SickofInternetProgs,e9c31pe,conservative
"She is going to steal the election.  However many votes they need they are going to ""find"".  Al Franken redux.",WIlf_Brim,e9c298p,conservative
"In r/politics it sounds like they think it's a Republican conspiracy.  Does this woman have a party affiliation?
",tehForce,e9c1979,conservative
Well they shouldn't be. Kinda like the caravan no one is talking about. ,nkn_19,e9bs68i,conservative
"We need to start upvoting people in posts like this *just because*.

These people try to downvote accounts into oblivion. When I first started I had someone following me do just that. I finally got a bit more than 2k, so I’m pretty safe now.",KKN0PP,e9chlzs,conservative
Liberals are fraud.,StephenScherer1,e9bx9tc,conservative
I was just talking to a guy in another thread. There needs to be a serious push to get him to run for SoE. I disagree heavily with his politics but he seems like an honest anti-corruption Democrat... if such a thing exists.,Tau23481992,e9bumif,conservative
Stop using Google and use Duck duck go. It’s *amazing* what I have been able to find info on since I switched. And it just goes to show just how much Google suppresses for the left. ,KKN0PP,e9chizi,conservative
"Let me know when you get an answer.

&#x200B;

Lack of accountability is common in the government, sadly and it's incredibly frustrating when this type of corruption occurs.  


More than likely, they hire people to take the blame/fall and act as scapegoats in return for political favors?",Religion_N_Polyticks,e9cf84w,conservative
"If there’s a D next to it, we’ll vote for it down here. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bohjb,conservative
Cowards.,memberCP,e9c52mu,conservative
"It's funny how while this is happening leftists are up in arms rioting about how ""nobody is above the law"". Apparently they forgot to add ""except Democrats""",VoinaYMir,e9brfnb,conservative
r/politics is a shit show. I’m *sure* they are up in arms over there being a “r” in front of their politics. ,KKN0PP,e9chg15,conservative
She totally has no connections to Hillary DWS of the DNC. Zero. Trust me. Don't look.,Alex15can,e9ce81i,conservative
"I’ve been phasing DuckDuckGo into my searching but it is till hard to find evidence sufficient enough to sway middle of the road people, since they still believe that MSM is unbiased.",DocMilk,e9d2ef3,conservative
"But in all seriousness, is there not more to this? Her having a job is the least surprising thing about this, how is destroying ballots not an automatic prison sentence?  
  
Any of you from Florida know?",mp-,e9cicb6,conservative
Too bad the only sites on the whitelist in r/politics are far left liberal blogs and superpac owned sites like thinkprogress and shareblue (and media matters),ExpensiveMention,e9cry6e,conservative
"This will probably get buried but I'm a Democrat and I'm seeing the same concerns about the death of democracy because of issues in Georgia and all over the country. This is absolutely wrong that the law is being broken in Florida. It's wrong that anywhere in America citizen's are having to figh to vote. People are questioning the legitimacy of elections because of tactics by parties and individuals, we have to decide as a country that we want better and it's going to take all of us to get it. ",IAmPhilipFry,e9c3jnj,conservative
Is Broward County literally the most corrupt county around? Inept sheriffs department and now this. ,Zac1245,e9bcm55,conservative
"They just ""found"" a box of ballots at Miramar Elementary School....on Thursday afternoon, 46 hours after polls closed",YankeeBlues21,e9bj2c9,conservative
Are we suing to stop this?,hipsterdufus84,e9b8r9y,conservative
"I don't understand why the law isn't enforced. Like whoever the election officials are in these counties should be arrested. Same for when mayors of cities declare the cities sanctuary cities and refuse to enforce immigration laws.

I don't get to pick and chose the laws I want to follow with impunity, why the hell should people who work in the government?",123hig,e9bely3,conservative
"Those Broward bastards are waiting to see how many votes they need to ""recover"" for Nelson. Fuck this shit.",1wjl1,e9bagja,conservative
"They need to be in court now.  

There is a reason broward county isn't disclosing the number of votes left.  They are figuring out how many they need to get the result they want before they lie.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9bex94,conservative
Where the fuck is Pam Bondi?,ReaganTroll,e9b85hl,conservative
"As long as there's no fuckery going on, let them count the votes. ",Nevaknosbest,e9by5c7,conservative
"The incompetent Supervisor of Elections in Broward County has broken her silence and will make you even more pissed off.  FTR, she has already been under investigation for the handling of past elections.  
[https://www.local10.com/news/elections/broward-county-elections-supervisor-explains-why-its-taking-so-long-to-count-ballots](https://www.local10.com/news/elections/broward-county-elections-supervisor-explains-why-its-taking-so-long-to-count-ballots)",TBSportsFan1254,e9bcgik,conservative
Reminds me of when hundreds of Al Franken ballots were “found” in the back of a trunk in 2008. ,CherryCokeNixon,e9blmzo,conservative
"Hey mods, sticky this.  This cannot be allowed.",StraightNewt,e9bb23h,conservative
"Unbelievable they have refused to state how many they have left. It's been 2 damn days. 

Tells me they either are scrambling because they fucked something up or they are up to something illegal. ",MajesticMulva,e9bjfef,conservative
Corruption at every level.,TBSportsFan1254,e9b8caa,conservative
"Edit Updates 2: @marcorubio: This video,posted by an Independent Cong candidate in 18 (who was endorsed by Bernie Sanders in 16) purports to show BrowardCounty ballots being transported from polling places in private cars. Has anyone in local media looked into this claim or asked elections dept about it?

Updates via twitter:

@marcorubio: This report comes from reporter at South Florida Sun-Sentinel reporting from the #BrowardElections office; ""Ooops! Looks like the 205 provisional ballots that were approved by the Broward elections office and tabulated maybe should have gone to the canvassing board first so they could be challenged by the candidates' reps. Stay tuned.@lbarszweski""

@charlescwcooke: Scott bluntly says that Broward County and Palm Beach County are finding votes ""until they get the results they want."" Calls for the FL Department of Law Enforcement to ""investigate.""

@charlescwcooke: Rick Scott notes that 100,000 votes have been ""found,"" in addition to the numbers publicly released by Broward and Palm Beach, and that nobody can say where they came from or how many remain. He uses the words ""bad faith"" and ""fraud"" to describe Brenda Snipes.",Zyrioun,e9bwuy5,conservative
"Well, its Democratic counties. Rules are different for them. ",molon-labe7,e9b89jv,conservative
[removed],,e9c0yo0,conservative
"If they get away with this, our republic is pretty much done. ",iwasthebeaver,e9b8rjs,conservative
I am legit unironically triggered at this bullshit. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bal6d,conservative
"Just like the Good Old Days when the democrats would find a box of ballots they 'forgot' to count.

All of these late ballots should be tossed out by law. 

",ozric101,e9bbifp,conservative
"Broward County voter here. This is FUCKED up. I just checked my voter status online and it says that my mail absentee ballot was ""tabulated"" so HOPEFULLY I'm good. But still, something is extremely fishy here and I'm really concerned that they are magically going to find the necessary votes to push Gillum and Nelson over the finish line. I really hope Rubio, the campaigns, GOP officials get ON this because they may be trying to pull a fast one. ",itsnammertime,e9bk3on,conservative
Shouldn't every vote count? ,LogicInText,e9brxzn,conservative
"If they can’t reliably win elections anymore, the Dem’s goal is becoming to make them become illegitimate entirely ",YankeeBlues21,e9b90q2,conservative
This literally affects my mother and I directly as we did early voting at FAU in PBC. Ridiculous how no matter what election it is it's always us and Broward at the center of election scandals.,Unforgivenfive,e9bmq1r,conservative
"Well the issue here is not as straightforward to me.  The county is in the wrong - theres no doubt.  The election officials of Broward should be punished.

But should the votes not count?  If the people voted ahead of time, the simple fact the election officials messed up is NOT on the voter, and that persons voice should NOT be taken away.  As long as they can show the vote itself was on time I dont see how these votes can stop.",PTLove,e9bidnq,conservative
"And this is why I always vote in person on the day and recommend that others do too. Lots more eyes on the process on election day at my polling place with a certified chain of custody.

Early voting sounds like a good idea, but lots of opportunity for things to go bad when there are less watchful eyes.",doomrabbit,e9bfn3g,conservative
"I was going to make a comment about law enforcement and Broward county, but I won't.",justhere2havefun,e9bavt8,conservative
"Hey, I'm from Broward. Be happy they haven't burned any buildings down in protest, though there honestly might be drugs involved. No seriously.",Neckbeardascended26,e9bp1ik,conservative
If there's any justice their authority to count votes should be rescinded. Send in the FBI and send the votes to be counted some place else.,dontshootthattank,e9c54lx,conservative
What is being done about it? This is a literal example of a threat to democracy... Which I have been told for 2 years is the worst thing ever ,BeachCruisin22,e9blk8r,conservative
Literally rigging ,TrumpwonHilDawgLost,e9bqbeh,conservative
Just the only thing that makes me mad  about these things is that imagine if the Republican Party did this. It’d make headlines,lukeisun7,e9bq5dh,conservative
[removed],,e9btxk9,conservative
"They just stole the election in Arizona too. But no, it's Russia we should be worried about. 

We need to make it clear that you can't steal elections. McSally and Scott should simply report to work when the senate starts up, regardless of how many votes the Democrats are able to manufacture. Just ignore Sinema and Nelson. If a court tries to rule otherwise, ignore the ruling. Don't let another Al Franken happen.",Glsbnewt,e9by7ih,conservative
"So they're trying to figure out how to pool in extra democrat votes to sway the election numbers, and deliberately breaking state law to do it. Why is this not surprising? ",xJownage,e9c26r0,conservative
"I honestly thought, real life-ending political violence was going to wait at least few years. But alas if this blatant fraud is allowed to stand then I fear someone is going to lose their cool and do something rash. Hell, even if it’s stopped it could happen anyway.",RightWingFreak,e9c49ae,conservative
The Dems are up to the same fraud in Arizona now as well.,ecfreeman,e9bg6pe,conservative
"I was wondering what the Acosta smoke screen was trying to distract from...

VOTER FRAUD",wynhdo,e9bn5au,conservative
No irregularities to see here. Move along.,Lepew1,e9bbmok,conservative
Something so strange going on. Seeing a bunch of my liberal friends post a pic of Gillum with him urging his supporters to call the election officials and tell them they want their vote counted. Is he telling them to vote after the election? This is so bizarre and if we can’t protect the dignity of our elections what is left.,the-divine-comedy,e9bd8xb,conservative
It's almost like they had more early voting and vote by mail ballots than expected or something. ,mdconnors,e9bzj9t,conservative
No surprise the place is a Democratic stronghold. It takes longer than the law allows when they must additionally count the votes of all those dead people.,StephenScherer1,e9bn4cu,conservative
They don’t know how many they have until they know how many they need.,HiGloss,e9boqyx,conservative
cheating to get elected? Say it ain’t so lol,EnditAll4me,e9bp5wz,conservative
They know there is no law,indrid_colder,e9bhjbw,conservative
"It’s BS that they’re still counting after 43 hours. Though I’m not inclined to call corruption just yet bc even though the law requires all votes to be counted 30 min after polls close, there’s a recount happening so that changes things if I’m understanding the law correctly.",PoliticPetes,e9bi6be,conservative
It's ok! 100000 democratic votes from a city of 1000 citizens will totally change the elections in democrats favor!,Electroyote,e9bitzs,conservative
"GOP needs to [investigate the dems voter fraud](http://archive.is/bf50f).

It's obvious that dems are trying to steal Florida.",LastationNeoCon,e9bpv5f,conservative
"Sticky this bs, this is crazy",Tantalus4200,e9bzrji,conservative
"It's not rocket science to make the connection why they don't give a total count immediately after the election. 

They want to know how many added votes they need to fib the democrats into office",Moonthrower,e9bvrsw,conservative
Dirtycrats.,Mr_Hyde_,e9bp46c,conservative
[deleted],,e9boc8d,conservative
[deleted],,e9bcvly,conservative
The Left always eventually win,aJVRa,e9br1tp,conservative
"Well you really have to find the balance between verifying legal voters and “suppressing” specific votes. 

I voted in GA and had absolutely no issue. The process was secure, smooth and easy. There was basically no way to commit fraud. 

The fact that some people think requiring ID or accurate personal info to be voter suppression is crazy to me. They also think distance to the polling place is voter suppression. 

So as a Democrat why do you think those things are voter suppression? Using identification and driving are things most people do every single day yet when it comes to protecting our voting system it’s suddenly suppression. 

And if you do think all those things aren’t legitimate what would you do to fix them? If you stop requiring ID then you get votes from non citizens (nice way of putting it), the dead, people who already voted and minors. If you worry about anyone’s travel distance to polling then you’d have to put a polling place evey half mile. 

I’m not trying to be rude but how could any sane person argue against having an ID to vote. It’s a very common thing to use your ID and shouldn’t even be a talking point. 

Now on the other hand you have people actually breaking the law in democratic strong holds. They broken the chain of custody while transporting ballots, still counted provisional and absentee ballots after the legal time had expired, destroyed ballots and continued to block inquiries into any numbers or vote numbers 48 hours after the polls closed. 

So again, I don’t mean to be rude, but i don’t see how you could possibly compare the two situations. ",Chootum,e9cwfyd,conservative
"Georgia aside, nobody has to fight to vote here. It’s easy all over the place, and it is the VOTER’S responsibility to ensure registration. It is the voters responsibility to ensure he has completed the basic steps required to cast a verifiably legal vote.

",TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9cazk8,conservative
"A friend of mine was running as a berniecrat progressive against Mark Bogen, the county vice mayor for Broward county commissioner. In addition to having to deal with his car getting towed regularly by Bogen's friends, a mysterious ""write in party"" candidate appears just before the primary, which made it a closed primary. My friend Ryan had been building a coalition outside the party and needless to say was destroyed when it became dem only. To nobody's surprise, the new challenger did nothing, and when Ryan initiated legal action was represented by his Lawyer... Mark Bogen. So yea, Broward is fucked up.",piper06w,e9btka4,conservative
"One time I was leaving on a cruise out of one of the ports in Broward and the sheriffs patrol boat ran into the cruise ship, knocking out an officer and forcing our boat to leave four hours late.

Literally the only experience I’ve ever had in Florida and it did not leave a good impression.",redfern962,e9c5ezw,conservative
"> Is Broward County literally the most corrupt county around

No, I think Cook County wins that contest.  Broward is a strong contender for \#2 however.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9blpfu,conservative
"Read through this tweet thread of Rubio's below about Broward. 
 The county is terribly run.  

https://twitter.com/marcorubio/status/1060596888372699136

Rubio has been putting all sorts of stuff out on Twitter about this too.   It's really worth a read through it.

https://twitter.com/marcorubio

",Roez,e9bpkf1,conservative
"Our SoE has ALWAYS been a corrupt Dem cesspool. And we never run anyone against Brenda Snipes either. Had to write my cat’s name in last time. 

In the primaries this year, they “found” a van full of 9,000 “absentee ballots”",YankeeBlues21,e9bd3im,conservative
"Out of the big ones, probably.",ReaganTroll,e9bcu83,conservative
Truly a toss up with Dade depending on the decade.,Cronus6,e9bndj3,conservative
So many graveyards so many new Demoncratic voters.,StephenScherer1,e9bn8yz,conservative
"This reeks.  I don't understand how a county can't say, ""we took X number of votes, we only have Y, where's X-Y gone to?""

I thought basic practices like that were mandatory?  How do these states even conduct an audit if they don't have basic information.  ",Roez,e9bpxn9,conservative
They just found a box Milwaukee too lol,VincibeLemur03,e9c4s2q,conservative
"I know you all hate this, but public record. Let anybody run throught the votes and verify they aren't illegals or dead.",Philletto,e9bqg1g,conservative
46 days and the cole ran out!,Marmar1117,e9bwj4t,conservative
"Per the letter of the law, anything they didn't report on time is null and void.",happybirthdaydude,e9bbttg,conservative
"Two days after the election, we still don't know how many people voted in Broward.  This is insane.  Regardless of the count, the number of people who came in to vote or mailed a ballot should be obvious to anybody in charge.

If the GOP cannot stop this, we are screwed.  The Democrats can steal any election they want in direct contravention of the law.",nited_states,e9bhfqg,conservative
"Who's going to enforce it, the Broward County Sheriff's office?  They don't exactly have a stellar record...",alienvalentine,e9c0rvh,conservative
"I understand your point, but this would be impossible to carry out in reality. Governments—like people and entities injured by tortfeasors—have limited time, limited money, and limited legal personnel. Litigation (while a valuable tool) is chancy and sometimes very lengthy. They have to pick and choose what’s worth expending those resources on. 

I don’t know anything about Florida law on this, but there are also constitutional and statutory limits on (1) who can sue (2) whom for (3) what kind of relief that might make it impossible to enforce the law.

And many *many* questionable (or even obviously illegal) actions by governments and non-governments alike go on forever because they are never challenged.

I’m not from Florida and have no idea whether this situation should be a priority. But to answer your “I can’t pick and choose what laws to follow; why can they?” question, the answer is because no one is stopping them—and that is because the process to do so takes a lot of effort. (And honestly you probably *do* pick and choose what laws to follow because of this reality too: you may occasionally roll a stop sign, or go slightly above the speed limit, or share Netflix account, or maintain a Facebook account not in your legal name, or pirate songs, or post a yard sign without your landlord’s permission, or any number of everyday activities that are or might be illegal. I’m not saying those actions are culpable in the way voter fraud would be, just that everyone makes a calculus.)",SuurAlaOrolo,e9borq0,conservative
Sanctuary cities is why sessions is out,collectijism,e9br17w,conservative
Exactly what is going on.  If they admit how many are left to be counted they can't come up with a given number.  We need to do the same shit in the panhandle.,WIlf_Brim,e9bdmjn,conservative
Coward County,DeadHeadLibertarian,e9baq23,conservative
This. And hide or destroy unwanted red votes. ,socrates40000,e9bgvki,conservative
Hmm. She got in trouble for destroying the ballots too fast... Nothing fishy about that...,strallweat,e9bcrgj,conservative
How in the actual fuck is she still employed for this?,MigzMando,e9bhj8k,conservative
"Yup, and that's how he got elected.  It was 800 votes difference or something.  ",Roez,e9bqc2k,conservative
"Or the 2000 election where each time they recounted democrats ""found"" more Al Gore votes.",ultimis,e9brbep,conservative
"How is that not a break in the chain of custody. 

I mean we’re at a point where all this shit should be really easy to figure out. So I’m starting to wonder exactly why we haven’t taken care of this stuff since it seems to happen evey election. ",Chootum,e9cx0d7,conservative
"Ballots for me, Al Franken.",TheComedianGLP,e9c4qd9,conservative
Agree this needs to be stickied ,SanduskyTicklers,e9c0qut,conservative
In both parties.,KrazyKukumber,e9bs94y,conservative
We need laws to keep Republicans from cheating! Otherwise our cheating would be less effective!,burtmaklin1,e9b96wz,conservative
"Just to be clear, you're saying that both parties are corrupt and guilty of shady tactics like this, righ?
",KrazyKukumber,e9bsjdz,conservative
"It would be one thing if this happened once or twice. But it has happened in many states and the ""found"" votes are *always* for the dems, and it's always for *just* enough votes after they know how much they're down by.

It's not a case of legitimate votes not being counted. It's election fraud, and it has been a tactic that the dems have been using for years and years because the GOP has never pushed back.",jtljtljtljtl,e9cb4oi,conservative
"Already did in New Mexico where it was called then hours later oops found some more.

And then this in SC

https://mobile.twitter.com/TheLastRefuge2/status/1060405898538033152",Enzo_SAWFT,e9baae5,conservative
You think our republic is done if voters don't have their ballot invalidated because someone is slow at counting? Or is there some other scheme going on here?,BaronVonFunke,e9bca97,conservative
Gotta be carefull though: They could be withheld red votes. Throwing them out may well be what they were hoping for.,SaiHottari,e9bmmrx,conservative
"The legit ones. That's not the issue.  The issue is how do we know what ones are legit or not when they aren't even saying how many were taken in by the close of the election?  

If this county didn't have such a terrible track record, including destroying ballots early, it might not be as much of a concern.  ",Roez,e9btknr,conservative
"Just wait until they lose enough elections to declare voting itself to be ""racist"".",justhere2havefun,e9basz9,conservative
That’s the problem is how do you validate that the votes weren’t created after the fact? You would have to have independent investigators go to every single person whose vote was counted in that fashion and verify their vote. Anything less is unacceptable and worse than throwing away the votes. The county officials should be removed from office as their ineptitude disenfranchised their voters. The law is the law and frankly if the rule of law is not followed then this state is lost. ,Tau23481992,e9bl6t4,conservative
"It seems to me that if you are going to vote early or by mail, your ballot should be sitting in some official facility on election day.  The total number of ballots in that facility should be known.

We are now two days removed from election day and nobody can even say how many ballots exist in Broward County.  How do you not know this?  Forget the actual count—all we want to know (as the law requires) is how many people voted.  This should be recorded.

This is either extreme incompetence or malice.  Either one threatens the integrity of the democratic system.",nited_states,e9blq75,conservative
The “think of the ____” mentality is why Democrats get away with everything. It’s a tough situation. ,Chootum,e9cx7q1,conservative
"Don’t come here as a leftist concern troll and pretend it’s something else. We’re not stupid. You know damn well what’s being talked about here — it’s got nothing to do with ‘making your voice count’ and *everything* to do with fraud. 

Edit:

Do you people really think we care about your brigading? Coming in here like children to downvote things you don’t like is a genius move — really. Sure fills me with empathy for your phony fuckin’ causes. ",CabinDownBelow,e9bk6wg,conservative
Funny... it's elected Democrats in democrat counties that always fuck up.,Moonthrower,e9bvnyf,conservative
Yeah how come this is only happening on Democratic counties in red states? Really makes you think 🤔,RepubliKin,e9c0kiz,conservative
"Lol, that's ridiculous. Have you seen the full video? If anyone is trying to smoke screen anything it's sarah huckabees doctored video",BrumDawgMillionare,e9brnbj,conservative
Acosta smokescreen? Maybe if the right didn't keep saying he attacked her there wouldn't be one.,explosiveteddy,e9bqxjo,conservative
That’s for if they did a mail ballot and it had an error of some kind that had got it thrown out. I am not sure of the process for fixing them though and what sort of protections there are for ensuring nothing illegal occurs. It needed to be “cured” by 5pm today or else it’s definitively voided. ,Tau23481992,e9bkvzt,conservative
Source to back up that snark?,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9cflja,conservative
Yeah but the ballots that they are currently filling out to add to the pile will count in a recount too.,r777m,e9brx30,conservative
"This post came up under all, I'm not a conservative. If the law is 30 minutes, it should be followed. If they have a problem with the law, they should suggest changes be implemented. It sounds more like gross incompetency rather than something malicious. It is a hardcore blue county, so it isn't like a heavy democratic vote isn't expected. And if there IS something malicious going on, it should be investigated.",NotNyuda,e9c165i,conservative
And Arizona ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bvzdz,conservative
"It opens up room for fraud.  By not following the steps and providing a proper accounting, no one can later say, ""you had so many at election close, why did that number go up?""

It's worth noting this county is terrible at running elections, which means there's not much confidence people on their own inside the office aren't playing shenanigans.  

Everyone wants and is entitled to transparency.  ",Roez,e9btzn5,conservative
"Florida went Republican in Senate and Governor(a big and unexpected loss for the Dems), if they get what they want they might change that and totally change Florida's coarse for the next 2 years.",ardubeaglepi8266,e9br9h4,conservative
"They haven't even reported how many ballots they received and how many they need to count. If we can't even verify if they are telling the truth of how many votes they got, what makes you think we can trust what votes they have that are going to where?",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bf1dv,conservative
You at least say there’s a pile of 500 votes here that we will count. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9be8vq,conservative
"> So if the government is too slow at its job, your vote gets thrown in the trash?

Think of it like a statue of limitations.  It's a safeguard.  You can't just ""find"" thousands of ballots days after the election, otherwise we'd just start seeing that tactic used in every county eventually.",Telineye,e9bjujq,conservative
Progressive or not that shit shouldn’t be happening to anyone. People should be able to compete and win fair and square. ,Zac1245,e9bu1ma,conservative
How do you not see a cruise ship in front of you lol. ,Zac1245,e9c5hel,conservative
Fair.,Nonethewiserer,e9bxcgo,conservative
"They ""left behind"" a whole tub of ballots. WTF",Zac1245,e9byx1b,conservative
He’s making the Lindsey Graham Republican super saiyan evolution over this,YankeeBlues21,e9bqmuz,conservative
Please tell me the van was down by the river... ,AeonTek,e9bjajw,conservative
"They found a van, you have to be kidding me. ",Zac1245,e9bdj8e,conservative
"You can't even make this shit up, they don't even hide it",LastationNeoCon,e9bpt2e,conservative
Did they say it was Cesar Sayoks van?,srThoits,e9bzl6i,conservative
"That's just the tip of the iceberg.  The bigger issue is that there is absolutely chain of custody with any of these ballots that are being discovered God only knows where, and we don't know the total number of outstanding ballots to make sure there is no fraud.               ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bx8zx,conservative
They are going to scream voter suppression and the corrupt media will follow along.,the-divine-comedy,e9bbx3h,conservative
But are we going to sue over it?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bc6pv,conservative
Source please?,BirchSquid789,e9cav99,conservative
There's no way that will happen. Time to grow a pair and tell Dems to play by the rules or face the consequences.,PigsAndCats,e9bk78d,conservative
Not trying to disagree only trying to educate myself - - do you have a source to this law?,KingGrowl,e9bwft3,conservative
"> Regardless of the count, the number of people who came in to vote or mailed a ballot should be obvious to anybody in charge.

This exactly.  This is the problem.  ",Roez,e9bq0h6,conservative
"Same in Georgia. The Democrats won't concede because there is still absentee ballots to count. Well, there's about 25k absentee ballots to be counted and even if every single one went blue there still wouldn't be enough votes to push Kemp below 50%. It's BS and the media isn't calling them out on it. ",haplogreenleaf,e9blpaw,conservative
"Yup, and you can only do a recount 30 minutes after it ends, not 2 days. They can't get away with this. ",mw3noobbuster,e9bm84z,conservative
"This is about election integrity. Without it our system of government is meaningless. It should be absolute top priority to enforce election laws, and bring those who break those laws to justice.",_Hospitaller_,e9brguc,conservative
"There are allegedly now fewer reported votes for Senate than for Agriculture Secretary in Broward. Also, 4% of Broward ballots voted for Governor but didn't vote for Senate (over 25k). No other county had more than a 1% discrepancy....

B U L L S H I T",YankeeBlues21,e9bjzh0,conservative
Corrupt Dems keep electing her. She’s of the same stock as Debbie Wasserman-Shultz. Andrew Gillum is equally corruptible so of course they’re going to do this to get him in as Governor.,Tau23481992,e9bjubt,conservative
cuz Democrats.,TheComedianGLP,e9c4xh3,conservative
"Are you just here to say “Nuh uhhhhh, you toooooo.”?",OstentatiousSock,e9bv7cy,conservative
"It's not cheating. Stop using that word. It's ""resisting"", not cheating. ",molon-labe7,e9b9z4i,conservative
"No, because it’s consistently democratic strongholds that this happens in.",Masterjason13,e9cf4vx,conservative
"Starting to think we need a do over election, with strict rules and poll watchers in place. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7bu4,conservative
And in Wisconsin,samiam0295,e9byn35,conservative
">Or is there some other scheme going on here?

It's certainly fishy in that the Panhandle counties that got shellacked by the hurricane managed to count all of their ballots (including mail and early voting ballots which are at issue in Broward) when their infrastructure was completely destroyed.  I don't know if you are a Floridian or not, but Broward county has a history of cocking up elections (including the 2000) election.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bcn9w,conservative
"they are ""finding"" ballots and the Election Officials won't say how many more ballots they have left to ""find"". And they are coming in at like 100% democrat. Its absurd and its actually against Florida Law, not like the law means anything anymore. ",iwasthebeaver,e9bd6lb,conservative
"Yeah, I don’t think you understand the process well lol. Just scurry back to r/politics",pro_nosepicker,e9bjf3s,conservative
"All real votes should count, Democrat or Republican.

The issue is these votes seem incredibly suspicious.  Not only has the chain of custody been broken, but they've just been laying around for two days in a box.

They should either be ignored, or a new vote needs to take place with an impartial body overseeing it.",Telineye,e9c7hbl,conservative
Except this just happened to be the bluest county in FL... 🤷🏻‍♂️,why-this,e9btv4l,conservative
"Wrong....and the person who broke the Florida Election laws needs to be prosecuted. 

It does not matter if you win by 1 inch or 1 mile a win is a win.",ozric101,e9bn3t0,conservative
Not in Broward,OneMe2RuleUAll,e9byhs6,conservative
">The legit ones. That's not the issue.  The issue is how do we know what ones are legit or not when they aren't even saying how many were taken in by the close of the election?  

Now this is where we agree. I think they should say how many they have. The only disagreement that im making is how long they should have to count them. 



>If this county didn't have such a terrible track record, including destroying ballots before they could be verified, it might not be as much of a concern.  

This is also where I can understand the concern. I don't think they should be allowed to destroy the ballots but I also think they should be allowed to count them all even if it goes beyond the 30 minute time frame. ",LogicInText,e9bugbv,conservative
I am surprised 4chan hasn't tried this angle yet,soxfan90,e9bhox3,conservative
"Usually with data validation, you don't do every single one.  You pick a random 10% or something and verify those. Unless you find a problem, then you do more.",mermaidKT,e9c3y3e,conservative
"So your solution is to outright throw out potentially valid votes?  I don’t consider that a option, it’s the most fundamental principle of our republic. 

Paper trails exist. I’m sure you can quantify a ballot was mailed to X person by a barcode of some sort. ",PTLove,e9blkmc,conservative
"It’s a little hard for me to argue against this. Depends on what the postmark date required is in Florida. From what I can tell they must be received by 7pm on Election Day. Absentee is just must be postmarked by Election Day and received up to 3 days later. 

I still find incompetence (a very basic human trait) far more compelling then a nefarious theme to cheat. ",PTLove,e9bm70i,conservative
"I don’t hide my leanings. I still don’t see how what you said is relevant. 

There are lawyers from both sides present. The legislature in the state is GOP controlled, and Scott does not lack for resources personally. You can believe incompetence, which is the most straightforward answer, or something nefarious, that magically flies past all those lawyers and money. You’ll excuse me if I don’t find the cheating argument more compelling. ",PTLove,e9blghb,conservative
[removed],,e9c28n3,conservative
"I saw the video and it clearly shows him pushing her arm away and keeping her from getting the mic away from him.   He should have gotten his credentials pulled a long time ago.   

He got what he wanted, so he can scream about the 1st amendment which is what is really rediculous.   If you disagree you're not paying attention. ",wynhdo,e9bushy,conservative
"Itd be nice, too, if the Left actually acknowledged their own bullshit. Unlikely that happens anytime soon, though. ",Ledcookey,e9c8tb9,conservative
That along with alot of the other states that dems won in Red America.,LastationNeoCon,e9bwi33,conservative
[deleted],,e9bf9as,conservative
[deleted],,e9bkf2d,conservative
"I fear it will do no good, but he's right.  This can't be allowed to happen over and over.  Especially when there's cause for concern about the validity.

No clue what the law is there, but perhaps a Federal Judge would have the authority to step in and mandate how it has to be run, and appoint an independent law firm (law judge or whatever) to supervise the judge's mandates were put in place. ",Roez,e9brvm6,conservative
"Was it down by the river? 


Edit: /u/aeontek beat me to the joke. Fuck.",LogicInText,e9buqqd,conservative
"I mean, I would be pissed if my vote wasn't counted because the polling place didn't get their shit together",Horse_Ebooks_47,e9bzg4b,conservative
They already are in /news. Ignoring the fact it's the law. ,valmeister,e9blj8a,conservative
"Let them.  At this point it should be clear and obvious that no amount of appeasing the screeching left will ever be enough for them, so fuck 'em.  If they missed the cutoff then that's a problem they should make sure to solve for *next* election.",anuser999,e9c568h,conservative
And the rest of us know it's falsified votes... Again,nBob20,e9boef3,conservative
"There are Republican Party of Florida lawyers heading to (already at?) the Broward SoE Office. A recount is scheduled for Saturday with RPOF staff in attendance, but, according to Tim Canova (the Dem who ran against DWS in the 2016 primary, as an NPA this time, and sued the county SoE last election) the chain of custody of ballots has been broken and there won’t be a way to confirm that the same amount (plus or minus) are involved in the recount. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bd00s,conservative
"Problem is, it's the government.",ryph,e9bsmzt,conservative
"Shouldn't it be top priority to ensure that every vote counts?  If you don't count one of those votes, then you can't really say it was a fair election if one rights are trampled on.",LogicInText,e9bs4wy,conservative
When you are cranking out hundreds of fake ballots it's so easy to forget one place or two.,WIlf_Brim,e9c3job,conservative
"Also we never run a Republican against her. Granted, they wouldn’t win since Broward is so blue. 

My pet project is going to be trying to talk Tim Canova into running as an NPA if he knows he’d have the GOP and his own Bernie wing behind him. He *hates* the SoE and DWS down here and is a stickler for election transparency. I don’t care about the SoE’s opinion on taxes, I care that they count the votes. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bm1la,conservative
"""Electing"" .... sure...",Player_17,e9bp8zj,conservative
Democracy has failed us!,Philletto,e9bqm7g,conservative
"Provide a fingerprint ID, which is extremely difficult to fake. Wouldn't be the worst idea. ",psstein,e9cd5sq,conservative
"It’s also shady that every other major city NYC, Chicago, LA, Houston all can count in a timely manner. Then there’s the Miami area.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9bdue7,conservative
"Reading up, Broward does seem to have a pretty shady past with elections. Some investigations need to happen if they happen to destroy the ballots before the smoke clears. Although at this point the process of electing representative has been so debased that it feels odd to fixate on this one example without also being extremely disturbed by pretty much every other part of the process as well. ",BaronVonFunke,e9bdeci,conservative
"I'm always happy to improve my knowledge and change my mind, what do you believe I'm missing?",BaronVonFunke,e9bjjfy,conservative
"If the SoE doesn’t follow the law yes. This sham can not be allowed to stand. Only two counties in the entire state have failed to report their numbers, Broward and Palm Beach. If Miami-Dade can do it on time so can Broward. There is no excuse and any disenfranchisement falls on the hands of the Broward/PB SoEs the prior of which was already in legal trouble for illegally destroying primary ballots prematurely in 2016 when those ballots were being challenged in court. Snipes is as corrupt as they come and this will go to the SCOTUS if it comes to it. ",Tau23481992,e9bmnqz,conservative
"I think the phrase is"" never attribute to malice which can easily be explained by incompetence""",Zetesofos,e9bniba,conservative
"When it happens consistently in the same way on a regular basis, and always to the benefit of one side over the other, incompetence stops being a plausible explanation.",GameShowWerewolf,e9bno4i,conservative
[removed],,e9bme6l,conservative
"Miami-Dade was fine, Leon County (Tallahassee) was fine, every other county red or blue besides this was fine except  Palm Beach and the one repped by DWS, who infamously rigged the primaries, and had legal restrictions placed on it because of fears of election security. Nope, not buying it",RepubliKin,e9c34c6,conservative
If you have x number of envelopes from mail in ballots you can count those up without opening and tallying the contents inside. If you have y number of early voting you can easily count those in a reasonable time.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bfgjx,conservative
"They are able to report how many ballots they have received, counting them refers to counting which ballot goes to which candidate. They haven't even reported how many they received, so we have no idea if anything regarding the vote total there is truthful.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bfo3b,conservative
"When you show up to vote, your name is recorded as a voter (so that you cannot vote twice, for instance).  Figuring out how many votes we're cast is as simple as tallying up the voter roll.

We don't know how anybody votes, but we do know *who* votes.  Or, at least, virtually every county in America does.  Except Broward.",nited_states,e9bhzy4,conservative
"Hilariously, the same woman at the head of this debacle destroyed ballots in 2016.",Telineye,e9bmpcm,conservative
Either way lol I don’t know how you fucking lose a van ,Zac1245,e9byjdk,conservative
"They have their shit together though. Thats the problem. They were waiting to see how many tubs of ballots they had to ""find"" ",iwasthebeaver,e9c2wz3,conservative
> REEEEEEEEEE ITS TOTALLY NORMAL TO FIND SEVERAL BOXES FULL OF DEMOCRATIC VOTERS BALLOTS.,Penguin_Party12345,e9bzemw,conservative
Can you link me the thread?,General_Queipo,e9c02g5,conservative
This is a huge problem.  If you can't confirm a break in chain of custody it is hard to throw them out.,TBSportsFan1254,e9bhi6q,conservative
So are we suing? We need to sue over this shit. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bd4ot,conservative
Do you have a good suggestion or two where I can follow this from the local level?  Is there a group putting out updates?,Roez,e9bs04c,conservative
That's terrible.  What's worse is people pretend there's no problem with it because it's their side.  ,Roez,e9bq3jr,conservative
"Accepting late votes AFTER the total tallies of the election are decided is a guaranteed way to get fraud.

Further, if you accept votes that weren’t properly handled and had the huge possibility of being tampered with, you risk invalidation of far more votes than otherwise. Election procedures and laws exist for a reason.",_Hospitaller_,e9bsju7,conservative
"Dumping random piss into a urine test invalidates the test.

Why are you being thick about this?",TheComedianGLP,e9c3og8,conservative
"That’s a great idea. A good friend of mine took a law school class he taught and loved him, she’s likeminded to us too. ",Tau23481992,e9bmygo,conservative
"The irony might be, from what I am reading, is by no one running against some of these D's it might explain why Broward has less votes for Senator than Governor by about 3.5% (much lower than the rest of the state).  

The theory being the box for Senate was on the same side where the R candidate would be, but on the very bottom.  Since that side is empty, they think a lot of people missed it.  It was a new ballot design (in a county run by all Democrats).  Apparently, this problem came up in a couple wards in particular and they are tracing the lower Senate votes to those specifically (but I haven't seen confirmation this is true). ",Roez,e9bsox7,conservative
"I might be retarded, damnit ",Tau23481992,e9bq4lh,conservative
"Fortunately we are not a democracy.

We are a Constitutional republic.",TheComedianGLP,e9c4ukn,conservative
"Those cities listed have tons of polling locations, so it's pretty easy to count millions of votes in a relatively short time. ",LogicInText,e9bs9i1,conservative
[removed],,e9c3f0o,conservative
[deleted],,e9bg1ei,conservative
[deleted],,e9bfvjo,conservative
Apparently you need to park it by a river. ,LogicInText,e9bz1wk,conservative
I actually has the wrong story. They are going mad about the main in votes thing. ,valmeister,e9c058w,conservative
He posted a video of ballots being unloaded from unmarked civilian cars and driven away on election night. [Bizarre](https://twitter.com/Tim_Canova/status/1060575611868114944). ,YankeeBlues21,e9bit3m,conservative
I don't understand your logic here. If you have evidence in a criminal trial and the chain of custody gets broken it's thrown out. If you have ballots and chain of custody has been broken they're hard to throw out?,aCreditGuru,e9bncyn,conservative
"I don't know how you can count them.  If so I just found 75,000 ballots in the panhandle.",gbimmer,e9c7fsg,conservative
"Have to imagine once they file whatever specific grounds to sue, they will. 

This has already overturned the Sec of Agriculture result in favor of the Dems (worth noting that our Agr Sec has purview over the distribution of gun licenses...) ",YankeeBlues21,e9bd96b,conservative
"I’ve been getting them from other Republican political insiders, activists, and officials on the ground down here so I don’t know any specific sites to follow from. If I hear anything huge, I’ll be posting about it. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bs4c4,conservative
">If you accept votes that weren’t properly handled and had the huge possibility of being tampered with, you risk invalidation of far more votes than otherwise. 

Until it can be determined that a vote is being tampered with, all that is happening is a simple count. Should they not count every valid vote? 

>Election procedures and laws exist for a reason.

Yes, and that's too determine if a vote was mishandled and not to ensure that valid votes don't get counted because of arbitrary reasoning.",LogicInText,e9btajl,conservative
That's really not an accurate analogy but ok.,LogicInText,e9c4glw,conservative
"He’s absolutely a nice guy. His economics are out there, but he’s an honest person who could help clean up Snipes’ cesspool. 

I just finished being a staffer on a winning local campaign and have some prominence in local GOP circles so maybe the political visibility can get me in the door to talk to the guy about it. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bnbjh,conservative
"Yeah that’s being tossed around as an explanation. Still weird that over 25,500 voters apparently missed the senate box and didn’t think it was weird that one of the 2 big ticket races wasn’t on their ballot. 

I fielded calls on my campaign’s google voice (not MY campaign, but the one I worked on) all day Tuesday from people out of district asking about our candidate not being on their ballot. So voters had SOME idea who’d be on the ballot. ",YankeeBlues21,e9btnr0,conservative
So greater Miami does not? Bowerd county and Palm Beach are not in the middle of the Everglades. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bsnsa,conservative
"I think she had it regardless, Clinton dominated the minority vote and that’s a huge part of the Dem primary electorate. That doesn’t mean they didn’t fuck Bernie over in every conceivable way imaginable. You can rig something you would win anyway. ",RepubliKin,e9c4d2m,conservative
No it makes sense to count the envelopes you receive as you receive them as there is a legal deadline to state your amount of absentee ballots. Worry about the contents later. The law exists so nothing shady can occur and I would rather absentee voters be disenfranchised because their SoE couldn’t follow the law than millions of Floridians be disenfranchised because we allowed an election to be rigged using faked absentee ballots. ,Tau23481992,e9bm2zk,conservative
">That would be a reduplication of work, though.

It isn't about convinience, it is about supressing fraud and doing things correctly.  That is why tons of money goes into getting elections correctly.  I would be way less cynical about this if it weren't Broward County which can't go 5 years without fucking something major up.

Edit: supposedly some truck was found with thousands of ballots in it.  You reduplicate the work to prevent situations like that from happening because who is to say whether those ballots were legitimate or not, originally? ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bhrow,conservative
"The reason why is to verify that the amount of votes given to either candidate matches the votes received. Its to make sure I can't just show up with 9,000 ballots in a van (which actually did happen, by the way, but not by me) and pass them off as legitimate votes, because first off they were given illegally, second off they are given past the deadline. Since they haven't even reported how many the received when the polls closed, we again cannot verify.

The reduplication of work is purely to make sure it is legitimate.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bg27d,conservative
"Reduplicating = double checking, a good thing.  And it’s very easy to get a count of votes before determining officially who the ballot goes for.  

Every other county except the two dem strongholds get this right and done in time.  Please explain why they can’t.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9bjwk3,conservative
"No, we will get blamed for the EPA violation ",Drunkenly_Responding,e9c4vex,conservative
"Faked by the same people who faked that video of Acosta.

/s",TheComedianGLP,e9c3dc1,conservative
"You have to prove it was broken, can't assume. ",memberCP,e9bw5v7,conservative
"Better to count a *potentially illegal* vote than throw out a legitimate one accidentally.

Innocent until proven guilty",duckduckgoit,e9bnt9d,conservative
How are firearms related to agriculture lol,AyyyGreens,e9bheto,conservative
[removed],,e9btczr,conservative
">So greater Miami does not? Bowerd county and Palm Beach are not in the middle of the Everglades. 

Never said they were. Just said that the cities you listed most likely had far more polling places. ",LogicInText,e9bt1ng,conservative
This. Answer isn’t that hard. ,phi11ip,e9bsoxf,conservative
"That's proving a negative, a logical fallacy.

This can't be correct.

Proving chain of custody is a positive assertion.",TheComedianGLP,e9c3h5a,conservative
"That's essentially what I was getting at, but I don't do election law for a living, either. ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bobk5,conservative
"No idea, just the way it is down here",YankeeBlues21,e9bjpgj,conservative
Don't know - perhaps it's related to hunting.,Dial-1-For-Spanglish,e9birct,conservative
"I asked exactly this when I went to get my CCW. But after my run-ins with local law enforcement, I'm kind of sketched out by the idea of Florida LE being given more control over that aspect of my life.",richardguy,e9bnuyx,conservative
"Department of Fish & Wildlife or Fish & Game might be under Agriculture. Past legislators might have tucked guns in with hunting/fishing licenses.

Maybe? 

If the GOP controls the legislative and executive branches they could change that now.",sanjoseboardgamer,e9btktv,conservative
How do you defend your farm?,duckduckgoit,e9bnw1n,conservative
[removed],,e9bu9c0,conservative
"Let me rephrase, you would have to cast reasonable doubt upon the chain of custody. I am not a lawyer so I am not sure what the legal standard is so could be wrong. ",memberCP,e9c51ea,conservative
"Bears, mostly.  Hbu?",KilKidd,e9by1rw,conservative
"I prefer to dig a ten foot deep ditch around my farm, flood it, and fill it with alligators. It's the Florida way!",raculot,e9c4gd9,conservative
"When other counties with even more voters are able to count their votes in time, there is NO EXCUSE for counties like Broward. There is far too much possibility for fraud and abuse if you just keep extending their time to “count votes”. ",_Hospitaller_,e9bufx2,conservative
"The video of them being loaded from a private car on to a truck should suffice, no?  Or the box left for 56 hours in an elementary school?",gbimmer,e9c7iya,conservative
">When other counties with even more voters are able to count their votes in time, there is NO EXCUSE for counties like Broward. 

I've already addressed this issue. 



>There is far too much possibility for fraud and abuse if you just keep extending their time to “count votes”. 



There's also far too much possibility for fraud and abuse by not allowing every vote to be counted because of a lack of time.


Ballots shouldn't be destroyed but all votes should be verified.",LogicInText,e9buocj,conservative
"Your “addressing” of the issue was nonsense. You said count votes first, verify second. What a great way to defraud an election. 

> There's also far too much possibility for fraud and abuse

So you admit there is far too much possibility of fraud and abuse by extending vote counting indefinitely. First correct thing you’ve said this entire thread. 

I’d take the possibility of fraud within a time limit than the possibility of fraud by having people dump endless piles of manufactured votes into the tally until they reach the number they know they need to win.",_Hospitaller_,e9bv4wd,conservative
">Your “addressing” of the issue was nonsense. You said count votes first, verify second. What a great way to defraud an election. 

Phrasing could have been better but that's not what I said. you're welcome to believe it though.  

>So you admit there is far too much possibility of fraud and abuse by extending vote counting indefinitely. First correct thing you’ve said this entire thread. 

Not at all. If you add the rest of the quote you get what I said. Cherry picking a quote isn't doing your argument justice. 



>I’d take the possibility of fraud within a time limit than the possibility of fraud by having people dump endless piles of manufactured votes into the tally until they reach the number they know they need to win.

That's why they should verify votes. If you'd read the things I've said, you'd see that. ",LogicInText,e9bwsqi,conservative
Allowing specific counties to keep counting votes long after total tallies are given allows them to know exactly how many votes are needed to be manufactured for their candidate to win. This is why it's far the far more dangerous form of fraud.,_Hospitaller_,e9bx1oj,conservative
">Allowing specific counties to keep counting votes long after total tallies are given allows them to know exactly how many votes are needed to be manufactured for their candidate to win. This is why it's far the far more dangerous form of fraud.

I think all voters, regardless of county should be counted and given a reasonable time frame(couple days in my opinion). And they should all be verified. ",LogicInText,e9bxchm,conservative
Your problem is your blind faith that Democrats will verify all these votes they find AFTER they know the amount of votes they'll need to win.,_Hospitaller_,e9bxmgj,conservative
">Your problem is your blind faith that Democrats will verify all these votes they find AFTER they know the amount of votes they'll need to win.

I said votes need to be verified. The only blind faith is yours with the assumption that republicans are the only ones that should be trusted. ",LogicInText,e9by85p,conservative
"To my knowledge there has not been a single election in modern history where a Democrat was leading on election night only for a Republican to take the lead several days after the election.

However there are many cases where the reverse has happened. Senator Al Franken's election being one of the most obvious and consequential.
",_Hospitaller_,e9byl2e,conservative
">To my knowledge there has not been a single election in modern history where a Democrat was leading on election night only for a Republican to take the lead several days after the election.


Then read up on the 2004, 2006, 2008, 2010, and 2012 elections. 


>However there are many cases where the reverse has happened. Senator Al Franken's election being one of the most obvious and consequential.



Not saying you're lying but id like proof. I don't remember anything about this. 

",LogicInText,e9bzfxd,conservative
"Please provide specifics about elections where a Democrat lead on election night and later votes being found then lead to their loss.

[Here's what happened with Al Franken](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Senate_election_in_Minnesota,_2008);

""Since the unofficial results were first posted on the Minnesota Secretary of State's website, Coleman's lead had narrowed from 726 votes on November 5 to the official pre-recount tally of 215 votes on November 18. 

In accordance with state law, the Minnesota State Canvassing Board ordered a hand recount in the Senate race...

The state canvassing board certified the recounted vote totals on January 5 with Franken ahead by 225 votes.""",_Hospitaller_,e9c0483,conservative
">Please provide specifics about elections where a Democrat lead on election night and later votes being found then lead to their loss.

You might be too young to remember. Look up diebold and George w. Bush election. The results on television showed the dems up but after a blackout, the republicans were up by a wide margin. I tried finding the news footage of when it happened but to no avail. 


>The state canvassing board certified the recounted vote totals on January 5 with Franken ahead by 225 votes.""

Well, if the votes were verified, I don't see the issue.



Either way, if you were truly sincere about your argument you'd be bothered that the last three republican presidents lost the popular vote. Now i'm sure you're going to throw the ""it's a democratic republic"" line in my face and I'll give you that; however, I doubt you'd have the same stance if a Democrat was in office after losing the popular vote. ",LogicInText,e9c4ab3,conservative
"Bush was NOT behind Gore in votes in Florida at the end of election night. That does not meet the criteria I described, where a Democrat was leading on election night and a Republican passed them days later. 

From [Bish vs Gore](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_presidential_election,_2000); 

“At approximately 2:30 a.m., with some 85% of the votes counted in Florida and **Bush leading Gore by more than 100,000 votes**, the networks declared that Bush had carried Florida and therefore had been elected president. However, most of the remaining votes to be counted in Florida were located in three heavily Democratic counties—Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach—and as their votes were reported Gore began to gain on Bush. **By 4:30 a.m., after all votes were counted, Gore had narrowed Bush's margin to under 2,000 votes**, and the networks retracted their predictions that Bush had won Florida and the presidency. Gore, who had privately conceded the election to Bush, withdrew his concession. The final result in Florida was slim enough to require a mandatory recount (by machine) under state law; **Bush's lead dwindled to just over 300 votes when it was completed the day after the election**. 

> if you were truly sincere about your argument you'd be bothered that the last three republican presidents lost the popular vote

My issue is with FRAUD and manipulation, not the electoral college which is part of our Constitution.",_Hospitaller_,e9c50nw,conservative
">Bush was NOT behind Gore in votes in Florida at the end of election night.

I don't believe I specified Florida. 

>That does not meet the criteria I described, where a Democrat was leading on election night and a Republican passed them days later. 

I ignored that and went for a real issue instead. 

>My issue is with FRAUD

As with mine. Again, you're probably too young to remember what had actually happened that night. 
",LogicInText,e9c5eyb,conservative
Well you won't actually give **any** specifics. I have.,_Hospitaller_,e9c5iyf,conservative
The Babylon Bee is a treasure. ,MookieMagic,e9bv2rz,conservative
Nazis and Communists are just the National League and American League where the sport is collectivism.,aboardthegravyboat,e9c3e6q,conservative
*Real* nazism hasn't been tried. ,DenSem,e9c5mbw,conservative
[removed],,e9c0dtt,conservative
Oh Bee you scamp! Now get outta here and do some actual satire 'stead of all this real news.,UltraSurvivalist,e9cbko6,conservative
This is absolute gold. ,Nightshade37,e9c4zq5,conservative
Bernie has more in common with Fascists than actual socialists.,ultimis,e9c2sma,conservative
"Its happening right now. Anti muslim voters, anti gay, pro war... ",AntiAntiAntiFash,e9cusye,conservative
"""Nazism"".. I see that made up word everywhere. It's national-socialism you know.",fractal_lifeform,e9cn8vf,conservative
"> The things you could vote for would be stuff like how Nazi should we go? Double-Nazi? Triple-Nazi? Nazi-nine-thousand? The choices would be endless, but of course all Nazi choices.”",Quantumstinger,e9cjbkb,conservative
This is solid gold. Going to use this amongst my liberal friends.,powpowbang,e9d1s9c,conservative
I thought the sport was suffering,therealdutchman11,e9crim8,conservative
"Can we all agree on the definition of ""nazi""? ",skarface6,e9c2a1o,conservative
">active in /r/politics and /r/news

no",richardguy,e9cb0x9,conservative
Fuck communists and their antifa terrorists. Can you agree on that?,LastationNeoCon,e9c8ti2,conservative
Agreed.,Nevaknosbest,e9c0quf,conservative
"i'm not saying bernie is a maniac like mussolini, but wasn't mussolini a socialist before he became a fascist?",fireball3k,e9c88v1,conservative
most Americans don't seem to know what socialism actually means,RobotXander,e9cnqg0,conservative
"I think the terms are pretty interchangeable. In German it was Nationalsozialismus, or National Socialism, but also called Nazism. But, it's all semantics really and none of this stuff is black and white anyway. What was National Socialism isn't the same as what people necessarily mean when they socialism now.",RunagateRampant,e9cyfqw,conservative
a good ground rule would be that whatever the left claims to be nazism is almost never what nazism actually is.,fireball3k,e9c875f,conservative
"It means white people. 

I know, this may be shocking to hear. Thing is, words are defined by how they're used and especially how they're used by the people in power. Right now in  the public consciousness, this is what ""Nazi"" means and that's why people getting punched by the ""punch a nazi"" crowd are white much more often  than they're Japanese and never have swastica tattoos. It may be a definition conservatives don't  like, that conservatives wish  was different, and what have you, but that's the definition for all practical purposes. The only way to deny that ""Nazi"" means something other than ""white person"" is to come up with some intangible metaphysical navel gazing thing that will not impact discourse one bit and will leave you sitting in a room feeling smug while the world moves on without you. Nazi = white person. 

Anyone who disagrees with me is free to put this to the test. Go find any leftist discourse and replace the word ""Nazi"" with ""white person."" If whatever they're saying seems to be basically the  same thing (or dare I say, more accurate!), then you know I'm correct.",Hmmmming,e9c8ffh,conservative
this is a troll account,richardguy,e9cba95,conservative
"Yes he was a socialist his entire life. Fascism was based off of ""an evolution"" of the socialist ideology. They used the ""transitional state"" that communist literature supported to implement their utopia, and decided that was the end goal. As instead of the collective, it would be the ""state"" (slightly different).

Socialists of the early and mid 20th century saw the transitional state as a means to an end. The fascists saw it as the end. Bernie has no interest in reducing the size or scope of the state, thus he is more aligned with the Fascists.",ultimis,e9c8d7y,conservative
"Oh really? Hm, I thought all those black, gay or jewish people supporting Socialism were actually supporting Nazis?

Super eye-opening that it turns out Nazism may not necessarily be the same as what those people mean by Socialism; Neat!",MorePointsThanShalov,e9cznir,conservative
National socialism,SuperiiorX,e9d2ym3,conservative
Leftese dictionary? Lord Klavan is that you!?,callthereaper64,e9c9k5e,conservative
[removed],,e9cbcop,conservative
"dang. i suppose i need to bone up on my history, then. would make it easier to deal with my peers who champion socialism.",fireball3k,e9cdpqn,conservative
"Yeah, black/gay/jewish people did not support Nazis, especially because they were killed by them because they were considered lesser human.

Socialism is not the same as Nazism. Nazism is synonymous with ""National Socialism"" but that's not the same as ""Socialism,"" which is obviously confusing because they both say Socialism. Nazism is called National Socialism but is really a form of fascism.",RunagateRampant,e9d1i8z,conservative
"You make yourselves so obvious just by pretending so hard to be a conservative. Anyway, six years account and just a few hundred karma? Ok.",richardguy,e9cbgsx,conservative
"Be prepared for a nasty argument, the left hates hearing that the fascists were leftists. They have been brainwashed into believing it's an ""extreme right wing"" movement. You ask them why they state ""Nationalism"" and ""Racism"". As in left wing governments have not been nationalistic (which they very much were during the time of Stalin and Mao). Or that somehow ""racism"" is left wing even though progressive heroes Woodrow Wilson and FDR were up to their necks in the KKK and other racist associations.

Post modernist thought as allowed them to label anything that is known to be bad as ""right wing"" so it makes them feel better about the intellectually and morally bankrupt movement they are associated with.",ultimis,e9cdwrg,conservative
"""The only feasible socialism socialisticamente is corporatism, confluence, balance and justice interests compared to the collective interest."" its still a market economy in his mind



Mussolini rejected egalitarianism, a core doctrine of socialism.[6] He was influenced by Nietzsche's anti-Christian ideas and negation of God's existence. [40] Mussolini felt that socialism had faltered, in view of the failures of Marxist determinism and social democratic reformism, and believed that Nietzsche's ideas would strengthen socialism. While associated with socialism, Mussolini's writings eventually indicated that he had abandoned Marxism and egalitarianism in favor of Nietzsche's übermensch concept and anti-egalitarianism

Definitely not a marxist or socdem either ",SdSquid,e9chy3t,conservative
[removed],,e9cbmv0,conservative
[removed],,e9cgw4t,conservative
"i was always told that fascism was a right wing movement, but after knowing the things i know now, i don't believe that it is. in college, i was also told that the republican and democrat parties did a switch sometime in the past, but i now doubt this even though i know i'm ignorant about why this claim is a load of garbage.

post modernism basically claims that the truth is that there is no truth. how people can believe that the statement ""there is no truth"" to be true is beyond me, given the inherent contradiction in a statement like that",fireball3k,e9cfhn7,conservative
You post in /r/politics all of a sudden? And talk shit about conservatives in their own sub? And you thought you would pass?,richardguy,e9cc06o,conservative
"Numbers 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, 11, 12, 13, 14 were all present during the communist regime in my country. I can clarify if you want. ",ginkavarbakova,e9cjh52,conservative
"Oh look, a list that was likely identified by a left wing professor ",Dranosh,e9cpx75,conservative
"Was Hugo Chavez left or right?   Bolivarianism shares many of those qualities, and many of those traits most certainly applied to Chavez's rise of power and his control over Socialist Venezuela.  

Most Conservative and right leaning pundits in History have been pushed out of universities.  I'm not surprised if this debate has been reshaped over the last few years, because it wasn't anywhere near as cut and dry as you are portraying when I was in college in the 80's.  ",Roez,e9cwg32,conservative
"I don't have time to go through this right now. My definition comes from Mussolini himself in his ""Doctrine of Fascism"", written intentionally to mimic the Communist Manifesto. He literally tells you (as a man who was a socialist his entire life) that fascism was an ""evolution"" of socialism, how he has nothing but disdain for capitalism and classical liberalism (everything the right stands for in the United States).

Considering he coined Fascism and its definition, you can fight this all you want. A brief glance through your list and you are reaching hard to claim ""right"" wing. In most it has nothing to do with American ""right"" which is the typical leftist attempt to make this claim. The American political spectrum is not the same as other countries, that is due to the overall political spectrum not being a line, but more like a grid.",ultimis,e9czbcp,conservative
[removed],,e9coajj,conservative
"Most of those break down when you realize that all the privately owned stuff was because the government let you own it. Not that you have a right to it in the first place, such as what the American right wing believes. In a communist country the business you ran was owned by the government. In a fascist country the government let you run a business that you ""owned"". But in reality do you own something if the government has more of a say than you do?",notagooduname,e9cvgt9,conservative
The shocking thing is that CBS actually did report it.  ,stancrouch,e9cv1a1,conservative
Led by Giraffe nevk professor? The one that like being tied up in ropes?,krepogregg,e9cpbs0,conservative
Jobs not mobs!,sjwking,e9cnbn3,conservative
"Nothing to see here. Move along, move along ",Chapka69,e9cn7ci,conservative
"Fox News covered and sided with the news personalities who were targeted by the pipe bomber, showing solidarity. Guess it doesn’t make the circuit if it’s the “other side” getting attacked. ",justhere2havefun,e9d2km2,conservative
"Hypocrisy at its finest. 

Jim Accosta losing his white house credentials: “An unprecedented attack on the press and a direct violation of the first amendment!” Plastered all over the media. 

A liberal mob targetting Tucker Carlson’s family at his home: *crickets* ",BarelyAUseraname,e9cm9bs,conservative
"I know it's been said numerous times, but when satiric headlines read like real news (or a true reflection of it) it's a sad state of affairs.",Terra_green2,e9btark,conservative
Oh look anti fascist being fascist. ,Stonemeteor360,e9bzdma,conservative
why didn’t carlson use his guns? i would’ve ,Cesar_XCVII,e9c27fg,conservative
"Question, if one of these retards end up with a chest full of shotgun pellets one day, would they stop this behavior? Or would they send the women and children to the front?",CN9YLW,e9c6zpw,conservative
"""There's a really easy way not to get mobbed in public places or your own home: march in lockstep with the leftist agenda,"" said a Smash Racism D.C. spokesperson. ""It's really simple.""

Come on. I'm really expected to believe this was said verbatim? I'd need to hear that in audio before I'd ever be able to swallow that bullshit as truth. What is this, The Onion?",Nevaknosbest,e9byeyn,conservative
"TI actually woke up to two redditors telling me that the mob at his house was both fake news and justified if real.

[Crazy people I tell you](https://np.reddit.com/r/news/comments/9vbgra/man_charged_with_threatening_to_kill_cnn_anchor/e9c6rjv/?utm_content=permalink&utm_medium=front&utm_source=reddit&utm_name=news)
",DangerToDemocracy,e9cnmd0,conservative
Bamboozled again ,paulbrevik,e9cvale,conservative
i love that the protestors are being investigated for Hate crimes. lets set that precedent and she what happens.,atmatchett,e9cyehk,conservative
"Not satire tho, sadly",rdrptr,e9cqgkw,conservative
"Agreed, getting stung by the bee over and over again ain't good for my mental state...",wynhdo,e9bwj5e,conservative
"Yup, seems like a growing trend more and more. ",TheMongoose101,e9c9kev,conservative
"The Left amazes me with their disconnect from reality and lack of self reflection. 

I just got a PM from a whinny bitch Leftist to kill myself. 

This is why I stopped being a liberal. Well, one of many reasons. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e9cq1hx,conservative
He wasn’t home at the time. His wife was calling 911 while hiding. ,Mindcraftjoe,e9c57fa,conservative
They'd send the women and children to the front,prcampbell10,e9cmul9,conservative
"It’s the Babylon bee, a known satire site, hence the satire flair.",Logan891,e9c0580,conservative
r/woosh,haplogreenleaf,e9c2300,conservative
"So I get that now you understand this post was satire and all, but I have to say your comment genuinely made me burst out laughing with your candor and bluntness about it all, like, “Come on, you’re fucking kidding me, right?”

What makes it a little sad (and definitely ironic) is that no leftist ever does this with the media he’s digesting. He just swallows it whole without any qualifications.",ascatraz,e9cliok,conservative
"Ohhhkaayy, I get it. Sorry for being stupid.",Nevaknosbest,e9c0t7h,conservative
Now look into the other ones like Wisconsin and Arizona,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c4iuo,conservative
It looks like the left may start brigading these threads (about the broward controversy). Nothing would make me happier than the left proving they don't care about voter fraud unless it suits them (2016). ,xJownage,e9c8zax,conservative
Finally. Get em Trump!,the-divine-comedy,e9c482s,conservative
Please please please stay quiet Trump.  Let the locals take care of it and work to repair the damaged perception of conservative Americans in almost all forms of Media.,Falkamper,e9cxgpc,conservative
Isn't it weird how this giant stack of unmarked envelopes always comes in overwhelmingly Democrat?,nited_states,e9c63yj,conservative
"Exactly this. If this is being done in Florida and Arizona it must be being done in other battleground states.

Honestly, if voter fraud is found, I want every fucking state to go under investigation and I want every single inch of ground covered to show the nation-wide effort to interfere with the democratic process. I don’t want to just investigate the close states I want every one and every single election volunteer to be investigated.

This is bigger than Russia. I fundamentally believe there is a massive, nation-wide voter fraud apparatus designed to help the democrats. Whether the democrats are directly involved or not is yet to be determined (hint: they are directly involved. So are major news networks)

This isn’t tin foil hat shot anymore. This is the situation we are in right the fuck now.",DJ41,e9cfida,conservative
"Um as a conservative voter in Wisconsin... no.  I don’t want a witch hunt.   I’m not aware of any issues at polling locations in Wisconsin and the margin was wide enough that a recount won’t change the results.  Yes there was a story about Madison handing out IDs to foreign nationals.  It may even be possible there was some influencing at some city polling locations, but without video evidence it’s not provable and I have seen no evidence.

Provide evidence and I damn well wanted it investigated.",Lustan,e9cxwkq,conservative
That just makes me more certain that someone corrupt is actually happening. No need to brigade if it’s nothing.,Masterjason13,e9ce23s,conservative
"works both ways though, right?",RobotXander,e9cnx8s,conservative
"We would care, but Trump has a extensive history of saying things without any support/evidence.

If there is fraud for the dems, it should be found, corrected and people prosecuted. That said, voting more votes isn’t fraud. Fraud is not counting legitimate votes!",Bigbucketposer,e9cxkmw,conservative
Can you provide any reputable sources detailing voter fraud in the 2016 election? I was under the impression it was such a non issue that Trump had to disband his voter fraud commission.,Mrranger92,e9cxxpa,conservative
You think the media will be kind to conservatives is Trump just stops talking? They will NEVER give conservatives a fair shake. The media IS liberalism.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d13vc,conservative
"The yellow media is what is creating the damaged perception, so try again.",mlmack,e9d42tp,conservative
Other than W has any big race flipped blue to red/ affirmed red,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c6kok,conservative
"The theory is this: it’s usually large cities that report last because they have more votes to count, and urban areas vote democratic.

That’s bullshit as far as I’m concerned though.",Masterjason13,e9cdzw6,conservative
Happened in the 2004 Washington gubernatorial race. Republican was winning until they found enough votes to put the Democrat on top.,flextov,e9chynd,conservative
"How can you fundamentally believe something without evidence? Asking as a conservative, not a liberal sneaking into this sub. 

I’ve enjoyed this sub for its rationality and this perspective makes us no better than liberals who believe every shred of everything in the liberal media. ",modtrax,e9cyqv3,conservative
"Everything is bigger than Russia, haha. ",skarface6,e9d3vy8,conservative
"Two two years later and all Mueller has done is prove that Trump is 100% innocent and the cleanest president in history. While also proving massive corruption from Democrats.

Whitaker needs to CEUs and take charge of all of the corruption that Mueller has found because Mueller referred it to the Democrat attorney general in New York who will likely sweep it under the rug",ExpensiveMention,e9cw5r0,conservative
"Sure, I’m for anyone caught doing this bullshit to go to jail.",Shotwe11,e9cq1nc,conservative
He had to disband it because no one would give up any information.  You have to be pretty dumb to think that voter fraud doesn't happen.  Why else would the democrats stymie every attempt to create a system of voter identification?  And spare me the standard democrat BS of black people being too dumb or too poor to get an ID.,mlmack,e9d3z8s,conservative
W started red. Every recount it got bluer,greeneyedunicorn2,e9ccpte,conservative
In my experience urban areas have always reported earlier than rural area.,SWTORBattlefrontNerd,e9d3m0k,conservative
"Their neighbors in Miami apparently did things on time (with 100k more votes, apparently).",skarface6,e9d3uf3,conservative
"The cleanest president in history is a bit of an overstatement.  I mean, there was a prezzy nicknamed ""bathtub taft"" after all.  Let's not forget James K Polk either.  Dude makes 4 promises during his campaign, follows through on all of them, does not seek reelection.  ",yomon1771,e9cwtht,conservative
Life sentence. This is tantamount to treason. It’s ruining and subverting our very foundation for representative government. ,Aviator07,e9cvzon,conservative
Polk fought the bank,ExpensiveMention,e9cxb4x,conservative
"Note that clean and conservative are two different words, even though they both start with the same letter",yomon1771,e9d0e1h,conservative
"Can anyone supply a rational explanation for this? I'm genuinely curious. It looks shady as hell, but I don't want to jump to conclusions without all the facts.

What is the best interpretation of this and what is the worst? ",ripecookies1,e9bxbdc,conservative
Werent the two districts mentioned being late the only ones the Democrats wanted to count in 2000? I'm now wondering how long this has been going on.,chugonthis,e9c4y0v,conservative
They are not going to get away with it.  ,ozric101,e9bnb2j,conservative
Just more bullshit that the news and dems won't mention,tohollywoodandback,e9c37w9,conservative
"If this is true* 

This is so unjust, unconstitutional and un-American. 

I would bet if this did come out the Dems would go back to Russian collusion. LOL",StockSkys,e9cb3cz,conservative
Is this for real?,genie73118,e9bxdo2,conservative
"I have been a poll worker before and yes, all the ballots are stuffed into a normal persons car and driven to a location where there are trucks to go to Norwalk or wherever the voting center is in your state.  

It is also why I only vote by mail ahead of time now bc of the incompetence of several things I’ve seen that can miss your ballot, tear your ballot, or lose your ballot.",HowRememberAll,e9chhgu,conservative
Because it doesn't fit the democrat/liberal narrative.,LastationNeoCon,e9c8s52,conservative
"the same reason the obama administration's spying on the trump campaign isn't front page news. the media doesn't want it widely known, so they bury it. ",tifuforreal,e9cjfn7,conservative
"> why isn't it front page news

Don't ask, we can't talk about it here.",anuser999,e9c5boz,conservative
Penalty should be really harsh,chauey,e9ciu7j,conservative
"I just think it odd that we dont have a better system in place nationally.  Armored cars, police escort, and a national holiday.  These votes are one of the most precious things we have and I dont understand why we dont have a holiday and armored escorts for them.  TV cameras should be following caravans and proudly playing the national anthem like ice cream truck sirens.  Voting is an awesome responsibility.",Falkamper,e9cxocg,conservative
"Shit like this is why we need to keep the electoral college.  

Without it, this could happen in any solidly blue state (where it's easiest to get away with it) and screw up the election for the whole country.",BrighamYoung,e9cvi37,conservative
"Uhmm...
Would you rather see the ballot boxes arrive at the county commissioners office in an ice cream truck?

Have you ever volunteered to help at voting sites?",bombilla42,e9cn369,conservative
"Best interpretation? Incompetent staff, should be fired and severely punished. These ballots aren't toys. Votes also invalid due to state law.  
  
Worst interpretation? The whole system there in Broward County is corrupt with officials who are in on it.  
  
Likely explanation because this happened last time and a judge found them guilty of destroying ballots? The latter.",AThiccMeme,e9cdon1,conservative
"Is anything from the headline verifiable? 
Do we actually know what's in the boxes?
Do we know where this was actually filmed?
Do we know when this was filmed?
If they are ballots and they are from this election and they are from where they're prepared to be from there may still be a reason that this is happening.

Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence.",aptpupil79,e9cc5w6,conservative
"The one in charge of Broward or however you spell it has been caught before manipulating the vote totals, how she is aloud even close to ballots I don't know.",etibbs,e9c5tkk,conservative
"You have more optimism that I do, sadly.",PrawnsAreOk,e9br1ji,conservative
Oh yes they are. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9c5klw,conservative
"> They are not going to get away with it.

""Hold my pumpkin-spice soy latte"" - The Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9d1h3t,conservative
Don’t forget r/politics ,SteelersBraves97,e9c63w6,conservative
"They’re stealing elections, and they’re importing people who will vote for them. 

Sadly if Texas turns blue we will lose the country. It will be tyranny of majority rule. ",MeatPumper69,e9ctlk0,conservative
Maybe in Fl but other states the ballots are in a locked box while being transported in the normal persons car,krepogregg,e9clo2i,conservative
"I honestly don't know how the precincts work... How is it supposed to be done then? 

I do find it odd that volunteers have the ballots in their car and are moving ballots to a pick up location.",abuigues,e9cw2l7,conservative
This is far beyond incompetence. Don't be naive.,phoenix335,e9chqp7,conservative
"Here's the Facebook post of the woman who took the video. https://www.facebook.com/joann.knox.7/posts/1875888749146325
",_Hospitaller_,e9cgs2f,conservative
"See this is why l like the right, we actually question what’s in front of us instead of swallowing whatever they tell us",poltergeist007,e9cjw19,conservative
My optimism level is about on par with yours. ,bdub561,e9bsw9h,conservative
That's why I said best case scenario,AThiccMeme,e9chz04,conservative
"Some people on the left question things too, like me when I was on the left.

I'd always ask questions, and doubt sources, and hear all perspectives before I made up my mind, and then I looked up one day and I was on the right. Funny how that works.",misespises,e9cv560,conservative
People that do that on the left don't last long on the left.,Error_Lord,e9d1xim,conservative
She should have called the police. ,ozric101,e9c3w8m,conservative
So was it full of Democrat votes? It’s official now that Florida needs an entire new voting system. Scrap the whole thing and re-build it.,the-divine-comedy,e9c4akk,conservative
"“I don’t think you’d lock up extra ballot paper.”

Of course you should lock up blank ballots. That’s literally how you predict false votes.",quadrophenia515,e9crhwh,conservative
"Broward Country, public school teacher, friend of a sitting Democrat state rep.

Nothing to see here, carry on.",DogBeersHadOne,e9c60km,conservative
This is so damn blatant ,unityrootts,e9c5e0g,conservative
It's no fucking coincidence **if** these ballots were found AFTER Ginsberg was admitted to the hospital for falling and breaking 3 ribs. Desperate times call for desperate measures among Democrats. So I'm curious what the timeline is on these new ballot discoveries. ,Rightquercusalba,e9cro4y,conservative
Golly Gee now Howed that get there,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c4kwq,conservative
"""Provisional Ballots""

Like, in case we need these to be ""found"" if we haven't got enough legitimate ballots to win",Liberty_Pr1me,e9csdbw,conservative
"Get your shit together, Florida",Nevaknosbest,e9c8y1s,conservative
"No chain of custody. They can’t be counted. I mean, that’s just common sense.",Dammit_Banned_Again,e9cgu9p,conservative
Let’s not involve Sheriff Scott Israel in this one. ,YankeeBlues21,e9c62ln,conservative
as if that would have changed the outcome.,JMB_was_a_god,e9c79lf,conservative
"Florida election officials - ""Hold my beer...""",Moonthrower,e9cp9bw,conservative
"> No chain of custody.

I'm not sure of FL election laws, but wouldn't there need to be chain of custody for a ballot to be counted.  And could any ballot not accounted for in the chain of custody get thrown out?  ",jedichric,e9d0he5,conservative
"I said call the police not the sheriff, do they have State Troopers in FL?
They would be the ones to call if they do. ",ozric101,e9c79c8,conservative
"The Broward Sheriff’s Department *are* the local police for all but a handful of local cities. Most folded their departments and outsourced their police to the BSO. 

But yes there are also state troopers. ",YankeeBlues21,e9c7qro,conservative
You can’t pick and choose what agency handles your call to 911. ,rpm3311,e9ccipb,conservative
Love how we’re arguing over something that doesn’t matter. The box was placed there. ,MeatPumper69,e9cu8y0,conservative
"There are direct police numbers, 911 is only for emergencies ",catholicgrant,e9cgs16,conservative
And when you call the wrong agency they redirect you to the correct one. Ask me how I know. ,rpm3311,e9chdu3,conservative
"We are talking about a call to 911, don’t take my comment as a threat lol. 
",catholicgrant,e9chleq,conservative
"Ok, so again the call would go to Broward Co. Sheriff. ",rpm3311,e9cjjoq,conservative
A big part of their strategy is to call everything they disagree with hatred. ,JimboJehosephat,e9crc5h,conservative
Trump advocates racism and bigotry,AkilaC,e9d0zud,conservative
Post your video of him advocating racism.  ,timbowen,e9d22ic,conservative
"Krugman, LOL  
  
The guy really does need to seek professional medical help.  He's living in a giant mansion, getting paid a fortune to write the same column twice a week, and yet he's LARPing as Winston Smith.",FelixFuckfurter,e9d1a5g,conservative
"Are you implying ""Anti""Fa is economically literate?",MarioFanaticXV,e9d3vqf,conservative
You may fire when ready.,checkmate14,e9c2pmj,conservative
Rebel scum,Delta_25,e9bzo5d,conservative
I laughed ,freightofheights,e9c6u6x,conservative
"Jim Acosta, you called it an invasion.

Trump, yes I did.

Jim Acosta, but it is not an invasion.

Trump, but I believe it is.

Jim Acosta (now crying) but I said it wasn't and I will tell mom.
",Conservativeone,e9c904n,conservative
I wish the left would take this seriously and make fools out of themselves.,xJownage,e9c3f4u,conservative
"A surprise to be sure, but a welcome one.",ponmbr,e9cy7jp,conservative
Dear diary... today the President played rough with me again... ❤,r-magnificient,e9ck7zb,conservative
Stormy Daniels?,ElbowWhisper,e9czi3t,conservative
Good. If we tolerate liberals donning pink cat ears and screeching at the sky because somebody they didn't like won fair and square then conservatives have every right to protest the shenanigans going on right now. ,Natetendo83,e9cygjr,conservative
"So they go low, we go lower?",RealSlimBiscuits,e9d0216,conservative
"No, we defend free and fair elections.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9d2ide,conservative
"There are such a things as rules and laws....  You can not go vote right now the election is over.
so if thousands of ballots were not turned in in time... That is too fucking bad, that is why we have rules and laws without them we would have fucking chaos.  Is that what you want fucking chaos?",ozric101,e9d22qi,conservative
"If it turns out to be true, I'm going to roll my damn eyes the next time one of these people parrots that ""Trump is a threat to democracy"".

Because it's crap like this that *actually threaten democracy*.",AvdaxNaviganti,e9cdzb3,conservative
No... democrats steal an election? Say it ain’t so.,Wespiratory,e9clq7k,conservative
"Somebody posted on the other thread that Scott and Desantis had to file lawsuits or else they'd end up losing. Right on cue, Scott fights back. GOOD.",xJownage,e9c350v,conservative
"This is outrageous. They've ""found"" enough votes to put Sinema over the top in AZ and now they are doing what they can steal it from Rick Scott. ",Sola__Fide,e9c3bnd,conservative
"Oh look, that thing that never happens is happening again...",Starky_McStarkface,e9d1fxa,conservative
Counting every vote is a threat to democracy?,Brewster-Rooster,e9cnmde,conservative
"Democrats are in Totalitarian Mode at this point. They next time they grab power, they will probably never relinquish it. ",tifuforreal,e9cd00s,conservative
"Loading fake ballots onto a truck the day after election to be counted is a threat for sure. You know the lady in charge of this in Florida has been found doing this stuff before right?

And by the way, I don’t care which side you are on. If you are rigging elections, you’re a piece of shit to the highest degree.",Shotwe11,e9cq78w,conservative
"Every ballot counted? Like the ones in counties where there are somehow thousands more ballots than registered voters?

It's funny how every time there is a close race and the democrat is down in votes someone just happens to find a box of ballots in the trunk of a car or in some janitor's closet and those ballots are somehow 95% democrat votes. This happened in Washington in 2004, Minnesota in 2008, North Carolina, Florida and Arizona this year and probably many more.  

Not to mention that this specific one happened in Broward county where this has happened before. Also, the election commissioner had been convicted of election fraud just two years ago and has been involved in numerous other fraudulent activities. ",deathwheel,e9d2thw,conservative
Projection much?,Hip_Hop_Hippos,e9cl5jm,conservative
"We need a full federal investigation into where those votes came from and why they weren't counted originally.

also the only threats to democracy are the people who are trying to overturn the results of an election in 2016",ExpensiveMention,e9cwaq0,conservative
Projection much?,wynhdo,e9cr4ik,conservative
When have republicans done anything like this or anything resembling totalitarian behavior?,deathwheel,e9d2x3i,conservative
"Babylon Bee nails it again. 
",Dunkeliness,e9bhfpr,conservative
Thats a spicy one from the Bee.  ,timbowen,e9bkcvg,conservative
"Trump: I'm going to choose your successor.

RBG: I know. <*woosh*>",Anti-Decimalization,e9bnpkd,conservative
I’m liberal and even I think this is funny,FalcoonnnnPUNCH,e9ccxsz,conservative
Obama gonna break her out with a thermal detonator,UltraSurvivalist,e9c2tv0,conservative
Looks like Boba Fett's guys dropped her.  Don't tell Jabba.,tehForce,e9bvvki,conservative
I swear to God if she dies in the next two years the Dems will do a Weekend at Bernie's with her to stave off another appointment,greatatdrinking,e9coj6f,conservative
Cortez: Yoosa say people gonna die?  Gib dem free insurance Ani!,Lustan,e9btm85,conservative
I find tonnes of Trump jokes hilarious too. ,Glochidiate,e9cm6z6,conservative
"I read one that said she fell because she leaned too far left. Sorry not sorry, that's hilarious, ",GladysCravesRitz,e9cxmy0,conservative
Jar Jar was wayyyy smarter,MastaSchmitty,e9byoql,conservative
"It wasn’t a reporter. It was a transgender activist who was shouting and protesting against LGBT deportation. The people who were clapping weren’t the press corps, they were guests from the general public invited to the speech. 

Edit: [Video: Transgender woman heckles Obama](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/jun/25/barack-obama-heckled-transgender-woman-gay-pride-white-house), [more info](https://www.nytimes.com/2015/06/25/us/politics/activist-removed-after-heckling-obama-at-lgbt-event.amp.html) ",wine_o_clock,e9bcsxc,conservative
This doesn’t seem to be the same thing Trump did yesterday.  But Obama did refuse conservative reporters access to the news pool on Air Force One.  That wasn’t over rude behavior that was just conflicting ideology.,nooneuknow42,e9b4j3n,conservative
Obama had a heckler. Trump had a journalist.,bobzilla509,e9cjpfu,conservative
"This is just a picture, not the video in question. Would have been nice to post the video so I could see it for myself.",Nevaknosbest,e9b50ba,conservative
https://youtu.be/HpF9ObMoIDc?t=142,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9b6me2,conservative
[removed],,e9aw1q3,conservative
"We're all aware that Trump is way more outspokenly hostile to criticism than any president in modern history, and doesn't have any attachment for things like decorum, politeness, or fairness as stand-alone concepts, right? He's been pretty explicit about his views that lying is okay if it helps you get what you want, and ""good"" is synonymous with ""on my side"".  I don't get the need to drum up flimsy justifications of his behavior, when the president himself is generally unashamed to admit that he did something because he wanted to, and he can do it because he's in charge. ",BaronVonFunke,e9bacoy,conservative
"The white house -press interaction is a PRIVLAGE  the white house does not need to have these conferences or a press secratary or a press core that flys around. 

Its a privlage, Acosta among others has been abusing that privlage, its about time something was done.",Manchurainprez,e9b99wp,conservative
"Liberal hypocrisy is no longer surprising, in fact it's expected. ",SilverHerfer,e9b2lao,conservative
The most striking difference is the entire press corps sucking it up to Obama. Just no professional distance there. They are all fanboys. Tittering at his every rehearsed joke. Sort of like he is the love god embodied in their leftist orgy of love and he can do no wrong.,Lepew1,e9bbaer,conservative
"I think OP was going for the video that corresponds with the link below.... I know Obama kicked Fox out of the press briefings at one point, I just couldn't sort through you tube on my work PC to find it

[“We’re going to treat them the way we would treat an opponent,” she says. “We don’t need to pretend that this is the way that legitimate news organizations behave.” - White House staffer, 2009, concerning Fox News](https://www.newsweek.com/when-obama-went-war-fox-news-632424)",Jizzlobber42,e9br21z,conservative
Democrats are such HYPOCRITES.,StephenScherer1,e9bkw1c,conservative
[deleted],,e9bl7dp,conservative
[deleted],,e9btjb5,conservative
Wish op would correct the headline. If what you posted is true.  Truth has to start somewhere.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9biq5z,conservative
Man he was charismatic. ,Enyalius3-3-3,e9bn1dw,conservative
"> It wasn’t a reporter.

I would argue that's not the part that really matters. It's the fact it's wasn't a question-and-answer period like it was with Acosta and Trump but instead a speech. Obviously interrupting a speech is rude and dumb but if this activist was asking Obama a question during a designated period it should be no different. I think there's far too much clout around the ""the press"" and it creates this different class of citizen. You should not need to be apart of some aristocratic class of journalists to get the privilege of asking a politician a question. 

The problem with this example is that the activist asked made a scene at an inappropriate time, not the fact she wasn't a priestly ordained ""journalist"".",Glochidiate,e9clysu,conservative
"Don’t forget this

>(CBS News) Court documents released this week show the Obama administration secretly monitored a Washington journalist. In seeking a search warrant, the FBI called Fox News' James Rosen a ""criminal co-conspirator,"" even though he isn't charged with any crime.

>These revelations have set off a firestorm of criticism from the left and right, CBS News' Jan Crawford reports. For the first time ever, a presidential administration is treating news reporting like a crime, and a reporter like a criminal suspect.

https://www.cbsnews.com/news/fox-news-reporter-secretly-monitored-by-obama-administration-court-documents/

",Paul_Hommala,e9bvoi5,conservative
"Every modern president has had a contentious relationship with the press, but Trump takes it to a new level. ",TrueBirch,e9c0nfc,conservative
"The woman Acosta “Struck” should have just filed charges and that would have given them more cover to do this. 

That being said I think they did the right thing by banning Acosta.",SnickersReese,e9baumq,conservative
[This article details the hypocritical nature of the press corps](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/opinion/its-ok-to-hurl-questions-at-the-president-until-it-isnt). They are outraged when a conservative reporter interrupts a democrat president but are silent as reporters sink to new lows daily with a Republican president.,ngoni,e9bw8hp,conservative
https://twitter.com/almostjingo/status/1022297569337077765,cons_NC,e9b6etb,conservative
"
This clip documents an incident which took place at a July 2015 event at the White House in honor of LGBT Pride Month. President Obama was delivering a speech (not taking questions at a press conference) when a protester (not a reporter) interrupted and shouted at him to demand an end to the deportation of LGBT immigrants:

An activist interrupted President Obama at a White House event celebrating L.G.B.T. Pride Month to demand an end to the deportation of L.G.B.T. immigrants. The activist was escorted from the room amid a chorus of boos and jeers from the assembled guests.

The activist, Jennicet Gutiérrez, who is transgender and says she is in the country illegally, interrupted Mr. Obama shortly after he began speaking, calling from the back of the room, “President Obama, release all L.G.B.T.Q. immigrants from detention and stop all deportations!”

President Obama displayed little patience with the heckler, telling her, “You’re in my house” before having her removed.
  

Edit to say this is an excerpt from snopes.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9bj2va,conservative
https://www.cnn.com/2015/06/24/politics/obama-heckler-white-house-lgbt/index.html,TangoFoxtr0t,e9c0hzt,conservative
I felt a chill up my leg on that one.,Lepew1,e9bb23j,conservative
Wow Obama was a fascist too? /s,steampunker13,e9bcpea,conservative
There's no bias here....,easye2889,e9bc7q9,conservative
Is it ever possible for Biden to not be the creepiest lookin dude in a room?,The_Mighty_Rex,e9bi0fy,conservative
"Funny though that in that video Wolf Blitzer called it an ""awful situation"" for a heckler to interrupt the president.",justhere2havefun,e9b2vu8,conservative
Go back to /r/politics. ,VirginWizard69,e9ayq7k,conservative
"Did the reporter smack an intern? Was Acosta escorted out mid conference?

Your right Acosta acted much worse and was treated much more leniently. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9azcxo,conservative
[deleted],,e9b462a,conservative
"[Harry Reid](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/ayobami-olugbemiga/harry-reid-gives-shameful-response-to-his-attack-on-mitt-romneys-taxes_b_6999996.html) and [Obama](https://www.realclearpolitics.com/articles/2014/08/13/too_bad_obama_didnt_follow_his_own_advice_123650.html) would like you to not forget about them!

Also the NY times would like you to consider Obama's track record with the press:
https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/30/opinion/sunday/if-donald-trump-targets-journalists-thank-obama.html",ngoni,e9bws5h,conservative
Uh what. ,mw3noobbuster,e9bpkzj,conservative
_privilege_,malevolent_maelstrom,e9bdbrf,conservative
How did he abuse it?,mutt_butt,e9ba8nw,conservative
"Lefties dont care about hypocricy, half of their policies are contradictory ",Manchurainprez,e9b9bgc,conservative
Wasn't that in the middle east?,glwilliams4,e9brtej,conservative
I think the press took it to a new level,billswinthesuperbowl,e9c8zil,conservative
Hello Mr Obama Apologist,0b1w4n,e9cbuii,conservative
"From the video I saw, it didn’t look like she was ‘struck’. However, anyone can file charges and let law enforcement investigate. People these days lose track of the difference between allegations and convictions.",linklitter,e9bdim3,conservative
"If she had been in fact struck, I’m sure she would have.",iHaveAMicroPenis12,e9cbq36,conservative
"> That being said I think they did the right thing by banning Acosta.

I'm in the camp of ""right thing for wrong reasons"". 

The shit Acosta pulled at the N. Korea meetings was beyond disgusting. He was basically trying to undermine negotiations to make Trump look bad. It was revolting and so partisan. I don't agree with the whole ""he abused a woman"" narrative but don't expect tears from me that Acosta got the boot.",Glochidiate,e9cm4dj,conservative
"File Charges? Please, stop being so partisan.",jay_dar,e9bbaj1,conservative
"He’s a man, she’s a woman,  shouldn’t he just roll over and show his belly?  What an example of white male patriarchy.",nooneuknow42,e9c66x7,conservative
She is a victim of workplace violence.,Lepew1,e9bb4mj,conservative
Was it a reporter or lgbt heckler like posted above?  It makes a big difference.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9biu6c,conservative
"Ur doing God's work, thanks",Nevaknosbest,e9b6ou7,conservative
"I would disagree and say he showed quite a bit of patience. He let it go on for a full minute and a half before asking secret service to remove her from the room. Even said she could stay if she would just shutup. Not defending anyone, just assessing the situation with my eyeballs and calling it how I see it.",Nevaknosbest,e9bjk95,conservative
Unironically yes,cucumba_water,e9d29bg,conservative
[removed],,e9az9ez,conservative
*you’re,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e9b0hpw,conservative
[removed],,e9b48td,conservative
"His question was asked and answered and when president trump called on the next reporter, he threw a tantrum and refused to give up his microphone. Did you not see the video? ",VeryMint,e9bacuu,conservative
"I think more reporters need to call him out on his bullshit to be honest...  
Now the White house is gaslighting the American people with fake news videos...  
I have to admit though, it's all very entertaining from an outsiders perspective :)",RobotXander,e9cod7n,conservative
"They set you up by only accepting one answer, that they are right and you are wrong. Not even a discussion to get there, just ""You're all Nazis and racist and white people suck."" That is only if you happen to not agree. That's not even a disagreement with them. You could be completely neutral but they need you to take a side. Because they aren't divisive at all, y'see.

They have a problem with Trump saying, ""Stop being lying dicks."" Why? Because calling out lying dicks is considered a dick move. Liberals have become masters of projection.",Buce-Nudo,e9cahfr,conservative
Hello Mr Trump Apologist,digitag,e9clv5t,conservative
It was no worse than what Adam Sandler did to that poor flight attendant on Anger Management.,JackFucington,e9bzmkw,conservative
He karate chopped her. There is even video evidence of it,SnickersReese,e9cdrdt,conservative
Yeah I kind of agree. I’m just glad to see him go. He was definitely mentally unstable.,SnickersReese,e9cu0zs,conservative
I mean it would have been in her right to do so. I think it would be good just to give the WH more cover to get rid of Acosta. It would be hard to argue it didn’t happen with video evidence and charges filled. Of course the media is full of retards with room temperature IQs so who knows.,SnickersReese,e9bbg9g,conservative
"Exactly.  This wasn't some horrible beat down, but if you attempted to strong arm a co-worker and refused to hand over a file or something, I'm pretty sure every single person in the office would consider that to be out of line.",Telineye,e9bk2tu,conservative
"She was thrust into a combat situation. Albeit, a small one. I bet she’s never tried to pull a microphone away from a grown man in front of the world before. ",SonOfSite,e9bfplp,conservative
[It was a heckler.](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/jun/25/barack-obama-heckled-transgender-woman-gay-pride-white-house),81toog,e9bnswi,conservative
"People acting like these situations are the same just want to play goal keeper.

1) Acosta asked a question and was answered

2) Acosta attempted to continue to ask questions and was informed it wasn’t his turn

3) Acosta continued

4) The intern is directed to get the mic and Acosta resists

5) Eventually the mic is handed over

It SHOULD have ended there then his press pass revoked citing his inability to respect the time of the other reporters trying to ask questions. The President should not have berated him and should not have clapped back at the next guy with “I’m not a fan of your either” all around lack of professionalism.

The Obama situation was a speech not a press conference, was a protester not a reporter, why is this even being brought up its beyond me.",BigAggie06,e9bnh85,conservative
Sorry - it was cut and pasted from snopes - I agree with you.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9boe3t,conservative
What Obama did was worse. ,VirginWizard69,e9azc8z,conservative
[removed],,e9b4wsj,conservative
Saw the video. Don't think that getting into a heated exchange with Trump amounted to 'abusing' a privilege. Thanks for the reply.,mutt_butt,e9ban41,conservative
"How was his question answered lol? Being accountable to press who you disagree with, or who have an agenda, is part of being POTUS. Hell its part of being a politician in any civilised democratic nation in the world. Revoking a  respected journalist’s credentials because they ask you tough questions or challenge your policies and statements is tantamount to actively gagging them. Even if they are attacking you, the right thing to do is respond to their question in a level headed manner. 

Whatever side you are on, that accountability and sense of professional respect for people who you disagree with has completely gone out the window with Trump. It’s a worrying precedent, which should leave anyone concerned with basic democracy worried about how this president may behave over a whole host of issues, if he has the opportunity. ",digitag,e9cm6fv,conservative
I didn’t see the difference between the supposed doctorered cideonit just looked zoomed in,billswinthesuperbowl,e9cscw1,conservative
"I'm not an apologist for any president. But if my employees acted like he does at work, I'd probably fire them. It's not appropriate.",TrueBirch,e9d0nqe,conservative
"Do you even know what a real karate chop looks like? I see more violence during my morning commute on the subway. Jesus, ya bunch of snowflakes.",iHaveAMicroPenis12,e9cnxqq,conservative
Or they could have just refused his access for his blatant erratic behavior for the past two years instead of trying to force this issue lol.,_yuengling,e9bipvi,conservative
"Ummmm.... is it really her job to pull a mic from someone... or isn't that the job of security?  


Think about it this way... is her job to take microphones away from people, or just to pass them around to the reporters in the room?

&#x200B;

Technically, she reached into HIS personal space.

&#x200B;

Honestly, it's stupid that this is the reason they used. ",tomowudi,e9bt9pp,conservative
Combat situation?  You can't be serious. ,PatrickJane,e9c5kr6,conservative
[removed],,e9b1s03,conservative
His privilege is him getting to ask a question and participate in the process led by Trump. That’s like a kid getting the privilege of recess in grade school and then throwing a tantrum when recess end because he wants to stay. ,VeryMint,e9bb1oa,conservative
"The abuse comes in when Acosta refuses to respect the time of the other parties involved. He asked a question and was asked, his turn is over, he chose to ignore that and continue. There are other reporters there who have questions and have a limited window of time in which to do so.

I’m not a Trump supporter, I don’t think he is a conservative and he is erratic, I don’t generally defend him and I don’t believe his response was appropriate for his office but Acosta was clearly in the wrong.",BigAggie06,e9bntye,conservative
If your employees acted like who does? Trump or Acosta?,digitag,e9d3jqs,conservative
"> is her job to take microphones away from people, or just to pass them around to the reporters in the room?

Why are you fighting a teenage girl over a microphone?

No one was hurt or anything, but what sort of classless buffoon are you to do that?
",lipidsly,e9bvvr5,conservative
That's some incredible mental gymnastics. You should compete professionally. In no sense is Abilio Acosta the victim in this situation. ,ngoni,e9bwk87,conservative
So her job is only to GIVE Reporters the microphone and not take it away.........Interesting mental gymnastics you have there.,SnickersReese,e9c1ant,conservative
/s,SonOfSite,e9c7081,conservative
Go back to r/politics,VirginWizard69,e9b1ujm,conservative
"I don't think anyone behaved well.

I don't Trump behaved well - he was dismissive and interrupted Acosta 4 times before not answering his question. And to be fair, it's not a bad question. It wasn't a ""Does your wife care that you cheat on her?"" Question. It's about this stupid caravan that Homeland Security doesn't seem worried about.

I personally have a problem that he spent $300 million on this nonsense to tweak an election. If that's true... that's some bullshit and I don't want other Presidents to do that either.

Acosta was being a dick about refusing to give up the mic.

And the girl... I feel bad for her. She's caught in the middle of this nonsense. She reached into his personal space, but I imagine if she didn't she might have felt she'd be fired. She should have called for security or just stuck her hand out and politely asked for the mic rather than snatching it, but she should be forgiven for being flustered and trying to snatch it. It's a high pressure situation for her, and her choice was suboptimal for how messy this was.

Obama froze out Fox... that's a way of playing favorites, and when he crossed a line the Press closed ranks against him. He pretty much walked up to the line in regards to Fox, but he didn't really cross it.

Trump is crossing it in my view, in a way that is... potentially dangerous. Lindsey Graham has pointed out his tendency to do this in general, so it shouldn't be unreasonable to point out.",tomowudi,e9cuh7o,conservative
Deserves a gold medal,billswinthesuperbowl,e9c91nl,conservative
"Interesting use of a semantic argument - intentionally misunderstanding the point is not actually a rebuttal.

I was pretty specific - there is a difference between the difference between a bouncer and a cocktail waitress. My point is that she isn't a bouncer, she's a waitress. Last I checked if someone is causing a ruckus, the waitress has no obligation to wrestle them.

But sure, if you want to distort that point with a semantic argument, that is certainly something you can do.

It's not intellectually honest, but evidently you are a fan of intellectual contortionism.",tomowudi,e9cthj3,conservative
"> I don't Trump behaved well - he was dismissive and interrupted Acosta 4 times before not answering his question.

He answered it fairly and pretty respectfully “my opinion is that its an invasion and thats different from yours” quite well tempered for trump especially with acosta. Acosta then continued pushing which is where trump started interuppting him because hed already answered his question and acosta was onviously full of it

>300 million 

what?

>his personal space

Because he was refusing to give up the mic when he was quite presumptious in asking multiple questions unlike everyone else. He continued to ask them and hog the mic after the *president* had to tell him *multiple times* to move on. Children dont behave that way

>she should be forgiven

She can tbe forgiven because she did nothing wrong. “Journalists” like acosta should give up the mic the very second theyre asked. The fact she had to come take it from him at all is 100% on acosta and shed have been right to wrench it from him

>didnt really cross it

He had the nsa spy on a fox news reporter because he said bad things about him...

",lipidsly,e9cvybu,conservative
Again mental gymnastics. If you weren’t trying to make excuses you would realize that her job is to control White House Property (The Microphone). There is no way the procedure would be for her to call security wait for security to come and then take the microphone while the White House loses total control of the press conference. No workplace would have two separate people control the microphone (One to give and one to take away). But I know Orange Man is Bad,SnickersReese,e9ctwi3,conservative
"If someone interrupts you 4 times as you are trying to ask a question, is that them treating you fairly? C'mon, we can be objective about this. Trump was annoyed with Acosta and tried to bully him. Acosta certainly is a bully with his questions, but if he was interviewing say, Obama like this, you'd be cheering him on as a great reporter, right?

And the last headlines I read estimate that the troop deployment to the border is going to cost us taxpayers $300 Million, which sounds about right given that we're sending 14000 troops for approximately 1400 people. Which... seems excessive, to say the least.

Yes, he was being a dick with the mic. Clearly she would have been just as effective at getting it from him if she had waited obviously and patiently with an outstretched hand. She's the equivalent of a cocktail waitress and Acosta is a drunk at the bar. When you've got a drunk, do you let the waitress or the bouncer deal with things? 

And fair point - that's similar to the SS interviewing Eminem and Kathy Griffin, so sure, Obama crossed a line that time. But Trump, by comparison, is a habitual line crosser. The point I care about is that crossing the line is bad every time, and Trump does it often enough that it is reasonably concerning to people like me that miss Reagan Republicans.",tomowudi,e9cwuh4,conservative
"You are saying her job is to be the bouncer, not the waitress?

I find that an interesting, if uncompelling argument.

I'd be curious to see where exactly in her job description it requires her to snatch microphones away from pushy reporters. 

Your semantic argument is cute, but let's be honest here. The expectation of her job does not require her to touch anyone unless she also happens to be trained as a stripper or a security professional. Clearly she wasn't trying to give Acosta a hand job, and clearly she was trying to snatch the mic back, and failed.

Because if she was hired for her ability to wrestle reporters, that was a stupid hiring decision.

This was outside her job description. An unfair situation for her to be in the middle of.

Acosta was a dick, and so was Trump, and she was caught in the middle and made a suboptimal call that was good for her with her boss and little else. 

But, I can see that you are getting triggered about all this, ;)",tomowudi,e9cxe7f,conservative
"> If someone interrupts you 4 times as you are trying to ask a question, is that them treating you fairly?

When im not supposed to be asking a question?

Yes, frankly the fact i was allowed to ask is generous

> C'mon, we can be objective about this. Trump was annoyed with Acosta and tried to bully him. Acosta certainly is a bully with his questions, but if he was interviewing say, Obama like this, you'd be cheering him on as a great reporter, right?

No, hed be incredibly disrespectful to the president of the united states. The only way i could see it being okay is if he was asking for a clarification because he misunderstood or misheard. So just a “could you repeat that”


> And the last headlines I read estimate that the troop deployment to the border is going to cost us taxpayers $300 Million, which sounds about right given that we're sending 14000 troops for approximately 1400 people. Which... seems excessive, to say the least.

>1400

Try 14,000

And id pay 1 billion to keep them out. Its a killer savings in the long run


> Yes, he was being a dick with the mic. Clearly she would have been just as effective at getting it from him if she had waited obviously and patiently with an outstretched hand. She's the equivalent of a cocktail waitress and Acosta is a drunk at the bar. When you've got a drunk, do you let the waitress or the bouncer deal with things?

You get a bouncer but dont victim blame the waitress for trying to do her job. And how sad it must be to be that drunk that security has to come get

> And fair point - that's similar to the SS interviewing Eminem and Kathy Griffin, so sure, Obama crossed a line that time. But Trump, by comparison, is a habitual line crosser. The point I care about is that crossing the line is bad every time, and Trump does it often enough that it is reasonably concerning to people like me that miss Reagan Republicans.

Following the letter of the law is very different than spying on people you dont like *for no reason* or sicking the IRS on groups you dont like

Youre comparing grapes to watermelons
",lipidsly,e9cx9hk,conservative
"Trump called on him. He didn't have to. So, false premise on your first point. Trump called on him and then interrupted him. This is normal for Trump, I am not sure why it's a point worth disputing? Dude wasn't elected because of how courteous he is.

As for this idea that the POTUS deserves more respect than any other citizen - that can only be true when they are held to a higher standard for their behavior. Reagan was deserving of respect. Let's not pretend the two are even remotely comparable with the standards they are held to. Trump was elected because he ""tells it like it is"". So he set the tone for ho much ""respect"" he is entitled to.

Acosta was a dick, and so was Trump.

But being a dick to get the truth is what reporters are paid to do, and Presidents are supposed to tell the truth. Especially at a Press conference. You really believe that the other reporters weren't interested in this story? This confrontation happened because Trump didn't like the question, because if it had been about the Stock Market Trump would have given Acosta all the time in the world.

And that fact matters in this conversation.

And I agree with you about how sad it is about the drunk, and how the waitress can be forgiven for suboptimal choices. I have not ""blamed"" the waitress... I simply pointed out that snatching mics from reporters is not her job, which is a point others are arguing.

And it's a stupid point to argue, because she doesn't fucking matter. There are 2 things that matter.

Acosta's behavior and intent, and Trump's behavior and intent.

Both of their behaviors sucked.

But I think Acosta's intent was more about revealing the truth, and Trump's was about concealing the truth, and that is a very important distinction.

And I already conceded that Obama crossed the line, I don't even recall the details, but it's really not important, because that was then and this is now, and right now I care about the truth.

So, where are you getting your numbers from?

The reporting I have seen in multiple sources is about 6500 people in the caravan, and only 20% are expected to actually make it to the border.

Here's the only source for the leaked memo I have: https://www.newsweek.com/migrant-caravan-terrorists-military-armed-1194456

It actually had the actual memo. Do you have information that I am missing?",tomowudi,e9cz1qq,conservative
How much longer will the public allow social media sites to openly set politically biased and hypocritically enforced rules?,raffu280,e9b7esf,conservative
"""Sure, they're *saying* threatening things, but they agree with me so I know they're really good and don't mean it""",burtmaklin1,e9b9bwn,conservative
When will antifa be labeled a terrorist organization like it deserves?,Aaron1570,e9bjo6a,conservative
Then they are responsible for the content on their site and should be sued.,zeldaisaprude,e9bbq64,conservative
"So if a law was made that imprisoned backpage creators because their site was used for prostitution, why can’t twitter execs be held responsible for enabling their users to break the law? Not saying I agree with it but just a thought. ",Dmfconrad,e9beye6,conservative
They approve of the terrorist group known as Antifa. ,J0kerr,e9bd17j,conservative
"I'm not surprised. The left likes to see themselves as ""victims of right-wing bigotry.""

So as far as they are concerned, those people were merely ""defending themselves.""",mikecx79,e9bjwf7,conservative
"And they wonder why the number of users is dropping.

Half of it is their excretable privacy policies and data mining, half of it is the blatant favoritism. There's something here for everyone to dislike. I can't imagine leftists being too pleased about their personal information being used for a huge corporation's profit.",ZarahCobalt,e9bluv1,conservative
Why isn't Tucker Carlson suing Twitter?  it is on Twitter where the addresses where posted,CreativeRoutine,e9c1k0t,conservative
REGULATE,LastationNeoCon,e9b8r9q,conservative
They are commies...,lax714,e9boflr,conservative
Terrorists deserve no mercy.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9btiep,conservative
Anti-fa and Nazies are two sides of the same coin,PerceivedShift,e9bqxjr,conservative
Does it help if we report them as hate speech? I know I did. Maybe we need a reporting mob just like  theirs. ,Mesicks,e9d0qf3,conservative
But look at what happens with our boy from the daily wire Michael Knowles,uriel2xa,e9bnddq,conservative
Facebook and Facebook*,Pointy_Nipples,e9crrqv,conservative
"Indefinitely.  

The only option to stop it is to not use those sites and either create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, gradually reducing the market share of Leftist ones. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bfsob,conservative
"Until people stop using social media, which means never",Al_Gayda,e9bw1zc,conservative
"They just need to be enforced as publishers. If they want to curate content, that's fine. But they need to held accountable for what they allow on their platform then.",Drewbagger,e9cbwm4,conservative
At this rate forever. It keeps happening. We yell and complain. We ask: ‘What are we going to do about this?’ We do nothing and repeat. ,A_WildStory_Appeared,e9cplte,conservative
As long as anyone who disagrees still uses it.  Delete Failbook,booblitchutz,e9byz28,conservative
"Bullshit. These people make us on the left look terrible, not that we needed their help.

This is unacceptable.

Edit; If Alex Jones was deplatformed then these wackadoos should be as well. Charged with crimes too.

Edit 2; Smash Racism DC or whatever the fuck their ridiculous name is has been deleted off Twitter, but is still on Facebook. Unacceptable. People who call for harm to fall on those they disagree with should not be given the time of day.",ScramJiggler,e9byu4r,conservative
When we get a FBI and Justice Dept that the nation deserves again.,raffu280,e9bkq8p,conservative
I believe New Jersey has designated them as such.,unibuckeye,e9bmfeq,conservative
I thought they were.,dicaparly,e9boeh6,conservative
"after hundreds (or more) of Conservatives die, then *maybe* they will conisder it",CreativeRoutine,e9c1lsx,conservative
Because the people writing the laws are too busy sucking Dorsey's pencil dick to care.,dicaparly,e9bodu2,conservative
Boycott,eleete,e9bk8h8,conservative
"> create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, 

How? 

No credit card or payment processors will allow you to collect money to fund it (has happened to many people before, they've resorted to crypto, but that's a poor substitute for real money).

No US-based domain registrar will allow you to have a domain name though you might find a shady foreign one if your lucky, and if your unlucky one of the US based ones will just decide that they don't want to act as a registrar and then refuse to transfer the domain, effectively stealing it (has happened at least once recently).

No US-based hosting will allow you to purchase their services to host your content. If you are lucky, a sketchy off-shore host might allow you, but their sketchy (only allow payments in crypto), their slow since their not hosted in the us, and have poor uptime. This severely impacts any competitiveness that you might hope to have, and effectively rules out hosting streaming video of any kind.

Same for any major content delivery networks (CSNs), so that's another knock at any chance of competitiveness. 

No mainstream DDOS-protection service will do business with you, making you highly susceptible of attacks and a lot of downtime, and will likely get your hosting provider to drop you, if your constantly under DDOS attacks.

So, your solution to tech monopolies colluding to limit free speech is to rely on non-US companies, to do it for free (since they can't collect money), and to not bother trying to compete with services that require your site to be fast, have 99% uptime, or host video content. Yeah, sounds like a winning solution.",PrawnsAreOk,e9cc99y,conservative
Except they get shut down as soon as the media can find a reason. Just look at what happened to Gab,dicaparly,e9bobnj,conservative
"> The only option to stop it is to not use those sites and either create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, gradually reducing the market share of Leftist ones. 

literally impossible.",JMB_was_a_god,e9chj72,conservative
Or until conservatives wise up and remember that even there ancestors supported Regulation now and then,ExpensiveMention,e9cses0,conservative
Then Write ur representatives,ExpensiveMention,e9csl9x,conservative
"You already deleted it.

So why isnt it dying?

Every conservative in the world wouldnt even make a dent in Facebook",ExpensiveMention,e9csiwc,conservative
Alex Jones never called for violence like this,ExpensiveMention,e9csoi1,conservative
"""Again."" Since the cross dressing queen of blackmail started it, the FBI has been nothing but incredibly corrupt. ",PascalsRazor,e9cq239,conservative
Write to mathew whitaker. Tell him it needs to be,ExpensiveMention,e9csrc5,conservative
That escalated quickly ,Dmfconrad,e9bpv00,conservative
never works.,JMB_was_a_god,e9bm93s,conservative
well said!,JMB_was_a_god,e9chjcm,conservative
"Dont worry! Im sure some noble billionaire will fund a Facebook alternative that loses him money just for u!

/S

In reality the richest company in the world (google) already tried to dethrone Facebook. It didnt work

Even when they FORCED u to sign up",ExpensiveMention,e9cs9hu,conservative
"So itss not really an option

The public has 0 options to stop it

Wich is precisely why the govt exists

Because the ONLY option to stop it is a govt law 

",ExpensiveMention,e9cs502,conservative
"And that, ladies and gentlemen, is the liberal mindset in a nutshell.",booblitchutz,e9cu8ow,conservative
Its true tho.,ExpensiveMention,e9cssdn,conservative
[Boycott](https://i.pinimg.com/736x/97/a8/0e/97a80ed8356a560effcca23fd89890c1.jpg),ClosetFascist,e9ckvu7,conservative
"But Libertarians are still busy praying to ""muh invisible hand of free market"" and would never support govt action of any kind (unless its bailing out billionaires)

Conservatives need to step up and take our party back from the Libertarians that would destroy it on ""muh principles"". Libertarians already destroyed there own party. Dont let them ruin ours",ExpensiveMention,e9cs6ij,conservative
"Except im conservative but sure

Ur not conservative. Ur Libertarian.

And Libertarians are idiots who support an ideology thats killed more people than communism

They understand economics less than ocasio cortez
",ExpensiveMention,e9cuwai,conservative
Libertarianism boycotts in a nutshell,ExpensiveMention,e9csuiu,conservative
"No, pot heads destroyed the libertarian party. The issue with libertarians is that they have solid principles, but lack the historical context of their ideas put into action. A totally free market sounds good in theory, but so does communism. Its very different on paper than it is in practice, where you get that pesky thing called ""human nature"" thrown into the mix. We need a healthy balance of free markets and government control, and it seems the only people willing to have a debate over where that balance lies is conservatives and classical liberals.",dicaparly,e9cuz9z,conservative
"That comment 100%

Idk if it was just pitheads but everything else 100%


Ideologues are bad on either side

And Libertarians and communists are the 2 extremes of both sides. Both are probably equally bad in practice",ExpensiveMention,e9cv4wt,conservative
There is no legitimate reason for them to be two days past what the law allows on this. ,Buddha_Punch,e9cbx1o,conservative
LBJ won his senate seat with a ballot box of 200 votes that showed up at the last moment putting him 14 votes ahead. It was about to be opened up an examined in court for the first time when LBJ got a Supreme Court Justice to throw it out. Barely stole the election. ,thebroncoman8292,e9cc16b,conservative
What a gorgeous thumbnail.,xJownage,e9c8sh6,conservative
"She's a *beautiful* and *magnificent* woman. 

This photo simply exemplifies the level of scrutiny she will use when overseeing the vote ~~manipulation~~ counting, as is traditionally displayed by the body language of a squinting eye. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9c968y,conservative
No reason to cross that out when we all know it's true. ,xJownage,e9c9jv3,conservative
They really need to get a handle on their election process down there. This happens every damn time.,Wespiratory,e9cllos,conservative
"My wife knows where the shotgun is, the location of the ammo, how to load and charge the weapon, and how to discharge it at the intended target.  Like myself, the wife is also aware of the extreme circumstances that need to be present, and provable in a court of law, that would justify that magnitude of self-defense.  A mob of mask wearing psychopaths breaking down the front door, **and gaining entry**, is absolutely one of those justifiable moments.

",Jizzlobber42,e9b2bx1,conservative
"Chanting “Tucker Carlson we will fight, we know where you sleep at night” on his front lawn with a bullhorn is just peaceful protest. Not mob behavior, obviously.",mattyice18,e9bbugx,conservative
Breaking down the front door gives reason to shoot back.  ,CreativeRoutine,e9b4tlz,conservative
"Maxime Waters wanted this. This is going to escalate until they break down the wrong door and catch a 9mm round to the chest. 

...And then the media will vilify the guy defending his home. ",LumpyWumpus,e9b0w0n,conservative
"If they actually entered his home and harmed his family, I bet CNN would try to blame Trump for it.",mikecx79,e9b2fku,conservative
"Just had multiple ""conversations"" with lefties in r/politics and r/news.  They are mostly ok with this because they think Tucker is a racist.  Troubling times indeed.",socalpro,e9bemg6,conservative
This is a mob...a product of the democrat party.,J0kerr,e9b55s6,conservative
This is one of the reasons we have firearms.,KryptoPower77,e9bstt6,conservative
WeRe nOT a MoB. People who downplay ANTIFA are the worst ,thereisasuperee,e9bdamk,conservative
"*mob literally breaks down Tucks door*:
""hahahahahahahaha""

* A psycho simply threatens a CNN anchor*:
Reeeee kill all Republicans now!",coolrulez555,e9bkrza,conservative
This should be talked about way more than Acosta.,callthereaper64,e9bgy0y,conservative
"She should've taken Joe Biden's advice: Fire two blasts, outside the house.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uv66RiFC4T0
",synn89,e9bi1pn,conservative
Damn. There are seven hundred and sixty two reasons to stay the fuck away from my door. ,AmericanYidGunner,e9b8dak,conservative
This is so unacceptable.  Where are the police?  What is wrong with these people?,Falkamper,e9bqpb5,conservative
Jobs not mobs,SuperFunMonkey,e9bdjal,conservative
These commie purple haired freaks are going to mess with the wrong person and get speed holes punched in them eventually. They're lucky Tucker's wife wasn't waiting behind the front door with a rifle or shotgun in case one of those gender studies majors actually got into the house.,MrSparkle86,e9batou,conservative
Grab a gun and wait for them to come inside. ,M0L0N_LABE,e9bap28,conservative
Is this real?,callthereaper64,e9b9ltn,conservative
"When will people realize, the time for peaceful protest and deliberation is soon coming to an end. Nations are founded through the fall of older nations...it's cyclical if you will. I don't suggest conservatives resort to violence, but we ought to be prepared because it will eventually find us...and if the fight is brought to us we should stand united against the ultimate goal of the west, to destroy the founding concepts/principles this country was built on. Conservatives should wait patiently, but eventually you won't be able to sit on the sidelines, as not acting is to act and to choose a side. Eventually this will boil over and it will have to solved physically.",annonymous93,e9ba2as,conservative
Time to start shooting mf'ers,Pockaden,e9bai6o,conservative
Animals,BombadMus1im,e9bpwr4,conservative
"I'm taking a gander that this would be the incident that would allow DOJ and Trump to label Antifa as a domestic terrorist organization, and start investigations to find anyone and everyone who is linked and has donated to them and have them investigated as well. Lets see how the Dems like it when they're on the wrong end of a criminal investigation. ",CN9YLW,e9c6bqp,conservative
"Wow... this is screwed up

“They weren’t protesting anything specific that I had said. They weren’t asking me to change anything. They weren’t protesting a policy or advocating for legislation. … They were threatening me and my family and telling me to leave my own neighborhood in the city that I grew up in.”",linklitter,e9bdtyk,conservative
"The way things are going, our beautiful country's going to be in a dark place soon.  These weak-minded useful idiots don't understand what their political party's getting them into, and I almost pity them for it.",Orbtecc,e9bnvnp,conservative
[deleted],,e9bh4td,conservative
"It used to be outlandish to think that another shooting level civil war would happen in America again, but I'm really starting to believe it's coming. Soon. ",DXGypsy,e9cf23i,conservative
[removed],,e9azgwo,conservative
"I would have been unloading at the point they broke the door down.  Unloading and reloading.  Wash, Rinse, Repeat.
",tehForce,e9bx2dk,conservative
"Seems like most of Reddit news and political subs are silencing this story which is unsurprising. I’m glad it’s still somewhat trending on Twitter. I understand protesting, that’s fine, but this is completely illegal. Liberal MSM refusing to talk about it is setting a dangerous precedent that this nonsense is okay. ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e9bnic7,conservative
She needs to be well armed in the future. Nothing says safety like a 12 gauge.,StephenScherer1,e9blts2,conservative
This is horrible. Why didn't the police show up?,daviipup,e9c2vo2,conservative
"I'd imagine tucker's wife to be the kind of gal that keeps a revolver on her, not the hide in the closet type.",mkov88,e9cdhpx,conservative
So have these fools been arrested yet?,RobotXander,e9coluy,conservative
"I have several times considered putting together an AR for home defense, but my pistol always seemed sufficient.

Thank you, Antifa, for giving me the clearest reason yet for needing a much higher mag capacity for home defense.",haplogreenleaf,e9b7dox,conservative
In Texas just being on your property dressed like that and being threatening is enough.,SeismicOne,e9bopwj,conservative
"So she shouldn't just go on the back porch and unload a couple of shells in the air?
",tehForce,e9bx5kf,conservative
AR15 is better for home defense contrary to what people say.,M6D_Magnum,e9bxugz,conservative
Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.,pacifist228,e9bbc8n,conservative
Came here to say exactly this. Good shotgun fixes everything,Nemesis651,e9bklla,conservative
What COWARDLY Behavior. ,StephenScherer1,e9bmreg,conservative
This is exactly what Leftists want.,8K12,e9b9wm6,conservative
"This already happens any time there's a self defense shooting. Just go to local media in Dallas, Memphis, or Atlanta, or any other major city. In one recent story, an elderly man was villified by the media for shooting a black man who broke down his door and had a weapon.",dicaparly,e9bni9u,conservative
"I have always said that the left aren't interested in civility because the can ramp up the violent rhetoric and use an event, like having a poor activist getting shot, to their advantage and plan for another Anti Gun rally in DC. Win - Win for the Dems.",Buit,e9baoe7,conservative
"I said it elsewhere in this thread.  I would've unloaded and reloaded.  Wash, rinse, and repeat ",tehForce,e9ccomn,conservative
I look forward to the day they come to all of our doors and are surprised when they are euthanized for threatening our families.,deepfeels96,e9cfyr5,conservative
Piggybacking to ask: Did Tucker address this on his show tonight? I wasn’t able to watch. ,GetAGoddamnBeagle,e9c6t8a,conservative
That's like betting the sun is going to rise tomorrow. You're not gonna get any takers.,ValidMakesnake,e9b8fva,conservative
"""You made them do this! """,mexicanmuscel,e9bary1,conservative
"Nah, they'd talk about it for like half a day, the main figures on the station would condem it, they would have guests on that go ""meh, maybe it deserved"" then move on to talk about Trump's attack on the press. ",Glochidiate,e9cncrx,conservative
"I could not find this story on /r/news. But of course the top post of /r/news is of some guy threatening a CNN anchor. You really can't make this stuff up. This may be the most bias major website on the internet.

EDIT: The story appears to be posted now and people are on Tucker's side. Faith in /r/news is minutely restored.",sau1_g0odman,e9bj3az,conservative
"Yes, the new lynch mobs will grow.  It is only a matter of time before the new Democratic leadership endorses them.  I think they will wear brown shirts, the color of the earth they will protect.  conservatives will need to wear some kind of insignia so they can be identified.  Consetvatives have ruined this country and economy.  Conservatives are the cause of misery, lock em up.  /s   with what you know is a bit of truth.",Conservativeone,e9c7tqt,conservative
Theyre in DC they would have arrested her for even thinking of using a shotgun.,War-Damn-America,e9bj1xe,conservative
"Or his other advice, and fire one through the front door.",mlmack,e9blcqx,conservative
"Sadly, only five hundred and fifty six to stay away from mine.",rf-engineer,e9bc5cc,conservative
"I've only got nine, and they're all hollow. ",Jerseydevil556,e9bl5qi,conservative
Multiply that number by 39 or 51,sau1_g0odman,e9bhzp1,conservative
"Don’t be silly the Carlson’s live in DC, where even thinking of uttering the phrase firearm will get you arrested. ",War-Damn-America,e9bj8h0,conservative
"Yeah, but when they get shot up, they're going to say they're the victims, and that they did no wrong.",ModeratorsAreDouches,e9c2t09,conservative
I live in Ohio. I don't *have* to wait for them to break through the door.,unibuckeye,e9blx9j,conservative
"Yes, this is real.  This is the current state of American politics, where violent Leftist mobs besiege terrified women in their homes because their husbands committed thoughtcrime.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bgcz7,conservative
http://i.magaimg.net/img/1jb.jpg,PrawnsAreOk,e9bavcf,conservative
"Fuck waiting patiently. That's gotten us from a free country to a socialist/capitalist/bureaucratic corporatist muddle, trending toward socialism. We need to push this country back toward liberty as fast as possible, using any and all methods that are justifiable and will be most effective in the long run.",LibertyTerp,e9bbx4r,conservative
I think the modern left is a conspiracy to make Trump look good.,rAlexanderAcosta,e9bngxm,conservative
"> Carlson, host of ""Tucker Carlson Tonight,"" was not home at the time. He said his wife, Susie, was home alone and heard the commotion from the kitchen. She called the police and locked herself into a pantry, he said. His brother -- who lives close by -- arrived about the same time as law enforcement.

> The host said activists rang his doorbell, broke his oak door and one protester was apparently caught on security video mentioning a pipe bomb.

Directly from the Fox news report, maybe if you actually read the article you would know that.

https://www.foxnews.com/politics/mob-chants-threats-outside-tucker-carlsons-dc-home",Havebaconwilltravel,e9azzze,conservative
"They did. Apparently they didn't detain anyone. Not sure if that means Antifa scattered like roaches when they showed up, or if they just... didn't detain anyone. :/",trustymutsi,e9carly,conservative
"""Nobody needs more than 10 rounds.""",ValidMakesnake,e9b8dsk,conservative
"Shotgun > [musket > handgun > cannon loaded with grape shot > bayonet](https://i.imgur.com/efCkOd4.jpg) > all else 

for home defense",OnionLamp,e9bdnfs,conservative
AR pistols are fun to build ,gtrdundave2,e9bu56w,conservative
Still the most frightening sound on the planet is the sound of the slide going back on a 12 gauge pump shotgun. (The bad guy knows you can't miss.),StephenScherer1,e9bmpcq,conservative
"AR is unwieldy and super fucking loud. Better would a “pistol-rifle”, essentially a miniature rifle chambered in pistol ammos. Quieter and easier to wield indoors with better accuracy and control than a handgun. ",trelium06,e9b8df9,conservative
"~~Honestly an AR isn't great for home defense in my opinion if you're considering it for indoor use.  You want a shotgun for that, in large part because 5.56 is going to over-penetrate and you don't want to kill your neighbor by accident.  Now, if you're able to hold a perimeter at or beyond your front door, then an AR is better (as I see it) because you can engage threats at a distance.  But in a case like this, with people literally slamming their bodies against the door... I'd stick with a shotgun.~~

~~Edit - this is my opinion, not the word of God. Please stop downvoting just because you disagree.~~

Edit #2: 5.56 has the penetrating power of a spitball, slightly damp tissue paper will cause the round to fragment.  Please use it for all your home defense needs.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bg3m0,conservative
"An AR will most assuredly deafen you AND any shots you miss will penetrate pretty much anything they come into contact with. You could easily kill your next door neighbor from inside of your house. 


AR is not a close range reason. Pistols are best with shotguns being second best. ",Bears_Bearing_Arms,e9brlbj,conservative
"> In Texas just being on your property dressed like that and being threatening is enough

...and I envy your laws surround the topic of ""Stand your Ground""; in WA State you pretty much need your back against the wall, at the end of a hallway, with the assailant(s) having entered and advanced on you giving you ""no other option"" before using deadly force.  Other instances can be won in court of course, but you need to be able to prove that you feared for your life, or that of your family.  

The commies in Seattle are making it harder and harder to responsibly own, operate, and defend yourself with a firearm every chance they get.  As of now, a .22 semi-auto rimfire plinking rifle is now considered an ""Assault Rifle""...... morons.  

Link; https://ballotpedia.org/Washington_Initiative_1639,_Changes_to_Gun_Ownership_and_Purchase_Requirements_Measure_(2018)",Jizzlobber42,e9bpjl1,conservative
">Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.

I would disagree.

Shotguns have a very limited round capacity compared to any conventional handgun or semi-automatic rifle. They are extremely slow to chamber the next round unless it's a semi-auto shotgun. They are much longer than a handgun, which makes navigating the confined quarters of a house more difficult. They also have a more difficult to control recoil.

The supposed pros of a shotgun are round spread, which at the range inside of a house are too small to be considered a pro (the size of an orange or smaller), and greater stopping power, which if home invader can easily take a .45 JHP, stopping power isn't the the issue, the issue is why superman is breaking into your house.",PrawnsAreOk,e9bcewp,conservative
"> Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.

I agree; 00-Buck and in a hallway and you can be a terrible shot and still hit what's coming at you.  My pistol is more accessible to me, and various other semi-auto rifles at my disposal are more comfortable to shoot, and accurate, but pistol ammo (mine is .40) and rifle ammo (mine being 7.62x39 and .308) has the tendency to punch through their targets, the wall behind, the wall behind *that*, and possibly into my neighbors house.",Jizzlobber42,e9bgb9w,conservative
"This is what Hamas does. During the summer in the big border clashes Hamas told their followers to charge towards the fence saying it had been breached, while knowing it had not. Sacrifices for the cause.",MajorLads,e9c5ssj,conservative
"I think we’re terribly close to civil war. But I don’t know of a better solution. Leftism is going to take over and the socialism talks needs to be curbed. Importing shit tier people needs to end. Maybe we just secede, people will obviously have to move or stay In the country they don’t agree with. 

America going into civil war tho would cause a global crisis. ",MeatPumper69,e9cuqku,conservative
"This group represents the left in the way that Cesar sayoc represents the right; its the crazy violent radical branch that doesn’t represent the majority. 

Demonizing swaths of people doesn’t help anyone. ",xpis2,e9bhil0,conservative
I mean don’t you think saying “All Leftists want vilification of gun owners and police officers” is as bad as the left saying “All Conservatives want black people dead”?,MADBARZ,e9br1lr,conservative
He called in from a planned vacation.,ngoni,e9cbr81,conservative
"""WHEN WILL YOU TONE DOWN YOUR RHETORIC, YOU ORANGE NAZI?!",unibuckeye,e9bls40,conservative
"Nah, Twitter and Tumblr are still around",dicaparly,e9bnsi4,conservative
I think Tucker needs to play that several times in his next show.,rf-engineer,e9c025r,conservative
"That's plenty, friend. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9bch6n,conservative
"I only have nine, thanks to the gun laws in my country. 

But even that's enough, if you have good arguments and better aim.",SCPendolino,e9bgb9c,conservative
"Three hundred fifty seven in my case, and fear of coddled suburban wannabes isn't one of them.

I'm really waiting to see what happens when one of these kids meets with *real* violence.  I expect crying and lawsuits from his parents. ",LonelyMachines,e9bftlc,conservative
"Buddy, 22 would work just fine. You're shooting antifa, if you can hit those skinny fuxkers they'll just about snap in half regardless of what you hit them with.",Saxtonhine,e9ca5ux,conservative
"Wait, what? I thought Ohio had the same rules as TN for home defense.",dicaparly,e9bo06e,conservative
Yeah heard Ben report on this.  This is said that the main stream cares more about Acostas ego then this.  Chanting we know where you sleep fucking irks me so bad.,callthereaper64,e9bgntg,conservative
"Just saying, timing is important",annonymous93,e9bca5q,conservative
Don't bother. He's a ChapoTrapTard.,PrawnsAreOk,e9b09pl,conservative
"Gavin Newsom says I only need 10 here in Cali  (but, shhhhh, I load 10+1, Jokes on him)  ",Goblicon,e9bl11l,conservative
That’s because for a leftist his wife and daughter getting raped by a train of guys is Friday night.,TomahawkSuppository,e9bi4rx,conservative
That's heresy in the Imperium. Bayonets always come first. ,The_Mighty_Rex,e9bidtx,conservative
"Tally ho, lads.",rf-engineer,e9bhvue,conservative
"Fun fact (legend): Cassius Clay (the man Ali was originally named for) ran an abolitionist newspaper in Lexington KY. One day, an anti-abolitionist mob attacked his home (or possibly newspaper office) and according to legend, he fired a swivel gun from the top of his stairs into the mob to drive them off. Likely bogus story, but he did have at least 2 small cannons at his house and newspaper office.",piper06w,e9bxgy6,conservative
Have you ever fired a shotgun? The spread of the shot is quite tight at close range. It is very easy to miss your target. You need to aim. ,machinerer,e9caplo,conservative
">Still the most frightening sound on the planet is the sound of the slide going back on a 12 gauge pump shotgun. (The bad guy knows you can't miss.)

Unless he doesn't hear it, doesn't care, you short stroke, or you do miss...",richardguy,e9bp8dl,conservative
"Pistol Caliber Carbines are good for that purpose, but it is so much cheaper to build an AR, just make it a pistol AR, give it a 10 inch barrel and a blade brace. ",austin123457,e9b9apq,conservative
"The loudness is Fudd-Lore. Basically, all gunshots are going to be in the 150-decibel range, except for a .22LR rifle, which is around 130 decibels. Pretty much anything at or above 140 decibels can cause immediate hearing damage.

The rest is just conjecture and personal opinion.",haplogreenleaf,e9bam8z,conservative
Pistol rounds over penetrate while 5.56 doesn’t ,bilbobimbopoophead,e9bkprw,conservative
AR is much shorter than the average shotgun and not as loud as you might think. ,richardguy,e9bp9ii,conservative
"Just get a suppressor, then. If you're gonna rely on a gun for home defense you might as well shell out for the perfect PDW. A short-barreled suppressed AR (pistol or rifle configuration) is pretty much the perfect home defense weapon. ",Maswasnos,e9bqlzp,conservative
So a Hi-Point 995TS 9mm carbine. $250.,KingOfTheP4s,e9caqim,conservative
">  5.56 is going to over-penetrate

5.56 starts tumbling after going through as little as drywall. 9mm has been know to penetrate more.",JMB_was_a_god,e9bhpww,conservative
"> 5.56 is going to over-penetrate

It really doesn't. The 55gr bullet fragments fairly quickly and imparts it energy quickly. It'll destroy what it hits really well, and will penetrate a thin initial barrier well due to speed(ballistic vest, car door) but not house walls.",synn89,e9bid6c,conservative
This is false ,bilbobimbopoophead,e9bkmcj,conservative
You are wrong...please do some ballistics research.,Goblicon,e9bl7pr,conservative
A shotgun loaded with any kind of home defense buckshot is going to penetrate way more than a 5.56 round. ,Maswasnos,e9bqxew,conservative
"A good 12 gauge with buck shot (or a slug) should suffice. A pump action is great. If you have a single shot, practice loading and unloading.",unibuckeye,e9blmz6,conservative
"Not a matter of opinion really. This has been tested multiple times. 5.56 is definitely a fast moving round but not an “over-penetrating” one. Shotgun, in anything larger than say birdshot, will vastly out penetrate pretty much all AR rounds. ",DV8EDD,e9byvpl,conservative
"> An AR will most assuredly deafen you AND any shots you miss will penetrate pretty much anything they come into contact with. You could easily kill your next door neighbor from inside of your house. 

this is simply not true. 5.56 will tumble and fragment going through just one barrier. ",JMB_was_a_god,e9bu6dc,conservative
"Sorry but you’re just wrong. Pistol calibers are typically large and slow moving compared to 5.56. 5.56 is small and moves fast, so it burns off kinetic energy quicker. 

There’s a reason 5.56 isn’t good for hunting large animals. It doesn’t cause a lot of damage or go through obstacles well. There’s a reason I use a 45-70 for hunting. It moves very slow but has a very large bullet, so it punches through anything it hits and doesn’t stop. It’s like your car getting hit by a rock going 60 mph vs a train hitting your car going 30.

Also, if you shoot a gun indoors it’s going to deafen you no matter what you shoot.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9bu6ek,conservative
"Yep. In Texas you can use lethal force to protect yourself, someone else, and your property. If they are on your property trying to steal crap you can shoot.",SeismicOne,e9bqv97,conservative
"> the issue is why superman is breaking into your house

That only happens in 0.02% of home invasion scenarios.

Another point on shotguns (and yours are excellent) is that it takes two hands to work the action.

A pump shotgun *can* be good for home defense, but there are more practical options. ",LonelyMachines,e9bfnsr,conservative
Sawed off saiga for the win. ,trump-train-bitches,e9bcp4p,conservative
"I'd disagree with you. A shotgun has statistically more stopping power than any handgun, by far. Is easier to land shots with than a pistol, because it's a long gun. And with a pump action you can leave it loaded without a round in the chamber very safely.

I'd argue it's a simpler weapon to operate than a semi-auto too.",synn89,e9bisee,conservative
00 Buck is going to waaaaaaay penetrate.,Goblicon,e9blfq9,conservative
"I hear this argument a lot but it's simply untrue. We don't have multiple leaders on the right calling for this action, the left does. That isn't a small group of radicals that's the people trying to lead the party. It's not on the same level at all.",The_Mighty_Rex,e9biacx,conservative
"I would agree with you if it weren't for political, cultural, and Civic leaders on the left calling for escalation of violence and using their influence to encourage this kind of behavior. Contrast that to every conservative leader and commentator that disavowed Sayoc before we even knew who he was, and consistently denounce all violence except self-defense.",dicaparly,e9bno1g,conservative
"I think the problem is the politics of hate, parties know toxic rhetoric works so they do not denounce it, and this inspires deranged people. Most democratic voters are not extreme like antifa, but they do not adequately denounce them.  Antifa is often presented as a force that fights fascists by the democrats, while they do not want report the reality of arbitrary violence and intimidation. Throughout history flirting with extremist fringes to try to bolster support never goes well. ",MajorLads,e9c6tu3,conservative
"No.  He sent bombs that weren't going to detonate.  These people are deliberately inciting mass violence and publishing addresses so someone will kill a person on the list.

",chabanais,e9c2qa0,conservative
"Maybe, but that isn't what he said.",rf-engineer,e9bzia5,conservative
No way is that a comparison. What are you smokin?,8K12,e9c64s3,conservative
That's 900 reasons in a different measurement.,Moonthrower,e9cpoeu,conservative
And don't forget the media reaction. I just hope I can move back out to the farm before things really get bad  because my home has 1100 + 50 + 2 people that won't hesitate to use them. We just *really* prefer using ours at the range,dicaparly,e9bnxzm,conservative
">I'm really waiting to see what happens when one of these kids meets with *real* violence.  I expect crying and lawsuits from his parents. 

HE WAS A GOOD BOY. HE ATE HIS SOY AND DID HIS ART MAJOR HOMEWORK BEFORE GOING OUT TO PLAY WITH THE MOB. THIS IS A TRAVESTY.

",soylent_absinthe,e9cu84z,conservative
In Ohio I can use deadly force on *any* part of my property if I feel threatened. The presumption of innocence is on me.,unibuckeye,e9bp0bm,conservative
"It more than irks me, it worries me.  I'm not Tucker Carlson, I'm (hopefully) never going to have even a fraction of the national recognition / hatred that he enjoys, but when you take a step back and look at this through a non-partisan lens, it's political violence.  The same sort of thing - violent rhetoric turning into violence - was seen [during the collapse of the Roman Republic](https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/lessons-decline-democracy-from-ruined-roman-republic-180970711/).  Consider that we've been teetering for over half a century now on the edge of domestic collapse.  The 1960s and 1970s saw massive riots, high racial tensions, and a heavily divided populace.  The 1980s and 1990s were a time of relative prosperity and foreign policy victories (the USSR fell, the Gulf War was won, the economy was in a massive seemingly endless bull market, etc).  The 2000s and 2010s have seen a growing swell of violent rhetoric, mob violence, and both foreign policy (9/11, Afghanistan, Iraq, etc) and economic uncertainty (2000 crash, 2008 crash, and the inevitable upcoming bear market).  We haven't reached the lows that the 60s and 70s plumbed, but we appear to be well on our way there. 

Our Republic is dying.  I won't predict when it will die or what will replace it, but it is terminally ill.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bi57m,conservative
"Fair enough, not pissed about your post, just adding emphasis. We have to take the initiative. Don't just play defense. Spend most of our time on offense.",LibertyTerp,e9beo2p,conservative
Was more for the people that would see his/her post than really arguing with him/her. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9b11wx,conservative
Never forget the one in the chamber.......,unibuckeye,e9blhso,conservative
Damn...that escalated quickly.,Goblicon,e9bkzdh,conservative
Where does my trebuchet fit in?,unibuckeye,e9bljhp,conservative
"Silly followers of the corpse emperor, everyone knows that noise based weaponry is superior!",samurguy990,e9brd50,conservative
"Fuck no! Power first, feet, and power bat's come first! Haven't you met the angry marines? Ranged weapons don't exist! ",JakeSaint,e9bwk5v,conservative
"You mean Cassius Marcellus Clay, the great Bowie knife fighter? They say an anti-abolitionist assassin once jumped forward and tried to shoot him, but missed. Clay leapt forward with his knife and took one of his eyes, one of his ears, and had split his skull with it before the horrified crowd pulled him off his would-be killer. Modern historians believe Clay was just angry at what a massive pussy the shooter was and had been trying to whittle a second, leaner, better opponent out of the original. 

And by 'historians' I mean myself, when drinking, as I currently am. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9c3jz1,conservative
"I have several shotguns. A short barrel is for home defense not hunting. At 15 feet the pattern is a foot across using #6 shot. You don't want to risk injury to family or neighbors and #6 shot will not go through walls but will give you that spread out pattern. I'm sorry to burst your bubble but within an INVASION setting there is NO time to aim. You point as you would with your finger and immediately fire. Go find an old Viet Nam Vet, he will have mastered ""quick kill"". Those Viet Nam Vets who did not use quick kill came home in boxes.",StephenScherer1,e9cxut6,conservative
"If he doesn't hear the slide go back; he will still see the flash and hear a big BOOM. Lots of pellets going his way, he will get hit. Then, he has a second chance to hear the slide go back, see the flash and hear a big BOOM ------ AGAIN! --AGAIN! -- AGAIN! -- AGAIN! (You can trust me, I'm a Vet; it's Scary Scary!)",StephenScherer1,e9by1su,conservative
Did not know about prices ouch,trelium06,e9bp7nv,conservative
"Yeah you’re not going to be able to hear much difference between a pistol and a rifle going off directly by your head, without any ears it’ll be loud as fuck either way",kowbrandt,e9bicf5,conservative
"Unless you run subsonic ammo, and let's be real... For home defense you really don't need supersonic ammo. ",JakeSaint,e9bxi99,conservative
"This is accurate, and I’d further add that space and distance to impact could make an difference as well. ",DV8EDD,e9byll2,conservative
You can build an AR with a 7.5in barrell,gtrdundave2,e9bu6lz,conservative
"Accurate, same for heavier shotgun shell types.",DV8EDD,e9byoxe,conservative
"Well, I hope you're right.  I've personally seen 55gr 5.56 fired at 100 yds go through two boards (pallet propped on its side w/ target stapled to it) without any fragmentation or keyholing.  I could very easily see a round punching through drywall and remaining relatively intact with enough kinetic energy to go through somebody's window or maybe even another drywall.  Cinderblocks would probably stop it (e.g. might go through one side but the round will almost certainly fragment and be stopped before it penetrates the other side), and if you shot through bricks or thicker walls (e.g. load-bearing interior wall) it'd be stopped as well.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bkz74,conservative
"I have.  We aren't talking rounds fired at 100+ yards here, we're talking distances of 10-15 yards tops.  A 5.56 is going to have an awful lot of kinetic energy remaining if the only thing that it hits is drywall and insulation.  Even if it fragments en route, you've still got multiple high-velocity fragments that might go through a window, maaaaybe (probably not but I don't know for certain) drywall.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9blht6,conservative
"It’s shitty indoors specifically because it’s a long gun. Stand in a hallway holding a mossberg 500 and try and spin around 180 degrees to the other direction. Your shotgun will bang into the wall.

Also you can leave a round in the chamber in any gun and it’ll be safe. They don’t shoot themselves. Also, a gun for emergencies without a round in the chamber is just a lump of metal.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9bucd6,conservative
"I bought the ammo at the recommendation of the folks at the gun shop; the 00-Buck obliterates pumpkins or watermelons @ 20 feet, then still has enough force to punch through 1 layer of sheetrock (though spread out *a lot*) but looses almost all velocity after that",Jizzlobber42,e9bnqzg,conservative
Can you give some examples of the left leaders encouraging violence?,xpis2,e9bpb7m,conservative
"I wouldn't worry.  These are the participation trophy kids.  They're unaccustomed to the slightest verbal conflict, much less real violence.  When it comes to the real thing, they'll run.

Then they'll call the very police they claim to despise to come help them. ",LonelyMachines,e9bqjfu,conservative
I've said for years that we are Neo-Rome.,callthereaper64,e9bk6xx,conservative
The cancer of statism will always kill its host.  It never stops growing and eventually collapses under its own weight.   It is the inevitabile trajectory  of granting coercive power to one group of people over a society. ,podestaspassword,e9bl909,conservative
Did you just assume xir's gender??,FelixFuckfurter,e9b4kjh,conservative
You forgot ze one in ze chamba!,nsmith1003,e9c427g,conservative
All the way over on the Age Of Sigmar shelves because Bretonians arn't getting any love. ,XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9cckgj,conservative
Go to bed grandpa,richardguy,e9byck0,conservative
"Eh, you can find a Ruger PCC for about 450.

I'd personally rather have an AR9 but the PCC is probably cheaper.",Nonethewiserer,e9bxm5q,conservative
300 blackout ftw,rf-engineer,e9bxlbc,conservative
"Well, drywall won't stop much of anything, sadly. In fact even common pistol calibers will easily go through an entire car, assuming they don't hit anything solid in between. Shotguns loaded with shot do perform better here.

It's just that an AR-15 isn't going to be much worse than a 9mm or 45, because handguns already penetrate a lot more than most people think.

",synn89,e9bojcp,conservative
Pallet wood is usually lower quality scrap wood anyway.,unibuckeye,e9blp2k,conservative
">does a heavy bullet traveling at low speed penetrate better than a very small one going very fast

Gee I wonder why people don't big game hunt or shoot through brush with 556.",richardguy,e9bop40,conservative
"The reason why you generally want a round in the chamber is because for most guns your normal firing pattern is to not put a round in a chamber and you'll repeat that under stress. Firing a Glock isn't ""round in chamber, pull trigger, round in chamber, pull trigger"" it's ""pull trigger, pull trigger, repeat"". You'll repeat that under stress. This is why safeties on guns are generally bad as well, btw. Your normal firing pattern on each shot isn't to turn off the safety, so you may not do that under stress. 

Lever/pump action don't suffer from this. The normal firing pattern is ""work action, work trigger, work action, work trigger"" so under stress you'll repeat that. Get a dud round? Guess what you'll do under stress? Work action(eject unspent round), pull trigger.

This type of action is also safer to keep around than normal semi-auto because it takes 2 actions to fire the gun, instead of just one. It makes it harder to have a ND, especially for newer users.
",synn89,e9bwle0,conservative
"Hillary Clinton- https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/09/politics/hillary-clinton-civility-congress-cnntv/index.html

Maxine Waters- https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2018/06/25/maxine_waters_god_is_on_our_side.html

Eric Holder- https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2018/10/10/eric-holder-when-they-go-low-we-kick-them-thats-what-this-new-democratic-party-is-about/

Tim Kaine- https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/01/31/kaine_take_advantage_of_public_outcry_at_trump_to_get_outside_the_bubble.html

Loretta Lynch- http://nation.foxnews.com/2017/03/05/loretta-lynch-we-need-more-marching-blood-death-streets

I’m tired of looking, I’m sure you can find more.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9buzlh,conservative
Maxine Waters. Hillary Clinton. Eric Holder.,runs_in_the_jeans,e9butis,conservative
"I had a talk with my guns. None of them are aware of any of their kind ever injuring any living creature. I am also in full agreement with them. However, I do know a number of humans whose overbearing force with guns caused injury. My suggestion is that you not F... with Grandpa and breaking into his home is a very low percentage approach which will surely result in citizens arrest, only if you are easily identified as age 12 or less, and otherwise may result in very serious injury if you are very very very lucky. 

Praise the Lord, pass the ammo and always remember that if your assailant does not bleed out before the police arrive - YOU ARE USING THE WRONG AMMO!",StephenScherer1,e9c60c8,conservative
I dig it,gtrdundave2,e9bxnof,conservative
Yeah no argument on AR vs handgun. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9brvml,conservative
"Spartacus had some comments too, I thought.",rf-engineer,e9bzm56,conservative
"Oh look at that, he disappeared...",Moonthrower,e9cpkoy,conservative
"Man this has to be an ironic boomer bit or something

please tell me it is",richardguy,e9c67lr,conservative
Oh my shotgun has been known to murder pheasants. I hope that doesn’t make him a bad gun.,TannerPoonslayer,e9cx397,conservative
"I’m sure he did. 

Corey Booker is like a Jack O Lantern .

At first you see the face, but then there’s nothing inside.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9c6din,conservative
Facts tend to do that to liberals. ,LumpyWumpus,e9cqc2o,conservative
"Highly educated Viet Nam Era Vet.  Nice call. Younger man, when you are 70 you will know or see what I already know. You have 2 generations (40 years) to return to your homeland. The American Experiment is a dismal failure. The American system, REPUBLIC, was designed for those who are genetically presupposed to desire to help others overcome adversity. That is spelled EUROPEAN Christian.  Spanish (SPAIN) or German or Polish the morals and values are the SAME. It is the WRONG system for Central/South Americanos and an outright insult to Muslims. Your parents gave away the AMERICAN Dream and replaced it with the Norte Americano Gringo Lottery with FREE housing FREE medical, FREE food stamps, etc. Their ignorance sealed your fate. You shall go somewhat quietly into the night and that is more than you deserve for giving away your conetree.

Not 40 but 35 years from now according to the 🇺🇸 California will be 50+% CHINESE (Average IQ 104 as oppoaed to theAverage Hispanic IQ of 85 to 90)
I and ANYONE who follows History expect that:

1.   The 104 Group will view the 85- 90 group as little more than WORKER BEES, totally expendible. ONLY Europeans have that innate GENETIC compulsion to help others and no desire to divide up earned assets so that the unproductive and greedy can have equality.
2.  Worker Bees not BREEDER Bees. The Chinese are shy many millions of women. The modest IQ Hispanic Honnies will help fill that gap. They will go to the soldiers first as is the Asian custom throughout all of recorded history. They will care for several Chinese soldiers at a time but be fixed so that they cannot breed.
3.  The 🇺🇸 government estimates that China will have a new modern Navy larger than ours. Learn to say ""Yes Sir"" in Mandarin.
4.  The 51% highly practical Chinese will prefer to rule California rather than listen to the patter of tiny 85 IQ minds and they will have little respect for the 100 IQ Gringos who foolishly gave away their conetree.
5.  Expect a repeat performance of the system that has worked so very well for thousands of years. First China sends their civilians in to live in the country. Second, when Chinese citizens become numerous and annoying/threatening China stations overwhelming military troops on the border claiming that they will protect those of Chinese decent from violence. Third, Chinese migration begins in earnest. 
6.  The Dalai Llama is the religious leader of Tibet and has a Palace in Tibet but he can't go to Tibet because he criticized China for taking over Tibet. He has an arrest warrant outstanding in Chinese controlled Tibet. Now read #5 above again.

This Vet Boomer lived his life under FREEDOM. You will not be that lucky.








",StephenScherer1,e9cwgml,conservative
Your shotgun is forgiven. ,StephenScherer1,e9czau6,conservative
">I’m sure he did. 
>
>Corey Booker is like a Jack O Lantern .
>
>At first you see the face, but then there’s nothing inside.

Not even a candle? You trying to make me feel sorry for him?",rf-engineer,e9c8cbi,conservative
I certainly hope conservatives aren’t going to sit back and watch several elections get stolen. Where’s Trump on this?,the-divine-comedy,e9bg2k2,conservative
Is this out of the ordinary?  What’s the usual procedure?,timbowen,e9bpphn,conservative
Dangerous. ,soxfan90,e9bh9v0,conservative
They do and they will this is your country now sit and accept it ha ha ha ha ha we win we had to cheat but we win now good luck in 2020 losers cuz we won't do it again we promise this time for realsies ,chulocolombian,e9cl4cb,conservative
"Don't worry, the GOP in Florida isn't that incompetent. It'll be fine.",SickofInternetProgs,e9c36b4,conservative
"For what it’s worth this was actually uncovered by Tim Canova who is a Democrat in Broward county who has tried to unseat Debbie Wasserman-Shultz twice now. He claims this is in clear violation of federal or state election laws, can’t remember which. ",Tau23481992,e9bxv02,conservative
Are you kidding? Dems do this all the time and get away with it.,the-divine-comedy,e9c3827,conservative
Good for him! ,StockSkys,e9cbg6v,conservative
I believe I might have finally found a Democrat I respect.,bmack083,e9coak2,conservative
They try in these counties but keep getting caught and slapped down by judges. The only time it works is when the Dems are screwing each other (criminals don't call the police on their own),SickofInternetProgs,e9c3vpg,conservative
McSally in Arizona appears to be having her seat robbed as she is now behind in a recount. I’m speechless,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9cozpy,conservative
Arizona elections are always like they. They never call it until days after. Now Florida is some shady shit. ,Zac1245,e9crc60,conservative
What evidence is there that it’s being robbed? How do you know the recount is inaccurate?,Hotal,e9croxq,conservative
Gee I bet this has nothing to do with the Muslim population,noodlesaremydick,e9d29mw,conservative
"Donald Trump’s rhetoric is at it again!

/s",justhere2havefun,e9d152l,conservative
Id rather not. Loved the YOUNGER ZZ.. but this? No,lax714,e9d0wkr,conservative
">“I thought that it would be OK for me to post that I voted. I thought that it would be OK for me to say who I supported,” Blount said. “I had a MAGA hat on. For that reason, and that reason alone ... my career is on hold”

Why do we accept this as a society?",Silicon_Avatar,e9d1co0,conservative
Robert Baden-Powell must be rolling over in his grave. ,PubliusVA,e9cu4we,conservative
"If BSA and GSUSA merged, would they peddle cookies, popcorn, or both? That's what this is about. GSUSA has the inferior service, it's a scheme to sell cookies. They've lost a bunch of ""scouts"" (read: salespeople) for their cookies to the rebranded BSA. These girls want to be scouts, not cookie peddlers, and it's hitting the GSUSA's bottom line.",Cr8er,e9cxres,conservative
It’s becoming a crime to be feminine... unless you’re a male.,Lustan,e9czsqz,conservative
"As an Eagle Scout, I hope they win.  Anything to keep the sexes separate.  ",ravenswin,e9cyk2j,conservative
"Well... according to her you ""just pay for it.""",ADamnTroll2,e9cvdxl,conservative
"Hey, I too have not been receiving a congressional salary as a non-member of Congress! What gives??",PubliusVA,e9cxcx4,conservative
She's already complaining that she's not taking in the dough fast enough. And how in the world is the electoral system to blame for you not being financially stable enough without a six figure income from the government? ,MaddSim,e9cxkyx,conservative
I honestly thought this was satire. Reality is getting increasingly stupider. ,justhere2havefun,e9d0vap,conservative
Wat you have to work before you get a paycheck?!? Bullshit pay me now! ,CuckRhoades,e9cvni8,conservative
"She has no place in politics. But, this is what happens when you brainwash people. I could slap a D next to my name and promise free shit and win too.",HolsterOfNuts,e9d1cr3,conservative
"""Fuck you, Pay me""

On a serious note, how can we expect someone who apparently can't even handle their own financial situation to do so for the area they represent?",Silicon_Avatar,e9cxr23,conservative
"People like her are the exact problem with big government. If you can’t afford something, you just raise taxes a bit (over simplification obviously). A few extra bucks from everyone is more than enough to cover whatever they’re trying to pay for.

I will never understand why we don’t operate government like a business. So much waste and unnecessary spending. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9cvp9f,conservative
Hey me too! This must be Bernie Sanders plan to get more people federal employment,F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e9czq4h,conservative
I thought she had two jobs?,jdizzle161,e9cy1ie,conservative
The sheep wonder why the wolves don't act more like dogs. ,Rightquercusalba,e9cw2qa,conservative
"> If you can’t afford something, you just raise taxes a bit (over simplification obviously).

Not really actually.",FelixFuckfurter,e9d1wjq,conservative
"Government isn't operated like a business precisely because it exists to solve problems that the profit motive doesn't. It literally won't work. Yes, we can use economics and business concepts to design some aspects of government, but at its heart government is antithetical to pure capitalism. ",GorathThorgath,e9d4vde,conservative
[removed],,e9aqann,conservative
From the video we actually have more evidence Acosta didn't assault a woman than that Brett Kavanaugh didn't. ,JumpingJigglypuff,e9bbqsy,conservative
"Excuse me, but are we going to address the altered video from Sanders vs the unaltered video?  This appears to be a reactionary movement, I'm not certain where we are getting the notion of assault.  We just condemned the Democrats for these shenanigans over Kavanaugh.",Falkamper,e9b0tbv,conservative
"That’s hilarious, but the video was clearly doctored. He didn’t assault her.",AndYetAnotherMichael,e9b05kl,conservative
"Good joke, but no one seriously thinks Acosta assaulted that intern, right? The Acosta-Accosting scandal is just grade-A Trump trolling. ",REVDR,e9bdny3,conservative
"Here’s the thing, Jim Acosta, May be reporting propaganda and asking stupid questions, but in no way did he “assault” anyone. He wouldn’t give up the microphone, but he gently nudged her arm a bit. 

I like Trump, I like his response to the reporter, and I really like how he didn’t back down. Revoke the press pass, it’s his right to do so, but don’t say he “assaulted” the intern. That would make us no better than the left.",poltergeist007,e9ba2zk,conservative
You guys watch to doctored footage or the actual footage? Jesus Christ.,I_Am_Not_B1ack,e9bdz8o,conservative
What evidence?,jacob2815,e9ary80,conservative
"And the girl from FSU ""battered"" those Republicans with her Concealed Carry Chocolate milk. I get that this is a joke, but everybody needs to stop acting like we're all Faberge eggs that can't be touched in the slightest.

",Javalavadava,e9briyz,conservative
Yeah government sanctioned propaganda vs. media propaganda. Hmmmmm What’s worse?,AndYetAnotherMichael,e9b0c9b,conservative
[removed],,e9ayzfl,conservative
he should have just grabbed her pussy. Trumps base would have been fine with that.,Doobie_daithi,e9bf3sl,conservative
[removed],,e9bey6d,conservative
"ha ha, very funny. now can we stop drooping to their level and calling something that isn't assault, assault?",sylect,e9blurg,conservative
"Wow, this thread got brigaded hard. ",dynamo3g,e9bf6ie,conservative
"Ouch... haha!

Edit. Idk why I got downvoted? I meant ouch as in Roasted, b w/e",RKfan,e9alxo8,conservative
[removed],,e9babrm,conservative
Wow that was quick...oh wait duh! Lol ,StockSkys,e9bb6gc,conservative
[deleted],,e9ap7am,conservative
">""He hit that woman! He should have his pass revoked!""

\-My Democrat dad watching NBC's edited footage this morning on Today.

&#x200B;

(*The red pills I've been sneaking him are starting to work!)*",CaptMorgan74,e9awp0f,conservative
Have they spoken to the staffer who Acosta karate chopped?,lioninawhat,e9bc7e4,conservative
Acosta is a violent semi man,Just_a_Drunk_Gambler,e9ava6u,conservative
"@mods, brigades incoming",sir_fenwick,e9bgz7k,conservative
Pretty sure it's a joke. ,regollyek,e9asbz0,conservative
"Or maybe we're reflecting on the fact that with zero evidence against Kavanaugh, an image Of Acosta simply coming into physical contact with a woman literally is more evidence of assault by comparison and not actually an accusation of assault?",Apoxeon,e9assyh,conservative
Technically grabbing someone is battery but it's not my Tweet.,chabanais,e9aqs8f,conservative
"Where are the officials saying it’s assault? Nobody said assault. 

But watch her face when it happens. It’s very clear that she did not like the physical contact. Looked like she wanted to punch him in the face. ",SexAddictRecovery,e9b0un1,conservative
"Exactly.... if this is how we are defining “assault” I believe all of us should be in prison just from bumping into someone in the cafeteria line 

https://imgur.com/a/iytccff

Note who instigated contact",jordanmindyou,e9b374w,conservative
"> but are we going to address the altered video from Sanders vs the unaltered video?

Watch them both side by side.

The official CSPAN video shows him hitting her with his arm in the exact same way. The only changes to the ""altered"" video as far as I can tell is that it's zoomed in so you can see it better. What his hand does is the same in both videos, but actually clearer in the CSPAN version as far I'm concerned. ",Silicon_Avatar,e9b2h5j,conservative
They're so pathetic aren't they? It's just embarrassing. ,Giant_Fishman,e9bduo6,conservative
"https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9vcypq/proof_the_acosta_video_wasnt_doctored_side_by/

CLeaRlY dOCtoRed!",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9bet7e,conservative
"What the fuck are you talking about? The footage was published by multiple news agencies and he was clearly a little rough, nothing was doctored.

Rough enough to be called assault? I'd say not really but dems would be calling it that if he was conservative and she was a dem, so fair game.",liquidsnakex,e9bi4ha,conservative
"> clearly doctored

Yeah, zooming makes the whole thing a fabrication. 
Watch the [CSPAN version](https://i.imgur.com/L51KfuG.jpg) yourself and tell me where the ""doctoring"" is.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b2se6,conservative
"I don’t think anyone here seriously believes it’s assault, but more of just desserts for Acossta who has a long history of being a professional jackass at these press conferences. Always acts like a clown at press conference, including this one. Him pushing the staffers arm downs is just the last straw on the camels proverbial back. ",curlbaumann,e9be334,conservative
"Exactly, this is so stupid. This is what I expect from /r/politics.",mp-,e9bdhas,conservative
"https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9vcypq/proof_the_acosta_video_wasnt_doctored_side_by/

Edit: If any downvoters want to take a minute to be Capt D and prove this is doctored I will certainly listen...",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9bezpv,conservative
"You don't believe all women what are you a sexist?
",chabanais,e9asi8i,conservative
"The whole thing was [caught on video](https://www.redstate.com/california_yankee/2018/11/08/acosta-denies-touching-white-house-intern-despite-video-evidence/). I wouldn't call it ""assault"", but Acosta clearly pushed away the interns arm as she was trying to get the mic back. Now Acosta's lying and claiming he never even touched her.

The point that it's not really assault, but that Acosta clearly touched a woman, is part of the joke.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9boku0,conservative
"> Where is the ideology here? Are we, progressives, really to believe you when you say it's a joke and that you don't truly believe the propaganda? This sub is miniscule compared to the_donald, which we all know DOES believe the propaganda. Is that not a problem?

And a more moderate left-wing sub like /r/liberal or /r/neoliberal is miniscule in size and activity compared to the massive unhinged echo chamber that is /r/politics. What's your point?

Sub counts on Reddit don't represent percentage of beliefs as a microcosm.",-Shank-,e9azw8e,conservative
"Crosses a line? Come on man. 

Proven false allegations to deny a man his Supreme Court seat. Totally ignoring the fact it would have destroyed his and his families lives. With absolutely no corroboration. 

Liberals today are acting literally insane. You think this “altered video” that may or may not have two extra frames crosses the line? I suggest you go back and reevaluate the way your party has acted for the past two years. It’s this psycho-skewed viewpoint of reality you have that put Trump in office. ",SexAddictRecovery,e9b0pk9,conservative
">I am here because I think that this video crosses a line. It's scary. 

Could we dispense with all this emotive language?  Could we get back to discussing things rationally and coolly?  Not everything needs to play on your emotions like some sort of metaphor for Nazi Germany.

So, to be perfectly honest, when you say this is ""scary"", I think you're either emotionally frail or being disingenuous.  There is nothing scary about a rude, disrespectful ""reporter"" who openly wields a leftist agenda against the President having his White House access removed.

The press has not been limited.  This is the most hostile media coverage I've ever seen towards a sitting President in my lifetime, to the point of outright distortions and editorializing disguised as ""fact"".  Jim Acosta is free to continue to be a journalist, reporting on whatever he likes, the way that 99.99% of journalists do it: without direct access to the President.",nited_states,e9b0mik,conservative
"> doctored videos

Holy shit, you're really going to claim the video Sanders tweeted was so badly doctored it doesn't basically show the exact same thing?

I watched the video of the two side by side and it seems the same to me.

And what the fuck are you on about with k-means clustering?  LOL.  Nerd, you're overthinking this shit.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9b4y31,conservative
"I will be honest, I found this place because progressives such as yourself made the democrat party your own party and thats fine, congratz on that, however I know for a fact you pushed a lot of people like me away to the republicans and I can assure you we are fucking happy everytime you progressive and your agenda take a political beating.",masternarf,e9b2s5j,conservative
Or just straight up raped her. All the Clinton-loving democrats would have insisted it was a private matter!,ngoni,e9byc4y,conservative
"Thread is at 63% upvoted, that means reddit's resident leftists have found their way over here.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9as3fe,conservative
"Le reddit white knight army is here, lefties don’t appreciate these kinds of memes but they’ll post worse ones over in /r/politicalhumor ",Jabronies96,e9bn4wc,conservative
Downvoting seems to be the norm in here often.,ShenandoahValley,e9b2cl7,conservative
Take MY upvote. We'll beat them like we did in the midterms!,PHNX_xRapTor,e9blhrn,conservative
"I think this is mostly just joking. Nobody really thinks he assaulted her, or he would have been arrested or something. Its just funny to point out that there was so little evidence against Kavanaugh, that we actually have more evidence of Acosta doing anything to anybody, than we do of Kavanaugh assaulting or raping anybody. ",SeanRamey,e9bpev0,conservative
"Imagine 2018: President Hillary Clinton. Hearing her cackle on TV. The press kissing her rings, glorifying her, 0% negative coverage. All while NK is still firing missiles over Japan. ISIS still chopping off heads on YouTube. Iran acquiring pallets cash from you, the taxpayer. All Americans paying more taxes. Companies hiding even more of their wealth overseas. Bigger trade deficits. No space force. Crumbling military. Mass European style importation. Illegals welcomed, legal immigrants are now racist for following the law and wanting others to have to do the same. ",runeu,e9ay4x0,conservative
Do not compare Rubio to kasich. Kasich is legit a democrat ,hipsterdufus84,e9aqqwx,conservative
Kasich would have appointed Hillary as VP and resigned in the first year.  While apologizing to her. ,grckalck,e9apvht,conservative
[removed],,e9b2hk6,conservative
Have you watched the undoctored video?  He didn't karate chop her.  Don't sully yourself over a lie... unless you can't review the evidence for yourself?,kayjee17,e9box03,conservative
"Pretty sure the NPC isn't programmed for humor, only ""outrage.""",chabanais,e9asf8d,conservative
[removed],,e9atgcp,conservative
[The assault in question](https://i.imgur.com/uCwPwdI.gifv),maddabattacola,e9arisn,conservative
"So you're saying what that woman did was battery? Because it was.

>the intentional causation of harmful or offensive contact with another's person without that person's consent.  

>Battery need not require body-to-body contact. Touching an object ""intimately connected"" to a person (such as an object he or she is holding) can also be battery.

She intentionally grabbed the microphone without his consent. ",concernedgf005,e9au5hz,conservative
"The tweet said assault, probably what op was responding to.",snufflypanda,e9bdnoe,conservative
"Shes very clearly doing something she feels uncomfortable doing. She reaches for the microphone, fails to grab it, looks uncomfortably to or past trump, and attempts again as if someone is telling her to grab it. Fails a second time, looks back again, then finally goes for another more forceful third grab. When he doesn't let go she again looks to whoever is instructing her in a resigned embarrassment and just ducks down out of the way.

&#x200B;

 ",howthehellyoudothat,e9beco1,conservative
"> Where are the officials saying it’s assault? 

Sanders' statement:

> We will, however, never tolerate a reporter placing his hands on a young woman just trying to do her job as a White House intern...",bruh_breh_broseph,e9bg8iq,conservative
"> instigated contact

She was extremely careful not to touch him.  He obviously blocked her arm when she went under his arm.

But no, it isn't ""assault"" but then again Lewandowski got charged with battery for a little pull of a reporter and it was a big fucking deal not only on reddit but all over the place.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9b4kci,conservative
"The speed of that segment was altered to make it seem like he “chopped” at her, instead of brushing her away. ",PhotoconductiveOil,e9b5bos,conservative
Yeah they started it!,YamoB,e9bmxm8,conservative
"She was trying to take the mic from him though. We make fun of the left for the feminist shit and crying foul over little slaps.

He firmly held onto a mic. That was it",Genocide_Me_Captain,e9blw7u,conservative
Ikr. We make fun of the left for this hypocritical shit.,Genocide_Me_Captain,e9bls3q,conservative
Troll harder. 🙄,eeviltwin,e9asrxj,conservative
This is some petty shit lmao,whisperkid,e9bm07s,conservative
https://imgur.com/a/iytccff,jordanmindyou,e9b3b4n,conservative
"> Proven false allegations

But see, you're lying. ",2totwo,e9b6tui,conservative
no emotion then. Do you believe that Acosta assaulted or harmed the WH intern? Do you believe that the video Sarah Sanders tweeted is doctored or not?,WhirlStore,e9b1ao1,conservative
"The point, to me, is that the white house is spreading doctored videos, the impact is another discussion.

The k-means clustering quote is a joke regarding the reaction I got for my emotional plea I by no means expect anybody here to know what k-means clustering is(I do not understand it either). I don't think you could understand that and don't think you will, sorry. This post is not for you.",kettlechip,e9b5a3u,conservative
"You have to understand that the left is so used to having near hegemonic power so all this ""believe women"" and ""believe survivors"" are just tools to use against the right to them. So when the exact same standard is put back on them they just resort back to ""Bush did 9/11"" mode and go off into conspiracy theories. 

They will happily go frame-to-frame through the tweet to find the doctored footage because they're just desperate to drive the conversation into the weeds. The left with this Acosta stuff is the definition of can't see the forest for the trees. ",Glochidiate,e9b9ads,conservative
"I will be honest, I do not understand where you are coming from nor what you mean to say.

If I could rephrase, do you mean that this video is a political beating, and so you are happy for it, and so you support it?",kettlechip,e9b334v,conservative
Doesnt that seem petty to you? ,whisperkid,e9bm2ca,conservative
r/BlueMidterm2018 is lurking here ,SussyPiff,e9ayjmx,conservative
"Gotcha, leftists, the champions of wom.... Democrat Women.",RKfan,e9av8fu,conservative
I love the smell of tarding in the morning... smells like... victory.,chabanais,e9ass3l,conservative
Can you imagine being such a Loser you lurk in the shadows and downvote posts that anger you? Like WTF do these retards think they are achieving?,SnickersReese,e9au7r8,conservative
"ShareBlue must have had some leftover dollars for astroturfing after Nov. 6.
",nited_states,e9b0vtn,conservative
"> No space force

This one made me laugh.",acetyler,e9b5yi9,conservative
Oh the democratic paradise,Biscuit_Bandit_Sr,e9b3ukm,conservative
[deleted],,e9aryp1,conservative
Better than the libs in our public schools actually medicating kids to keep them docile and receptive.,CaptMorgan74,e9b2tcz,conservative
Lol. No you don’t.  Not if your honest with yourself. ,pro_nosepicker,e9b3zte,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/L51KfuG.jpg,chabanais,e9atq0f,conservative
"https://v.redd.it/mz9ev3e74yw11/DASH_600_K

* Unwanted intentional touching is legally considered assault.

* Jim Acosta **intentionally** touched the staffer (trying to knock her arm away) in an attempt to keep her from taking the mic back. This happens at 0:01. At 0:02, he grabs the mic with his other hand to prevent this from happening.

* Jim Acosta assaulted the staffer by definition.

Seems pretty clear cut to me.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b0hs4,conservative
[removed],,e9arxyz,conservative
"Exactly...there was *zero* evidence Kavanaugh assaulted anyone.

;-)",chabanais,e9as91d,conservative
"Good God people, there is no assault or battery on either side here. She tried to grab the mic, he denied her. Their arms touched each other. Big whoop.",MHanky,e9b3r54,conservative
Wasn't his it belonged to the White House.,chabanais,e9axk3a,conservative
It wasn't his microphone and his time was over.,chabanais,e9ayfp1,conservative
"It wasn’t his microphone doofus.  It’s the WHs and therefore hers, as the person  responsible for taking the microphone from the previous journalist and handing it to the next one. Acosta asked his question, got an answer, was repeatedly told his turn was over, but continued to verbally harrass the president and physically prevent a young girl from doing her job. 

The ends your ilk is going to defend him after all the bullshit accusations you’ve made recently is absurd. 

I hope this girl waits 36 years, then accuses Acosta of battery.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9b4ax8,conservative
"> Lewandowski got charged with battery for a little pull of a reporter and it was a big fucking deal not only on reddit but all over the place.

But the difference was that was a tool to be used against Trump. Very different! Now we're pivoting from ""believe women"" to ""this is attack against the free press"". 

Don't you understand how this works yet?",Glochidiate,e9b9svb,conservative
"Ah, so that speed at which he hit her is substantially more important than the actual act of him hitting her.

Gotcha. That clears things up, thanks.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b7im0,conservative
"Responding in kind to an aggressor is considered fair game by everyone. Don't dish out what you can't take in return, dipshits.",liquidsnakex,e9ci4vk,conservative
"She was ordered to take the mic because he wouldn’t stop talking after his turn was up, she was essentially polite security.",curlbaumann,e9bnqau,conservative
"So you're a sexist bigot.  You must be a Trump voter!
",chabanais,e9asulm,conservative
Acosta has always been a hack.,chabanais,e9bogua,conservative
"Not his microphone, his time was over, he refused to relinquish it.  Acosta's biggest problem is he thinks it's about him and that *Orange Man Bad*.  The tards cheer him on so it's like a dog who shits on the rug and gets a treat after.",chabanais,e9b43nk,conservative
"No, they are not lying. Two of the people who made allegations have come out and admitted that they were lying and the Senate Judiciary Committee unanimously and officially referred those two to for criminal investigations. So, based on these facts, saying ""Proven false allegations"" would not be lying.",-Kerosun-,e9bak0g,conservative
"I believe that Acosta acted disrespectfully and belligerently even before the mic chopping incident.

No, I don't believe what he did was assault in a criminal sense, but it was certainly childish.  His behavior is unbecoming of a White House journalist and his spot should be given to somebody else who can at least do the job with some respect for the process and personal dignity.

No, the lady was not harmed, but how sad is it that he needs to make some defensive gesture (that did involve pushing back against that woman's arm) to protect his microphone like Gollum and the ring?  He was looking to be provocative and start an altercation first and foremost, not to do journalism.",nited_states,e9b2dpc,conservative
"No one said she was assaulted. 

The video is not doctored. Some of us actually watched the news conference live and know what the fuck happened.

""Scary"", haha. A rude reporter fighting over the mic with an intern, in the process making physical contact, had his press pass revoked. Wow, SCARY, I'm LITERALLY SHAKING.",MercyYouMercyMe,e9b2k5m,conservative
"> Do you believe that the video Sarah Sanders tweeted is doctored or not?

Yeah, zooming makes the whole thing a fabrication. 

Watch the [CSPAN version](https://i.imgur.com/L51KfuG.jpg) yourself and tell me where the ""doctoring"" is.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b2vti,conservative
"> Do you believe that the video Sarah Sanders tweeted is doctored or not?

[video on The Guardian.....](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xYNM6UQVW04&t=15s)

....and I saw it during the press conference, the tweet isn't doctored.",PerceivedShift,e9bqk59,conservative
"It’s not assault.  It’s batttery.  The definition is unwanted touching, and he clearly did that regardless of the version you look at.  
And Sanders nor the WH didn’t doctor a video.  

But these are just distractions from the main issue of Acosta’s actions, something your ilk does their best to ignore. ",pro_nosepicker,e9b3wsg,conservative
"Yeah well I actually do understand k-means clustering and data analysis is a big part of my job.

The point is that you seem to not understand the middle ground from ""scary"" to ""I must put on my green-billed accountant hat and find an optimal model for this problem"".

I mean, there's much more I would give you shit about in that emotional rant of yours... How about you claiming you can't have a discussion with conservatives while bringing up ""deep state"" (lol, both ironically and unironically) in the same comment?

So yeah, you're an emotionally fragile person that is smart enough to understand objective thoughts but unable to prevent them from becoming corrupted before leaving your brain.  It's going to be really hard to have an honest conversation with that problem.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9b6dim,conservative
"*I am worried that the conservative ideology is one that is simply a guttural emotional reaction to the existence of a progressive party*

I was addressing this sentence of yours. I absolutely despise the progressives, I was a democrat and your movement took over the democratic party over the most recent years. And I always happy when I see a defeat on your side. ",masternarf,e9b3dzu,conservative
[deleted],,e9ayxwj,conservative
"Don't call it ""the shadows"" just because it's in their mother's basement... it's called the ""Command Bunker"" and *no girls are allowed either!*",chabanais,e9auk82,conservative
What would we do without the space force 😦,TortelliniSalad,e9bmly2,conservative
"Rubio defended gun rights on CNN in front of an arranged mob.

Show Kasich doing something similar.",Argonut32,e9b5v6p,conservative
Are you being serious?,whisperkid,e9blysi,conservative
Yeah fuck vaccines!,oh-man-dude-jeez,e9bljxj,conservative
"If the definition of unwanted intentional contact is assault, then isn't the staffer who tried to take the mic away from him guilty of assault?",PotatoPotahto,e9b0wmb,conservative
"First the video is doctored. Congratulations on buying into fake hype. Second, it's pretty clear that the woman aggressively entered his personal space and Acosta raised in hand in self-defense.

If I unexpectedly reach over and try to grab your ice cream cone out of your hand while you're eating it, and you put you arm up to defend yourself from my advances, you are not guilty of assaulting me.

Seems pretty clear cut to me.",csajhr,e9b8ba5,conservative
Is that the fake sped up clip or the original footage one?,Lives_With_His_Mom,e9bg3a2,conservative
She invaded his personal space because he was holding White House property illegally. ,VeryMint,e9atitm,conservative
"""#BelieveAllWomen""",chabanais,e9asanl,conservative
[deleted],,e9axqb7,conservative
"The fact that you can watch any of those videos, doctored or not, and think that what happened constitutes  ""him hitting her"" shows that you really don't care. You just want to score some points on this, make it an outrage before moving on.

She attempts to take the microphone off him 3 times, on the third she reaches around his body and he reacts in what would be described as a blocking response in any other situation except this one. He isnt even looking at her when the so called ""hit"" occurs. He is in the middle of a shouting match with the president. If you watch this with audio, you will see the moment after he reacts he turns to look at her and says ""Pardon me ma'am"".",howthehellyoudothat,e9bf480,conservative
"Yeah but not giving up the mic for like 10 seconds doesn't count as ""assault""",Genocide_Me_Captain,e9bo3eb,conservative
[removed],,e9ay0pz,conservative
Orange man bad!,TangoFoxtr0t,e9bolgy,conservative
But you’re actually saying he assaulted this woman when it’s clear he did not. I’m sure it would not be such a controversy if our White House staff had not made the false allegation in the first place. ,turtlebro_,e9bgbdw,conservative
I can't believe he punched her in the face! Holy shit! ,ILoveShitRats,e9bbbt4,conservative
"If you don't think it's assault, how do you feel about conservative pundits ( like the tweet we are commenting on), and the WH itself referring to this as assault? 

&#x200B;

Also my second question was, do you think the video Sarah tweeted was doctored? ",WhirlStore,e9b8l2r,conservative
[removed],,e9b6vn8,conservative
"I think anger is just as much an emotional reaction. Perhaps you too could try to be more clearheaded.

I do not recant the idea that people such as yourself, who are purposefully trying to not internalize what has just happened with the white house, is scary. You are happily accepting propaganda, I do not know what else to call it. Of course that is scary.

I don't have any expectation of you, the one who has actually been brainwashed, who cannot look at things rationally, to understand my concerns. The post is for those who actually understand what happened. There are many conservatives here who do understand. They are not telling jokes about the event but instead focusing on the hypocrisy surrounding the Kavanaugh allegations. Perhaps you could get up to speed on that.",kettlechip,e9b3jsm,conservative
"Let's not use that argument. By the same token the intern also committed battery by grabbing the microphone in his hand. Legally speaking, it was an extension of his body, and she had no right to do what she did. I believe this is the kind of one-sided thinking OP is talking about in this sub.

Edit: Further, it could be argued that Acosta's touch with her was incidental because he uses his arms to speak. He was clearly using his arms prior to her grab attempt. Her arms got in the way of his. This is very clear on the video.",kdhawk,e9b4jey,conservative
"I think you are not really capable of understanding what I wrote in the top level.

It's probably just because of the difference of ideology, but every paragraph you wrote is a fundamental misunderstanding of my writing. Nobody else had this much trouble.",kettlechip,e9b82z7,conservative
"I still do not understand if you feel this is relevant or what it means in context, sorry. But okay.",kettlechip,e9b3xc0,conservative
"Champions of Democrat women, as long as it is in the best interest of the Democrat party?",cysghost,e9begjp,conservative
"Except Mom.  ""MOM!  THE MEATLOAF!""",AManGotToHaveACode,e9az0hc,conservative
Even the imaginary girls?,Clatsop,e9b4kth,conservative
That includes Grandma!,callthereaper64,e9axxp3,conservative
"> Show Kasich doing something similar.

Bro, it's still the middle of the day. Save the Kasich clips for nighttime when I can fall asleep to them.",Glochidiate,e9b84sc,conservative
"Slightly.  ADHD is often overdiagnosed and treated with medication. Most cases I've seen are an excuse for poor parenting and a lack of discipline in schools.

Source: I was a teacher, and I actually have ADHD.  Why would I want medication?  Harnessing many aspects of ADHD is like a superpower.  Most creative thinkers have ADHD to some extent and medication dulls those abilities.",CaptMorgan74,e9c7yul,conservative
Uhhhh,ordonuts,e9bmvcz,conservative
"Accidental touching is an affirmative defense to assault in DC (there's no battery, it's all assault there), and I think there's a very valid argument that the staffer's goal was to grab the mic, not Acosta. The only contact she has was brushing the top of his closed hand with her little finger while trying to close her hand around the mic. (Frame advance video between :00 and :02)

I sincerely hope you can understand the difference between brushing someone and trying to push their limbs away.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b0zy1,conservative
"I just got done reading the bogus accusations of ""doctoring"". The frame rate difference changes none of the facts.

>Acosta raised in hand in self-defense.

Acosta *lowered* his hand. Or do you think the difference from hand at face level to hand at elbow level is *up*?

Do try to get your story straight?",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b8yax,conservative
Because asking questions the orange Muppet doesn't like is apparently grounds to be ejected and have credentials revoked. So add another tally of trump being spineless and add one more for the free press being attacked for peskily pursuing the truth,Suspicious_Burrito,e9au736,conservative
[removed],,e9at7eb,conservative
I think it kind of does.,chabanais,e9aydhe,conservative
"Not very nice, Comrade.",chabanais,e9ay6uu,conservative
Show me on the doll where he hurt you.,chabanais,e9bpcrj,conservative
Technically it would be battery.  Assault is verbal but I didn't write the Tweet.,chabanais,e9bgfw8,conservative
Where did he punch her in the face? She just sits down after trying to rip the microphone out of his hands.,Kill3rK3ks,e9bkfm3,conservative
I think you're asking me a ton of questions that are tangential to the real issue at hand.  Acosta should no longer have White House access based on the way he behaved.  This isn't limiting the press; this is about giving his spot to a better journalist. ,nited_states,e9bak4y,conservative
This tweet is simply pointing out hypocrisy and how liberals handled the kavanaugh confirmation. Its not suggesting that we charge anyone with assault.,huntdawgin,e9b9kc2,conservative
"I don’t think he assaulted anyone. I also don’t think the video was “doctored”. He was being a dick to the president, so he got kicked out. There’s nothing more to it than that. Did you watch the video? Did you think the way he was acting toward the president was respectful? Was it acceptable? Or was it only okay because it was Trump? How would you feel if someone treated president Obama that way? 


Just so you know, I am not brainwashed. I voted for Obama many years ago. I voted libertarian in 2016, and I’ll likely be voting Trump in 2020. What the other commenter was saying is that the shift in tone in the Democratic Party has been so extreme over the past few years that it has shifted many moderates into voting republican.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9b76sf,conservative
"I'm laughing at your comments dude, you really need to get over it and get a life",Morninglow,e9b606v,conservative
"That’s simply untrue.  It was White House property ( not his) and by repeatedly telling Acosta his turn was over Trump was telling him to relinquish he microphone. When the White House employee did her job and then went to seize the microphone, she grabbed the microphone(not Acosta) and he touched her. It’s not assault, but technically it’s battery. Any other version of this is absurd. 

That said, I and most don’t really think he should be charged with anything.  But I challenge you to deny that his demeanor was over the top, rude and disrespectful not just to the president but to the other journalists in the room. 

Moreover, at least some like me on our side can deny a bullshit “crime” as I’m doing here. Meanwhile your side incites a nation to rally when someone comes forth with a fake charge 36 years after the fact with no evidence.  The hypocrisy is unbelievable. ",pro_nosepicker,e9b5ymv,conservative
"I know you low-key accused all conservatives of being a nazi with your ""jewish deep state"" comment.

But sure, keep thinking it's the conservatives that can't have a reasonable discussion.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9bbq6v,conservative
"Thats fine, cheers, hope you enjoy your stay on /r/conservative in the meantime.
",masternarf,e9b4aay,conservative
"She's cuddly and she's bouncy,

She's like a rubber ball,

I bounce her in the kitchen

And I bounce her in the hall",chabanais,e9b4tih,conservative
Grabbing something out of someone's hand without their consent falls under the legal definition of battery.,rationalinquisition,e9b2ej4,conservative
"According to [this website](https://criminallawdc.com/dc-assault-lawyer/laws/), Assault in DC is generally defined as:

""the threat or use of force on an individual that causes the individual to have a reasonable apprehension of imminent harmful or **offensive contact**.""

and the law: ""also covers anyone who threatens such assault in a manner that gives the threatened person a reasonable belief of imminent harm or **unwanted contact.**""

With the way Trump was acting against Acosta, many should be able to argue that a staffer approaching him in such a way and abruptly invading his personal space in such a way would qualify for him having a ""reasonable belief of imminent harm or **unwanted contact**"", would it not? I suppose it would depend on the lawyer you speak to, but Acosta himself obviously felt threatened (rightfully, based on his uncalled for media ban) and may even have a case for assault himself.",PotatoPotahto,e9b26vj,conservative
"> free press being attacked for peskily pursuing the truth

You really believe that? Acosta was basically calling Trump racist because he called the mob of 7,000+ people trying to enter our country illegally ""an invasion."" Trump didn't appreciate Acosta innuendos and told him his time was up. Acosta didn't want to hand over the mic (after being asked to repeatedly) and the female intern attempted to do her job by removing the microphone. You **sure have** been drinking the koolaid",Mr_0pportunity,e9avlxl,conservative
Oh you're a real tough guy telling it like it is on Reddit.,cookster123,e9bfven,conservative
"He already asked his question. It was no longer his turn. They needed to give the mic to the next reporter. Do you have reading difficulties?

Downvoting objective facts 😂😂😂",VeryMint,e9aubkd,conservative
"> orange Muppet 

https://i.imgur.com/L51KfuG.jpg",chabanais,e9axemv,conservative
"The only one attacking free press was Acosta.  He wouldn’t allow other journalists to take their proper turns. 
",pro_nosepicker,e9b4h5d,conservative
"You're just enabling Trump and his base.
",chabanais,e9atn3h,conservative
He took away all muh free stuff that I didn't work for!,TangoFoxtr0t,e9bwrt4,conservative
Technically it would be nothing though. He touched her only as much as her arm ran past his hand as she reached for the mic. ,turtlebro_,e9bgvgk,conservative
"Sounds like someone familiar, can’t answer questions. What a mess. 

Edit: if being asked to back up a position is something you consider too tiring and “a ton of questions”, then maybe your position isn’t knotted very tightly to the logic pole. 

I’m always willing to debate and hear the viewpoints of any political position. 

Edit: fixed shitty mistakes made due to using the small stupid motherfucking keyboard on my phone. ",SuccessPastaTime,e9bks1e,conservative
[removed],,e9bbkgk,conservative
"But... there is more to it than that. The reason given for removing Acosta was that he unduly put his hands on the intern, not that he was mean to the president. The idea that he was removed for “being a dick” is either a misunderstanding on your part, or a lie. I’ll give you the benefit of the doubt.

In Sanders own words regarding the removal:

>he put his hands on a young woman just trying to do her job as a White House intern

Which, first of all, is demonstrably false. The video clearly shows that the intern in question reached across Acosta to grab at the microphone and accidentally came into contact with Acosta’s arm as he was gesturing.

The video is also undeniably doctored. A simple side-by-side comparison proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that the video shared by Sanders is sped up at the moment Acosta’s arm comes down, and the words “Pardon me, ma’am,” said by Acosta, are also removed from the doctored video.",SweatyVeganMeat,e9bbb05,conservative
We’re on a political subreddit discussing politics. What else would you have him talk about?,SweatyVeganMeat,e9bbmnk,conservative
"If you do not care at all, you are a useful idiot. Exactly the kind of person who I know is embarrassed to behave like this in real life, but maybe one day won't be.",kettlechip,e9b66fj,conservative
“Get a life”? Oh ok thanks for letting everyone know you’re twelve,Antapocatastasis,e9b7nah,conservative
"There's exactly the problem. It's always about ""sides"". You got me for the wrong ""side"" there, friend.

Acosta was doing his job as a journalist. This fake outrage over respecting the POTUS is exactly what OP is talking about - it reeks of worship. Journalists ask questions and try to get answers. Disrespect is creating fake videos.

You're upset Acosta ""touched"" her? Really? With the arm he was using for gestures when he talked and that she intruded on by trying to grab the microphone? The emotional lens to be right is incredibly strong here. It's insanity.

This is obviously not worth discussing. Reality is not a friend here. The thinking I see of cult worship and the notion of party over country at all costs is part of the problem for conservatives and why I think the party is too extreme for people like me anymore. It once had morals and a logical approach. No more. Good luck.",kdhawk,e9b7gq3,conservative
That’s beautiful and terrifying all in one,GenericTexan117,e9bj2vb,conservative
There is no battery law in DC. And I'm pretty sure that something being the property of your employer would change things somewhat...,Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b2hj5,conservative
"You ignore the intent required bit. And I call massive shenangians on Acosta feeling any actual ""threat"". The man is an actor.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b2foa,conservative
All of what you said is true - none of it is assault.  Calling it assault makes everyone look hysterical and takes away credibility. ,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9avo3g,conservative
Nah trump and anyone who voted for him can go fuck themselves. Im an independent. This is just a blatant and laughable attempt to justify ejecting a reporter the president doesn't like. Isnt a free press important or am I just old fashioned like that,Suspicious_Burrito,e9au21f,conservative
Orange Man Bad!,chabanais,e9bxmx9,conservative
"I doubt he had consent and ultimately that's what it's about.

Bottom line is he's a self centered dick.",chabanais,e9bgxxr,conservative
"I'm saying you are asking irrelevant questions.

I already have answered what you want to know. No, I don't think it's criminal assault.  However, yes, I do think he deserved to have his WH press pass revoked for childish, intemperate behavior that disrespects the privilege he has.  The video evidence supports this.

As for other conservative pundits, I don't really care.  I haven't heard anything, nor do I bother to seek it out.  Acosta is a side-show to me. 
",nited_states,e9bl1ou,conservative
"Trump wanted him out because he didn’t play by his rules, and Trump was clearly pissed about the disrespect. I’m honestly not up to date on the official White House statement, but I watched the video live and can guarantee he wasn’t kicked out because of touching the intern. The touching of the intern didn’t look like a big deal to me. He was kicked out because he pissed off the President of the United States and Trump wouldn’t stand for it. That’s the real reason despite whatever official announcement was made. I think we can be in agreement there. I’ve watched the side by side videos and I can’t see a major difference, but I don’t think it look like assault in any of the videos I’ve seen. 


I also think that Trump would be justified in kicking him out for the way he was acting, regardless of any so called “assault”. He was being blatantly disrespectful and knew exactly what he was doing.


You also didn’t answer any of my questions.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9bcdot,conservative
Bye,N7_Starkiller,e9bvfcv,conservative
It's a song by The Police.  ,chabanais,e9bj70i,conservative
"> There is no battery law in DC.

Okay, then it falls under the legal definition of assault in DC.

>And I'm pretty sure that something being the property of your employer would change things somewhat...

A desire to retrieve a piece of legally-owned property from another person does not give someone the right to commit a crime in order to retrieve that piece of property. As the mic was given to him in the first place, and he is simply refusing to give it back, it would be a civil matter and not a criminal matter, ergo no reasonable force protections would come into play for trying to get it back.

",rationalinquisition,e9b3073,conservative
[removed],,e9b2s5f,conservative
I didn’t say it was assault. ,VeryMint,e9avrxw,conservative
"This doesn't have much to do with free press at all, CNN could have anyone else in that position and their ability to publish what they please on their network would not be affected ",buy_ge,e9avf9r,conservative
"> Nah trump and anyone who voted for him can go fuck themselves. Im an independent.

*Sure* you are!  Do you watch MSNPC a lot?",chabanais,e9aummv,conservative
I am a registered independent and a Trump voter. Lucky for you I fucked myself this morning ,billswinthesuperbowl,e9ay8a8,conservative
"You’re off the rails now buddy. He did nothing wrong except for asking a question, which is literally his job. Yeah, he’s got forceful questions but that’s what being a reporter is about on all sides. 
Consent has nothing to do with this because she approached him and grabbed the mic from HIS hand. ",turtlebro_,e9bigtr,conservative
"I know, I appreciate the discussion, by the way, I’m actually different then the original person you were responding too.",SuccessPastaTime,e9bmkth,conservative
"The official White House statement is that he was kicked out for touching the intern, so you’re guarantee is wrong.

The touching of the intern is also the stated reason for removal of his press pass.

Edit: Give me a minute and I’ll answer your questions. I skipped those because I wasn’t the OP you were originally talking with, but what the hell I’ll give it a crack anyway.

My answers: 

1. Yes, I watched the video. In fact, I watched most of the press conference live.

2. No, I did not think the way he questioned the President was disrespectful. The president repeatedly dodged the questions while personally insulting Acosta. If anyone was disrespectful in that room it was Trump. Trump had also spent the majority of the press conference, prior to Acosta’s questions, insulting, dodging, and being generally disrespectful to almost everyone who asked a question of him. Frankly, Trumps behavior was unacceptable.

3. Yes, Acosta’s actions in the video were acceptable.

4. I would have approved of his questioning no matter who it was. He wasn’t disrespectful, he was a journalist trying to get answers in a sanctioned press conference, a press conference in which Trump had spent the majority of the time prior to this incident being disrespectful to many of Acosta’s colleagues.

5. I would have no problem with a reporter questioning Obama in that manner, given the same circumstances.",SweatyVeganMeat,e9bcy0x,conservative
"> Grabbing something out of someone's hand without their consent falls under the legal definition of battery.

Given the fact that you didn't even know battery wasn't a thing in DC, I'd like to see the source of your reasoning for this.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b34lo,conservative
"> Said person you're talking to also has an undeniable history of bragging about sexual assault.

Ahh.. I've been wasting my time debating a leftist who peddles debunked conspiracy theroies. Apologies, I'll turn off replies and end this here.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b31oh,conservative
Sorry about that - didn’t mean to put words in your mouth.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9azu8a,conservative
Do you always deflect from addressing the question that forces you to admit you are wrong?,slippyslappyswanson_,e9ayyxm,conservative
"He didn't yield when asked to let other reporters ask questions.  Acosta picked a fight with the wrong guy.  Chris Wallace called his behavior ""shameful"" and I agree.

Even little children know when you're told it's someone else's turn you step back.",chabanais,e9bj3yn,conservative
"Yeah, i think the whole ""assault"" thing started as a joke. The ""karate chop"" thing and all. But the real point is that he behaved poorly, and yeah, his job is to ask questions, but he didnt just ask questions, he tried to start arguing with Trump, then he wouldnt let go of the mic after his time was up, AND he kept interfering with the next guy's questions. Did you notice that one guy from the conference who said, ""sorry sir"" when the president said, ""hold on""? Yeah, that guy gave Trump some respect, so he actually got to ask a couple more questions. Thats how you should act if you want to get your questions answered. ",SeanRamey,e9bp67x,conservative
"Reading your answer, I do think it’s a valid viewpoint. As long as it’s consistent along the political spectrum. If you think it’s acceptable then that’s what matters. I personally would be pissed if someone treated me the way Acosta treated Trump, and would have probably reacted in a more angry way than Trump did. I thought he was pretty restrained in his reaction. So I just don’t really see it as unjustified the way Trump spoke to him. I’m simply putting myself in Trumps shoes and thinking about how I would react to the situation. I’m not even a hard right conservative, I’m pretty left leaning libertarian. I just think the whole situation is absurd. ",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9bimka,conservative
"Sorry mate thought you were the same guy. Also I’m sure that is the official statement, I just think it’s obvious from the events that occurred that he really got kicked out because he pissed off Trump, touching the intern is an excuse.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9bdioe,conservative
"> Given the fact that you didn't even know battery wasn't a thing in DC, I'd like to see the source of your reasoning for this.

Sure, if you can first give me indisputable proof that it was Acosta's intent to brush the staffer's arm away and that he was not simply accidentally touching the arm that was in his personal space, and then provide a source showing that brushing a person's arm away as a reaction to them grabbing something is a significant enough to contact to meet DC's assault requirement.",rationalinquisition,e9b3ldk,conservative
Aka I’ve lost ground to stand on so I’m going to resort to calling you a crazy leftist and run away.,PhotoconductiveOil,e9b4wfg,conservative
Don’t worry about it,VeryMint,e9b2kcr,conservative
What question is that?,chabanais,e9b04oz,conservative
Awww congratulations on watching your first press conference!,oh-man-dude-jeez,e9bli2x,conservative
"No worries. Can I ask your opinion on them permanently revoking CNN’s press pass? Either for the stated reason, which neither of us seem to believe, or due to the disrespect you believe he showed Trump?",SweatyVeganMeat,e9bdsmo,conservative
">Sure, if

So no, you cannot. You've made an unsubstantiated argument and cannot back it up. We are done here.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b3we9,conservative
Isn't a free press important?,slippyslappyswanson_,e9b06mz,conservative
I was too busy banning trolls to see the entire thing.,chabanais,e9bln6c,conservative
"I don’t see a legitimate reason to revoke CNNs press pass. I think it’s completely justifiable to kick out the individual, Acosta, but not the entirety of CNN. Seems like a bit of an overreaction to me, but I’m also not and expert on the situation.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9bi2fv,conservative
"> You've made an unsubstantiated argument and cannot back it up. We are done here.

Pot, kettle, black.",PotatoPotahto,e9b3ypg,conservative
"You first made the argument that Acosta assaulted the staffer. As you were the one who made the initial claim, the burden of you is to support that claim. If you are going to demand I source my arguments, since the burden of proof falls on you initially, it is your responsibility to source your arguments first.

So either neither of us use sources, or both of us require them and both of our arguments are unsubstantiated. But since you are the one making the original claim, I don't need to make any further arguments if your initial claim is unsubstantiated.",rationalinquisition,e9b43et,conservative
How is that relevant?,chabanais,e9b09qt,conservative
"So, yes, you do always deflect.",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b0b6t,conservative
I'll try this 2nd time for you.  What does a reporter from CNN having his credentials suspended have to do with the free press in America?,chabanais,e9b0hh0,conservative
"You're deflecting by going off on a red herring on the issue of freedom of speech, when the issue that is being talked about is about whether what Acosta did was wrong.

Nice try, however.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9b63qu,conservative
"I think you should re-read your question.  
  
President suspending a member of the press because he doesn't like his questions, and then his staff leaking a doctored video and lying about the reason he was suspended is restricting the press, dude. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b0ohf,conservative
"I'm not deflecting. OP was asked a question. He did not answer the question. And if we are being truly honest, which is a stretch, the conversation is about whether Acosta did something wrong *or if the President and/or his staff are using the illusion of a wrongdoing to ban him from press conferences.*",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b69z8,conservative
He was suspended because he's a grandstanding idiot who has done this charade at least two dozen times.  He's a child who's been sent to his room.  The press is not restricted CNN is free to send anyone else.,Boozenight,e9b1npz,conservative
"No, it's telling *one* employee at *one* company that he's not wanted on their property because of his bad behavior.

Go to England if you want to see what stifling the press looks like, dude.",chabanais,e9b2n1e,conservative
"He asked you a question first and you deflected with a red herring. And no, that was never asked of the OP. You asked whether it was an issue of free speech, which was the red herring (and also answering a question with another question). You are now blatantly lying.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9b6lgq,conservative
Why did the White House lie about the reason he was suspended and release the doctored video?,slippyslappyswanson_,e9b2hgl,conservative
No one lied about anything.  He did touch the itern while he was being an idiot.  Can you please tell me how the doctored video changes what Mr. Acosta did?  The incident still happened they didn't add anything to it.  The fact you're defending this moron tells me everything I need to know about you.,Boozenight,e9b2y3e,conservative
"> doctored video

😂😂😂",Silicon_Avatar,e9b2p6b,conservative
"[Take a look at this analysis.](https://twitter.com/aymanndotcom/status/1060424768653062149) Whether or not it is doctored, if you understand the law as it relates to assault and battery, you'd know that this wasn't either. The fact that you think he was suspended from the white house for physically contacting an intern that came up into his personal space and reached across his body and to his hand while he is staring straight at the president of the United States asking him what he considers important questions - that tells me everything I need to know about you. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b46t9,conservative
Yes. [This video will better portray it.](https://twitter.com/aymanndotcom/status/1060424768653062149),slippyslappyswanson_,e9b3zyc,conservative
"That isn't the only reason he was suspended genius.  Sorry you're blind to that.  This isn't Jim's first fuck up.  Fact is he was being a jackass came in contact with the itern, and would not stop being a jackass even after been asked multiple times.  If Tucker Carlson was doing this during an Obama press conference you cry babies would have lost your shit.",Boozenight,e9b4crz,conservative
">Yes. This video will better portray it.

Ahh yes.

Thank you, I see it now.

In the doctored video, it looks like he hit her.

In the original video, he also hit her, but at a different frame rate.

That really clears things up. Thanks.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b49gk,conservative
"[Oh, sorry for taking the Press Secretary at her word. I should have known that she wouldn't tell the whole truth.](https://twitter.com/PressSec/status/1060374680991883265)",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b4iwt,conservative
Hit? Ok. Sure. Keep hiding in your hole deeper and deeper. The truth can't get you there! Just a little deeper....,slippyslappyswanson_,e9b4ez9,conservative
"Do you have some sort of learning disability?  She says he's been suspended for inappropriate behavior, which is exactly what he is doing in that video being inappropriate.  ",Boozenight,e9b5g47,conservative
"Ad hominem attacks. Would expect nothing less. Let us read the words, together! ""We stand by our decision to revoke this individual's hard pass. We will not tolerate **the** inappropriate behavior **clearly documented in this video.**""  
  
Now, it is either my learning disability or my law degree, but I'm reading this statement as applicable to only one event. The one in the video. Not related to any other event, action, or statement of any kind.   
",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b5vxf,conservative
"So a learning disability and lack of reading comprehension. Not a good combo for a lawyer yikes.

 He was being inappropriate in the video which is what her statement says. He has also been inappropriate numerous times in the past which are well documented. This was the final straw there slick.  ",Boozenight,e9b6o6h,conservative
I have a hard time thinking someone who had made as many logical fallacies as you have to have a law degree.,HighLatencyRaptor,e9b69sc,conservative
"But, pal, that isn't what she said. That is coming from your mouth. Where did that ""final straw"" language come from? Oh, right, you projecting on the tweet and not realizing that isn't the stance they took. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b93o7,conservative
"Please, explain further regarding my ""logical fallacies."" Don't worry, you can look up the definition first. And I have a hard time giving a fuck about what some uneducated ignorant fuck on reddit believes or doesn't believe. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9b9jfi,conservative
No what I said is reality.  Jim Acosta is a horrible journalist that has been inappropriate and making a fool of himself for a long time.  What he did yesterday was also inappropriate so they had enough.  I'm sorry you're so consumed by hatred of the President to see that.  Good luck with that law degree... ,Boozenight,e9baalz,conservative
"> Please, explain further regarding my ""logical fallacies."" Don't worry, you can look up the definition first. And I have a hard time giving a fuck about what some uneducated ignorant fuck on reddit believes or doesn't believe. 

I think you are the uneducated ignorant asswipe if you can't clearly see you have violated the red herring fallacy and the ad hominem fallacy. Also, you've been reported to the moderators of this sub, and to the reddit admins for harrassment. You know why? Because screw you.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9b9qkw,conservative
"Bud, holy shit. Good luck to you as you navigate your loony reality and try to figure out why your words and your thoughts are at odds with the truth. Not sure you ever knew what that was, though, so good luck with your booze. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9bahq9,conservative
The irony is palpable... ,slippyslappyswanson_,e9b9xub,conservative
Woo boy the ramblings of a mentally challenged individual consumed by hatred.  Try not to hurt anyone on the playground Johnny.,Boozenight,e9bb03j,conservative
"There is no irony here. There is only ignorance on the part of you. You have broken rule #1 of this sub, and have also decided to attack me with bigoted terms, instead of proving what you said earlier was not a red herring, which you can't, because it is. I thought your side was against the bigots? No, they are only against what they hate.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9ba2dl,conservative
"This is who you are. I'd say think about that, but it is clear that would be too much of a challenge for you. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9bb3hw,conservative
This statement reads like satire. Are you being serious? I asked a very clear question. It was not a red herring. It was a question that I was hoping OP would answer. Do you know what a red herring is? ,slippyslappyswanson_,e9baa32,conservative
Please stop trying to project your stupidity onto me.  Bye!,Boozenight,e9bcdox,conservative
" >Do you know what a red herring is? 

Yes, I do. Textbook definition right here: 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_herring

>A red herring is something that misleads or distracts from a relevant or important issue.[1] It may be either a logical fallacy or a literary device that leads readers or audiences towards a false conclusion. A red herring might be intentionally used, such as in mystery fiction or as part of rhetorical strategies (e.g., in politics), or it could be inadvertently used during argumentation. 

Your question was made for the clear purpose of distracting from the relevant argument at hand. Do not lie.

The fact you clearly think I am being satirical clearly shows the lack of reflection on your comments thus far, and the fact that you are not as intelligent as you think you are. You may be educated, but you are not smart.
",HighLatencyRaptor,e9baeg3,conservative
"Bye, Felicia.",slippyslappyswanson_,e9bcuds,conservative
"Wow, you are so defensive you really can't actually objectively read anything.  My question was directed at OP's failure to answer the question regarding the freedom of the press, which is at the heart of this issue. I understand your denial prevents you from seeing that, but facts are facts. And focusing on OP's deflection is important, because I'm not going to try to have a debate with someone who continues to deflect or use logical fallacies to engage. Which, jokes on me, because here you are. ",slippyslappyswanson_,e9banpv,conservative
"> Wow, you are so defensive you really can't actually objectively read anything. My question was directed at OP's failure to answer the question regarding the freedom of the press, which is at the heart of this issue. I understand your denial prevents you from seeing that, but facts are facts. And focusing on OP's deflection is important, because I'm not going to try to have a debate with someone who continues to deflect or use logical fallacies to engage. Which, jokes on me, because here you are. 

Wrong. OP Clearly said he was talking about whether what Acosta did was wrong and a legal charge, not whether it was an issue of free speech. And if facts are facts, then you clearly have a hard time seeing that the microphone was not his, and he was refusing to relinquish white house property, and what he was doing was completely inappropriate. You added the issue of free speech to the discussion, which was irrelevant to what OP was talking about. You are an idiot, sir.

Third logical fallacy: Strawman. You are making my position to be weaker than it is and attacking a caricature of it. 

Please go screw yourself.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9barsm,conservative
Jailtime...,Bubbacat7,e9c5bna,conservative
Should we riot? /s,DBG1998,e9bzzgy,conservative
"We should go to Broward and bang on their doors! Oh wait, the left would say that's wrong to do...",xJownage,e9c3dnx,conservative
What deserves a civilian uprising: Trump winning a fair election or our government literally changing results against the will of the people? ,Natetendo83,e9c3r39,conservative
"Um I think we should make our voices heard if they try and pull BS, also they are doing it in Arizona and Wisconsin I have heard. If it is proven true that they are committing fraud then yes I think it would be time to rise up a tad. If they take away our votes, with manufactured ones, then we no longer live in a republic and they will continue to cheat. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7rmk,conservative
"Honestly, I'm getting closer to thinking that but not sarcastically. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9cfg4y,conservative
"Look where being the better guys has got us. They take advantage of our kindness, it's time to get tough, if the allegations are true. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7umk,conservative
"""ORANGE MAN BAD!!!!!""",Moonthrower,e9cpv4l,conservative
"Confession: I added /s as an edit, with hesitancy. ",DBG1998,e9cg89u,conservative
"They threw tantrums, ran extreme left, and were rewarded with the House. Obviously the American people want us to dive into the crazy end of the pool with the Dems. ",YankeeBlues21,e9c8602,conservative
"**user reports:**

3: Shitpost

2: It's rude, vulgar or offensive

1: This is spam

1: It's rude, vulgar or offensive it's rude, vulgar or offensive

1: Spam

1: this is pathetic, even for you fucks. keep licking that boot.

1: awww poor trumpy might get embarrassed, such a strong man huh, lmfao you pussies

1: You do realise it will open up and disclose a lot of the shit and baggage he is hiding (tax returns)",chabanais,e9b9sig,conservative
"Anyone else think now is the time for federal marijuana legalization? It could be a bipartisan effort, more states have recently legalized it, Canada recently has, and Sessions is out. It's time we stop restricting what adults put in their bodies of their own free will. ",Gam3rGurl13,e9apn2k,conservative
[removed],,e9akydu,conservative
"That last panel is right on the money.

I'm honestly baffled that the Dems haven't been able to form *any* substantial response to the Trump phenomenon since November 2016. The silly ""resist"" shtick is still all they've got after 2 (!) years.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ajal2,conservative
It would be far funnier if it wasn't 100% true,Jizzlobber42,e9alqpu,conservative
"I’d rather them continue to advance the “we hate trump” agenda than their actual legislative agenda of Single payer healthcare and $15 minimum wage and that stuff. Populist, unconstitutional bullshit like that is much scarier than trying to fight everything Trump does. ",roberttylerlee,e9akrd9,conservative
"Watching Pelosi yesterday talking about working together, and I'm thinking 'uh huh...'

",puddboy,e9akmq0,conservative
This isn't even a joke but it's funny,daviddavidson29,e9aonna,conservative
[removed],,e9ao8he,conservative
Damn somebody went up to the attic for the Christmas decorations and found a vintage meme lying in the corner.  I like it.  ,wengerlight,e9akzgb,conservative
"By the time they completed the impeachment process he'll be up for re-election; so yeah, a pretty stupid use of political capital unless some egregious wrongdoing comes to light. ",pixelfishes,e9b8erk,conservative
A+,Splickity-Lit,e9am8i0,conservative
I can hear Paul Sr. in my head on that last panel.  Perfect!,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9atf6f,conservative
"1. Scream Orange is Bad for any and all reason
2. Claim that anybody who remotely supports Trump is racist
3. Try to impeach him based on previously debunked claims
4. Obstruct any legislation the Republicans put forth, even if they supported it in the past

Why the down votes? This exactly what the dems will do.🔥",Red_Falcon_75,e9b39km,conservative
"Shockingly accurate.  Dems have to be upset with the complete lack of any representation whatsoever in terms of legislature or solving problems.

edit - I see the brigade is alive and well",smakusdod,e9ay6kq,conservative
This is too accurate,ThisFinnishguy,e9asq9o,conservative
"Okay, this is epic ",joecaputo24,e9atgp5,conservative
This is hilarious.  I love this meme format.  Prob my all time fave.,thechariot83,e9aufrn,conservative
"""HATING TRUMP IS OUR AGENDA""

Almost perfect, made me laugh. Only thing missing is an exclamation point.",ChromeWeasel,e9b6zo3,conservative
Well done and concise,nina_gall,e9b1es4,conservative
Too funny!,JFGFNY,e9bryko,conservative
This is so true.,heartless_13,e9ayoiw,conservative
Actually very accurate.,AlterAlias1,e9b6n6m,conservative
Exactly why im know longer a Democrat ,he-hate-me___4,e9aqzg9,conservative
It is truly sad that an entire party would base their whole agenda on hating the president! Liberals are honestly a class of their own! They can’t handle trump’s success! ,antiantifa2020,e9b0gg6,conservative
Love. This. Meme. Always upvote the tuttles. ,briannnicole,e9bc2mq,conservative
I like it.,steveoneill,e9aq9n8,conservative
This right here,Itsyoungdaddy,e9b99y1,conservative
It really do be like that.,monsieur_chevre,e9anwdw,conservative
This is America. ,Ashen-Knight,e9b256m,conservative
Glorious. 10/10 would read again.,machinerer,e9b1rc1,conservative
Lololololol ,eke72,e9b4wck,conservative
Orange man won't show me his tax returns must impeach ,Yhbayb,e9bebqa,conservative
Chabanais the bringer of Leftist Pain,callthereaper64,e9bb1iq,conservative
"Definitely. It's a losing issue for the GOP. And for the DNC it's a carrot they've been dangling in front of their voters forever.

It's gonna happen eventually- might as well be the party that does it and score some points with moderate swing voters.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9aqjy5,conservative
"I read that Bohner went to work for a marijuana company, so I'm guessing there's some behind the scenes stuff already being worked on.",bambamtx,e9avy2i,conservative
Couldn't agree more. Sessions being gone is helpful but we'll see. I'm not sure we'll have too many Senators on board with the idea.,mnslice,e9ayy6l,conservative
[removed],,e9alrva,conservative
[removed],,e9alf7a,conservative
"I was brought to tears... of sadness knowing an entire,  
a probably 75%+ margin of democrats legitimately run on this kind of bullshit.",SimonJ57,e9boexx,conservative
They’ll waste their time. Senate will swat down any lefty legislation they pass.,Dank_Cartographer,e9alzdn,conservative
"Reminds me of what they said when they took over in 2006. Transparent, Open, and Honest were the buzzwords. Now Pelosi is talking about bipartisanship? I'll believe it when I see it.",Martbell,e9akxw0,conservative
A meme the way a meme should be memed. This memes a lot to me.,Splickity-Lit,e9amcgu,conservative
Muh Cheetoh Hitler!,chabanais,e9bfj6m,conservative
One of the four tardspeople of the tardpocolypse.,chabanais,e9bfhvk,conservative
"I'm from upstate NY, which is extremely conservative, but also loves marijuana. Talking to conservatives in the area, it's a big point for them. Not just because they either do it themselves or know someone who does, but because it's hypocritical for the party to be against it at all. They that tout, ""less government,"" but want you jailed or paying fines for *smoking marijuana?* Something doesn't add up. ",AragornsMassiveCock,e9b2ut7,conservative
"Marsha Blackburn from Tennssee is open to legalizing medical marijuana. Thats pretty huge in Tennssee.
https://www.tennessean.com/story/news/politics/tn-elections/2018/09/26/tennessee-senate-debate-marsha-blackburn-open-medical-marijuana-phil-bredesen-cannabis-schedule/1430604002/",SeanRamey,e9azup6,conservative
The MSM makes sure the DNC takes credit for anything no matter what the historical facts are. ,ozric101,e9b1bk4,conservative
Problem is they’ll use those issues to GOTV in 2020. Idiots love free shit and they love getting paid more than they deserve even more. A huge portion of the country are idiots themselves or so compassionate they’d embrace tyranny on the off chance it might alleviate poverty.,rwwman50,e9ay3ab,conservative
Theres a chance she understands how precarious of a situation she’s in,Dank_Cartographer,e9atok9,conservative
"I guess she’s not gonna try the old, “you have to pass it to find out what’s in it” approach again. ",Ravens1112003,e9bf6uy,conservative
"Back then, she was saying how, oh, it'll be even MORE bipartisan in the house now with me in charge...",irving47,e9bhl1s,conservative
Rider of the tardstallion Tardy,callthereaper64,e9bfpnh,conservative
"It would also open the door for more funding for things democrats can't pay for. If Republicans were able to say they legalized it and paid for X program completely with the taxes from it, they could tout that for years. ",chief89,e9be5zo,conservative
"$10 says she rails against global warming and advocates safe spaces for those feeling threatened.  Yet she drives a truck and physically intimidates those with a different opinion.  

It’s not the Left or Right that bothers me as much as the hypocrisy. ",kjc127,e9b68bm,conservative
"These are the people that students take on crushing debt to be ""educated"" by.",jd_porter,e9b4wtc,conservative
It's too bad booby-trapping these signs is illegal. I remember seeing a guy running electricity to his signs to shock losers trying to steal them.,DrKhaylomsky,e9b1uc6,conservative
">""I have family I love that support Trump, so I was after the sign, not the person,"" Ebert told Campus Reform. ""I have apologized and feel bad, but clearly the GOP is putting a big deal [of] spin on this. Many signs have been taken and disfigured, which, while no excuse for my bad behavior, doesn't warrant the death threats I have received...Nor the smear campaign after me...""

Can't you just feel the remorse? Does she get her Democrat get out of jail free pass yet?",Lepew1,e9bbjoq,conservative
that sign was hate speech so it deserved it. GOP is literal NAZIs and their hate speech sign won't be tolerated in New York. Isn't it so wonderful to be so tolerant.   ,stoffel_bristov,e9b9wi9,conservative
How embarrassing. ,Julevict,e9bgi5z,conservative
"Yikes, that’s embarrassing for her.",theArtlaw,e9bqzdn,conservative
My wife's friend stole our Cruz sign. Thankfully she got some instant karma by falling in our water meter after it had rained for 2 weeks. She took her pants off in the street right as a car drove by. 🤣,Jimbeau83,e9bnsuz,conservative
"Colleges just love out-of-state tuition revenues, especially from foreign students. The more there are, the more text books sold and classes filled, etc. The more demand for education, the more justification to raise costs, staff raises, etc.",Saigunx,e9bnd69,conservative
"Being a professor doesn't help when you are morally bankrupt; the bottom line is White Trash is just that, WHITE TRASH.",StephenScherer1,e9bork2,conservative
"> McGovern said the incident was especially ""frightening"" because it was so close to their home, but she said it was amusing to find out it was a local professor.  

> ""I kind of thought it was funny in a way, because of the times, you hear about stories of the professors being very liberal and not allowing people with conservative or Republican views to speak...almost like trying to shut down my voice, which seems antithetical to what a professor should be doing because we should all have a voice,"" McGovern said.",AManGotToHaveACode,e9c5uwi,conservative
"Professors, as a caste, will need to answer for their crimes against this country. They are the reason why so many of these college kids are insane now.",FiveHits,e9bly4g,conservative
"From the video: ""She apologized and expressed remorse, but says now she is experiencing death threats.""

&#x200B;

No matter what political side anyone comes from says or does.. can we please stop with the death threats part? Sheesh.",pastalvr,e9bkdi6,conservative
[removed],,e9b950c,conservative
I not going to take that bet.,lodger238,e9be7gr,conservative
Jeez it’s even worse when I see you say it like that. I’m glad I was able to bite my tongue somewhat for my years in college.,AlterAlias1,e9bn8r6,conservative
You can put bird repellent on them. ,ozric101,e9b6taa,conservative
"I doubt she received death threats. If any, they were from a 2 hour old Twitter account. People caught doing something wrong always being up how they were death threated",necktits_,e9bcmve,conservative
"you forgot the /s. Was about to pull a ""death threat"" on you.",igor_otsky,e9bc9rt,conservative
These people have no shame and therefore feel no embarrassment.,scungillipig,e9bjvcg,conservative
Hailed as a hero on campus.  ,Roez,e9bsg5n,conservative
"Here you go, another news source which verifies the story that SUNY economics lecturer Laura Elbert confesses to stealing the signs: https://www.campusreform.org/?ID=11491",Crackerjack-Karma,e9badi5,conservative
"I have to bite my tongue everyday. Thank goodness this semester is nearly over, I won’t have to listen to my ultra liberal history professor anymore",asphaltcement123,e9cinvc,conservative
Flair checks out.,jj_dynomite,e9bhp1e,conservative
How about that ink they put on money given to bank robbers? Can you see her explaining her red hands to her class?,JFGFNY,e9bs3aq,conservative
Good idea. You can also cover them in Anthrax as long you don’t get caught.,YaBoiRexTillerson,e9bbdzo,conservative
"What would that do, exactly? I've never used bird repellent before.",AThievingStableBoy,e9d0i3o,conservative
"She didn't.  They always claim these ""death threats"" but never provide documentation.  Gun control advocates have been doing for years. ",LonelyMachines,e9blu4u,conservative
New “democratic” communism  awareness spreading?,Wittyusernameman,e9c58x3,conservative
That would be illegal... the bird repellent is not and makes it fucking worth it.  ,ozric101,e9bbtxg,conservative
Think you got whoosed ma dude,curlbaumann,e9bbxeo,conservative
"If anyone is a Feminist of their time, it's Tommy Robinson.  This is what his UK supporters need to say to get the message out to support him in the crazy language of regressivism as he is the only one to speak out against rape gangs.",CreativeRoutine,e9d4wkf,conservative
"Not mental health in general, but ignoring people who have already been violent and say they'll do it again, as most of these shooters have. 


Joe blow with depression or bipolar isn't a threat. 

A psycho who says he'll kill people should perhaps be investigated. ",CinnamonAndCloves,e9cghkk,conservative
"I feel like it's a cop-out to try to sympathise and humanize any person who walks up to a club and shoots a little girl (yes, that was his first hit), much more, any senseless shooting for any reason whatsoever.",CreativeRoutine,e9cet2h,conservative
"Aren’t most “mass” shootings the result of gang violence? 

I don’t feel mental health is the cause of those. It’s a war on drugs, broken families and the lefts goal of keeping these people dependent on the government. ",DudeCaptain,e9czxss,conservative
Sounds like a good argument for universal healthcare.,myfantasyalt,e9cist7,conservative
Seems to me a good argument for background checks.,BarneyBent,e9cibic,conservative
"And not just mental health, but womental health and childrental health too.",chickennoodleo,e9d042a,conservative
"Sure, and government is a terrible method of implementing that target.",DanReach,e9cnvr8,conservative
"With one possible exception, all mass shooters in recent memory bought their guns at retail and passed the background check. ",LonelyMachines,e9coh0c,conservative
Were is the GOP on this? ,Isredditreal2009,e9chuj6,conservative
"So why don't republicans take to the streets to protest? The democrats are protesting all over the country because Sessions resigned. This is a little bit more important than that.

Edit: also, don't these shenanigans (at least in FL) amount to *exactly* what the democrats accuse republicans of doing? But I guess if it never gets 24/7 coverage on CNN it isn't ""real"".",justhere2havefun,e9ceqg3,conservative
"This is not America, this is Socialism/Marxism/Communism",TheThinkerofOutcomes,e9cfc7f,conservative
What's going on in Arizona? ,xJownage,e9ce65c,conservative
Absolutely disgusting,UltraSurvivalist,e9cjsty,conservative
"Well, Mitt Romney and Jeb Bush are bashing Trump on unrelated matters. 

Marco Rubio and the head of the RNC are making noise on Twitter, at least. Rick Scott is filing lawsuits, and Trump is calling for law enforcement investigations (on Twitter anyway). ",tifuforreal,e9cj7cg,conservative
"when republicans gather in large numbers they get called a ""racist/nazi mob"" by the media, and that gives antifa terrorists the green light to attack them in the streets. so republicans kinda stopped protesting. ",tifuforreal,e9cexcc,conservative
Because the vast majority of republicans expect the law to do it's job. ,Buddha_Punch,e9cf4qi,conservative
Blatant fraud. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9cfbso,conservative
"> Absolutely disgusting

So I guess we have moved to the point where we have to win elections with not just a majority but a big enough majority so they can't manufacture enough fake votes to overcome it.",optionhome,e9cn60z,conservative
"Exactly. This is exactly what they wanted. They saw the Tea Party movement, got mad, and sought a way to silence them from everywhere but the ballot box. And they're apparently working on that too right now.",justhere2havefun,e9cf5ur,conservative
"So what's happening in Florida exactly, pretty much? You didn't give me any details",xJownage,e9cfcun,conservative
yep. democrats aren't liberal anymore. they are totalitarian. ,tifuforreal,e9cfny1,conservative
"Democrats lost, so they're creating fake ballots that all support them and claiming they found them. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9cfqzp,conservative
"No I'm aware of what's happening in florida, I live there. I'm guessing democrats are doing the same thing in Arizona too. Figures.",xJownage,e9cfwo8,conservative
"Yeah they found 120k votes after the election that just so happened to push sinema over the edge just enough to where the remaining votes cannot mathematically be enough for mcsally to win. 

Each candidate only got around 900k votes, so they just magically found 14% of votes 2 days after the election... Weird",SlickDigger,e9d3yyf,conservative
Scott and DeSantis need to file for an emergency injunction immediately. Brenda Snipes is a snake and she needs to be forced to reveal what's going on.,mastaxn,e9bip1y,conservative
If they swing the AG commissioner kiss your concealed carry in FL goodbye. same with governor with gun laws in general. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9blc2k,conservative
"Get that new AG in there to start tearing down the Leftist power structures that allow this sort of corruption to flourish. This is the *perfect* time to have gotten rid of Sessions, and Trump should let Whitaker loose to shine a light on the Left by whatever legal means he has available to him, regardless of how ""ungentlemanly"" it might seem. I'm tired of gentleman Republicans. I want our side to *fight* tooth and nail and *win*. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9bitpe,conservative
"The 4th is incorporated so no, it would go to SCOTUS. ",ozric101,e9bnimo,conservative
"I confess I tune out a lot of news these days. I am vaguely familiar through headlines but I don’t know details (I finally got sick of all the sensationalism so I haven’t been reading too many articles). Can someone please help me with this one...

“Critics have long noted that extended wait times at ports of entry may not be an option for migrants fleeing danger in their home countries.”

Even assuming they all have valid asylum requests, extended wait times “not being an option” doesn’t make sense to me. The danger they’ve been fleeing in their home countries hasn’t been following them as they’ve been walking thousands of miles, but suddenly it’s an issue once they get to the border? Something about “if it smells like bullshit...” comes to mind, but since I haven’t been following this in depth, maybe I’m missing something?

E: why are you downvoting a legitimate question? At a minimum, I’d think I’d get an “it *is* bullshit” response. I have been leaning more to the right lately as I’ve been hearing nothing but the same BS script in the far-left city I’m in, and I am sincerely curious as to your thoughts on this. ",GreenEyesClementine,e9cuz11,conservative
"Dude, don't worry about the downvotes, it's most likely the first wave of brigade downvotes this sub gets daily.

As far as your question: it's all bullshit. If they really wanted asylum, they can request it, and must by law, in the first safe country they reach. By bypassing Mexico, they are saying one of two things; they don't want asylum, or Mexico isn't safe. The latter is bullshit, and the former is grounds for denial and deportation.",Cr8er,e9cygfo,conservative
"Thank you. Yes, I’m late to the game, and a big reason why I’ve tuned it out is because all I get is the left’s typical outrage script - there is no discussion where I am and asking questions is a big no-no (as I’m sure you all know already). I’d rather disagree with you (I don’t here) than even attempt to have a conversation with the left these days. I’m more of a lurker than a commenter here, but damn are the different views on this sub a breath of fresh air from what I normally hear. ",GreenEyesClementine,e9czm3b,conservative
"For those looking for more info on how dumb she actually is, check out r/crazy_eyes

And for those wondering ""Why the nick name ['Crazy Eyes'](https://goo.gl/images/vFBhyW)?""
",tehForce,e9bvbv8,conservative
"""*A 17-year-old can walk into a shop and purchase an assault weapon*"".",FuriousChef,e9ahgaf,conservative
She should run against Nancy for Speaker.,Lepew1,e9aj9ec,conservative
The only reason why unemployment is so low is because everyone has two jobs!!!,14thAndVine,e9agpag,conservative
Bad for politics but good for the meme economy. Positives guys we gotta think of the positives.,thx_II38,e9apqvt,conservative
">“The upper-middle class doesn’t exist anymore.”


>""People often say, how are you gonna pay for [universal healthcare]? And I find the question so puzzling because, how do you pay for something that’s more affordable? How do you pay for cheaper rent? How do you pay for—you just pay for it.""",guitmusic12,e9ahkdp,conservative
"I'm starting to think politics isn't hard, just run in the right place.",SuperFunMonkey,e9aj7e7,conservative
We need a subreddit called r/ShitOcasioSays,JimboJehosephat,e9aivg9,conservative
  Boston University has a lot to answer for by letting her graduate with a Economics degree.,Nanteen666,e9ajwu3,conservative
"In a night of historic firsts, Florida elected its first white male senator named Rick who was born in 1952 in Illinois. Talk about a glass ceiling shattered.",1wjl1,e9anqzd,conservative
"""im not the expert on geopolitics hahaha"" - This moron",supacrusha,e9b5vks,conservative
I'm not surprised New York elected a socialist.  I am surprised they elected someone so phenomenally stupid.,Yosoff,e9aiovi,conservative
The only issue I have with that statement is the looping of Millennial into that. The generation she was born in has nothing to do with any of the rest of it.,slopezski,e9ajhiw,conservative
"""How are you gonna pay for universal healthcare?""

&#x200B;

""Erm. Universal healthcare is free, dummy!""",Electroyote,e9arvsg,conservative
"I think we need to keep an eye on her, there’s a reason higher dems didn’t try and stop her from taking Crowley’s seat. Also all the positive coverage she’s been getting and the out of state fundraisers on the west cost, is making me think something is up. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e9amckv,conservative
[removed],,e9am1k8,conservative
You pay for things by writing a check.  Then the bank sends money.  We can afford anything with this great system.  We dont need capitalism.,Conservativeone,e9aw512,conservative
Although I do think we need more young people in politics. Young people like myself barely understand life. This could be an issue.,goldrotmgonly,e9b9hjl,conservative
"> 'Medicare for all' plan may be expensive, but think of all the money we'll save in funeral expenses!",Jizzlobber42,e9aloe4,conservative
Her opponent had a PHD in economics. Like California though they probably just saw the D on the ballot and voted.,ultimis,e9ak8df,conservative
Her acceptance speech was painful. Chock full of struggle and resistance. You can only fly on that for so long. Hopefully she'll do some good. I don't wish failure on anyone in the government. It screws us all.,cafeRacr,e9awlgk,conservative
"I feel like reading her statements gave me a stroke. Also, I was born in 1989 like her, I definitely do not identify as a millennial. It hurts that these idiots have stained my entire generation.",Tiller9,e9aix1k,conservative
"This is the gal who expects to be, ""innauguarted"" and ""signing bills"" on her first day in office.

Add Anthony Delgado, the Pelosi supported lefty and former rap artist (the reference to porno tapes - such a delight) who is the new NY-19 rep.

Corrupt Cuomo, a former rap star and a dingbat ex-bartender and they wonder why NYS never seems to do much beyond treading water and raising taxes.",JFGFNY,e9anct7,conservative
Creative titles,Splickity-Lit,e9am3sw,conservative
"Yesterday someone commented ""*I'm like so happy I like won and stuff*"".

I'm still laughing.",lodger238,e9bd07f,conservative
Detroit 2,Nova17Delta,e9aj68n,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/BuEZoWT.jpg,alc59,e9aprs6,conservative
good luck,donjohn1986,e9ahpra,conservative
she literally has a degree in economics.,VermiciousKnidzz,e9ar7d1,conservative
Personally this does not sit well with me. I have an MBA in financial management and just started working as a City Auditor a few months ago. I'm still trying to straighten out the finances from when the last Auditor basically wasn't entering things into the accounting system correctly. I hope to God nobody tries putting her on an appropriations committee.,Ed_Radley,e9aji3a,conservative
"People like her are the gift that keeps on giving. She will be the distilled idiocy of the left concentrated in one incredibly stupid person. Her poorly-thought-out statements will reveal how misguided the left is, and will help wake up the average idiot that may be tempted by her free stuff. ",queerservative,e9aj14n,conservative
Bolshevik Barbie.,Mumblix_Grumph,e9ambwg,conservative
"She's one of the few people I've seen go fully possessed when she gives her impassioned speeches. Her eyes go wide, and it's like something comes over here.  That thing is power, the look on her face is it going to her head.",petitereddit,e9aklqq,conservative
"It should become a thing that every time she is about to say something, another Congress member interrupts with a drink order.  ""Oh good you're here.  I'll have a whisky, neat.""",WhetherReport,e9ambvn,conservative
[removed],,e9aomcs,conservative
I'm pretty sure they're elected Democrats before.,lfmann,e9akmc2,conservative
New York elected its first openly economically illiterate transgender woman to Congress.,bobbbsanders,e9avjyt,conservative
That just means she's an easily controlled NPC.,GreekLogic,e9b171l,conservative
We need to cram down the throats of all students throughout primary and secondary education the vile evils of socialism. The fact that so many people are historically uneducated on the over 100 million deaths caused by socialist/communist regimes is ridiculous.,DocMilk,e9alptc,conservative
Diversity...,Rhett6162,e9aoptc,conservative
Can someone lay out a list of the things she has said?,confusedstudent1212,e9arr13,conservative
I can’t wait for the sound bites she provides. ,mattyice18,e9au0mc,conservative
She really is something. People like her should go to an Econ 101 class and then talk,GainsGutsGlory,e9awpho,conservative
I don’t really know anything about her. What’s her name? ,jbirdie3,e9ax2fg,conservative
Step 1. Be Attractive,ImmediateArugula,e9bbboo,conservative
But she’s hot .  Oh that doesn’t count?  Lol,myfakeredditnombre,e9br2pl,conservative
I need to move so bad.,steveinbuffalo,e9cpv1d,conservative
"Its New York, you cant expect much in the way of common sense, NY commonly cant see past the end of their noses pointed up!",CulpeppperInaMinute,e9ajyok,conservative
"SHE HAS AN ECONOMICS DEGREE. 

what does that say about the state of education in colleges. I mean high level indoctrination camps.",feraxil,e9aoz6d,conservative
Her campaign song is Somewhere over the Rainbow...,lax714,e9ajqaa,conservative
Those filthy millennials. I hate millennials.,riseandburn,e9aqa8o,conservative
"She gives me hope. I may be a simply country man who lives a simply life. I'm not a big professor or a doctor or a lawyer. But I'm sure as shit smarter and more informed than she is. So if she could successfully run for office, maybe I could too one day. ",LumpyWumpus,e9am420,conservative
Anyone have a link to stuff she’s said?,lepuma,e9al6f5,conservative
[removed],,e9asy99,conservative
[removed],,e9auvi3,conservative
She did her fake business and economics degree thesis on milton Friedman. Its just when she got her first job bartending after graduation. Muh free market was too much work. So she went all chavez communist just for the champagne. ,collectijism,e9at8iv,conservative
"The first of many. Those hysterical children you saw throwing temper tantrums on the floor of Walmart or Target have graduated college, and are now going into politics.

Get ready.",NocturnalPatrol,e9apwem,conservative
So is she bad or good??,Bleachy98,e9akk5g,conservative
New York went completely blue this election.  My taxes will be completely fucked.,NumberWanObi,e9appjh,conservative
That goes without saying when voting for a socialist.,InquisitorThorn,e9aryhw,conservative
Can't wait until the sex tape comes out ,MAGAsquad,e9baeoi,conservative
"She's tragic as a politician.  Totally incompetent, vacuous charisma, and self-entitled to the core.   She will be a boon for conservatives moving forward, however.  Democratic Socialists have made her the young face of Democratic Socialism, and thank God for that.  How I dream for a day when Democrats elect to send serious people to congress again.  ",MojoHand052,e9al3s4,conservative
She only looks half batshit in this photo.  Photoshop?  She learning to hide her power level?,darthskids,e9al754,conservative
Tfw hating poor people makes you economically literate,warmPBR,e9ar495,conservative
Wonder if she'll face a challenger in 2020. From any party. The local Republicans blew it with Pappas.,postonrddt,e9anggx,conservative
If your country keep this pace you will fall as mine.,eduardocl,e9ar41b,conservative
She's hot though... That dimple! ,GodzRebirth,e9azjag,conservative
"....this makes so much more sense just realized I've been arguing on the r/libertarian as opposed to r/conservative. oops.

Makes so much more sense why so many people were saying baby boomers are the worst generation.",callthereaper64,e9bkbc8,conservative
"Despite her shitty economic policies, objectively speaking, she's actually quite attractive!",nrkyrox,e9bvall,conservative
"""diversity""--- must have illiterate and stupid people be represented now in Congress.  Cortez should start the below 80 IQ caucus in Congress to get the ball rolling on insuring moronic representation throughout the government.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9ate6n,conservative
I don't really care that she's not politically savvy.  What I don't get is the love the voters have for socialists.,mlmack,e9asogq,conservative
"How to be a successful Lefty politician: be a minority race, gender, sexual preference, religious ideology, actual retard.",BD1304,e9atenw,conservative
"Guys, but she’s really cute, though. 😍",rAlexanderAcosta,e9bjdgd,conservative
It's okay. I'm sure she'll learn what works and what doesn't. It's just a shame that it's at the expense of the citizens,anonymau5,e9akpou,conservative
Whatever that is,Austen98,e9ajhuv,conservative
This topic alone shows the liberals’ ability to think critically is so irreparably flawed I’m not sure they can be saved.,antiantifa2020,e9b1aw5,conservative
Everything is an assault weapon if you're strong and creative enough.,ZarahCobalt,e9box4g,conservative
"Any weapon is an assault weapon if you assault someone with it. Like a pebble, or a sharpened frozen banana, or a pencil. All items used to assault are assault weapons. ",cbryan890713,e9b8xc6,conservative
Republicans should all vote for her for speaker. Sprinkle in a few Pelosi hating Dems and we have ourself a shit show worth watching for the next 2 years.,Kemaro,e9ajoz7,conservative
Can we call them racist for not voting for the minority? Ooooooo! That would be fun to watch!,FarsideSC,e9al1by,conservative
"If you think about it. If we ever have to, though I doubt it, go down the line of succession, she'd be after Pence. But she's not old enough to be president, so it would go to whoever gets President Pro Tempore",sil3nt_gam3r,e9ap439,conservative
"
Don't forget: ""*Unemployment is low because people are working 60, 70, 80 hours a week and can barely feed their family.*""",FuriousChef,e9ahm0m,conservative
[deleted],,e9akutm,conservative
[removed],,e9aqdb6,conservative
"The only silver lining of her winning is we get to hear the silly dumb things she says. I couldn't believe how much people on reddit like this woman. Hell, I even know people IRL that met her and love her and it defies logic as to why.",Mswizzle23,e9alh4v,conservative
I can't even begin to understand how this would make any sense,unityrootts,e9ao9nc,conservative
that might be the best one I've heard her say,attack_bronson,e9awc35,conservative
Lmao. She’s majored in economics and spouts off this bullshit. ,kotov9syndrome,e9au6ab,conservative
"I've created the sub https://old.reddit.com/r/ShitOcasioSays/

I was thinking of the ""posting rules"".

Something like ""Quotes are fine...... but links to the relevant YouTube video with a link to the time in question would be best!""",SarahC,e9atqop,conservative
We must take back the memes of production.,FelixFuckfurter,e9b8a8e,conservative
[removed],,e9ap4qq,conservative
[removed],,e9aq2g8,conservative
"She has a degree in economics and international relations from Boston University but literally professes ignorance when it comes to answering basic economic and international relations related questions.

The scariest thing about the new  far-left candidates like herself and many others in the Northeast and West Coast isn’t there abhorrent misunderstanding or deliberate misinterpretation of fundamental economic concepts, it’s the willingness of the current Democratic Party to embrace them. 

Say what you want about Joe Crawley but he at least stood behind some established economic principles rather than embarrassingly espouse blatant socialist rhetoric. ",HingleMcCringlebarr,e9akjkn,conservative
"I've got this mix of disdain and enjoyment for that woman and her candid, ignorant commentary. She constantly exposes that she's not only uniformed but she'll also fumble around with terrible talking points when asked pointed questions. NY 14th was blue anyways. At least we have an idiot to point to about how idiotic they are.",greatatdrinking,e9aj6l1,conservative
[removed],,e9b1nsl,conservative
Universal healthcare is cheaper per citizen - it’s disingenuous to suggest otherwise.,renjo689,e9ap1k8,conservative
I'd be interested in average IQ and salaries for registered Democrats and Republicans.,mkov88,e9avjfo,conservative
It’s not. Run in the right place with money behind you and you’re good. Some districts it’ll only take $100k and you’ll probably win. ,Ruckus45,e9apddq,conservative
"When Congressman Hank Johnson was afraid Guam would ""tip over"" because there were too many people on it, that should have told you as much.

When Congresswoman Sheila Jackson Lee asked whether NASA's Pathfinder Mars rover was going to go past where the astronauts planted the flag, that should have told you as much.",Griegz,e9av3n6,conservative
"well you certainly don't have to be intelligent, or really have any idea what you're talking about.  ",puddboy,e9akyfl,conservative
"I used to think I wasn't well spoken or ""smart"" enough to run for office, now I am quickly thinking otherwise.",PerceivedShift,e9amq9d,conservative
"Just like real estate-location location location

",postonrddt,e9ancmk,conservative
Pendulum swings both ways my man.,IrieMars,e9ati27,conservative
"She was lucky to win that primary. If constituents thought that the incumbent was going to lose, I’m sure there would’ve been a higher turnout. Contrary to what the media was pushing, apathy is what led to her victory.",art36,e9au2oq,conservative
Here you go. [http://cortezsays.com/](http://cortezsays.com/),KezzardTheWizzard,e9ajsah,conservative
"On January 3rd I'm gonna get inaugurated, and on January 4th I'm gonna be signing laws for free health care and school! ",Detroit_Telkepnaya,e9ajqv5,conservative
What the actual fuck?,SuperFunMonkey,e9ao1py,conservative
Economics departments have historically been safe from identity politics. I went to a liberal university (At this point who didn't?) and the economics/business department was very conservative. University of Chicago's economics program produced Hayek and Friedman.,zuul99,e9b38x2,conservative
I mean it's Boston,beachmedic23,e9akqlh,conservative
She may just choose to ignore what she knows and BS people. BU is an amazing school and good Econ department.,Nonsenseism,e9arrp4,conservative
"Seriously though. The public puts so much faith in academia because of it's outdated perception of prestige.

The state of higher education system in the US NEEDS to be addressed by this administration, or it will continue to pump out brainwashed leftist activists with no actual competences. These young people are going to be in positions of power some day, and the chances for that are considerably better for those who graduate from big name or Ivy League unis.",Kryvakryz,e9arv3b,conservative
"wanhman always earn their degrees

respek",REEEorderTheThots,e9apvw0,conservative
"She won that primary, which was the real race. After that she ran basically unopposed. I'm not a fan, but she won on the same wave Trump won on. The ""out with the old"" sentiment. A lot of people still want a changing.of the guard at all costs, experience/ability be damned",TurnDownYourRadio,e9aktwg,conservative
Yup. A total and complete moron. ,retired-vet,e9cauxg,conservative
The two go hand in hand!,CulpeppperInaMinute,e9am7q0,conservative
"*NYC, I dont want any of that shit I live in upstate NY.",brendude313,e9avobg,conservative
It's the Bronx.  The masses that live in that area are inherently stupid.,Anklebender91,e9atj12,conservative
It matters in that she has never been a member of the labor force during a recession. ,senatorpjt,e9amzro,conservative
she’s literally guaranteed to run for president. i wouldn’t be surprised if she wins either. ,anon2777,e9awi9f,conservative
Because she's 29 and will vote party lines no matter what.,Anklebender91,e9atmmf,conservative
I'd eat her ass on Taco night. 'tis true.,VirginWizard69,e9am5ol,conservative
"Actually it's cheaper than what we currently have, and would prevent the deaths and bankruptcy of Americans. Do your research. ",Roonerth,e9av5yv,conservative
Is this real? Please no. ,jdawgisyodaddy,e9avczw,conservative
"But we're **elder** millennials!

WE'RE ELDERS!!!

Born in 87. 2 steps away from owning a cane.",Manchu_Fist,e9an02r,conservative
">do not identify as

No i'm pretty sure you're a millennial.",computerbone,e9ayexx,conservative
"I was born in '88 and most of my peers are largely conservative. Fiscally certainly, socially kinda a mixed bag, but not very vocal about it. It seems like the younger generation is the group that's loudly left",beachmedic23,e9akyfg,conservative
I feel you. It's rough being a part of The Stupidest Generation.,carrotriver,e9ak8eq,conservative
"What bothers me is that she’s college educated. We are the same age and I joined the military after a year of college. If I was half as dumb as her, I’d be denied re-enlistment (which is incredibly hard to pull off).",FarsideSC,e9al9qr,conservative
"Yea it's a little frustrating. We're outnumbered for sure, so I understand why our generation has the reputation it does. ",zilla0100,e9aj7s3,conservative
I was born in 82 and graduated in 2000. Graduating at the turn of the century is pretty much the definition of a millennial.  It's just a meaningless label but you're definitely a millennial. ,teardrop36,e9bnih0,conservative
I feel like I was already in my late 20's and graduated with a medical degree when I first started to hear that I was a millennial.  ,Detroit_Telkepnaya,e9akkdw,conservative
Be the exception.,SuperFunMonkey,e9aj8hg,conservative
"   I have several nieces and nephews born in the late eights through the end of the 90's who are all pro 2nd amendment conservatives that voted for Trump.  I'm very proud of them.  Not only that,  we're Hispanic and want that damn wall built!  I  feel like my family would blow liberal minds and I kinda like that image.  ",whineybubbles,e9akofr,conservative
You say ex rap star like the president wasn't in reality tv,morris1022,e9ba9vs,conservative
"Unfortunately, part of the problem comes from their competition. I hate Cuomo and will always vote against him, but when the other big candidate is Marc Molinaro....well, that's a problem. It was the same thing Astorino in the last election. 

I don't like Anthony Delgado, either, but John Faso? Jesus Christ, not great options and SOMEONE has to win.",AragornsMassiveCock,e9bakam,conservative
Become inhuman,Ash_C,e9akf3k,conservative
The ludicrousness of the statement is not a reliable indicator of whether the quote is real or a joke with this woman,Richard_Stonee,e9atql0,conservative
[deleted],,e9aut2q,conservative
You must be really damn old if you think newly built TVs have  a built in antenna. ,Roonerth,e9avj2x,conservative
So does Trump. I have a degree in philosophy. Doesn’t make me Nietzsche.,rAlexanderAcosta,e9bjfji,conservative
"How will we pay for your proposed socialised healthcare coverage system?

""Just pay for it!""",Ledcookey,e9atq1p,conservative
"She does. And I think it's interesting how one can manage to get a degree in economics without learning the first thing about it.

This girl's a massive airhead, let's not pretend otherwise.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9by5h6,conservative
Which means absolutely nothing.,LeaderOfTheBeavers,e9at2yn,conservative
I thought you were being racist at first and then I remembered her only work experience is as a bartender.,-Shank-,e9aowp0,conservative
"So stupid he built a billion dollar empire across two of the most competitive industries in the world. So stupid that he's somehow the mastermind behind a plot with the Russians that three+ years of investigations using all the powers of the intelligence and law enforcement communities still can't unravel?

Trump is the biggest buffoon when you want him to be until you need him to be the smartest man alive. I really hope you stretch before your gymnastics.",ngoni,e9aq8bf,conservative
gtfo,feraxil,e9apbhi,conservative
She has a bachelors degree in economics,cf726,e9b0qkk,conservative
"Having lived in NYC for six years, I’m surprised  that more liberals there don’t drown when it rains. ",Tony_Cappuccino,e9azh78,conservative
"That as long as you have access to a pile of cash, 4-8 years, and a modicum of concentration, you can hang a piece of paper on your wall in a two dollar frame.",cafeRacr,e9awcid,conservative
Are you sure it wasn't Hump de Hump?,TooOldToTell,e9ak2z2,conservative
"If her actions mirror her speaches, then she's a joke. Fairly good chance they do...

Who knows, maybe she'll do a completely 180 and help reform and gut the broken programs like Social Security. Would also be nice to see permanent tax and spending reform too. A low flat tax for everyone sure would be great.",Ledcookey,e9atn6r,conservative
Nah we’re mighty amused. ,redditiswhatimon,e9b2mgq,conservative
Why are you hoping for that?,itsmenicholas,e9bl88f,conservative
Broly does not like to wait!!!,ConvolutedUsername,e9aleef,conservative
">Tfw hating poor people makes you economically literate

It makes you a Democrat, if nothing else. 

The left only cares if they can leverage your poverty to their advantage. Poor people from the Midwest are seen as nothing but backwards hicks who can drop dead for all they care.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9byfq8,conservative
"Tfw when those on the Left are STILL too stupid to come up with solutions for the country's problems outside of ""give politicians more power, they'll fix it this time for sure!"" ",Ledcookey,e9atw3h,conservative
"She's from NYC. For all we know, she could be referring to those butter knife collections at Walmart.",dicaparly,e9ajo50,conservative
All weapons are assault weapons.  Assault is what makes an object a weapon.,LordButtscratch,e9ar9lw,conservative
"Well, she not wrong.

When I was 17 I walked right in a bought baseball bats and hockey sticks.",SuperFunMonkey,e9anwwt,conservative
Literally any physical object?,sahuxley2,e9amu2g,conservative
"You should be really damn careful with propping up ""ridiculous"" people just to make the other side look stupid; this is precisely what Democrat's little puppets in the media did (as per ""Pied Piper strategy"" mentioned in leaked DNC memo), look where it got them.

Pelosi is nutty enough, and many people are tired of her. Someone slightly more stupid yet new is far more likely to garner better reactions.",Kryvakryz,e9akvax,conservative
"So, more of the same?

In all seriousness, though, remember when idiotic ""reality TV"" was something I could choose to ignore because it didn't mean anything?",shookie,e9akfvu,conservative
"It is one of those win-win situations. If we carefully parse GOP votes to split the vote equally between Ocasio-Cortez and Pelosi, it could set off a Democratic party civil war that would be the perfect way to begin the new Congress.",Lepew1,e9ampvc,conservative
">Can we call them racist for not voting for the minority?

It's the internet. Nothing is stopping you from having a ""crazy democrat"" alt.

*Rules for Radicals* can be a two way street. Just saying...",REEEorderTheThots,e9apjpb,conservative
It shows precisely what a scam American universities are today.,TheComedianGLP,e9awrei,conservative
"I'm not saying that she screwed her professors to get a degree. But I am open to the possibility that she *didn't*.

Edit: Hi, brigaders. Bring it.",Juxen,e9anzal,conservative
I think she's trying to imply that the numbers are artificially low because someone working two jobs counts twice.,MyLittleGrowRoom,e9b0hpi,conservative
"Disregard this.


Edit: Spelling

Edit 2: I misread the original comment",KLaParl,e9axrof,conservative
"That's not what she was saying, it's just a rationalization after the fact.

Someone working 2-3 part time jobs, enough to live off but not receive benefits is also a percentage of a percentage and would have no major impact on unemployment statistics.",regollyek,e9arg0c,conservative
"> Hell, I even know people IRL that met her and love her and it defies logic as to why.

It's because she's an attractive young woman.",an0nymous_bosch,e9b5iwc,conservative
"Same reason people like Trump, she's ""not a politician"". (The irony is strong...)",three18ti,e9aqu5w,conservative
Bigly,nkn_19,e9ateyl,conservative
I would love to see her live micced for her entire term.,neo1962,e9b9wv9,conservative
Have you met her? What if she's actually a good person? ,Midnight_arpeggio,e9beg4k,conservative
Campaign finance reform should be a bipartisan goal. Regulatory capture is a real issue.,StupidAmericanRednek,e9aqxpm,conservative
"Very true. I'm honestly almost to the point where I'd be okay with single-payer. Like, fuck it, it's never been free market and never will be anyways, next best thing is single-payer. Because this idiotic mandatory insurance-driven system benefits nobody (except of course the insurance companies).

Obamacare literally took an overpriced product and made it mandatory. It's an insurance company's wet dream. There was no ""healthcare"" reform, it was ""insurance"" reform. Didn't get to the root cause of expensive drugs. And if we're not going to address the expensive drugs, then it just needs to be single-payer.",BrewCrewKevin,e9as7gj,conservative
"My uncle lives in Italy.  Single payer, single provider.  Horrible wait times, no access to your primary care doctor unless it's an emergency.  If you have a chronic problem but it's not life threatening you'll wait months to see a doctor, and then months for an operation.  According to the WHO it's number 2 in the world.

The reason it's a lot cheaper is they vastly restrict access to it.  So yeah, no special interests except the biggest one, the state.",UEMcGill,e9b4lkw,conservative
"A lot cheaper*



*ignores economic opportunity costs",GonadusTwistus,e9aw9ml,conservative
"Some people *may* save money, and others like me will get hit with massive, debilitating tax increases.

I am self-employed and have excellent coverage thru my spouse.  We spend <2000/year for coverage, low co-pays, everything has been covered.  

Using Bernie's plan as a model, I would pay an additional ~8% payroll tax.  Let's say in an average year I have 50K of taxable income, my health care cost have now doubled for at best the same coverage, and more likely worse.   Maybe next year I work harder, have a better year and make 90k. Now my health care cost have almost doubled again even though nothing with regards to my health has changed.  

And to think that tax will only be or stay at 8% is a pipe dream.  CA voted down a plan that was funded with a 15% payroll tax and assumed the Feds would pick up half the cost.  It didn't pass because that wasn't enough funding.  Even if you could magically cut the health care cost in half, a 15% payroll tax wouldn't be enough.

",general--nuisance,e9avmg8,conservative
"The cost is not the point... The point is that she doesn't have an actual plan for how to get money to the government to pay the costs.

If I get a new landlord and they lower my rent by $500, I still need to know how to make out the check to the new landlord.",guitmusic12,e9aq9ro,conservative
"That is the answer she should have given. But she is incapable of formulating an intelligible response, let alone argue the finer points of reform.",EldragonFromSA,e9ars7i,conservative
Probably because either of those in a BS/BA degree aren't worth much.  They're extremely broad programs that are intended to set you up for graduate study where one would select a more specialized segment of the field.,velogeek,e9aogpy,conservative
How can you say that when her secretary has to pay more taxes than Bill Gates and Mark Zuckerberg combined?!! ,ClubmanAftershave,e9ap5kd,conservative
easy on the eyes tho,santooz,e9bl71i,conservative
"This is what Medicaid for disabled poor people is for, and I'd be upset if that went away. If you can't work because you're too sick and going to stay that way for a long time, it should kick in to cover those expenses. We don't need to provide free stuff to everyone just to cover the people who, through no fault of their own, are too sick or injured to work and can't pay for their own health care as a result.

There's also charity, which is especially well-positioned to cover illnesses that are curable in a fairly short amount of time and thus wouldn't fall under long-term disability. We should do more to encourage that.

>If you're the one with the insurance and your spouse gets sick, you're not stuck at that job, talk about managers having leverage over you. 

This is no different from everybody else who needs to keep their job because they can't get by without a paycheck for very long.",ZarahCobalt,e9bpq8z,conservative
The fact that our employer based system is irrecoverably fucked is the reason I am actually very open to single payer.,guitmusic12,e9b1v95,conservative
"But the question isn't ""how much will it cost"" the question is how is the money going to get to the government to pay for these services and who is going to be paying for it.",guitmusic12,e9ap7k2,conservative
Then the government should start a go fund me for those who want it-- and get their hands off my wallet.,GonadusTwistus,e9awdda,conservative
That's because you have to ration it for it to be universal and affordable. It's disingenuous to leave that part out.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9ashcs,conservative
"But how can we afford it? We spend about $10,000 per capita and Canada spends about $6,000. Can't afford it.",Robertooshka,e9apkhx,conservative
"Nothing going through the government is cheaper. Ever. Railroads were extremely profitable in the private sector- Amtrak loses money. UPS and FedEx provide a better/cheaper service - Post Office loses money. Hell, the Obamacare website cost $2bil. Let that sink in, $2billion for a website. 

Government is wasteful at its core. In a utopian world single payer is great and obstructive government won’t get in the way. However, with a large heterogeneous population its best to let the free market see the needs of the consumer and meet those needs. ",Ruckus45,e9apmtk,conservative
For a reason,pro_nosepicker,e9b0swx,conservative
"*Checks bank account*

Looks like I'll have to sit this round out...",CouldntBeMoreWhite,e9b4ucz,conservative
Those easy tickets are sought after; if you hope to run there expect a fight in the primary or earlier.,skilless,e9bq5xp,conservative
[deleted],,e9apxuw,conservative
[removed],,e9b34jt,conservative
"I just realized I lived in the middle of her district for a while. I can tell you it wasn't apathy, it was stupidity and socialist indoctrination in the public schools there. This is what they have planned for the rest of the country, brainless puppets in government who work to keep the people ignorant and poor and the elite in power. 

Drain the swamp!",MyLittleGrowRoom,e9b13hq,conservative
"What's the point of this site if it's not putting out real quotes? All I see coming from this is uninformed people taking it* seriously, and then using them as talking points.

Edit: Forgot a word.",bossfoundmyacct,e9au8o3,conservative
">'Um, we need to change our strategy and if someone can purchase an assault weapon that's a form of assault. I mean, it's in the name.'

***HOLY S H I T***

Not a real quote",Szarkan-,e9akp8i,conservative
Omg this is gold. It's like r/chapostraphouse generator.,Manchu_Fist,e9amv1s,conservative
Lol this is incredible,crashohno,e9akkvd,conservative
"Economics and international relations, which is worse. She knows nothing/wrong things about both subjects. ",skarface6,e9b42wq,conservative
True but if you graduate with a degree from Boston University you expect them to be able to do math,Nanteen666,e9aoaa3,conservative
I think it's up to some conservatives to sacrifice themselves and become High School teachers and college professors instead of going off and making lots of money,Nanteen666,e9auwlu,conservative
Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez won in a primary against Joe Crowley in a district that is 49.8% Hispanic. I don’t think this was ‘out with the old’.,superAL1394,e9apjl7,conservative
"except that simply isn't true, the youngest millenials were born in 1995, meaning they were joining the work force at least as teenagers by around 2010 at the latest. That was the heart of the last recession and many teenagers that age could not even find jobs because of all the people who had lost jobs and had to take those minimum wage jobs that would usually be filled by teenagers.",slopezski,e9ank4y,conservative
Fortunately she's too young to run in 2020 and can't be VP either.,ZarahCobalt,e9bpyac,conservative
Unlike those 80 year olds who are super eager to challenge the status quo. ,Roonerth,e9avd4a,conservative
"Imagine looking into those crazy eyes while pumping her spicy cock sock.

Bet it looks like a thatched cottage down there!",Manchu_Fist,e9andtl,conservative
Summer's eve that ish,zwiebelsaft,e9ayawp,conservative
"> Actually it's cheaper than what we currently have, and would prevent the deaths and bankruptcy of Americans. Do your research. 

lol, I did.  Maybe you went to the same class Cortez did for her economics degree?

[Medicare for all would be the costliest initiative, coming in at about $32 trillion, according to the Mercatus Center, a free market-oriented think tank at George Mason University, as well as an earlier study by the Urban Institute's Health Policy Center.](https://www.cnn.com/2018/09/16/politics/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-40-trillion-cnntv/index.html)

Oh, and how would we pay for a $32,000,000,000,000.00 (that's 32 TRILLION btw) program?  To quote Cortez, ""You just **PAY** for it!""  

Brilliant.  You Socialists are incredibly stupid; there is just no kind way to say it
",Jizzlobber42,e9ayvx9,conservative
"Haha, I feel like an elder some days. Just went to the chiropractor yesterday to fix that :P",Tiller9,e9aqlgp,conservative
Haven't you watched the news in the past year? I can identify as a potato if I want.,Tiller9,e9be8so,conservative
"This is because school systems are hugely biased toward the left. Go on any college campus in the United States. It's LOADED with crazy left wing children. Say something offensive? They want you fired, beaten, thrown in prison, and given the death penalty. And you didn't even say something offensive, just stated a fact that they disagreed with.",Dioroxic,e9an60p,conservative
"Are we outnumbered? Or just vocally out voiced? I work with plenty of ""Millenials"" they are all hard working and innovative. But maybe thats why they are employed and not yelling. ",ghostanddarkness,e9almnl,conservative
"Agreed. I started to hear about it toward the end of my college years (around 2011-2012). 

Now I get to hear about how lazy I am and all I do is cry when I don't get my way. I'm just like, bitch, don't assume my generation; thats generationalism and it triggers me. /s",Tiller9,e9alhhq,conservative
"I try to be. I'm from the midwest, and it seems that millennials around here are wayyyy different than the ones on the coast. When I see coasties on tv it's like watching another planet.",Tiller9,e9ak3kj,conservative
"I'm all for immigrants. I just want them to do it legally and pay taxes. I'm happy to hear you are for the wall. It makes sense if you or your parents came here legally that you wouldn't want all the illegals giving you a bad reputation. Illegals take away from the what you and so many others had to go through in order to become a citizen. 

Contrary to the liberal media's belief, wanting immigration enforcement does not make you a racist. I don't let illegal immigrants coming from Mexico dictate how I view Hispanics. In my experience, Hispanics are hard workers with a strong family bond. Also, authentic Mexican food is my absolute favorite :)",Tiller9,e9aqclg,conservative
"Delgado is trying to pretend he's a moderate man of the people. His short lived music career with sexist, anti-establishment and racist comments paint a decidedly different picture. As they say, art reflects the man.",JFGFNY,e9bc3vf,conservative
"It's slim picking for quality candidates - just look at the many corrupt politicians in NYS who've been forced out of office and into jail cells! It's sad but true and likely the reason that more and more are leaving NYS. At the base level, this state is not friendly to business and overly solicitous of the welfare state.",JFGFNY,e9bceb3,conservative
How fucking gullible are you lot ,Roonerth,e9aw3hh,conservative
"i wouldn't doubt it, i got it from another sub",alc59,e9aw15j,conservative
Of course it’s not a real quote you dumb dumb. This is the Internet. ,eliphaz,e9aw2ie,conservative
Legal weed and ending the wars?,son-ofSalmon,e9big0k,conservative
it means i have reason to believe she isnt actually economically illiterate,VermiciousKnidzz,e9atw88,conservative
[Do you have a degree in economics?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fMa-_fd0E0Q) ,cafeRacr,e9avz8c,conservative
"Come on! If anything he's sexist! If he were racist, would he want a Mexican touching his drink? Use your head. ",pianoman1456,e9as41x,conservative
[removed],,e9awfgq,conservative
"Wow the irony. Nowadays professors are straight lying to students, so I’m not surprised ",GainsGutsGlory,e9bc07u,conservative
"Insane In The Membrane!

Insane In The Brain!",GreekLogic,e9b1f2k,conservative
"Maybe. Time will tell. I gave Trump a chance, I'll give her one too.",Nevaknosbest,e9au79i,conservative
It would be funny and I'd have a good hate fap ,MAGAsquad,e9bmy6h,conservative
Literally never said anything about giving politicians more power but okay bud,warmPBR,e9aus5b,conservative
I thought NYCs assault weapons were 32oz sodas,ClosetConservative45,e9aqvks,conservative
"NYC is ridiculous. [You seen the John Stossel report on gun carry permits?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1Mi-LXipDo8) The system exists to deter people from getting guns. They make it ridiculous, hard, and reject you unless you know the right person.",Dioroxic,e9akylq,conservative
"She's basically the kid from the Apple commercial who asks ""What's a computer?""",AddictedToGlue,e9aud3x,conservative
Shes probably going to start advocating we cut our arms off so we can’t use ours hands as assault weapons,Supringsinglyawesome,e9bcwxm,conservative
ORANGE MAN BAD,TheComedianGLP,e9awi2a,conservative
"Lol, never thought about that",Austen98,e9aw6pj,conservative
"Assault is a physical attack only. ""Weapon"" has a broad enough definition that it can include non-physical things such as emotional attacks or ideas.

A more correct statement would be ""All weapons that cause physical harm are assault weapons"".",rationalinquisition,e9b4wox,conservative
I've got an assault stick and I know how to use it!,SaiHottari,e9b1f61,conservative
"My comment was strictly in jest. I'd never actually want that to happen. You're right, Pelosi will self destruct on her own.",Kemaro,e9alxee,conservative
Pelosi was president or some such bs at my uni. Part of her master plan was vastly increasing admissions across already housing shortage facing campuses. If she can't manage a university what is she doing speaking for the house. I'm just glad she's never ran for potus. ,justathrowawayte,e9apzst,conservative
Take me back to those days!,Kemaro,e9akhjy,conservative
If only they’d have a transgender person running for house leadership... but it would have to be a male. Then we could have the victim olympics in full swing. Democrats’ heads would explode from intersectional confusion.,FarsideSC,e9an1cg,conservative
I don’t need a Democrat alt to make fun of them :),FarsideSC,e9aqefp,conservative
In what way are you referring to in this case? ,fishet,e9axjjt,conservative
"I mean, let's be honest... Would.",mnslice,e9ava53,conservative
[removed],,e9b0kry,conservative
"I said the exact opposite of what you're saying I did. 

> Part time employment counts for unemployment statistics, so individuals working ... part time jobs are considered employed",kingbirdy,e9aywud,conservative
"[27 million Americans work part time jobs](https://tradingeconomics.com/united-states/part-time-employment), or about 8% of the population. I'm unable to find statistics on exactly what percentage of part-time work offers benefits, but it's uncommon, and certainly less than 7/8ths, meaning some >1% of Americans (millions of people) work part time without benefits, not ""a percentage of a percentage"". And it's not rationalizing after the fact because that's what I understood her point to be right away. ",kingbirdy,e9aspny,conservative
Eh I couldn’t get past those crazy eyes she has,Mswizzle23,e9b8jic,conservative
I've never seen a picture of her without her mouth open to the fullest. It's weird. Not a single normal picture.,corectlyspelled,e9bg4vk,conservative
"I'd argue Trump know's what he's doing at least sometimes. 

She's the most economically illiterate person we'll have in office, and she somehow has an econ degree.",regollyek,e9arioh,conservative
"Are you comparing a billionaire's economic sense to that of ms ocasio-pinto-santa marie-cortez, who when asked where the money for a socialist economy comes from, responded with ""its a puzzling situation""......",schneiderct,e9c0o91,conservative
"You know, I have not. I would assume she's nice in person. Most of these people tend to be when you're being civil. But I'm very distrustful of her based on her platform and how she's lied about just little things like her background and stuff and how she's pandering to a populist movement that centers on wealth redistribution and pitting groups against one another. I'll say though, based on her interviews, I think she was just surrounded by this crap like I was in college and she literally doesn't know any better, she sounds like most redditors. They want this stuff because it sounds nice and simple but the reality is obviously much more nuanced and complex. The cynic in me thinks perhaps otherwise though and she just wants power. Who knows. ",Mswizzle23,e9bhqgw,conservative
Not just expensive drugs but medical care in general. Hospitals charging hundreds of dollars for aspirin?,Legendary_Hypocrite,e9asily,conservative
"One of the problems is insurance itself.   It has for years hidden the cost of health care.    You pay monthly and your employer pays half so you don't' really feel the cost (until recent years).   This has allowed the costs to creep up and has encourages high cost solutions rather than affordable solutions.     (Much like student loans and education.)   This isn't the only reason but it's a big one.    


Now, however, insurance is ingrained in the system as well as high cost solutions so I'm not really sure where things go from here.     I'm not sure there is anyway to avoid a one payer system at this point.    Those in the lowest income brackets are covered by medicare/medicaid, and they wouldn't be contributing to a single payer system anyway.       


And I'm a staunch social conservative.   ",alforddm,e9b4vq3,conservative
"Single payer hurts physician's income, in a country that has a physician shortage im not too sure it would work well. And thats coming from someone who thinks single payer has worked really well for many countries and would really help small businesses if it replaced the ACA.",TanManGaming,e9ax3hs,conservative
Or we could just push for truly free market healthcare and get rid of the mountains of red tape regulation. Competition in the marketplace is always best for the consumer.,xxsolojxx,e9ay6g8,conservative
"Look man. Any system works on paper. We have to pick the one that works the best in the real world.

And the real world says that big pharma is a cartel supported by the government. It's the opposite of a free market. 

I'm all for economic opportunity, but David and Goliath is a myth. You can't just invent a new medication... or get into the game and open up a new pharma company. It's a protected industry. There is no real ""opportunity."" 

So we work with what we have. And to be honest, it kind of looks like the only way to fight a giant like that is bipartisan campaign finance reform and a whole rewrite of how laws are made in this country (again, not actually going to happen), or single payer.

So single payer it is.",sloth788,e9b1c60,conservative
[removed],,e9atf6l,conservative
"As an Econ grad myself, I would agree 100%. Regardless of how broad it is, I would still think 4 years of BU professors telling you about economics and/or the history of economic thought would be sufficient to allow you to explain arguably the most basic economic concept of unemployment. 

I mean I’m 24, my career has absolutely nothing to do with economics and I still remember that things cost money.",HingleMcCringlebarr,e9arx97,conservative
Did she say that?,HingleMcCringlebarr,e9ary3u,conservative
"she's got the crazy eyes though! How do people not see it? She talks about economic theory or foreign policy and I see a lady who wants to slash tires. Attractive, sure, but much more crazy",greatatdrinking,e9blmnw,conservative
"Yeah, same. My employer healthcare costs almost twice as much and the coverage is a little worse than what I had through Obamacare two years ago. ",AragornsMassiveCock,e9ba1a6,conservative
It could probably be modelled on how it works successfully in every modern industrialised nation.,renjo689,e9aphaj,conservative
"Instead of individuals and companies paying X annually in healthcare premiums, everyone pays . 75X or whatever it ends up being in additional taxes",kingbirdy,e9aqivq,conservative
"This is the major sticking point.  I might be able agree to something like it but it needs the following:

A)medical salaries rolled back and capped on doctors/nurses/high paying positions

B)Cost of service needs to be outlined and negotiated in a contract.  No surprises.

C)Cost of Drugs needs to be outlined and negotiated

I'm sure there are plenty of other things but that is off the top of my head.  Basically the gov't would have to put the screws to the medical industry to make it worth it.  I know they wouldn't and there would be big increases every year which is reason enough for it not to happen.",Anklebender91,e9atgyo,conservative
Does that logic apply to military spending?,renjo689,e9b1h08,conservative
"It's rationed right now.

If you don't have the money to pay for it, you die.

It is rationed by money currently.",meatspace,e9b8v5k,conservative
Perhaps people are unwilling to trust more of the economy (and their own well being) to the government considering how terribly the federal government manages what they already control. I’d rather spend what I do now and have the quality of care I have now than pay 60% of what I do now and have the quality of care people with average coverage have now. ,rwwman50,e9axnvb,conservative
"Private passenger rail made money when rail was the best transportation option, Amtrak was formed after that era ended and loses money because it's cheaper and quicker to take a plane for anywhere outside the Northeast Corridor. There's no possible way Amtrak would be profitable unless the US shut down air travel, but the government decided forming Amtrak to keep passenger rail available was better than letting it die out completely. It's a disingenuous argument to use Amtrak as an example of government mismanagement, because the options aren't ""Amtrak or competitive nationwide private passenger rail market"", it's ""Amtrak or a Northeast Corridor railroad and nothing else""",kingbirdy,e9ar8rn,conservative
what can I get for $3.50? ,DenSem,e9bbexy,conservative
"Silly goose.  You're not spending *your own money.*  Just recite the correct talking points in public, and people will *give you* money to run.  You should also write a self-serving autobiography (don't worry--nobody will fact-check it) and do an AMA on Reddit to promote it. ",LonelyMachines,e9blj1v,conservative
"Trump isn't well spoken, but he is smart and hard working.  ",PerceivedShift,e9b6yce,conservative
"You’re not wrong, but the voter turnout wasn’t very high, so the motivated minority looking to push a more progressive agenda were at an advantage. Republicans should aim to unseat her in 2020 to make a statement.",art36,e9b1js4,conservative
"That's 100% what the creator of the site is hoping for I would imagine. Pretty disingenuous and scummy if you ask me. If her quotes are as bullshit as they say it is, put her actual quotes. Not made up shit. ",Roonerth,e9av18d,conservative
That cannot be real. Tell me it's real. ,VirginWizard69,e9amasj,conservative
"It's progressive math, don't be so closed minded! /s",nyran20,e9armcv,conservative
[The average Boston University professor earns >200k p.a.](https://dailyfreepress.com/blog/2014/04/09/average-bu-full-professor-compensated-210700/) I know a lot of conservatives who would be happy to make half that.,Red_of_Head,e9c606p,conservative
"That's true for middle/high school teacher positions, not so much for the uni professors - plenty conservatives would gladly take that job if academia wasn't an extremely hostile environment to them. There are sites like campus reform or college fix created with the purpose of documenting the leftist insanity in academia.

Conservatives do need to stop looking down on public schools and early education teachers though. Not everyone wants to or can be a uni prof, people who want to live a peaceful normal life should be encouraged by conse vatives to pursue work in the field anyways. Too bad so many on the right focus on homeschooling so much, it's basically capitulation.",Kryvakryz,e9cmnfu,conservative
"I think it was much more that than race. If anything, age was probably a bigger factor than race",TurnDownYourRadio,e9aqgcb,conservative
"I, too, make generalizations based on a single demographic data point and the name of a political candidate.

Oh wait, no I don't, because that's asinine.",Dinkleberg_IRL,e9asgri,conservative
"It is true, AOC was born in 1989, the last recession ended in 2009, she was therefore 20 at that time. From 2007-2011 she was a full time student at BU. Full time students who are not seeking employment are [not part of the labor force](https://www.bls.gov/cps/cps_htgm.htm#nilf).
",senatorpjt,e9b4v5n,conservative
Millennials start at 1981ish.  You're thinking of whatever came after them,Richard_Stonee,e9at57v,conservative
"Not only was that not the “heart” of the recession but it is officially considered to have ended by June of 2009. I think lumping 15 and 16 year olds with the rest of the “work force “ is misleading anyway.  A huge number, probably even a majority, aren’t even looking for jobs and those who do aren’t trying to run households or attain health care in most cases.  Mostly dependents looking for some extra cash.  
Older millennials might be a different story.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9b266p,conservative
"yeah but i believe she’ll get her 8 years when the time comes. she’s beautiful, she’s young, she’s more progressive than hillary, democrats love her, she’s from NY. i think this girl is gonna be a political powerhouse ",anon2777,e9bqdpq,conservative
r/BrandNewSentence,peeves91,e9ao50o,conservative
"But if I get her preggers, the patriarchy wins.",VirginWizard69,e9anhw7,conservative
"Do you know how much it currently costs? Because the cost that YOUR source quotes is still 2 TRILLION LESS THAN WHAT WE CURRENTLY PAY FOR HEALTHCARE. AND THAT LESSER FIGURE INCLUDES EVERY SINGLE AMERICAN BEING COVERED. So basically what you're saying is, you'd rather pay more for less. You'd rather get ripped off.


https://www.axios.com/single-payer-health-care-united-states-cost-bernie-sanders-34b74049-9a61-4b77-a495-62711073c639.html",Roonerth,e9b4cz6,conservative
Good can I identify as a retired person and collect my pension and SS. ,dagenought,e9d12ii,conservative
"I dunno, i graduated undergrad in 2010 and my college was pretty conservative. Republican club was huge and College Dems couldnt run from year to year for lack of members. Granted i havent been back so i dont know if things have changed",beachmedic23,e9aoslj,conservative
Vocally out-voiced is a very polite way of saying that they throw more tantrums.,Tiller9,e9aqs67,conservative
"Yea I would definitely say conservative millenials are outnumbered. And we are also shouted down by our sensitive tantrum throwing peers. And most of us work for a living so we can't show up on a weekday to march around the street in our purple strap on's and vagina hats or whatever, protesting whatever nebulous idea offended our delicate feelings most recently. ",zilla0100,e9av2j1,conservative
I've lived in central California my whole life. People two hours away from seem like they're from a different planet.,prometheud,e9alg9j,conservative
Came here legally?  My family has been in America for over a century 😂,whineybubbles,e9ca4bp,conservative
As opposed to grab them by the pussy?,morris1022,e9bdumm,conservative
"Not sure a weed tax and ending our involvement in the ME would cover the cost. But both are great ideas. 

Edit: I should also say that the individual States should decide on forming their own State run HC insurance. A singular one run by the centeral gov. would be a no no ",Ledcookey,e9bojqi,conservative
👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾,itsmenicholas,e9blcp7,conservative
[It doesn’t really matter whether *I* have a degree in Econ or not. ](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Argument_from_authority) ,LeaderOfTheBeavers,e9ax63b,conservative
"Sure don't let your lying eyes deceive you- all those skyscrapers and other properties are just figments of our imagination. And he didn't have the most popular show on TV either right?

Get out of your bubble and experience the real world. It's not nearly as bad as you've been led to believe.",ngoni,e9axbfh,conservative
That’s a great response. I wish everyone success. Why would people want them to fail? ,itsmenicholas,e9blayq,conservative
Sad,itsmenicholas,e9bmzeh,conservative
"None of you ever do. You just believe the policies you advocate for somehow dont result in that lmao... this is a big reason why many Conservatives look at the Left as idiots.

Not bad people (unless we're talking about things like Antifa), but very useful idiots. ",Ledcookey,e9avrxk,conservative
I'm writing that down. Brilliant,Alfa_Alesi,e9bejvt,conservative
"good, as someone who lived in nyc for 3 years, no one wants guns there, pistol or assualt rifles, no one. If you walked by 100,000 people every day, youd be happier knowing it was extremely hard for them to get a pistol or assualt rifle, you just would....

if you like in north dakota, feel free man, you should still have a background check and record keeping of said guns, but i get it, all alone, bears stalking ya or some shit, have a gun.

",brucebanner34,e9ao063,conservative
"Whoa! She doesn't know how to use a computer??

WOW!",meatspace,e9b8hxt,conservative
Reeeeeeeeee,TomahawkSuppository,e9ba0pp,conservative
"Assault. At Common Law, an intentional act by one person that creates an apprehension in another of an imminent harmful or offensive contact. An assault is carried out by a threat of bodily harm coupled with an apparent, present ability to cause the harm.

It's called assault & battery when there is physical contact.",JustAnotherJon,e9cfp9e,conservative
"I was once taught how to make defensive weapons out of pens, pencils, and keys.    ",alforddm,e9b3xby,conservative
Link? Just want to read her plan for some laughs.,HighLatencyRaptor,e9ayuz0,conservative
"What happens if a black biological female identifies as a transgender white male? Do you burn the witch, or do you empathize with its plight? Sometimes this stuff gets confusing.",Lepew1,e9aoefk,conservative
A national TERF war would be amazing. ,ElbowWhisper,e9aon9f,conservative
"Ocasia-Cortez has an economics degree from Boston University.

She is quite literally economically illiterate.

&#x200B;

[https://www.nationalreview.com/2018/07/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-economics-major-ignorant-of-basic-facts/](https://www.nationalreview.com/2018/07/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-economics-major-ignorant-of-basic-facts/)",TheComedianGLP,e9b1sik,conservative
"> she certainly knows this as an economics major

That's the point, she's an idiot and no amount of education is going to fix that. This isn't the first idiotic thing she's said about something she's supposed to be educated about. It's also a statement on the quality of our education system. I'd love to see the grades she got. ",MyLittleGrowRoom,e9b1xtt,conservative
Ah I apologize I misread you.,KLaParl,e9azhmi,conservative
"How many of those are stay at home moms?

How many of those are high school kids?

How many are college kids working summer jobs?

How many of those are in the service industry?

How many are retired folks just looking for extra income or something to do during the day?

Numbers by themselves don't mean much. Context is always key.",Sideswipe0009,e9b89jw,conservative
"How many do so by choice, and don't care about benefits?",13speed,e9b4sqc,conservative
Some people like that ¯\\_(ツ)_/¯,an0nymous_bosch,e9b8mzw,conservative
"> she somehow has an econ degree.

Maybe you're the economically illiterate one?

Or, maybe you're disagreeing based on differing views on what function a government should serve, and neither are economically illiterate?",notshitaltsays,e9b5tkw,conservative
"These issues, like many in the political system, are extremely complex and cannot be fixed with a single silver bullet. Twitter politicians can’t seem to understand this. ",Yung_Money_Yung,e9b5iov,conservative
"The real world is driven by supply and demand, which universal healthcare circumvents with government force.",GonadusTwistus,e9b26hk,conservative
That’s a hard pass then. I’d rather pay a company more and have the ability to leave the company if it displeases me than pay taxes and get whatever some government spreadsheet says I get.,rwwman50,e9axvw6,conservative
"I had this conversation the other day with a buddy who is also an Econ major, I minored in Econ and find the subject interesting, read about it, podcasts, etc. I’m not sure how someone could possibly complete a degree in economics and be so completely unable to discuss or explain ANY economic concept. It must be willful ignorance, there’s no other explanation. What she learned didn’t line up with her utopian delusion, so it was quickly forgotten. ",Tony_Cappuccino,e9axni5,conservative
Do you honestly think that she isn't aware that single payer would cost money?,here-come-the-bombs,e9b9u5w,conservative
"It's a riff on a quote from Warren Buffet, that his secretary pays more taxes than he does.

But that's because income tax on investments are lower than income tax on earned wages.",spookyghoststuff,e9asfrt,conservative
Which country with universal healthcare has 300+ million people in it?,AppleCirocMajorKey,e9b72jm,conservative
"Then she should say that as her answer to the question instead of ""you just pay for it""",guitmusic12,e9apk2d,conservative
"What other countries that ""successfully"" manage universal healthcare have 350,000,000 people spread across millions of square miles? Which ones do their own research and development and don't rely on us for it? Which ones defend the entire western world like we do? Which ones send hundreds of billions of dollars in aid to countless countries every year?",deathwheel,e9b8gqx,conservative
"""Successful""",PilotTim,e9b935i,conservative
You should call her up and ask to be on her staff. You clearly have thought this through more than she has.,guitmusic12,e9aqv6p,conservative
It applies to all of government spending,GonadusTwistus,e9b222m,conservative
Yea that’s why the United States had the highest survival rates for cancer.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9bp3b9,conservative
"Can I be unwilling to trust my wellbeing to corporations? They can be pretty incompetent.

I have seen a lot of polls that Medicare for all polls at about 70% and is even above 50% for republicans. People want it.

What I find frustrating is people fearing the taxes for it. Do you understand that healthcare insurance is a part of your salary? What is the difference between paying more taxes and paying for insurance. Medicare is insurance.",Robertooshka,e9b2ty8,conservative
So you’re going to just ignore everything else and only focus on Amtrak?,Ruckus45,e9as0uo,conservative
"you can be as much an US Senator as Beta O'Rourke and for $69,999,996.50 less.

So not bad!",osamanobama,e9buxpx,conservative
"Sometimes I wonder if I should study up on some things and run for office in about 10 years. Something smaller at first. It depends on where I end up with my career and whether or not I'm able to build a family, I guess, but if the first goes moderately well and the second bombs, it's possible. I wouldn't give up a great career or family for it, though.",ZarahCobalt,e9bpde9,conservative
"It’s not, it’s written right on the bottom of the site that it’s randomly generating sentences.",Quazman,e9an24e,conservative
"It's probably real.  Not because she's a socialist but because that's the average level of intelligence on the Left when it comes to guns.  I'll never forget years ago watching a Colorado legislator insist that magazines were ammunition and were literally fired out of the gun's barrel, and when all the magazines were shot there would be no more evil 'high-cap' magazines.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9aq3mw,conservative
"3 > 5 
3 identifies as greater than five so it is, stop attacking it.
Do you think this is usable as a thesis for my PhD?",Wedgehead84,e9avudg,conservative
"Race, age, ect.  Absolutely nothing to do with how good the candidate actually is.",Anklebender91,e9atlcy,conservative
"The point that was made though was that Millenials have not worked through a recession, not her specifically.",slopezski,e9b6do1,conservative
"I was saying the youngest millennials, the youngest were 95. Gen z is after them ",slopezski,e9av827,conservative
"If you look at many businesses the recession did not end for them and they didnt recover to pre recession levels until 2012-13. Even if you want to use those numbers though the majority of Millennials were already a part of the work force, even if you do not think it can contain teenagers who are working as well. Again as I said before the ones born in 95 were THE YOUNGEST. The older Millennials were already pushing 30 by 2008. ",slopezski,e9b3gyb,conservative
"I think she's either going to crash and burn quickly, or get some stern lessons from others in her party and start acting more intelligent. The second one is the danger, because then she might be competitive outside the bluest of blue districts. There's little chance of going for door #3 and actually becoming moderate instead of just toning down the worst of it so moderates don't run away screaming.",ZarahCobalt,e9brung,conservative
"Socialism wins. 

Seize the means of reproduction!",Manchu_Fist,e9anmts,conservative
"So, if you spend long enough paying attention to Government Cost Projections, (hell anyone's cost projections) you would notice a reoccurring theme; **THEY ARE NEVER CORRECT.**  Take the ACA for example; Better coverage, cheaper coverage, and as an added bonus.... if you like your Doctor, you can *keep* your doctor.  Remember that?  Do you know how much of that ended up being true?  ""The Individual Mandate isn't a tax!""  Remember that?  Do you recall the end result?  Cost projections, cute, optimistic, not tethered to reality.
 
You take on faith that *this time* the projections are accurate.  Never before, but surely *this time it will work!*  Just like ever Socialist ever.

> •Mercatus assumes that Sanders' new federally run program **would only pay doctors and hospitals Medicare rates** (as his plan calls for). 

If you *honestly* believe that Doctors and Hospitals getting paid *the bare minimum* to function is (A.) a good idea and (B.) won't run into an any problems with quality of care, which will then have to be offset by (C.) **more money** then you haven't been paying attention to how Government works.  The projections of cost are wrong, as normal, because it runs counter to Human Nature and reality in general. 

TLDR; Socialist rallying cry; ""*This* time it will work guys!"" ^/s",Jizzlobber42,e9bfko2,conservative
"Now we're thinkin'! I can't imagine why not. If you scream about it loud enough for long enough, they have to give it to you, right?",Tiller9,e9d2wsm,conservative
Lucky you. Sounds like you picked the right college. Pun intended.,Tiller9,e9aqgud,conservative
"Haha, whoops. Sorry for assuming. My mind just heard Hispanic and wall and jumped to that connection I guess.",Tiller9,e9cw98r,conservative
"Guessing you're a lib lurking? No problem. The issue being considered is a far left radical new rep for NY-19 who is putting himself out there as a moderate. He's not, but he's fooled a lot of folks.",JFGFNY,e9brwgr,conservative
Le antifa bogieman lmao,warmPBR,e9awvxc,conservative
"I’ve lived here all my life. I want to be able to conceal carry. Most of the people in my family want to conceal carry. 

Taking guns from people is unconstitutional and symptomatic of nanny state government. “You can’t have a gun because you’ll probably shoot someone.”
If I commit a crime, that crime is on me - not my weapon of choice. 

To use this logic to ensure that every citizen in NYC has his second amendment abrogated is frightening. Quite frankly, I would love to see a legitimate challenge to NY’s gun laws in the SC. 

The answer to society’s ills is never “curb people’s rights.”",_TheConsumer_,e9aso6d,conservative
"I can guarantee you that you unknowingly walked by more than one person carrying a firearm this morning.

They may or may not be doing so legally, they may or may not be a criminal.

You are deluding yourself thinking otherwise.",13speed,e9b30h3,conservative
"Everyone you don't want to carry a gun is going to carry a gun regardless of whatever laws you have in place.  
  
The question is if you want to be able to carry a gun to defend yourself from those people.",FelixFuckfurter,e9b9t3m,conservative
"Considering humans are much more dangerous than bears, I'd rather have a concealed carry in NYC than open carry in North Dakota wilderness.",lazerpantherr,e9aqljs,conservative
"At least have the decency to keep your metropolitan gun grabbing to yourselves.... but you can't because it doesn't work unless you can strip us all of our gun rights (that won't work either but that's another post), ever pressing on the state/federal legislature, fleeing CA to places like AZ and TX and bringing your inner city politics with you.",hiighCalibre,e9ar55f,conservative
"Ya, better for a 5’2” 100 lb woman get raped by some 200lb 6’1 man, than carry a gun to at least *try* to protect herself ",Dranosh,e9aotuw,conservative
There is no such thing as an “assault rifle.” That term was created by anti-gun advocates back in the 80’w. AR-15’s are semi-automatic weapons owned by millions of law abiding Americans. My 30 ott six is more powerful than these so-called “assault weapons” and it’s a hunting rifle.,NightFreak87,e9ap354,conservative
"No one wants guns...except the gangs and other criminals, I’m sure. ",skarface6,e9b3tf7,conservative
"The legal definition would not be at play in the context of the term ""assault weapon"". 

If you follow your train of thought to its logical conclusion, you would have to call a weapon used to actually harm someone an ""assault & battery weapon"". ",rationalinquisition,e9d1azj,conservative
A fookeeng peeencil,DerechoSCK,e9cehu1,conservative
Oh fuck me. Looked into it and realized I mistook Janet Napolitano for Nancy pelosi. Pelosi gave us a visit (during which all roads were shut down... That was her way of showing how in touch with the kids she was I suppose) and I've thought she was the president ever since. ,justathrowawayte,e9b2wam,conservative
"Again, it sounds like you're deliberately choosing the worst possible explanation for her comments rather than what makes sense in context",kingbirdy,e9b325r,conservative
"It happens, thanks for admitting it",kingbirdy,e9b2cxd,conservative
"I have retrieved these for you _ _
 *** 
^^&#32;To&#32;prevent&#32;anymore&#32;lost&#32;limbs&#32;throughout&#32;Reddit,&#32;correctly&#32;escape&#32;the&#32;arms&#32;and&#32;shoulders&#32;by&#32;typing&#32;the&#32;shrug&#32;as&#32;`¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯`&#32;or&#32;`¯\\\_(ツ)\_/¯`

 [^^Click&#32;here&#32;to&#32;see&#32;why&#32;this&#32;is&#32;necessary](https://np.reddit.com/r/OutOfTheLoop/comments/3fbrg3/is_there_a_reason_why_the_arm_is_always_missing/ctn5gbf/)",LimbRetrieval-Bot,e9b8ns7,conservative
"Or maybe she can't answer questions like ""how are we going to pay for that?"". Trump might give an answer that you disagree with but he gives answers.  Her answers are along the line of ""you just pay for it"".  She's ignorant in the truest sense.
",tehForce,e9c3db0,conservative
"S&P is a very simplistic model which doesn't take into account a LOT of issues... economies are more complicated than you were taught in 10th grade. 

Part of the government's job is to protect from those complications... one of which big pharma (a cartel) is a part of. The problem is that they have the govt on their side because they have enough money to do whatever they want.",sloth788,e9b7wkp,conservative
"> whatever some government spreadsheet says I get

The ""government spreadsheet"" would say you get full healthcare. Universal healthcare covers everything, you won't show up at the hospital and be told ""oh your arm isn't broken enough for us to cover it, go away"".",kingbirdy,e9azcuk,conservative
" No I don’t honestly think that, I was exaggerating   to convey the notion that she has a terrible understanding economics.",HingleMcCringlebarr,e9bapuu,conservative
Economies of scale would suggest that this would only bring prices down.,renjo689,e9b871x,conservative
"Hold on...

""You just pay for it"" is how we're building the wall.

isn't that the same thing as ""you just pay for it"" ?

I'm confused.

We just pay for the wall, by just paying for it. but healthcare, we just pay for it and we can't just pay for it because it costs more to cost less and can't just pay pay.

If it costs less no one can pay for it because it costs less and it has to cost more because the way it costs less is to destroy America?

Am I understanding?",meatspace,e9b8r69,conservative
"Who are you defending the ""western world"" from?

&#x200B;

And pretty much all  ""western countries"" send aid to ""countless countries"", they even do it every year.",Dertien1214,e9bbiu6,conservative
"I think you're just taking her comments in bad faith. If there's a question of ""how will the government pay for something"", the answer is always taxes and that shouldn't need to be spelled out. ",kingbirdy,e9atcw7,conservative
"...maybe she took that answer as an opportunity to make the point that it would cost less than the current system, rather than use that time to spell out in detail the intricacies of single-payer healthcare and how nations pay for such programs? Just a thought.",Dinkleberg_IRL,e9as90f,conservative
"What does that have to do with healthcare rationing?

It's rationed by money.

I understand you've chosen a specific data point regarding our success in healthcare. Certainly the healthcare system consists of many many data points which are equally as relevant as the one you've offered.

Many reports and studies show our healthcare outcomes are lower than other countries. It may only be non cancer related outcomes. There are many many non cancer healthcare things.

Healthcare is rationed in the United States. There are financial death panels. Unless I pay, I die. It's rationed.",meatspace,e9bu8tq,conservative
Who cares if people want it? 70-80% of people routinely support laws outlawing things already illegal. The difference between paying insurance is that if BCBS sucks I can just switch to Aetna or another provider. If the government is the only insurer and I’m unhappy with it my only option is to deal.,rwwman50,e9b8w17,conservative
"You said ""nothing is cheaper. Ever."" and listed Amtrak as a supporting example - I disproved your Amtrak example because rail would be more expensive or non existent without the government's intervention, therefore your premise is wrong. I think you're wrong on the post office point too but there's only so much research I'm willing to do, and besides the burden of proof for your claims is on you anyway. ",kingbirdy,e9at6uc,conservative
"Politics can be a career.

(And that's the problem.)",LonelyMachines,e9bqdij,conservative
"Oh I was so floored by the dumbassedness of that quote I missed that disclaimer, Edited for transparency",Szarkan-,e9an973,conservative
But isn’t it silly that we actually had to double check in the first place.,Adarkes01,e9ayyvu,conservative
"lol.

That is even worse than the guy who shot an AR15 and how much it hurt and how loud and evil it was. ",VirginWizard69,e9aq9le,conservative
"Sorry, I misunderstood what you were saying. It's something that I've thought about a bit though, what the effects are of having such a large group of people who have never experienced a downturn. ",senatorpjt,e9bc7hw,conservative
"Oops, read that wrong.  Amazing how I made it all the way to November before being wrong this year.  Carry on.",Richard_Stonee,e9avj2k,conservative
"Yes I agreed on the older millennials.  But “returning to Pre-recession” levels absolutely in no way defines being in a “recession”.  In fact just the opposite, there is usually a “boom” before the bust as there was pre-2007 so using that as your bottom line as a”recession” would be extremely misleading. ",pro_nosepicker,e9b66c2,conservative
"i dont see her becoming more moderate. if anything more progressive, as most progressives do over the course of their careers ",anon2777,e9bt003,conservative
"Getting tied up and raped by a crazy chick is my fetish.

Death by Snu snu. ",VirginWizard69,e9anpz8,conservative
"I don't really have a party affiliation, although I would say that my values align with ""the left"" more often than not. I accept your point about the rep not accurately representing his beliefs. I just thought it was an interesting choice of words",morris1022,e9c8ugs,conservative
"Right, they dont exist. 

Useful idiots will be useful idiots I suppose.",Ledcookey,e9axf65,conservative
How in the world can you guarantee that? ,yousir2,e9bahtp,conservative
[deleted],,e9aqnao,conservative
Not to mention I wouldn't want to be storm the beaches of Normandy with an AR-15. ,say_or_do,e9apcp8,conservative
"You're looking for ""Assault Weapon"", a truly meaningless term.

A rock can be an ""assault weapon"".",13speed,e9b3zrm,conservative
"[I think assault rifles are real things, just very specifically defined](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Assault_rifle)",smorezy,e9aq0yj,conservative
"Assault rifle is a literal military term. It comes from the German Sturmgewehr, which literally means “storm rifle”, but contextually can mean assault. It was literally called the Assault Rifle 1944. ",SovietRaptor,e9ats9x,conservative
"yep and law abiding citizens who have recieved a background check should have access to said guns. 

But dont tell another city how to have guns when they clearly have voted and pass legislation to not have guns so readily available. 

is your 30 ott bolt action? how fast can it shoot 10 or 15 rounds. 

Here in ny i think the magazine capacity got reduced to 7, its all stricly to stop mass shootings, anyone complaining they want to take your guns and i cant hunt, its all bullshit , at least in ny, ya you cant shoot a deer 8 times in 5 seconds now, boo fucking hoo. ",brucebanner34,e9ap7nc,conservative
Hahahaahhaa no worries. I just hadn't heard of it and if that was true I would have laughed. ,HighLatencyRaptor,e9b2zex,conservative
What makes sense in context is she's just one of millions of brain dead millennials who think socialism is a good idea and think it's possible to be both an American and a socialist at the same time. Anyone that ignorant promoted to a position of power deserves all the scorn and ridicule the masses can muster. ,MyLittleGrowRoom,e9bc4gn,conservative
"I like the way mine looks better, bot.",an0nymous_bosch,e9b8rdq,conservative
^^^^^ Oh no.. we have a central planner in our midst everyone.,GonadusTwistus,e9b86pp,conservative
Depends on your definition of “everything”. Beacause you sure as hell aren’t getting “everything”. ,pro_nosepicker,e9b0m9z,conservative
Not when it comes to a federal government presiding over the healthcare of a massive country. The waste and mishandling would be exorbitant. ,AppleCirocMajorKey,e9b8n7d,conservative
SIMPLE 👏 ECONOMIC 👏 CONCEPTS,here-come-the-bombs,e9ba3uj,conservative
">Am I understanding?

I doubt it, you aren't making any sense.

>We just pay for the wall, by just paying for it. but healthcare, we just  pay for it and we can't just pay for it because it costs more to cost  less and can't just pay pay.

The wall is very inexpensive compared to paying for healthcare.  You do get that right?  

Then, once it is built, the wall only requires a minimal amount of maintenance to serve its purpose, whereas the cost of a universal healthcare system will be never ending.

And no, it wont ""cost less"" and no thanks to government control over every aspect of our private personal lives.",literally_a_tractor,e9bo8cj,conservative
"> Who are you defending the ""western world"" from?  

Good question. Let's have the United States abandon all of it's military bases worldwide and bring every single one of our troops home and see what happens.  

> And pretty much all ""western countries"" send aid to ""countless countries"", they even do it every year.  

How much aid? Is it anywhere close to what the US sends? Let's have the US cut off all aid to everyone outside of our borders and let the rest of the world pick up the slack. We'll see how well that goes.",deathwheel,e9bfvg4,conservative
"Well when the question is ""how are you going to pay for it"" maybe answering ""how nations pay for such programs"" is what you should be talking about, especially when you are trying to demonstrate competence.",guitmusic12,e9askef,conservative
">What does that have to do with healthcare rationing?

You are the one who made the bullshit claim that people die here in the United States due to rationing. If you are sick with any ailment, regardless of your economic situation, there is no better place in the world for you than the United States.

> Many reports and studies show our healthcare outcomes are lower than other countries. It may only be non cancer related outcomes. There are many many non cancer healthcare things

Reports show that we are unhealthy as a nation because we eat like crap due to an over abundance of unhealthy food. When it comes to things beyond general practice across the board no other country comes close.",NuclearMisogynyist,e9c10az,conservative
What if I don't like any plans? They are all pretty much the same. I went through the 3 plans my employer offered and they are all almost identical. Good thing I had a choice. ,Robertooshka,e9bbcmi,conservative
"More like you want to put your fingers in your ears and close your eyes because I attacked single payer. 

The Amtrak discussion is correct regardless of your spin. High speed rail is popular in many parts of the globe and would be well accepted if a privatized company were given the ability to utilize it. 

The Post Office is also right. They are in the red so bad because of mismanaged pensions that would have been properly accounted for in the private sector. 

Government is a fatal blow to efficiency. Read some works by Peter Drucker if you are truly open minded. Good place to start. ",Ruckus45,e9audoe,conservative
"It's not all a problem. It's iffy when someone enters at 30 and leaves at 75, but 10-15 years in office? That's good. You need people who know what they're doing and have close experience with how the system works; a group of ever-changing newbies isn't ideal.

I'll probably never go for it, but I haven't ruled it out, and it's an interesting thought.",ZarahCobalt,e9brpce,conservative
"It’s more embarrassing than silly that in an age of widespread fake news that people aren’t fixed on digging the truth out of what they read.

We’re all guilty of it though, it’s natural to blindly accept a lot of what we hear.",Quazman,e9b1e58,conservative
If it helps I was not fully part of the work force at the time but the downturn certainly effected my age group as so many of our parents lost jobs and our families had financial issues. Since most of us were old enough we were aware of what was going on and I know it’s caused me to be very careful with my finances and to make sure I’m safe should something happen. ,slopezski,e9bcnc2,conservative
You'd get Maxine Waters.,13speed,e9b70v2,conservative
"I think if you live in NYC, passing thousands of people like it's nothing, it becomes a statistical probability. Obviously unless that dude is stalking them and was packing, he can't guarantee it, but the point stands that it is overwhelmingly likely with the number of human interactions, even in NYC where guns are harder to come by.",pharmermummles,e9bixho,conservative
"But wait I thought sexual assault was common and due to toxic masculitimty, runs rampant throughout? Is “someone would help” why do rapes happen in NYC loads more than say North Dakota, where I suppose there wouldn’t be anyone there ",steelallz,e9awsl2,conservative
"> this isnt middle america where bushes economy killed your town,

Bill Clinton did that with NAFTA, dumbass.",13speed,e9b3cng,conservative
"Say this to a woman like my mom who was the victim of violent crime multiple times when she lived in NYC. Maybe you and your friends don't experience the real world of inner city violence, or maybe you see things differently than others. But there's a difference between disagreeing with someone over how best to protect themselves, and trying to impose your ideas on others.

Also, nice dig at rural folks. Calling millions of people drug dealers and rapists because they don't live in cities like yours is a great way to view the nation. I'd like to see how long you can last without all those meth dealers to grow your food, haul freight around, build your cars, and power your home.",dicaparly,e9as9f7,conservative
Are you trying to show a correlation here?  Curious because you're doing a terrible job of making a sensible argument,Richard_Stonee,e9astlq,conservative
"> new york is 6th lowest in rapes per capita

Cool.

> so you can see, most states, with lowest rape rates, have good high scores for tough gun laws

Not true, and you can't relate ""gun laws"" to ""rape statistics"". That's conflating things that don't have a cause and affect relationship. Want to know what has been proven to increase gun crime and rape? Poverty and drugs.

Let's go back to the 1980's where new york had the crack epidemic. They were a freaking gun murder capitol. [1](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crime_in_New_York_City) What caused the crime to go away? Basically the end of the crack epidemic.

Another point to make, I looked up forcible rape statistics. [2](https://www.statista.com/statistics/232563/forcible-rape-rate-in-the-us-by-state/) States don't follow your random made up correlation of gun laws and rapes. Look at Michigan and Colorado. Both have a C rating for gun laws yet are ranked number 2 and 3 on rape. Alaska is horrible for both gun laws and rape. Why? Alaska is poor AF and a depressing place to live. People who live there have massive substance abuse (drugs again) issues.

Furthermore, your stupid scorecard you linked INCLUDES all suicides, accidents, literally anything that includes a death from a gun. Suicides is actually a very big category. So if you take a place like Alaska, that has one of the highest suicide rates in the country, and then include those numbers in your assessment of ""gun laws""... of course it's going to look bad. These people are going to off themselves regardless. Hanging, knives, jumping off a bridge, whatever. That's a different problem. But you're artificially bumping up gun crime stats in high suicide states with easy access to guns.",Dioroxic,e9aw3to,conservative
">in front of 100,000 people? its ny, someone would help.  

Kitty Genovese.",Rydiak,e9as8v9,conservative
You're denying that rape happens in New York? You're fucking disgusting.,Doctor_McKay,e9b4rs4,conservative
"NYC is trash, it smells like piss and it’s overpriced.  A grim example of what ignorance can bring a people. ",steelallz,e9awx7n,conservative
"> background check

imagine requiring a background check for any of our other rights they haven't completely trampled on... ",XDG-KEC-QZA-PBU,e9ar6t8,conservative
"Regardless of it being bolt action or not or how many rounds it can hold, it’s still a semi automatic weapon just like an AR-15. 

You really think gun control is going to stop a mass shooting? Look at Chicago. Better yet, look at the UK and see how knife control is doing for them.

I’m from Detroit. You know why we don’t have mass shootings? Because so many people here bare arms. Let that sink in.",NightFreak87,e9apwmv,conservative
I'm just a realist... just because something works on paper doesn't mean it works in real life.,sloth788,e9b8du5,conservative
"What do you think you're not getting? NHS for example covers everything but some dental and vision items, which you can purchase private insurance for. ",kingbirdy,e9b21vx,conservative
"I believe in fiscal responsibility ""it;s cheap so we just pay"" is equally as irresponsible as ""we just pay for it"" when it's expensive.

  
As a business person, the ROI on the wall is garbage.  


I didn't expect you to say ""he wall costs less and is a one time thing so its good.""  
Are all one time expenses better than ongoing ones?  


I was talking about the logic of ""We just pay for it,"" because I am a business person and I believe in solid ROI. I believe in running things like a business. The wall doesn't make good business sense to me. 

Universal healthcare makes good business sense to me. But I'm one of those hardcore capitalists, so my opinions tend to be unpopular.",meatspace,e9bp0k3,conservative
"Maybe she should, but answering in the way she did doesn't in any way show incompetence on the subject matter. Incompetence in appeasing conservative critics of medicare-for-all maybe, but not incompetence regarding how it'll be paid for.",Dinkleberg_IRL,e9at7s0,conservative
"To clarify:

All the reports about our healthcare costing more than other first world nations with lower ourcomes... all lies? Every single one is fake news?

Is that what you're saying?",meatspace,e9c1832,conservative
"get a different job, pay out of pocket, you still have other choices youre just not willing to make them. Why would you think that narrowing your choices down to one would improve that? Does that honestly make any fucking sense? And just in case you are inclined to answer otherwise the answer to that question is ""No, no it does not make any fucking sense"".",BolasDeDinero,e9bi7e7,conservative
"> More like you want to put your fingers in your ears and close your eyes because I attacked single payer. 

That's not the case, and further I'm trying to engage with you civilly and in good faith per the subreddit rules, so no need for the ad-hominems.

For Amtrak, there's no legal reason private companies can't operate their own rail, and in fact a private passenger rail line just opened in Florida recently.  It's just unprofitable in most areas due to the long inter-city distances in the US (as compared to Europe and Japan where rail is much more popular, their cities are much closer), and why it requires government subsidies to continue operating. The Florida line could be successful since it's operating in a relatively dense area, but that remains to be seen. However the last private passenger rail company to exist joined Amtrak in the 80s because it wasn't able to stay afloat on its own.

For the post office, you said it's more expensive [but per this comparison by a shipping company it's the cheapest option](https://online-shipping-blog.endicia.com/fedex-ups-usps-cheapest-shipping-rates-comparison-chart-2018/).",kingbirdy,e9aynrm,conservative
Is she a chick?,VirginWizard69,e9b72to,conservative
"The argument he’s making is that rape in New York is less common than rape in places where there are lots of guns. The chances of getting randomly raped by someone you don’t know is significantly lower than being killed by a gun in New York City. Most rape is perpetrated by someone who knows the victim, and rape has a higher rate per capita in predominantly red areas, presumably where women would have more access to guns to defend themselves, insinuating that access to guns have either no effect or a reverse affect on preventing rape.",SovietRaptor,e9atm4p,conservative
"> Kitty Genovese

pfsh what is this, history? I thought we were just correlating statistics and drawing conclusions here!",platy1234,e9at2us,conservative
I say we should require background checks for voting. That'd shut down the grabbers real fast.,Doctor_McKay,e9b501r,conservative
[removed],,e9armlv,conservative
"99% of all our interaction is voluntary.  We don't force people to buy shit they don't want.  But the state crowdfunds with guns instead of a website.  Its an anomaly.

",GonadusTwistus,e9bcgly,conservative
"Tons.  In a US model you definitely aren’t getting a ton of meds you want, you aren’t getting basic technological advances that are denied years and years after FDA approval as they are deemed “experimental”, you aren’t getting certain physicians you want who may accept cash only, and in many cases you aren’t getting elective surgeries. but timely fashion.  You are also suffering a medical “brain drain” already with fewer physicians and more patients; pretending a further drop in their salary while increasing government documentation even more is illogical. The list goes on. 

I’m a US surgeon and already see this already with Medicare, Medicaid and government funded Obamacare programs, and I’m currently lecturing in a country with Universal healthcare.  

Pretending that you get everything for nothing is a fool’s endeavor. Universal health care might even be the best overall answer , but pretending there won’t be sacrifices and drawbacks is just silly in my opinion.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9b31du,conservative
I'm saying it's misrepresented. We are unhealthy as a nation this is true. But we lead the world in care beyond general practice. Virtually all therapies come from the United States.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9c3k8z,conservative
"Getting a different job would give me the same choices. Paying out of pocket is stupid and totally unreasonable for the majority of Americans. The problem isn't choices, it is systemically broken. Healthcare needs to be out of the private sector. It needs to be like the roads, police, firefighters etc. Also before you say the government sucks at everything, there are things that it is better at than the ""free market."" ",Robertooshka,e9czwf7,conservative
Damn son you thirsty.,13speed,e9ba4tf,conservative
"You touched on the important point that makes this reasoning unsound - most rapes are committed by someone the perpetrator knows, and therefore would likely know if they had access to a gun.  I doubt that having easy gun laws would have much impact at all due to the circumstances behind most rapes.  IMO where it does matter is in cases of general violence against women (including rape) where the threat is known beforehand but the courts/police can't or won't do anything, such as stalking.

Also in play here is the fact that women are far less likely to carry guns, but are far more likely to be the victim of assault from a stranger.  

Edit: I'd be curious to see how these statistics look if backing out rape of minors.  I would assume that makes up a large percentage of all rapes, and would also assume that urban areas have a far lower percentage of minors than rural/suburban areas.",Richard_Stonee,e9avc79,conservative
"That’s not the point. The point is when more people are armed there are less chances of a mass shooting, otherwise they’re sitting ducks.

There are more knife attacks in the UK than the US. Even though guns are outlawed that’s not going to stop someone from going on a killing spree. There has been a 16% increase in knife attacks since 2011. There have been over 40,000 knife attacks this year alone in the UK. That’s pretty high.",NightFreak87,e9atgib,conservative
"Do you have any evidence a US universal system would have those flaws, or are those just your personal assumptions? Medicare/caid aren't and shouldn't be models for a full universal healthcare system or evidence to how it may work. ",kingbirdy,e9b3bxi,conservative
"So the ""Americans spend more per capita and get lower outcomes for it"" is untrue?",meatspace,e9c3qam,conservative
I mean she looks like a man.,VirginWizard69,e9ba73l,conservative
"I think those are the best models we have, since they are the closest to government run.  And when Obama tried to provide a “universal” coverage it rose up costs at the individual level — co-pays and deductibles rose — and for many access got worse.  

My evidence isn’t just personal assumptions, they re factual and I deal with them all the time in multiple healthcare models.  And my “evidence’ that there would be flaws i believe is more grounded than your assumption that there simply wouldn’t be any hitches without any facts knowing what the system would actually entail.  
You can’t just apply a French model to the US and assume it magically works any more than I can apply current US government models and make assumptions. They re totally different populations with different needs, expectations and problems and we have no specifics, so I’m not making “assumptions” any more than you. 

But to think that US universal healthcare would be some sort of medical utopia without any flaws is pretty naive imho.  

Oh and the examples I gave above are 100% fact and currently exist to some degree.  Not gonna spend a hour googling things that are as evident to me in my work as the sky is blue,  but based on government intervention they are already happening to some extent ",pro_nosepicker,e9b6tkz,conservative
How simple do I have to make it for you? I have been very clear.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9c4a5t,conservative
"I'm asking a yes or no question. I'm kind of slow.

Is it yes all those claims are untrue  or no they contain accuracy?",meatspace,e9c4jva,conservative
"You are not asking a yes or no question. You are trying to trap me into say something that's not the whole truth with a false dichotomy.

Like I said before.

>I'm saying it's misrepresented.

",NuclearMisogynyist,e9cu2dn,conservative
"Do I really seem that cunning? You give me too much credit 

Nonetheless,  my question was genuine. And regardless of intent,  it is actually a yes or no question. ",meatspace,e9d1e7m,conservative
"This is absolutely, unbelievably insane. They are actually going to steal this election. I can see so many becoming disenfranchised and giving up after this.",the-divine-comedy,e9bx40i,conservative
"Just think about it, that’s a tonnnn if votes.... how were they not found to begin with? ",xPineappless,e9cb90r,conservative
"If this continues I may just decide to stop voting in Florida. If Broward and Dade are going to be allowed to funnel in extra votes after a time limit with no consequence, I'll either move or go active duty. Not willing to deal with this nonsense. ",xJownage,e9cd23n,conservative
"That comment section though, lol",Gaelic_Platypus,e9c0mz4,conservative
"More ballots, *found at Kinko's*.",rf-engineer,e9c2stb,conservative
"These people are pure evil, and should be treated as such.",TakeMeToTheArch,e9c18vz,conservative
"Oh look, so the thing that never happens is happening again...",Starky_McStarkface,e9d1rz6,conservative
[removed],,e9c8ntu,conservative
Come to Texas. We need to counter the influx of liberals here.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d1tb7,conservative
I know they made me laugh too for some reason.,SnickersReese,e9c1lw8,conservative
[removed],,e9c8ox4,conservative
Leftists,ConsistentlyRight,e9ckbft,conservative
">But it was also dangerous, deliberately meant to stir up the wingnuts and kooks…What if someone with an unstable mind loaded a gun and drove to Washington? 

You mean how a Bernie Bro actually did that after all the rhetoric about how evil Republicans are?",MajesticMulva,e9d2ihr,conservative
"> I’ll never forgive [Barack Obama] for what he did to our United States military. By not funding properly, it was depleted. Everything was old and tired. And I came in and I had to fix it.  
  
He’s right though.  
  
I joined the Air Force in Sep. 2008. I graduated Basic Training the day before they announced that Obama had been elected President. If only I had been prepared for what was to come.  
  
My first two years were okay because I was in tech school. After that, everything declined rapidly. They made cuts to AFSCs (I was safe because mine was a critical position), but I had many coworkers who were either reclassed or just cut loose completely.  
  
We were constantly undermanned. Because of cuts they made to other careers, I had at one point three additional duties, on top of being in a job that involved chasing flights for missions (long and often crazy/unpredictable hours).  
  
Instead of spending time and money on additional training, we started having to attend mandatory sensitivity trainings and lectures about how all men were sexist pigs. That really boosted morale and camaraderie, let me tell you...  
  
It was awful. I never got to do my job.  
  
I’m not trying to brag here but rather provide some context: I graduated top Airman in my basic training flight. I was top in physical fitness. I consistently scored 95+ on all my PT tests. I graduated top of my class in my first tech school, won the provost award, graduated top of my class in my second tech school, was awarded SrA BTZ, made Staff Sergeant my first try...  
  
And Obama’s policies drove me to say goodbye to all of that. It was both the best and worst time of my life. I was sacrificing everything I had to be treated like the dirt under his shoe. No thanks.",jina100,e9d3pce,conservative
"Rather unChristian, but whatever. It'd be a good time for the GOP to keep climbing the moral high ground. After Carlson/Antifa thing, and more violence coming down the pipe, it'd be in the GOP's best interests to come out of this without mud on their faces.",cons_NC,e9d2qor,conservative
"A Shepard has to duty to protect the flock, you do not turn your cheek on a wolf.  ",ozric101,e9d3t8r,conservative
"Let the crazies show their crazy.  Let the media ignore the craziness because its associated with the side they want to win.  Let this go on for 2 years, then run with that on the ""poster.""",jdizzle161,e9d3ube,conservative
John 10:11-13,cons_NC,e9d3z9g,conservative
That’s good to hear. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9cqxax,conservative
I hope she's working on a retirement letter. ,triggernaut,e9csq8x,conservative
"She needs to retire and I despise her politics but I do hope she comes through okay. Hopefully this will be a wake up call for her. 

But I'm not going to sit around and wish ill will on an old lady.",brogarn,e9culd4,conservative
I bet. ,StillANNONin,e9cr7lm,conservative
She acts irresposibly clinging to her seat with physical issues like that. It's time to spend more time with the family. But then again she loves her job & probably has clerks doing most of it. Wishing her well.,ReaganTroll,e9cv18b,conservative
"Liberals: ""Trump is trampling on the sacred principles of our Constitution! The Constitution is hanging by a thread!""

Also liberals: ""The Constitution sucks cuz rural states and guns are dumb and muh popular vote.""",PubliusVA,e9cwbic,conservative
">Maricopa County has 345,000 ballots to be counted. That includes 150,000 early ballots received before Election Day and 195,000 ballots that were either early ballots dropped off on Election Day, provisional ballots, or out-of-precinct ballots cast on Election Day. 

Conservative-leaning 

>Pima County has 54,000 votes to be counted. This includes about 36,000 early ballots and 18,000 provisional votes. Pima County Registrar of Voters Chris Roads said the Recorder's Office will begin processing provisional ballots Friday morning. 

Liberal-leaning

>Pinal County has an estimated 31,800 early ballots still to count, said Michele Forney, elections director. 
There are 6,800 provisionals left to count, she said, plus about 25,000 early ballots.

 Conservative-leaning 


>Coconino County has about 10,600 votes left to count, per the elections department there. Those votes won't get counted until Friday. 

Slight liberal lean if these are from Flagstaff or the Reservations 

>Ballots remaining to be counted in the rest of the state total 4,600 in Apache County, 1,700 in Cochise County, 580 in La Paz, an estimated 8,000 in Mohave County, 4,000 in Navajo County, 2,200 in Santa Cruz County, 6,100 in Yavapai County and 3,100 in Yuma County, according to Garrett Archer of the Secretary of State's office.

Mostly conservative here but some reservation stuff also

People keep comparing Arizona to Florida but its not the case, AZ does this every election and is actually posting what needs to be counted. Florida is some shady shit where they are finding boxes and vans of ballots. ",Zac1245,e9crrni,conservative
"Yep I think that Pinal, Early Maricopa ballots & the NA areas will end up giving McSally an edge.  

For those curious AZ's secretary of state updates the results every day a 5PM AZ time (7EST) but idk if they do it on weekends too.",mbarnar,e9csky4,conservative
"Yeah, this isnt the same situation as Florida. The AZ secretary of state is a Republican so he has no reason to mess with the results. ",Zac1245,e9cswez,conservative
"At the current breakdowns in Pima, Pinal, and Coconino and then giving a 50/50 split across the other 8 non-Maricopa counties, McSally is going to have to pull at least 52.5% of the 345k ballots outstanding in Maricopa. She currently trails in Maricopa 50.2% to 47.7%. Even in that scenario, the total statewide vote spread between the two would be less than 0.1%. I am a bit concerned. ",jac5,e9cy6nq,conservative
"Simple: just, like, pay for it.",gbimmer,e9cn9n0,conservative
"Maybe all the idiots in NYC that voted for her can contribute to getting her a DC apartment.  Oh I forgot, they voted for her so they could get free shit, not her.",optionhome,e9clylm,conservative
See if she can use one of Bernie's houses.,allnamesaretaken45,e9cmyrj,conservative
"And this dingbat wants to tell you how to run your life and control what you spend your money on and how your resources get allocated.

Vacuous doesn't even begin to describe the space between her ears.",DevonWeeks,e9cn3ts,conservative
"Maybe even conservatives should consider chipping in to get her an apartment because she has important work to do.  Stuff like this ...
https://i.redd.it/lrvxs0aqzxw11.jpg",stancrouch,e9cxgze,conservative
"Yes! Let’s start that wealth redistribution now. 

Because we all know she can’t have a small one bed apartment. She needs the works to roll with her new commie friends ",Chapka69,e9cn27g,conservative
Occasional Cortex 😉,ChironInTheSky,e9cqlus,conservative
"At this point, she could jockey for being on the House foreign relations committee to better our relationship with Antenna, and I would not be surprised at all. ",justhere2havefun,e9d2exw,conservative
Did... did she actually say that? I find it hard to believe that actually happened. Nobody is that incompetent. Right? Please tell me this is just a meme.,Cr8er,e9cxzna,conservative
This is just a meme.,putercom5,e9czwzh,conservative
"Good. Thanks. It's a good one, though.",Cr8er,e9d107g,conservative
I am unironically flipping out about this. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9d1mle,conservative
How many ballots left? ,Intimidator94,e9d26y2,conservative
How many can Broward cook up in the next 7 hours and 35 minutes?,DogBeersHadOne,e9d2coo,conservative
Brenda Snipes refuses to say,YankeeBlues21,e9d43l4,conservative
2 million ,Intimidator94,e9d2eru,conservative
Cutting aid counterproductive? The cash never goes beyond the elite,lax714,e9d1d49,conservative
Really hope she can stick around. ,Briguy28,e9cqfgb,conservative
"If she did not accept Trump support, she deserves to lose. We’ll get the seat back in two years. ",mikeygio,e9cqtq6,conservative
"No, we don't need a cult of personality in the US. Congress is an independent branch of government, not the lackey of the executive.",PubliusVA,e9cw4yh,conservative
Yeah. Great thinking. Lose the majority to punish conservatives that can think independent of trump. ,hipsterdufus84,e9ctkf6,conservative
"It’s not a “cult of personality” per se. It’s a sense of “I’m not gonna sit here and take the shit from these Democrat bullies anymore.”  

Donald Trump has instilled somewhat of a backbone in a lot of these squishy Republicans. He has stepped up and taken the heat for them like a great leader is supposed to do, and the base has responded positively toward that. The base doesn’t want wishy-washy, cowardly, Republicans. They love their president, and they want their representative to embrace what he stands for. 

They can have a personality of their own, but they need to hop on board the Trump train if they want to survive politically. You wanna be an “independent”? You’ll be watching from the sidelines after being voted out of office. ",mikeygio,e9cxodz,conservative
"We already lost the majority. Her seat is inconsequential. Get her out now, and we will regain the seat in the most reliable of Red States. ",mikeygio,e9ctqts,conservative
"You can stand up to democrats and still not be a Trump supporter. To believe otherwise is to think the same way people did about Obama. If it’s all about the person and not the policy, what happens when he’s out of office?",justhere2havefun,e9d29ap,conservative
"Yeah im aware.  But trump and his people celebrating all the ""rino"" loses is awesome /s.  Love is more republican than anyone she is replaced by.  Flake in az is way better than selma who is probably going to win.  Somone who votes with us 80 percent of the the time is better than someone who never does.  But good job, celebrate Republicans who lose.   ",hipsterdufus84,e9ctzu8,conservative
"[Here](https://apnews.com/c575bd1cc3b1456cb3057ef670c7fe2a) is an expert going frame by frame to see if any editing has been done.

Even on the video in this link, the video on the left is a frame behind the video on the right at 0:00. By 0:03, the video on the left is a frame head of the video on the right. In one frame, the intern's hand is about 2"" away from the mic in the left image, while it's touching the mic in the right image. By 0:03 a piece of the intern's hair comes across her neck. It moves first in front of the image on the left and then a frame later moves in front of her neck in the image on the right.

So the Time Youtube video is a frame behind Sanders' Twitter video in the beginning. By 3 seconds the Time YouTube video is a frame ahead of Sanders' Twitter video. I'm not saying this whole 2 frame discrepancy is a huge deal, but this video doesn't debunk the claim that it has been doctored. The two videos here are not exactly the same.",super_ag,e9cdlrt,conservative
"I don't know, it just doesn't look that bad either way. Why is this even news? He stopped her from taking the mic, he didnt punch her in the face. So many other things to be more concerned about than this big nothingburger.",Nevaknosbest,e9b5jx4,conservative
"At best, the video on the right has a lower framerate. THATS why it looks ""sped up""
",monkeiboi,e9b7j2t,conservative
"No fan of Accoster, but WSJ says it was altered:

https://youtu.be/0NxYxibGCx0",ChunkyArsenio,e9bqaru,conservative
"He looks like a douche, but this doesn't make him a women beater.",johndeer89,e9b7umg,conservative
"In the one on the right, his arm definitely appears to come down harder. I’m curious if that might be because it’s poorer video quality? If I’m SHS right now I’d just tweet that the first clip was poor quality, and provide a link to a better one.",wine_o_clock,e9bg8eq,conservative
"still not assault, can we be honest about that? they don't need to manufacture reasons to get rid of Acosta. he's an activist, not a journalist. that's reason enough",sylect,e9bh0wt,conservative
https://apnews.com/c575bd1cc3b1456cb3057ef670c7fe2a,bchnyc,e9c07zr,conservative
"It looks more like a block to me. Legal, but rude. ",8K12,e9b9gb0,conservative
"If you go frame by frame, you can see a difference but it is very minor.  It appears the Twitter video has fewer frames and is blurrier.  I don't know if it's intentional, but I'm guessing not because it still doesn't look like the supposed ""karate chop"" they're suggesting it was edited to look like.",wiseracer,e9bvf5p,conservative
[deleted],,e9b77uo,conservative
What is the accusation? ,Altomckee,e9bz20i,conservative
"I have to say, both of these videos look similar...",sk8goofy,e9b7892,conservative
"The best explanation, actually, is that the video on the right has gone through more compression, decompression and format changes than the video on the left.

When this is done, depending on the type of compression and the formatting changes, frames can be dropped. If frames are dropped, what the decompression does will ""add"" frames where they are lost. These added frames will be a combination of the previous frame and the next frame. It will have a ghosted image of the prior frame and the next frame will be a harder image (not ghosted). That's why in the above video on the right, where it appears to be ""off"" from the video on the left, you can still see the ghosted image of the exact image on the left. The faster something moves, the more visible the added frames will be (this is called interpolation). Paul Joseph Watson was the original person who posted the video that was ultimately shared by Sanders. He indicated that he got the source from a gif online. Since a gif would automatically have missing frames, then the interpolation will become even more prominent if someone used the gif as the source to convert to a video. And then, you have the social media compression.

Basically, you are left with determining whether or not the suggested implication of ""doctoring"" should be applicable. Was it intentionally altered to make the hand movement by Acosta to be more pronounced than it was? Doctoring a video would imply that there was malicious intent to alter the video in some way to carry a particular narrative. If the changes were not intentional, then I don't think you can logically use the term ""doctored"". It would be more accurate, in my opinion, to say that the process that created an ever-so-slightly altered video was not intentional and happened organically and not intentionally.",-Kerosun-,e9b9x5h,conservative
Is someone saying it was?,callthereaper64,e9b9fkf,conservative
"This is the makings of another ""gate"" that will quickly fade.",petitereddit,e9btol6,conservative
Talk about a nothingburger...,_Dont_Quote_Me_,e9b6cgq,conservative
"I've never actually watched press conferences live.  But I watched this one live and was totally stunned at the press' routine rudeness.  

Shit you have the President telling you That's Enough repeatedly and you're not listening.  While Acosta was by far the rudest, it seemed like other press members were able to squeeze in a second question, so I learned it was kind of common practice.

Trump has way more composure than I would if my kids were misbehaving so.",idgaf-,e9b7w2p,conservative
"The real issue here is Acosta’s hypocrisy.  Not long ago Acosta accused Trump of ignoring female reporters, and then he ignores the female staffer, refuses to give up the mic, and yes...he did put his hand on her.

",neville_bartos666,e9bpg5u,conservative
I don’t know shit about video editing. Any reporter should give up the mic when they are being asked to do so. They have no right to that microphone. ,pk3maross,e9b82wy,conservative
This won't stop the flagrant lies on the default subs,setyourblasterstopun,e9b9btn,conservative
"It's textbook, they try to control the narrative by calling it a ""doctored"" video, there's nothing doctored about it. 

They will do anything to control the narrative ",Clownshow21,e9c19ix,conservative
"Here's the whole video seeked to Acosta;

CSPAN with the side angle

https://youtu.be/nH5AbQtHWAk?t=27m30s

WHITEHOUSE just front view

https://youtu.be/LO2IoiT63Pg?t=27m5s

",Elite_dean,e9bk2bz,conservative
Jim's a dick,lax714,e9bor3d,conservative
No Touchy!,Tolken,e9b8lbs,conservative
He pulled down hard enough for her shoulders to twist.  She got annoyed and looked at Trump for support.  Acosta's time and questions are more important than anyone elses apparently.  ,petitereddit,e9btn16,conservative
"[Abilio James Acosta](https://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jim_Acosta) clearly knows kung fu, as he karate chopped that woman's arm. Or maybe he was just giving her the Elizabeth Warren tomahawk chop.",Lepew1,e9bbs87,conservative
"What the left could've said: Honestly, this isn't that bad, he clearly didn't assault her. Trump is just making a mountain out of a mole hill.

What the actually said: FUCKING BLONALD BLUMPH FALSELY DOCTORED A VIDEO TO MAKE POOR JIM ACOSTA LOOK LIKE A WOMAN BEATING VILLAIN! SURELY IMPEACHMENT MUST FOLLOW.",MuricanStephen,e9cwj2f,conservative
Yeah I mean in fairness it's not like he Ellisoned her.,FelixFuckfurter,e9b7bzc,conservative
To be honest after watching it more the videos look the same and it almost looks like his arm comes down on hers possibly just naturally it doesnt appear to be forced down,callthereaper64,e9bfv5i,conservative
"I 100% agree with you, it is an involuntary reaction to “swat” at someone when they try to take something from you, that could’ve been Dwayne the rock Johnson he still would’ve done that. He wanted to speak and that’s that. ",GALOXITYv2,e9bwhvd,conservative
"1. He didn't assault her. But he was way out of line. Obama kicked a reporter out for less. You'd be escorted out of a building if you did that at a Q&A panel when the moderator/usher came to take and pass off the microphone.
2. His question was asked and answered. He tried to turn it into a debate. His job is to ask questions, not just give his opinion and filibuster
3. If a Fox News reporter did this to an Obama, you bet your ass the staffer would be making the rounds on media with a series of sympathetic interviews about the toxic masculinity of right-wing reporters and their lack of respect for physical contact with women. They would be calling it assault.

Edit: I had actually written a thoughtful reply to the below until I realized I'm feeding a concern troll.",aboardthegravyboat,e9bbm4j,conservative
Considering how minor this was compared to the Lewandowski thing during the campaign they really shouldn't be pushing this narrative.  Just kick him out for being the child that he is and call it a day.,cathbadh,e9bbskz,conservative
"Rules for thee, but not for me.",Caeleb_Candon,e9b5r4k,conservative
"> He stopped her from taking the mic,

This is bad enough. You ask a question and get an answer. Next journalist. 

Who the hell does he think he is that he's entitled to the WH mics and that he gets to berate the president beyond the allotted time. 

Edit: Former comments

>""Good people on both sides""

>Da komrade, let us sow hate and discontent together. Stupid libruls with dere violence and hatred of potatoes and they're enjoyment of being cucks. Long live Trump and Putin!

>But if she has just two brain cells to rub together, and given her experience and intelligence she does, then it would obviously behoove her to step aside and not let the Republicans use her to stir up their base. Everytime she gives wings to her opinions, however correct she may be, it fuels the flames on the right. We have enough to tend with without her input. Nothing personal against her though...she just needs to go away.

Now you only concern troll this sub? Man you guys need hobbies. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9b5pmq,conservative
"> Why is this even news?

Because of the tard.",chabanais,e9b7ko9,conservative
Let’s say President Trump did that to Hillary. Would it be a big deal then? ,Dammit_Banned_Again,e9chl0e,conservative
"From what I heard on I believe it was Ben Shapiro's show it wasn't about the physical altercation but more about the fact he wasn't following protocol. AFAIK they're not taking any legal action against Acosta, they just revoked his press pass for the White House.",Ed_Radley,e9cs5vf,conservative
"Unwanted physical contact. He touched her arm. Plus, she's just an intern doing her job.",justhere2havefun,e9b6rvr,conservative
"There are a lot of other reporters and it's only Acosta who comes up like this.  He's always in the news not because he gets Trump to answer hard questions, but because he constantly oversteps his turn, argues and grandstands.  Acosta had his question answered already.  All he had to do was pass the mic like every other reporter does.  Instead, he created conflict like he wanted. ",Roez,e9b8738,conservative
"It doesn’t look that bad, but it’s the patriarchy in action. He brushes her aside as if she’s a little girl. He probably got a little aroused thinking about how easily he maintained his dominance over her.

/s",RightWingFreak,e9b7rlk,conservative
"It’s news because people think he should still have his press pass rights which is a privilege. He should’ve acted with more respect. Instead he decided to ask more questions than allowed, and when was told it wasn’t his turn he acted entitled and jerked the microphone away from someone just trying to do their job.

I don’t agree with people who say it’s assault. But Acosta was being very unprofessional and shouldn’t be complaining because he didn’t get his way. Also people are letting their blind hate of trump delude themselves of the facts: yes he did touch her. No it wasn’t a Big Show choke slam but yes there was contact. People keep insisting there was no contact didn’t watch the footage. He was being rude, unprofessional, and acted highly entitled.",Hfireee,e9b84eq,conservative
"First you have to remember it is an honor to be allowed to ask a question in the first place.  Not everyone gets to do this.  Also the time to ask questions is limited so only a few people will get to ask questions.  So in this aspect Jim was disrespecting every other reporter wanting to ask more than his quota of questions in that room.

Second, Jim had already asked a question and Jim was trying ask a leading question as his second question to get even one more question.  Everyone else only got 1 or 2 questions.  So he wasn’t being prevented to ask any questions... he already had his question which was a loaded one to begin with.

Three, Jim demonstrated a disrespect to the President and the people working for him by pushing the aide away from taking the mic.  Regardless if the aide was a man or a woman or a child what he did demonstrated extreme disrespect by using any sort of force to prevent the aid from doing their job, much less the other reporters who also had a job to ask questions.

Acosta disrespected the President, his staff, and Acosta’s own ilk by acting this way.",Lustan,e9bco2g,conservative
"Decent analysis, but a three frame pause (at what, 30fps?) isn't a huge deal - it could just have been a buffering or recording issue than necessarily deliberate. Clearly the quality is worse in the Sanders video. Does it actually look more aggressive? I don't think so really. They both look equally ""aggressive"" but, like others say, kind of a nothing burger TBH. Just an excuse to ban Acosta.",tenshon,e9c7jjf,conservative
"To me it doesn’t matter if it was a man or a woman, he disrespected the aide, the President, and the other reporters who want to ask questions... with a question about Russian collusion.... REALLY?",Lustan,e9bdd6e,conservative
The problem is if this were a Conservative reporter he'd already be public enemy no 1,stanleythemanley44,e9bcu2u,conservative
It does make him ban-worthy from the White House,unityrootts,e9bfdlx,conservative
"It isn't that it visually ""came down harder"", there's a motion blur on the hand because of the lower quality.",dicaparly,e9botlc,conservative
"He is more of a journalist than Hannity who was campaigning with the president. Nothing says fair and balanced like campaigning for gop. But I'm sure that's just ""fake news"". ",Let_Me_Pop_A_Quick_H,e9bt95d,conservative
">  because they sped it up.

So you are admitting it wasn't ""doctored"", but was in fact just rendered at a different frame-rate, right?

Or are you claiming the the original video is also ""doctored"" too, and his hand did something different than is shown?",Silicon_Avatar,e9b8206,conservative
What the fuck are you even seeing?  You are seeing compression artifacts.  Don’t be a doofus.  ,Lustan,e9bd8wl,conservative
This is exactly what I've been trying to tell people. Twitter by itself does a horrible job at rendering video and video playback. It's probably one of the worst in comparison to Facebook or Youtube.,nousemercenary,e9baxop,conservative
"The shorter explanation is: ""Orange man bad!""",superdude411,e9bkcfq,conservative
[https://talkingpointsmemo.com/news/white-house-stands-behind-doctored-video-of-cnn-jim-acosta](https://talkingpointsmemo.com/news/white-house-stands-behind-doctored-video-of-cnn-jim-acosta),krelborne,e9bavi0,conservative
"VICE, Business Insider, r/Politics, and many other places are saying the White House (Sarah Sanders) posted a doctored video. Which is obviously untrue. They're just trying to defend Acosta since he lost his White House Press Credentials. ",nousemercenary,e9bb1d6,conservative
Jim Acosta is a nothingburger?  I concur.  He doesn’t deserve credentials if he can’t respect the honor of the position.,Lustan,e9bdilm,conservative
"Well, Ben Shapiro quit Breitbart over the Lewandowski thing during the campaign, and now says Acucksta did nothing wrong? He’s happy to shit on the government official who body slammed a reporter, but wants to brush this off. There is a blatant hypocrisy from the Cuckservative middle that hold Republicans to this above God standard, and don’t have the same standard for Democrats. What Acucksta did was wrong, and his punishment was deserved. Anything else is just false, and to sweep it under the rug and keep up with this Paul Ryan holier than thou routine is wrong. Just imagine if this was a Fox reporter and he did this to an Obama intern? The world would be on fire, there would be boycotts and petitions to fire the reporter. When will these Cuckservatives learn that taking the high road and the “muh principles” bullshit is why we almost lost a Supreme Court Justice and lost the fucking House. It’s extremely aggravating reading people who want to give  Acucksta a pass on this.",Litercola311,e9b940g,conservative
"To answer 1 and 2, typical proceedings dictate a reporter is allowed to ask a question and a followup. It seems he is attempting to exercise that right. I stated it before to others and I'll say it again. I am not entirely familiar with Jim Acosta, and I'm not going to defend him. It does appear distasteful but I wouldn't go so far as to say it was unprofessional. Also I watched recently the video of Obama kicking out that reporter. I have to say that he allowed it to go on for a full minute and a half before asking secret service to remove the individual. He even gave the guy a chance to shut up and stay. Not defending anyone, just using my eyeballs to assess what I find to be fair or unfair.

For 3.. Maybe. Either way making news of this kind of stuff is a waste of time for all Americans. More important things to focus on than this, by far.",Nevaknosbest,e9bci6s,conservative
"Obama also, y'know, held normal press conferences like every other President has. It's one of the expectations of the office. This was what, Trump's third press conference in two years? My kids get report cards from their school more often.",CheerUpCat,e9c5i6m,conservative
"How does this apply? If he punched her in the face, body-slammed her or grabbed her pussy, obviously I would be in agreement here, but jesus. Are we really gonna be pussies and complain about..THIS? What happened? Fucking nothing, thats what. Let's move on.",Nevaknosbest,e9b66ph,conservative
[removed],,e9b7y03,conservative
"Then they should say it's about not following protocol. Don't go on Fox News and go on and on about how he ""assaulted this poor intern.""",lankey62,e9d2ht0,conservative
"Nothing against her, you're right she's just doing her job. So is he. There was no malace between those two people. It's not like anything happened that suggested bodily harm or hurt feelings were intended. This aint kindergarten. I'm sorry, I just don't see what you're seeing. Nothing happened that warrants this being newsworthy. ",Nevaknosbest,e9b7631,conservative
"Whats the problem with physical contact? No one here did anything near “assault”. It’s ludicrous to say that Acosta assaulted her, and even more ridiculous to say that she assaulted him",benelchuncho,e9b86s2,conservative
"Oh like when she initiated the unwanted physical contact first?
",BigBad_BigBad,e9b71yi,conservative
"Your response was tasteful. We may not agree completely but I understand and respect your opinion. I don't think Jim Acosta is trying to make it all about himself, as others do. Is he entitled? Perhaps. I really don't know the man beyond what I see and read. 

",Nevaknosbest,e9b9d92,conservative
"I'll concede that it seems disrespectful. Beyond that, everyone in that room has a job to do and needs to do it, regardless of optics. Excluding someone being punched in the face, of course. ",Nevaknosbest,e9bhx0r,conservative
"The accusation is they paused 3 frames so they could speed up 3 frames during the downward movement, making it appear faster.

If the downward movement in the original takes 6 frames and the one on Sanders' feed takes 3 frames, it looks like he's pushing her arm down twice as fast or hard.",super_ag,e9cj7a5,conservative
I think you hit the nail on the head. We don't have to mention assault. Just look and see how sucky he is.,johndeer89,e9bf9ey,conservative
Absolutely,johndeer89,e9bkh34,conservative
"Hannity is an opinion editor who is open about being a Republican.

Jim ""Look at me, I'm Jim Acosta. Jim Acosta. Look at me"" Acosta says he's an objective reporter.

&#x200B;

Spot the difference.",Argonut32,e9c3car,conservative
"Dude, Hannity is an opinion editor, the don't hide that. There's a big difference. Now if you said like Shep Smith, that'd be a more fair comparison, especially since shep doesn't engage in activism like acosta",sylect,e9budzq,conservative
[deleted],,e9byxg0,conservative
They are calling for Trumps impeachment over this. Not joking. ,J0kerr,e9be3sr,conservative
I think people could take you a little more seriously if you didn’t use phrases like “Acucksta”. ,Droopy618,e9bazkh,conservative
Ben is pretty clear often about what a waste Accosta is.  Just because he agrees that this “assault” is being overblown doesn’t mean he’s defending him really.  He’s just stating a sensible point of view.  When we start going off in hysterics over trivia then we become as bad as they are.  Aren’t we supposed to be better?  Isnt that what we always say?,booblitchutz,e9bzkpy,conservative
The issue with Breitbart was they backed the administration over the reporter who was fucking bruises.,MegaBlastoise23,e9bbuao,conservative
"You can hold multiple thoughts in your head at one time.  

1) Acosta is an ass, and his behavior (both yesterday and generally) warrants a lifetime ban from the White House.

2) If a Republican did the same thing he'd be branded a patriarchal misogynist.  

3) It's not like he Ellisoned her.",FelixFuckfurter,e9bb3c4,conservative
"Ben only defended Acosta on saying to him it didn't look like it was forceful, he agreed with everything else that happened to Acosta.

Honestly seeing the video it looks like his arm is coming down.  He didn't slam his arm down he didnt pull away and push her, etc.",callthereaper64,e9bg9fi,conservative
The woman you referenced had bruising resulting from that incident. and Ben's exodus has more to do with Brietbart throwing *their own reporter* under the bus,sylect,e9bh4cg,conservative
This.,SirArlo,e9bdhu5,conservative
"Nevak I wouldn't say it was a follow up question it went from immigration, follow up, to impeachment.

I think that was definitely Acosta being an ass.",callthereaper64,e9bgkr0,conservative
"I wish I could reply to both of you guys but that must have been the most civil exchange I have heard in a long time and I salute you both. 

Cheers!",wynhdo,e9bvu0r,conservative
Just go vote democrat. Its what u really want,ExpensiveMention,e9by73s,conservative
"If you don’t think it’s unprofessional I don’t know how to even talk to some of you.  

Ridiculously unprofessional on every level.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9boizc,conservative
"It's not like he injured her, or anything, but let's be honest here.

What he DID do was act like a spoiled child, refusing to give up the mic that wasn't his to the woman he pushed away from it.  He acted very unprofessionally, and not for the first time, either.  

Alone, this isn't such a big deal, but this is easily the straw that broke the camel's back for Acosta.

He deserved to have his press pass pulled, and as far as I am concerned, he doesn't ever deserve to get it back, because neither CNN nor Acosta have shown any sort of contrition, here.",SideTraKd,e9b9l58,conservative
">we 

Don't pretend you're a conservative. ",Kistoul,e9b74pp,conservative
"They argued at length about the caravan. Jim had multiple follow up questions and comments. His last question was on a completely unrelated topic, i.e. the Russian investigation.

The intern, following Trumps direction, tried to take the mic. Looked at Trump, then tried to take it again, looked at Trump, then tried to take it a THIRD TIME. On the third time Acosta puts enough pressure on her arm that it bends at the elbow and she is clearly surprised.

This was no incidental contact. He knew his time was up, he knew she was trying to get the mic, and he used his arm to block her.

He deserved to get his pass revoked.",Tu-ne-cede,e9bnfdr,conservative
"Bullshit.  That wasn’t a “follow up “ question. He asked about the Russia investigation.  Then started ranting about immigration and the caravan.  

Before he acted like a child, yelled at a president, filibustered a press conference and accosted a young female.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9boq78,conservative
"> I dont agree with every little thing that you believe so that makes me not conservative? Lol, okay.

Your post history sure doesn't support it.  How about trying to post a positive thing or two?  And not tell a guy who says he might vote republican that he should get a refund on his college education.

https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9nploc/man_arrested_for_allegedly_threatening_sen_dianne/e7o4mqe/",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9bhcgr,conservative
"Trump suspended his access because this occurred, that's why it's newsworthy. I agree the incident is totally minor in reality",Davebo,e9b7y2d,conservative
I think the issue is Jim look at me Acosta had his question answered didn't like the answer and kept trying to ask more questions. And when the aide tried to take the microphone so another person could speak he pulled the mic away to be able to have more people look at him.,callthereaper64,e9b7mlp,conservative
"> she's just doing her job. So is he.

That's not his job.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b83ip,conservative
"> Nothing against her, you're right she's just doing her job. So is he. 

Acosta hasn't done the job of ""journalist"" or ""reporter"" in years now... 

Part of his job entails giving up a mic that is not his when asked to do so, allowing the president to respond to a question (not debate him), and quietly wait his turn and allow for others to ask their questions. 

>This aint kindergarten.

Speaking of kindergarten, his job entails basic behavior expected of a kindergartner in a classroom and he failed to do so. 

debates on acceptable physical contact aside, his behavior is and has been a joke. ",I_am_just_saying,e9b820k,conservative
"It's the legal term for what he did, or battery depending on the jurisdiction ",BeachCruisin22,e9bl7t6,conservative
"She's reaching for the mic, not touching his arm. Try again.",justhere2havefun,e9b7puh,conservative
"Like asking for something back which didnt belong to him?
",chabanais,e9b7mvi,conservative
You mean doing her job and obeying her boss' orders? ,molon-labe7,e9b7egi,conservative
The president or Acosta?,Jollybeard99,e9cmhk8,conservative
"If a Republican played keep away with the mic from a woman and shoved her hand away, there would be charges of sexism.",Dorian_v25,e9bhvgq,conservative
"[ I’m a journalist but I’m an advocacy journalist... Sometimes I’m doing investigative work, sometimes I’m doing straight reporting, sometimes I’m doing a straight news interview, sometimes I’m debating, sometimes I’m giving news and opinion which I do all the time.... It’s like the editorial page but I also do journalist work. We do our own digging, we get our own sources, we get our own information and frankly I think we disseminate more real news than a lot of other people out there](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/11/28/magazine/how-far-will-sean-hannity-go.html)",canisithere,e9cdkpj,conservative
Source?,callthereaper64,e9bfrix,conservative
They're also screaming for Accosta to sue Trump for slander.,Sideswipe0009,e9ccmio,conservative
"Kind of like those rabid feminists that use made up and clearly sexist words like ""mansplain""",MoreShovenpuckerPlz,e9ckmzl,conservative
"Yeah that's your problem, and the problem with a lot of people. What he is saying is either true, or it's not. It doesn't need to live inside some larger bubble of what is socially acceptable, which is what breeds leftism. The truth gets a backseat for what is polite, which is why reddit's system is cancerous. So bring on the downvotes, FUCK people like you. 

LOL edit: You useless mongs with no self awareness. If it wasn't for people like myself and OP your entirely ideology would be much closer to being wiped out. Sometimes I really think you spineless drones deserve every bit of what is coming your way. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9betmg,conservative
"...except you're not better, because you support a guy who uses his position of power to bully the citizens of America he should be standing up for. Taking the high road means not being adversarial for the sake of publicity.",CheerUpCat,e9c52h8,conservative
Especially when Breitbart was still Steve Bannon's 24/7 Trump train propaganda vehicle. People on our side who get mad at Shapiro for having standards are just as bad as those liberals who excuse the bullshit by the left. Bad behavior is bad behavior regardless of political affiliation. ,SirRollsaSpliff,e9bclv6,conservative
"I hear you. I would argue that a followup question should mean a question that proceeds the first, without needing to be in relation to it. ",Nevaknosbest,e9biqlc,conservative
"What I want is to have the old conservative ideology return. Small government, States rights, etc. Not to mention civility between those with dissenting opinions. We're all Americans regardless of political affiliations. I think some of us forget that.",Nevaknosbest,e9byrle,conservative
"Hmm, I'm sorry. I've personally witnessed what ""ridiculously unprofessional"" looks like. That was nothing close to what I've seen and would call to be ridiculous. I agreed with someone else that it appears distasteful, lacking in decorum per se. But what are you personally expecting from your newsreporters? I'm not asking anyone to punch someone in the face, but I want reporters to make my representatives to answer what's asked of them, since he's just an elected official. It's not like Acosta asked him a lewd or outrageous question that was offensive. This shit is just so picked apart by both sides. Nothing about this was spectacular, time to move on.",Nevaknosbest,e9bpd5d,conservative
Since when do we hold journalists to a higher standard of decorum than the president?,__space__,e9cpw1y,conservative
"I use ""we"" in the sense of ""us Americans"". Not that its any of your business, but my ideology is right-leaning independent. Socially liberal, fiscally conservative, you might say. I say Independent now because the conservatism I used to know is no longer recognizable. If Republican politians could get their head out of their ass and stop destroying the party, I will gladly vote straight R when they put up a true conservative candidate. But okay, I dont align specifically with YOUR political views so Im not a real conservative like you. That sounds like a healthy mindset you got going on there.",Nevaknosbest,e9b7mg8,conservative
"I guess we disagree on the severity of what we saw occur, but I can respect your opinion.",Nevaknosbest,e9boz0k,conservative
"We disagree on the severity of what we saw occur, but I can respect your opinion on the matter.",Nevaknosbest,e9bp0lx,conservative
"Uhhh... okay. Teddy Roosevelt was easily one of the greatest Presidents we've ever had, behind Lincoln. I like the idea of small government, but with social programs in place to ensure the weakest of us have a chance to do great things for our country. I like the idea of fiscal conservatism. I like States rights. Good enough for you? 

I'm sorry, but I don't recognize you as an authority of conservative ideology. If you want to stalk my post history knock yourself out, but there is no requirement for me to adhere to what you think a conservative should think or say or do. Last I checked this is still America and I have that right. ",Nevaknosbest,e9bj65l,conservative
"Taken by itself, this incident might be minor.  

But this is not Acosta's first incident.",SideTraKd,e9b9pef,conservative
">Trump suspended his access because this occurred,

Not really true. He suspended his access because of a pattern of behavior, not a single incident. 

The arm thing wasn't that big of a deal on its own though. ",dallens,e9bn8hm,conservative
"No, the issue is he pushed her arm away as she was taking the mic back. He touched her unprovoked. Unwanted physical contact. Granted, she was not harmed and I don't think he intended to harm. But he still pushed her arm away. He could have just handed it back or backed away instead of touching her arm.",justhere2havefun,e9b7wxu,conservative
Yeah I'm not going to defend the future and past actions of Jim Acosta. I don't know him enough to cast aspersions either way. I'm just speaking to what my eyes see. There's so much more important shit that is far more newsworthy than this.,Nevaknosbest,e9b8ko1,conservative
Battery and yes technically unwanted touching is battery. ,pro_nosepicker,e9bowk3,conservative
"She touches his hand in the process, and it appears he did not want that to happen.  If you're going to call what he did ""assault"" then you better call what she did ""assault.""

The fact of the matter is that no one here assaulted anyone and anyone claiming differently is doing so for agenda driven reasons and nothing else.  

edit:  although...the more the I think about it, the more I remember how every time I assault someone, I politely say ""pardom me, ma'am."" /s

",BigBad_BigBad,e9b84s0,conservative
Just doin’ muh job. ,BigBad_BigBad,e9b7kwj,conservative
Acosta.,johndeer89,e9cw1lu,conservative
Looks like he’s claiming to be a journalist. ,adizam,e9cr6cj,conservative
"Or you know... The first poster, if his comments are true and factual, should not need to use terms like Acucksta to try and paint him in some childish way. ",mphilly44,e9bqw4f,conservative
"I assume by the copy paste nature of your comment you mean Trump.  So who does Trump bully?  Seems to me with unemployment being historically low that he’s done more for the people he’s charged with protecting than his predecessor, who was more interested in driving Americans into the welfare state, to keep them helpless, to highlight and celebrate their victimhood because self reliance and success promotes conservative thought.",booblitchutz,e9c6m77,conservative
">mad at Shapiro for having standards

I guess you missed the video which proved Fields totally fabricated her story. She was never thrown to the ground. Shapiro ignored this and doubled down that we should believe Fields because she is a woman, and she said it happened. Even with video proof AND Shield's history of claiming she is a victim in the past.",Dorian_v25,e9bhmig,conservative
">complaiming that Breitbart supported trump

>Has no problem with cnn msnbc etc being obamas propoganda


I'm sure you agree with the people that denied Breitbart app a press pass. But you would be livid if they denied CNN or MSNBC a press pass",ExpensiveMention,e9by1ls,conservative
I can see that.  I would counter to with how many follow up questions do they get? Since it seemed to be 4 or more.,callthereaper64,e9bjzju,conservative
"> Socially liberal, fiscally conservative, you might say. I say Independent now because the conservatism I used to know is no longer recognizable.

The social conservatism has almost been completely dropped by the party as a any major part of the platform. Democrats and leftists are the social authoritarians. 


> conservatism I used to know is no longer recognizable.

Which conservatism is that? ",I_am_just_saying,e9b9oq6,conservative
"Either you are mistaken or Sanders is clearly lying. She clearly indicated the reason for the removal of his pass was the incident, not any “pattern of behavior”.  I think he grandstands more than appropriate for a journalist, but that’s not a good enough reason to remove his access, and the white house did not make any indication that was the reason.

We have to hold ourselves to a higher standard than making stuff up to fit our worldview.",Davebo,e9ca10r,conservative
"I guess what I'm saying here is, who is this an issue to? The aide? Let her file a report of assault with the police. It literally happened to her, so unless she goes to the media or to the police to describe how this wounded her in some way, this is just a distraction away from far more important things that are happening.",Nevaknosbest,e9b8e60,conservative
">  There's so much more important shit that is far more newsworthy than this.

All the more reason Acosta should not be welcomed back, he has a history of making the news about himself and making a spectacle rather than reporting on the ""much more important shit that is far more newsworthy"" ",I_am_just_saying,e9b9cm3,conservative
I agree it’s not newsworthy... but he did deserve to have his pass pulled.,Lustan,e9bds1y,conservative
"His hand is holding the mic she's reaching for. He moves and his hand gets in her way. Just like the intern, you are reaching.

Also, where did I say ""assault""?",justhere2havefun,e9bafzn,conservative
"Yeah, shockingly enough. It's almost like she's an intern and was just doing her job. Fuck her though, amiright? ",molon-labe7,e9b83h0,conservative
"Or it is an entirely separate issue, which is what my post is about, mouth breather. You didn't put forth an additional argument, you simply said the same thing I was making my point against.  And you did it after you saw I was downvoted, simply so you could get the social validation. You're exactly what I'm talking about and both too retarded and disingenuous to have any idea. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9ctn0h,conservative
"Hey, I'm listening to what he says. He acts, talks, and speaks like a bully. I don't need to pull any specific quotes -- in yesterday's briefing he told a reporter he was awful, absolutely the worst, and that the people he works for are failures. That's what a mean-spirited person does. That's what a person who acts in bad faith does. 

For the last part of what you said...well, self-reliance isn't a 'conservative' trait. The majority of people you and me have both run across with jobs mix self-reliance with community building. 

",CheerUpCat,e9cegnu,conservative
"I don't like Breitbart any more than I do CNN or MSNBC, I think both are far too rah-rah for my tastes. I have no problem with the white house denying anyone a pass, especially if they're disrespectful like that twat Acosta. That does not change the fact that Breitbart is nothing like Andrew originally envisioned it to be. What Steve Bannon has done to Drew's legacy is a shame.  ",SirRollsaSpliff,e9c5a10,conservative
"Yeah I can diggit. I would respond to that by saying a reasonable, predetermined amount of times would be best.",Nevaknosbest,e9bk9z6,conservative
"Looks like you are correct going off the official statement. I was just accounting for the fact that Trump was chastising him for past treatment of Sarah ect during that exchange. I believed this was a ""last straw"" type thing.

&#x200B;

Edit: Guess I should clarify, since I really meant ""not JUST a single incident. "".  They have warned him about outbursts ect like at the Korea Summit. It isn't like he was well behaved except for this one thing.",dallens,e9cbs9l,conservative
"If that's what the powers at be see fit to do, then let it be so. I don't care who asks the questions, I only care that my representatives answer those questions. I don't care how harsh the person is who asked, in fact I want my elected officials to squirm and sweat when they're under the spotlight. Doesnt matter if they have a D or an R next to their name. If we are entitled to anything, its answers.",Nevaknosbest,e9b9os3,conservative
"I have to disagree with you, but I can respect how you feel.",Nevaknosbest,e9bilpe,conservative
[removed],,e9b8sva,conservative
Acosta was being rude and was obviously grandstanding inappropriately.  You can’t (won’t) see or accept that because it doesn’t fit your narrative.  But a free thinker can observe that the president bluntly stood up for himself and the office of the president against a vainglorious pompous ass.,booblitchutz,e9cuehz,conservative
"Its exactly like he envisioned

Fighting corruption

Just cuz u hate trump (cjz ur racist) dooesnt change that",ExpensiveMention,e9ctshk,conservative
Agreed.,callthereaper64,e9bkm8l,conservative
You should check your facts before making claims. This is how fake news happens.,Davebo,e9cfn0f,conservative
"No I don't. This isn't an issue of big government and you know that. If you want to talk about ""loving big government"" I will talk to you about how we can eliminate massive amount of government starting with the proper interpretation of the Commerce Clause. 

This is completely within the right of the president to remove credentials or choose not to continue to answer questions from a single reporter. Sorry, this is a non-issue. Did he assault her? no. Did he touch her/push her away? yes. Has he cause disruptions like this before? Yes. Have other presidents removed people who cause disruptions? You need only go as far back as Obama.
",molon-labe7,e9b94vl,conservative
"Hey, I hear you. I don't think he was being rude though. He challenged Trump's use of the word ""invasion"". Trump responded by telling him his news organization is failing -- a pretty personal attack. Trump then berated him after his failed attempt at physically manhandling a microphone from him.

The aftermath of this was then to accuse Acosta of assaulting a woman. Trump doesn't have the balls to answer tough questions and instead intimidates, accuses, and then struts around with the power of a bully pulpit. It's a bit ridiculous to watch.

https://youtu.be/MvfqUMg10uM",CheerUpCat,e9czh8c,conservative
Yes you do. ,BigBad_BigBad,e9bbo4i,conservative
">I am similarly acting to suspend, for a limited period, the entry of certain aliens in order to address the problem of large numbers of aliens traveling through Mexico to enter our country unlawfully or without proper documentation.  I am tailoring the suspension to channel these aliens to ports of entry, so that, if they enter the United States, they do so in an orderly and controlled manner instead of unlawfully.  Under this suspension, aliens entering through the southern border, even those without proper documentation, may, consistent with this proclamation, avail themselves of our asylum system, provided that they properly present themselves for inspection at a port of entry.


>But aliens who enter the United States unlawfully through the southern border in contravention of this proclamation will be ineligible to be granted asylum under the regulation promulgated by the Attorney General and the Secretary of Homeland Security that became effective earlier today.  Those aliens may, however, still seek other forms of protection from persecution or torture.  In addition, this limited suspension will facilitate ongoing negotiations with Mexico and other countries regarding appropriate cooperative arrangements to prevent unlawful mass migration to the United States through the southern border.  Thus, this proclamation is also necessary to manage and conduct the foreign affairs of the United States effectively.


This is good, certainly, but it is simply not enough.

We should NOT be entertain the idea that ANY of these people whom are passing though Mexico could possibly qualify for asylum. There are no civil wars or any other kind of wars occurring in Mexico. If said persons are truly fleeing from torture, they must sneak asylum in the first safe country they pass through. Traveling hundreds of miles through a perfectly safe country then throwing themselves at our boarder is not ""asylum seeking"", it is a SHAM to extract ill-gotten gains from our welfare system.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d177s,conservative
"Its fucking Thursday in the afternoon.  Why can everybody else in the country be done counting but Arizona and Florida in certain dem leaning counties still pulling ballots out of their ass?  

You know why.  Fuck these assholes.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9bb2ym,conservative
"I keep seeing shit on Facebook from liberal friends in FL about 'provisional ballots'.

They are trying to trigger the 0.5% machine recount using these provisional ballots.",crackercider,e9b833m,conservative
We need to ensure that the voting process correctly reflects the populace. This voter suppression is ridiculous. We don’t need voter ID laws though. /s,tmv4,e9b70qy,conservative
"Why is Florida taking a long time to count votes surprising to people?  They have a long track record of not being able to run an election correctly and efficiently (see 2000, 2002, 2004, 2006, 2008, 2014).",DietCokeTin,e9bdgdn,conservative
"""Oh hey a warehouse full of lost ballots all voting democrat!""",scrubking,e9b8fhp,conservative
"I don’t give a damn if it takes six months, recount every ballot and verify citizenship with eVerify.  Expose this Broward bullshit for what it is, they’ve brought it upon themselves 
",CCPCanuck,e9bmn4p,conservative
Inb4 Nelson and gillum “finds” enough votes to get elected,Dank_Cartographer,e9bbxx9,conservative
"Florida still use paper ballots or some sort of paper backup to electronic voting?

As dumb as it may sound, this might be the perfect application for blockchain technology.",GFZDW,e9b720d,conservative
"Florida corruption and felon voting will mean a GOP presidential nominee wont win the white house ever again. 

Add in illegals and Puerto Rican refugess and it is assured. we may get it in 2020 but 2024 is a lost cause.",JMB_was_a_god,e9blifc,conservative
Nothing surprises me re; democrats.,JFGFNY,e9b9iu7,conservative
Trump is silent on this. Liberals will get away with this. America is dead,LastationNeoCon,e9b8x3z,conservative
They also just put Sinema in the lead in Arizona.,rjohnson99,e9btuh4,conservative
"Dems will justify it by saying ""BuSh sToLe iT iN 2000!""",Moonthrower,e9cfnzg,conservative
"Arizona is expected. The primary holdup for counting the votes is that every mail in ballot has to have its signiture verified, and they get more than a million mail in ballots. Add that to their ancient voting counting machinery, and there’s a reason no one called the Arizona race Tuesday. Everyone in the know knew there were hundreds of thousands more votes to count (And they have said approximately how many more ballots there are to count, they’re not exactly hiding information.)

Florida though, yeah. Broward county seems some sort of fucked up.",SymmetricColoration,e9bvewz,conservative
It's always the most left-wing districts that wait to report last.  You notice that?  I guess they need to figure out how many votes they need to cook up.,nited_states,e9bgjpj,conservative
"Well Florida is well known for being a hot mess when it comes to voting. But unless there really is some fuckery going on, they need to count those ballots. If my vote got cast aside for some reason, I'd be fucking pissed and I'd demand it be counted too. Not my fault someone fucked up.",Nevaknosbest,e9c9iaj,conservative
"Recount has already been triggered.  The governors race is now headed to the machine recount, and due to Broward County still counting ballots (I don't know how after all of this time), a hand re-count has been ordered.",TBSportsFan1254,e9b89ly,conservative
I’ll give you a hint: its not an accident they take so long to count the votes,Dank_Cartographer,e9bdl42,conservative
Florida doesn’t take a long time. Heavily Dem Broward County does.,1wjl1,e9bfqg5,conservative
You already know this is the end goal.,TBSportsFan1254,e9bc6g8,conservative
I used a paper ballot that was scanned into a machine. ,walkertxranger850,e9b787w,conservative
"> Nothing surprises me re; democrats.

They are just bastards that are incapable of following the law.  And aren't they pulling the same shit in AZ",optionhome,e9ba4w7,conservative
not silent anymore,JMB_was_a_god,e9c889z,conservative
"Yeah, Arizona does this every election. I don’t think they called it for Trump for a few days after. Florida is shady tho. ",Zac1245,e9bxw15,conservative
It's also so they can say there were problems and irregularities so they can file a lawsuit if they need to.,Goblicon,e9bo1sv,conservative
"If they pull this off, what hope do we have of not becoming a borderline socialist country? Anything goes? Why don't we see Republicans throwing shi-- fits and demanding recounts?",JFGFNY,e9bbllb,conservative
Lets see if he actually takes action. Words are not action.,LastationNeoCon,e9c8pmg,conservative
And then the higher ups in the GOP wonder why conservatives feel like the Republican Party has abandoned them.,nameerk,e9cv7rk,conservative
This article is obvious anti GOP satire...,RobQuinnpc,e9cvc9y,conservative
Anti-establishment satire yes. It mocks those Republicans that run on conservative ideals and then never **quite** get them enacted.,ngoni,e9cyhlv,conservative
But it's based off of truth...GOP has only been paying lipservice on this issue (along with gun rights).,workaccount35,e9d15ap,conservative
"Umm yeah, ok?",nameerk,e9cvtnc,conservative
"Control the House? Check. Control the Senate? Check. Control the White House? Check. Won’t actually do what they promised? Check. 

Business as usual.",justhere2havefun,e9d0mbi,conservative
Along with federal spending/debt,wine_o_clock,e9d40dp,conservative
But you can't do that. The right to a free press is guaranteed by the Constitution. /s,JoeWinchester99,e9d0kzg,conservative
There’s always something weird with Broward ,i_floop_the_pig,e9bljra,conservative
Yet DWS still took the race. ,nkn_19,e9bshlx,conservative
And they want us to worry about the Russians screwing with elections. Such bullshit. ,retired-vet,e9cbqel,conservative
Not enough “monitoring“ I guess.,StockSkys,e9cbscs,conservative
"This place is in fact, whack ",LegitUsernameTbh,e9bp4nf,conservative
"Yet another white male, not exactly surprised at this point ",theplatypusmaster,e9d19am,conservative
"Same law firm 2 different National Scandals they are at the center of...
Nothing to see here just a coincidence, right?     ",ozric101,e9d3xfm,conservative
It's what he says now that he's in charge that matters.,Quazimodal,e9cxzsw,conservative
How did you get this video? Is it your own or reposted?,xJownage,e9ck24f,conservative
"He is 100% correct... and there is NO disenfranchisement argument, if you were worried bout your vote  making it on time you COULD have gone to the polls in person.

Democrats OR Republicans breaking rules to steal elections is unacceptable.  ",ozric101,e9d2lxs,conservative
"I’m shocked, just shocked I tell you!",jina100,e9bz928,conservative
"They hate themselves, apparently. ",ATableForOnePlease,e9d4b1f,conservative
This is why King is no longer employed there. He is actually more independent than they are. ,justhere2havefun,e9ali6t,conservative
"When Larry King calls you out for not doing news, you know your network has failed. CNN is strictly catering to the DNC's need for its voters to be outraged.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9ancz1,conservative
"Exactly. Jim Acosta does not see his job as gathering and disseminating facts and information, it’s to stand against Trump. His remarks on a hot mic during the meeting between Trump and Kim was evident of that.",art36,e9aujb4,conservative
"I mean everyone knows this. CNN is a 24/7 cable news network. Nominally, it'd cover news. News happens all over the world every second of the day.

For over two years now something like 95% of CNN coverage has been focused purely on Trump. Unless there is some kind of huge mega tragedy or something, click on CNN at any random point in the day and it's a panel of Trump haters, Trump's name appears multiple places on the screen, and so on.

Trump should give Acosta's pass to some Youtuber. CNN doesn't need one because they aren't the press, they are all editorialists.",gargoyle_mayonnaise,e9b18wy,conservative
"Yes, but did you hear Trump put an umbrella down?",SickofInternetProgs,e9atprj,conservative
I'm glad Rotten Tomatoes has hired Larry.  It brings diversity to their cast of opinions and movie reviews.  <3,markcocjin,e9b4pfk,conservative
"http://archive.fo/Alttg

Archived link to the article for anyone who wants it.
",PrestoPesto1,e9b4q7k,conservative
Everyone can't stop talking about Trump,TravisKrooks,e9ar37i,conservative
"to ""focus"" on?

Jim Acosta stated ""I’ve just been denied entrance to the WH. Secret Service just informed me I cannot enter the WH grounds for my 8pm hit""  HIT!  He literally said HIT.",CreativeRoutine,e9axfhj,conservative
Which is a bit shocking. ,skarface6,e9b2gxm,conservative
The GOP might actually be more independent than CNN.,Mawaukey,e9bahiz,conservative
"This outrage is one of the saddest things about the state of our country today.  Outrage has replaced civil discourse.  The left has to rely upon (and artificially create) outrage against all conservative principles in order to pander to voters instead of having an informed populace.

I’m currently in college and you can’t have a conversation about anything without people retreating to their feelings.  Literally all you get if you talk about abortion for example, is “you’re taking away MY CHOICE.”  You can’t even talk about in what situations it is ethical/legal to take away someone’s choice or even the underlying principles about society.

It’s my opinion that all this stems from a lack of empathy.  I try to genuinely understand where other people are coming from and what they are going through before I even take an ideological stance in the conversation.  I don’t attack the persons morals regardless.  This consideration is just lacking from the left.",Mentat_of_Roshar,e9b1cot,conservative
"CNN's Don Lemon is openly racist. They constantly bring guests that are extremely racist and they don't hide it. Jim Acosta is essentially a thug reporter that disrespects all rules. CNN has taken people off air numbers times. 

At what point do we declare that  CNN is just DNCs Pravda?",sjwking,e9bpcje,conservative
"After the ""blue ripple"" you'd think they would do a bit of reflection on how out of touch they are with the general public... but it seems not.",tenshon,e9aq18q,conservative
"I mean, not to argue semantics, but whatever the US President says and does should be considered news, most especially to the American people considering he is our elected representative. I want to know the answers to the same questions he's being asked. Don't care who it is, Trump or Obama, they are my representative and as an American citizen I want answers.",Nevaknosbest,e9b4s6n,conservative
Just like Faux Newz,spoileralertagain,e9b1d2g,conservative
Next thing you're going to tell me is that he selfishly takes two scoops of ice cream,chii0628,e9b8npy,conservative
"I heard he intentionally tries to kill fish by over feeding, just like a serial killer would",CCPCanuck,e9b9b1p,conservative
"The guy has been the single best thing for American politics in years.  Love him or hate him, no one brings out the voters like he does.",mlmack,e9b2mzm,conservative
'Hit' is an industry term for a segment of cable news.,ngoni,e9azk2i,conservative
"That's actually industry jargon, but it definitely does have some unfortunate implications...",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b6u6a,conservative
Reflection..I see what you did there,ConservativeBrit,e9aqz5y,conservative
"> blue ripple

more like blue nipple after the dnc has sucked on it to long",Delta_25,e9b0xbm,conservative
"> but whatever the US President says and does should be considered news

To a statist? probably. To those of us who don't equate the president to a god? No.

They reported he had 2 scoops of ice cream at a dinner. They reported how he fed fish in Japan and even lied about that. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9baczz,conservative
"So it’s the only news?  It’s always the top news? 

That’s the obvious point. ",pro_nosepicker,e9b9ynx,conservative
Or that he has a button to order a Coke,asphaltcement123,e9cjkoo,conservative
"Pointing out an unintentional double analogy - I see what *you* did there! But yeah, reflection is kinda easier when the water's still.",tenshon,e9argzl,conservative
"Im not sure who is equating the President to a God. I'm not asking that I'm told what color socks he wears or how his shit went this morning. I do, however, want to know what he says and does in relation to his daily work. He's not a celebrity, he is my elected representative.",Nevaknosbest,e9bao5w,conservative
"Its news if its news, is my point. To be fair to you, there's always plenty of things in the news that aren't newsworthy. What the President of the United States says and does may affect you or me, so I want to know about it. ",Nevaknosbest,e9bahf0,conservative
"Yes and everyone here agrees with you in that we want to know when he is saying important  things in relation to his daily work but you are not acknowledging the fact that they DO cover what color socks he wears and how his morning shit went.  
  
I don't give a flying fuck that the President likes KFC but if I go to CNN to read some news the top story will be an opinion about how the President is unfit to serve because he took a picture on a plane one time w a bucket of chicken. Therefore he is super unhealthy and a gross pig and terrible person. Gtfo of here with that ""journalism"".",Finfan90,e9bdfc2,conservative
"I dont know man, i get what you're saying. I chuckled at your reply, and i get the gist of your point, but CNN or Fox News dont LITERALLY report about his morning shit. I'll concede that they needlessly report on things that need not to be reported. But I'd rather all of it than none. I'd rather sort through what's important and what isn't important to me. I like to have that choice.

Also like to have people in there to piss off the establishment, regardless of political ideologies. I don't like my representatives comfortable. I want them poked and prodded and forced to answer to the American public. Unless of course the subject matter is regarding his bowel movements or if his socks are Navy blue today. I mean, if he wants to indulge and the media wants to ask, go for it. I'll file it under ""I couldn't care less about that."" ",Nevaknosbest,e9bienc,conservative
They are going to try to pass a bill on a presidents constitutional authority? Hmmm,StillANNONin,e9ctqnv,conservative
"Outgoing losers with no clout virtue signal, story at 11",BeachCruisin22,e9ctyu1,conservative
Fuck it at this point it's like we already have Kyrsten Sinema who cares about the election results lol,mbarnar,e9cuase,conservative
I’d go to Tuckers house and remove them if he invites me ,mods_blow_goats,e9c7f4k,conservative
"Lol come on. So they're burning crosses and lynching black people? Come onnn, im not defending the actions of these particular people but that's not even close. ",Nevaknosbest,e9c786t,conservative
"Trespassing on his property, banging on the door so hard it cracks, chanting for him to leave town, and threatening to kill him and his family with pipe bombs.  They are threatening to lynch him.     
    
Besides I don't know where you get your BS definitions from but lynching doesn't require a black person present.",slam9,e9ch17g,conservative
"I'm pretty sure it's this part:

>showing up at a powerful person’s doorstep, usually at night, and generally making as much noise as possible.

That's the similar tactic. Also, trying to break into his home, and antifa sucker punching, pepper spraying, or smashing a bike lock across someone's skull is pretty damn close to lynching. But just give them time, and I'm sure they'll start doing that too.

Also, search for Crowder's antifa infiltration video. They were carrying knives and guns in hopes to actually stab or shoot people.",justhere2havefun,e9cf0kp,conservative
I pray that Justice Ginsburg has a speedy recovery and that she may have much more time with her family. A fall in old age is always a sad and horrible thing :(,UnimatrixZeroOne,e9ajgvl,conservative
It's scary how fragile we get when we get older. ,pk3maross,e9ajs9b,conservative
Old people don't take a joke. Someone at her age and as frail as she is typically does not do well with multiple rib fxs.,Chapped_Assets,e9airlz,conservative
The comments in this thread vs. the comments I read after scalise was shot....,GottaPewp,e9ajmbl,conservative
Here's to hoping she makes a speedy recovery. I wish she'd retire and spend her final years in peace. Her life seems so sad right now just trying to outlast Trump.,___-III----III-___,e9aillx,conservative
"Ooofff!  That sucks!  I broke 3 ribs when I was 19, slipped in the shower.  6 weeks of hell, *everything* I did hurt like hell; At 85, she's going to be hurting for a long ass time",Jizzlobber42,e9amj7a,conservative
Wow. ,BenchSpyder,e9aijgn,conservative
Get well soon RBG we may not like your political views but you're still a human no matter how much the left tries to demonize the right,Delta_25,e9ajj42,conservative
I hope she is well. 3 ribs is no joke.,cashflowpro,e9ajx6n,conservative
"As much as I dislike RBG, i really wish she would retire. Write a book , do a documentary.  Her recent history has been plagued to the point of possibly damaging to her credibility. She's been caught falling asleep. She's forgotten the constitution while speaking.  As much as I detest her viewpoints she has fulfilled her role as appointed. Time to do what's in her best interest rather than sticking it to Trump.",glockedup1,e9akzzy,conservative
"I hope politics doesn’t come into this at all. I really hope we’re better than that. Obviously I want her to retire, but I don’t want her to be seriously injured to do so. Here’s to a quick recovery, get well soon RBG",CatoTheBarner,e9aj9rl,conservative
"I hope she recovers soon, that is awful. If anything this should be a sign she should retire. ",Nightshade37,e9aipme,conservative
"Ugh, poor RBG. I hope she recovers quickly 😞",Wiseheart1,e9ajjbb,conservative
Whoooo boy; I hope she's okay. If she retires because of this the fight over the next justice is going to be insane. ,Maswasnos,e9ajo7r,conservative
"Just look at this comments section. Wow. 

So much class here. Not being sarcastic at all. ",Themusician67,e9ap8i3,conservative
Sad to hear. I hope she has a speedy and full recovery.,EdmundXXIII,e9amadq,conservative
"*Me (mostly centrist), coming in here to see the shitshow of people celebrating gleefully*

***Also me, very happy to instead see almost exclusively well-wishing***

Does posting here ban me from a bunch of other subs now?",Ablazoned,e9asd1h,conservative
"Our frenemy, Notorious RBG, friend to Justice Scalia. Hope she recovers quickly",RomeoMyHomeo,e9aj1ov,conservative
"She has proven to be tough as nails, I hope she recovers fully. I admire her grit that she wants to hang on to her seat, but she needs to retire. ",Kspresent,e9anu0s,conservative
"At her age that’s deadly. Not even the fall, but the recovery. I hope she recovers ",phantomcut3,e9aogzr,conservative
"Damn that sounds like one hell of a fall...
Here’s to RBG’s Health 🍻 ",Findalflin,e9ajyjq,conservative
"Get well, RBG. T&P.",fifaislife206,e9am45f,conservative
"Some real pieces of shit over on the thread over on politics.

""I just had the most morbid thought......if she gets put on life support....can her husband just never pull the plug as long as Trump is in office? And then technically he can't fill her spot?

I know that sounds terrible but technically could that happen?""

They literally care so little about her that they'd rather her hypothetically run the clock out on life support than have Trump fill her SCOTUS seat. Lefists are fucking disgusting.",allsystemscrash,e9an4lj,conservative
"top comment on the Democrats reddit page:  Is this what divine retribution feels like? What have we done wrong, God? ",Septimus_Decimus,e9alrqp,conservative
"You can see the difference between the two ideologies here.

High ranked Democrat gets sick or injured:

r/conservative: Shows concern, sends wishes

High ranked Republican gets sick or injured:

r/politics: Applauds, cheers, and celebrates",uniquecannon,e9ajvhc,conservative
She needs to be home with her family and loved ones. I have vast differences with RBG but man do I respect this women.  The thought of serving as long as she has and working til this age is remarkable. I wish her a speedy recovery but I also hope she decides retire and enjoy her life and family. She's earned it.,abuigues,e9an7s3,conservative
"Oh wow, I hope she recovers quickly. That’s never good at her age. Hopefully she’s back quickly",TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9aosm6,conservative
"I wish her well.  
  
I disagree with her politics, but she's certainly a tough cookie. Regardless of what you think of her, she'll rightfully go down as a legend.  
  
Falls for the elderly are no joke, so I hope she beats the odds and serves for however long she would have without it.",OrwellianLiberty,e9arrra,conservative
:(.  Really sorry to hear that.  I hope she can make a full recovery.  ,Tea_is_unAmerican,e9arxru,conservative
"I don't like RBG and I've joked about her dying in the past, but I honestly hope that she's okay.",MuricanStephen,e9apyaa,conservative
I have always hated the 'Supreme Court Death Watch.' I hope she gets better.,shawn77,e9ay7ga,conservative
Wishing for a speedy recovery and happy retirement!,heartless_13,e9ayw6l,conservative
"Jeeze, hope to a complete recovery. Falling at that age is no joke. ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e9ak4fj,conservative
I wish her a good recovery. How long do ribs take to heal at 85? I hope the fall was just a slip and not a sign of something worse.,Lepew1,e9ak6aa,conservative
Very distressing. The elderly have a difficult time rehabbing from falls and usually one fall begets another.  Its not uncommon for complications such as infections and sepsis to manifest in this patient population. I'm sure she will have the best care and rehab but it's a long road for an 85 year old. She will be out of commission for quite a few months and I wouldn't be surprised if she's out for the better part of 2019 healing and rehabing.,beachmedic23,e9aw0yp,conservative
"I'm hoping for her recovery.

I also hope she retires and enjoys her remaining time with her family.   She is 85 years old.  She has earned a rest.",Hillary_For_Prison,e9aw6m0,conservative
Ms. Ginsberg may the good Lord watch over you!,brubeck5,e9aynn4,conservative
I wish her a speedy recovery. ,LumpyWumpus,e9algo5,conservative
speedy recovery RBG!  broken ribs hurt. prayers for you!,methos04,e9algpd,conservative
Broken ribs are no joke.  Basic breathing hurts so much.  Prayers for her recovery ,nooneuknow42,e9alha7,conservative
"Tough lady. Hope for a speedy recovery. Really ought to step down at this point, though.",deepfeels96,e9als20,conservative
Praying for a speedy recovery. These accidents at this age are not good at all. ,programmingguy,e9apq3d,conservative
"I don’t agree with her philosophy on our constitution, but she’s been an inspiration to many Americans; specifically women. I wish her a speedy recovery.",mattyice18,e9au9z9,conservative
"Speedy recovery RBG scary thing to happen at that age.

Doubt she will ever be able to retire and actually recover under a republican senate they will push her not to.",ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e9ays1p,conservative
"God be with her during her recovery. For her own sake, i hope she retires. She should take it easy for her remaining time. She’s certainly earned it with time spent on the SC. ",Dank_Cartographer,e9al26e,conservative
"Jesus that shit is unfortunate, but maybe the silver lining is that she steps down. I'd never wish harm on anyone, but at that age it is difficult not to harm ones self. ",for_the_meme_watch,e9ak4aw,conservative
"Not like this.

I admire her conviction and tenacity, but it's time to retire, I think. Hope she recovers soon.",mwatwe01,e9almg6,conservative
"I hope she comes out of this OK.  Falling at that age can be deadly.

It's nice to see civility towards someone of the opposite beliefs as us when they're suffering as opposed to the lunatics on r/politics who are happy when someone they disagree with is injured.",ponmbr,e9akp73,conservative
"Definitely not a fan of hers, but I hope she isn't too seriously hurt and recovers quickly.",nateious,e9alfir,conservative
"Ouch. That’s going to take a long time to heal, too. ",Earthling03,e9an6gk,conservative
Dislike her polices but hope she can recover. That kind of fall at that age and size can not be good especially in the fall/winter.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9aqfw1,conservative
"i hope she recovers quickly .. in this age there are lots of risks to laying in the hospital for too long you loose muscle mass and mobility by the day and may never get it back 

&#x200B;

also thanks everyone for beeing kind human beeings in this sad show that is politics lately i am really glad to see that there are lots of people with the best wishes even for the people we disagree with ",maybe_not_a_cat,e9at81f,conservative
"Falling at her age and *only* breaking 3 ribs is a miracle in itself. Usually what happens is an ankle, hip or something is broke and they never fully recover ",Dranosh,e9avxek,conservative
"This is sad to hear, but unfortunately someone her age has pushed far to long. You just cannot continue to work into your 80s and not expect to have incidents like this. She needs to retire for her own health.  ",texanSTH,e9aomey,conservative
My grandmother just turned 90. If she had fallen and broken three ribs I'd be driving out to see her *right now*. Hope she comes out of it okay.,haplogreenleaf,e9aphac,conservative
"I hope she recovers fully and contemplates retirement.

It’s gotta be tough to deal with the stress of working on SCOTUS at her age.

Good luck in recovery Ruth. ",c_ward5,e9apk1c,conservative
"The likelihood of subsequent falls increases with each fall episode. Risk of death increases with each fall. Additionally she spends much of her time asleep during arguments. Where is the libtards outcry about fitness for duty?  Yes, it is a lifetime appointment, but would we have a comatose (alive) justice at the bench?
",Dentish,e9as00j,conservative
"She should have stepped down during Obama's admin and didnt because she was convinced Hillary would win.

I imagine she held out thinking she could outlast Trump and that isnt going to happen, she is far to old and inferm to continue her duties, this is irresponsible, she shoudl retire with soem dignity.",Manchurainprez,e9avzbq,conservative
"The saddest comment I read in that thread was some dude offering his body for her to put her brain in. It was a joke, but I guarantee people would actually do that if they could. Yet we are the cult.",Hello_34,e9az82w,conservative
"Justice Scalia passes away  and /r/politics was in a frenzy. People were actually celebrating. Now they want an 84 year old justice to “stay strong” and “resist” the temptation to pass? I just don’t get it, the hypocrisy is unparalleled.",Phillipinsocal,e9anl35,conservative
I won't wish anything bad on her. I hope she sees this as a sign though that maybe it's time to step down.,Madstork1981,e9ak7gu,conservative
"She was a good judge and has served her country well, now it's time to step down and enjoy life.",callthereaper64,e9at0i9,conservative
I don't wish suffering upon her. But I do wish that she would retire. It will benefit the entire country.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9au422,conservative
"Good work keeping it classy everyone. But seriously though, orange man bad amirite?",UltraSurvivalist,e9b9arq,conservative
CNN - Trump trips Ruth Ginsburg.,Twentyamf28,e9avxow,conservative
"That is one of the shortest Associated Press articles I've ever seen.

Weird how they didn't care to interview anybody about her condition or find anyone to comment on what it means for the Supreme Court.",dafunkmonster,e9aw895,conservative
"I always feel bad for elderly people who are injured; they're so vulnerable to complications and recovery is difficult. I understand that just breathing with broken ribs can be pure agony, so I hope that her docs are able to relieve that suffering.",JaneTheThird,e9ap78e,conservative
I hope she retires then lives happily 'til the end of her days.,Yosoff,e9aspxz,conservative
"Wow I hope shes okay, broken bones at her age is a possible death sentence but shes a tough old bird.

That said it seems like the midterms might be paying dividends for conservatives.",freedomhertz,e9at7qr,conservative
I respect her but she is getting old.,JumpyPorcupine,e9b3ygw,conservative
I hope she recovers as quickly as possible. I'm praying for her.,Nukatha,e9b47x7,conservative
"Fractured ribs are bad for anyone, but for a woman of her age & frailty it’s very serious. 

Prayers for her and her family. ",Clatsop,e9b52q0,conservative
"Horrible. I hope she can recover. Broken limbs have nothing on broken ribs; there's way more discomfort and pain during the entire healing process, which is especially long at her age. Hopefully she doesn't focus on work - even if she doesn't retire - during her recovery. The last thing she needs is stress.",burtmaklin1,e9b6mov,conservative
"How many hours a week does a SCOTUS justice work? The only reason I ask is because it seems weird that these people work well into their 80s.  

One would think they would want to get out of the Washington DC meat grinder for at least a few years at the end of their life.

I hope she recovers, and it's understandable that she wouldn't want to retire while Trump is president but perhaps she should have retired 5 years ago so Obama could have replaced her with someone of similar ideology. 

",podestaspassword,e9bqm3r,conservative
"I don't like her views, but I certainly hope she recovers. She needs to retire and enjoy herself.",blizzardice,e9bsf3g,conservative
I hope she recovers soon and gets back to good health.  Broke my ribs once.  Very painful. I dont wish that on anyone,Conservativeone,e9c8mvk,conservative
"I was a big fan of her vs Scalia in law school and how their friendship survived differences. I really hope she’s okay and she takes this as a sign to take the rest of her days easy. She has earned it, no matter what you think of her legal opinions. ",TheMongoose101,e9cas14,conservative
"Ohhh snap snap snap

Seriously though, I wouldn't wish this on anyone.",booszhius,e9aruxi,conservative
Can’t wait to see libtards blaming Trump for this. But I hope RBG recovers from this.,superdude411,e9ajl28,conservative
Somebody please link the /r/politics thread,McDrMuffinMan,e9akbvv,conservative
"In the event that RBG passes away, I think that conservatives should behave about as well as leftists did when Scalia passed away.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9alm7w,conservative
She will die in the hospital or in the bench.,Chastethrow316420,e9b3yms,conservative
*Basketball* court????,kinjinsan,e9b2iwg,conservative
I still like beer ,tiger81775149,e9anzxv,conservative
[removed],,e9alu9e,conservative
"Yeah. I'd not wish the pain of such an injury at an old age on anyways, because otherwise how would I feel if someone would wish that pain upon me.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9az9j0,conservative
"Exactly.  I don't hope she dies, but I hope she retires.  She really shouldn't be working at her age in her condition.

I pray she gets to recover and spend her remaining time peacefully.
",nited_states,e9aw83e,conservative
The elderly all fall. Seen it happen too many times.,Otto-Carpenter,e9amqii,conservative
Yeah I feel sorry for her. The beginning of the end for my grandma was a fall like this. She spent the next 1.5 years in pain and in and out of the hospital. It really sucks to watch. I hope she feels better.,StanleyKubricksPenis,e9anp4v,conservative
"I used to work with elderly people. Got to know a guy really well, seemed very healthy. One day he went to the hospital and never came back. It sucks. it is very easy for an elderly person to bite it with an injury.",Alpr101,e9ao9gc,conservative
I think she's pretty tough,RomeoMyHomeo,e9aj3x3,conservative
Having that kind of fall at her age is usually a death sentence.,Stunner900,e9aox99,conservative
"Hell, r/politics was having a party when Scalia died. ",Dtrain323i,e9ajw93,conservative
"Go read politics now. All they care about is her living. Not her health, happiness etc.",OneMe2RuleUAll,e9al7h6,conservative
"Yeah, by all accounts Ginsburg is a decent person. I hope she recovers.

 I also hope this is a wake up call for her. She should retire and spend her last remaining years with her family.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9ammlm,conservative
"It's simple. We are adults who are able to see past politics and put it aside when something bad happens. 

They are children who have no empathy or sympathy for anyone they disagree with. 

Conservatives think liberals are dumb. Liberals think  conservatives are evil. So they feel perfectly justified in hating us and celebrating when bad things happen. ",LumpyWumpus,e9alkm4,conservative
I really do feel so bad for her. ,peeves91,e9aouc0,conservative
"This, at its heart, is the difference between liberals and conservatives. It’s why as you get older you become conservative. Family, love, compassion become more important to you. ",SexAddictRecovery,e9b162x,conservative
[that is not entirely true. The overwhelming majority of people were wishing for everyone sans shooter to be ok just as here](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/6h705l/shooting_near_congressional_baseball_game/),rounder55,e9arped,conservative
"Agreed - never would wish harm on another person, regardless of politics. Hope she's back soon.",lion27,e9an01r,conservative
"It’s honestly pretty disgusting over at r/politics right now. 

They want an 85-year-old woman who is clearly too frail to continue doing her job (and has been for some time) to go back to work because fuck Trump I guess. 

They literally don’t give a shit about her. ",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e9akxew,conservative
I kinda respect it in a way.  She's a tough sonofabitch.,OrwellianLiberty,e9arucs,conservative
She deserves a happy retirement. It's easy to disagree with one's politics but she has worked hard for decades alongside health complications. I couldn't manage that job. ,BigZZZZZ08,e9avzx4,conservative
Comments like this are why I'm conservative. ,Opienus,e9amtzl,conservative
She isn't going to retire.  She is going to try and outlast Trump.  Even if she dies they will put sunglasses on her and carry her into the court.,WIlf_Brim,e9astql,conservative
"> Her life seems so sad 

So like every other NPC.",chabanais,e9ajg5j,conservative
"Sounds like she came in for discomfort, so if anything she may have gotten lucky and they may be tiny little non-displaced ones. Or she's just tough and handles pain better than most. ",Chapped_Assets,e9b1dxy,conservative
[removed],,e9ap9kx,conservative
She has a documentary. And a movie is coming out about her life. ,Jjlsat,e9amzo1,conservative
She did a documentary recently. Parts of it actually document how close she was with Scalia,rounder55,e9an1f3,conservative
If you want to cringe check out what she did with Colbert.,HohlraumHe3,e9cg34t,conservative
"I do too, but then again I watched the Gosnell movie last week and I don’t think what’s happening in abortion centers is “politics”, it’s basic human rights 🤷‍♂️",TedyCruz,e9apy1y,conservative
"> I don’t want her to be seriously injured to do so. 

It'll probably be that way she's made it clear she hates Trump and won't step down.
",chabanais,e9ajiz7,conservative
[removed],,e9aqha2,conservative
Best case scenario is that she retires and lives another 10-15 years spending time with her family.,1wjl1,e9am798,conservative
"Wishing her the best. But it does make you wonder how much longer she can realistically serve.

She's an 85 year old lady with a bad heart and she's already suffered 2 types of cancer. And now this? I'm seriously thinking there might be another SC pick for Trump in the cards.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9al6o4,conservative
Broken ribs are especially bad for old people because of the high risk of pneumonia,Marko_Ramius1,e9amcoa,conservative
"She's a little old jewish lady, who, from my experience, have super good genes when it comes to aging, so she's got that going for her. Not to mention that she is incentivized to maintain her mental and physical health, so that's another point for her. She's probably taken better care of herself than most octogenarians in the entire world. However, I worry that this fall will do her in. An injury like this could be a death sentence.",FiveHits,e9axc5d,conservative
"if she retires over this while we hold a greater senate majority the fight would be less insane but the wailing, screaming and kicking would be insane.",aCreditGuru,e9ajssh,conservative
"Probably. All those well-wishers are hate-filled racists, you know. 

/s",MadMarmoset,e9au71c,conservative
"
>Does posting here ban me from a bunch of other subs now?

Not to my knowledge. But I know that r/FuckTheAltRight and r/OffMyChest are known to auto ban people for posting in subs they don't like. If you get banned from anywhere because of your comment here, I would love to know about it. ",LumpyWumpus,e9awkxd,conservative
To your last question not really. There might be one or two subs but generally they ignore us or brigade us.,RAZRBCK08,e9auglt,conservative
Imagine the vitriol if Kavanaugh broke 3 ribs lol,Scpusa815,e9b3rry,conservative
"It has for many. So if youd say you spend most of your time in other political subs, itd be best to delete this comment and simply lurk here. ",Ledcookey,e9au6eu,conservative
Probably. Also there's a browser plugin that will put a big red tag on a comment from anyone who has commented here  so they can identify you as a Nazi.,senatorpjt,e9bhjmd,conservative
No friend to Justice Kavanaugh ,JdPat04,e9akqgq,conservative
Pneumonia is pretty damn common cause the body is in such a weakened state.,SirRollsaSpliff,e9as5q3,conservative
"Her husband died around 2010, they will have to find her a new one or at least a stand in.  But the comment about being on life support is pretty disgusting. ",shell1212,e9aou4m,conservative
Other than tell him he doesn't exist and they can do whatever they want outside of what his will is because he doesn't exist.,1amF0x,e9apa4e,conservative
"> What have we done wrong, God? 

""For starters, you burned crosses in my children's yards...""      -God

",TruthfulTrolling,e9av3u6,conservative
"Oh man, someone make a God alt and respond with a huge undeniable list. ",Human_Ballistics_Gel,e9azocx,conservative
"God: *pulls list from pocket ""Well where should I start?""",FiveHits,e9axgeg,conservative
"No one over there cares about her as a person. She's a tool through which they can push policy they want. It's all ""we need her now more than ever"" instead of actually caring about her well-being. Everything ties back to stopping Trump.

That's kind of an overarching difference between the two sides: one places people over politics, the other puts politics over people.",HornyVan,e9amb86,conservative
They don’t have to be injured. Democrats wish them to be killed.,JdPat04,e9aks81,conservative
"

Also the rand Paul attack, and many others.

And they say Trump is the one inciting violence hmmm",dtlv5813,e9ak9ia,conservative
"It's because the definition of conservative values differ from the left to the right. To the left conservative values mean racism and bigotry. To the right it means treating everyone with respect, even if they disagree with you.",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9aucqb,conservative
The hypocrisy of the Democrats is disgusting. ,guildarts15,e9akdda,conservative
"This is one of the top comments. Gilded too.

>All I want to know is where was Kavanaugh when it happened? Behind her?

>""I like beer""

>*crazy eyed push*

They're joking about Kavanaugh trying to murder her. They're laughing about this shit.

And the reply

>Kavanaugh was like ""this bitch isn't hot enough to drink beer to and rape, I'll just push her""

These people are sick.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9amzfj,conservative
If any of her ribs are broken shes out. Maybe we elect a centrist this time to be fair? Nah,AggressionSsb,e9any5l,conservative
"PMC2732099 shows that people over age 60 with diabetes and hyptertension are more likely to die after these sort of things. Given that RBJ does not appear to be obese, and likely does not have diabetes or high blood pressure, she's got as good a chance of a fast recovery as anyone her age. Ideally, (that is, if her broken rib didn't puncture a lung or do some other internal damage) she'll heal in about 8 weeks.  I can't seem to find an article on how osteoporosis (especialy common in women her age) affects healing time (instead of just increasing the likelihood of a break). If she rests well, she'll probably be okay by the start of the new year.",Nukatha,e9b5fa0,conservative
"Power and ego. That is why justices stay on the bench into their 80s. I hope she recovers fully, but she is just too old at this point.",War-Damn-America,e9bzhn2,conservative
"It's a lot of ""I hope she gets better because Trump will appoint someone I don't like"" rather than ""I truly hope she recovers because she is a fellow human being."" It's incredibly disrespectful to her.",UnimatrixZeroOne,e9al403,conservative
"No, we're not animals. Fuck this type of thinking (unless you intended it as sarcasm. But even then, that's going low). ",uniquecannon,e9am1kl,conservative
[removed],,e9apq58,conservative
"Yeah, I feel a little bad for her. She's essentially locked into working, because she'll be eaten alive and hated forever if she dares to retire, no matter what the cost to her personally or her family.  

She should retire and live out her days in peace with her family and friends. 3 broken bones isn't a joke in an 85 year old.   ",traxxusVT,e9b0ou4,conservative
"And they're lucky if they're found. A friend of my father in law fell in his home and lives alone. He wasn't found for more than three days. He was severely dehydrated and spent ***MONTHS*** in the hospital during which they expected him to pass on multiple occasions. Thankfully he did not, but it was a serious reminder to me why things like lifealert exist (as much as I made fun of the ""help I've fallen and I can't get up"" when I was younger.)",RampantAndroid,e9btrlk,conservative
100% of the time,SonOfSite,e9b8kez,conservative
Same with my grandfather.  It was so depressing.  It was the start of a gradual decline over 2 years in which the last 1.5 years were in assisted-living.  Still breaks my heart.,TBSportsFan1254,e9b1fam,conservative
"I've heard it said that, ""When you stop moving, you start dying.""

Any injury in the elderly has the chance to reduce mobility, and ai think that's the biggest risk to health.",nited_states,e9b1fl1,conservative
"Same. Except it was about 6 months, IIRC.",skarface6,e9b3bqj,conservative
"Yep, this happened to my grandma last year who was the same age. She died about a month later. Hope she can spend her remaining time with family in as much comfort as possible. ",OverneathTheSkyBridg,e9brx24,conservative
"you'd be surprised. > 64 yr olds with rib fractures have an increased risk of things like pneumonia, ARDS, and respiratory failure. The mortality rate of someone > 64 with a rib fracture is > 22% which is over double the younger group. Multiple fractures also increase the risk of pneumonia by 1.16 and death by 1.19.

Old people be frail yo. I hope she recovers well. I also hope she'll find a way to enjoy her time remaining on this mortal coil.",aCreditGuru,e9ajn2b,conservative
"You can be as tough as nails, but when you’ve got a frail 80+ year old body how tough you are doesn’t matter.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9arlu6,conservative
I think the media plays her up as being very tough so she looks less irresponsible for not retiring sooner,therock21,e9aq8jf,conservative
"In my Constitutional Law class in law school my classmates legitimately joked with glee about Scalia's death, and mocked him relentlessly about decisions he didn't get to rule on because of his death.

I wonder how they'll treat RBG.",sputnik_steve,e9aljo2,conservative
"""Obama found his final Horcrux!"" Oh, they thought that was so funny. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9alhe2,conservative
"There is something seriously wrong with hardcore liberals. It's not that they're not religious. I'm not religious and plenty of conservatives, libertarians and moderates aren't. It seems like they feel that they've been wronged in some way, and they are obsessed with getting revenge. Combine that with decades of dehumanizing the Right in school, the media, and Hollywood and these angry people think they have the right to treat other human beings like dog shit.",LibertyTerp,e9b1mww,conservative
"And of course they fantasize about stacking the courts:

&nbsp;


>Honestly if Trump replaces RBG I feel like the case for Democrats packing the courts becomes a lot stronger.

reply:

>I think the case is already strong, but it has to be done correctly. The current law schools represented in the Supreme Court are: Harvard (5) and Yale (4). Democrats need to make an appeal to fill the courts with a more diverse group of Constitutional lawyers from all over the country. That's the only way this can be sold. **We have to get rural America on our side** or this would never move forward.

&nbsp;

lol",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9aly6g,conservative
At her age there is no such thing as a full recovery. ,ozric101,e9anhe4,conservative
Did you see the one about building a cage for her and her needing to spend the rest of her life in it? They're fucking insane.,HonorMyBeetus,e9apt3f,conservative
"to be fair, i don't care about her happiness either",sylect,e9aqial,conservative
"A decent person, maybe, but a horrible SCOTUS judge, with dismissive disregard for the Constitution.",ozric101,e9anmbx,conservative
"Ginsburg attacked Trump during an election, violating centuries of supreme court decorum and historical precedent.",Reven1911,e9aztz1,conservative
"Hitler cried at the symphony.  That did not make him a decent person.
Actions define our merit, Ginsburg's decisions define her.  She is simply a wildeyed radical New York city leftist committed to legislating from the bench. Her actions defy decency.",Dentish,e9asi07,conservative
"> They are children who have no empathy or sympathy for anyone they disagree with.

And despite this they crow on and on about how empathetic they are, not realizing that their actions put the lie to that claim quite clearly.  

They don't even know the definition of the word, they just see it as a synonym for ""good"" and so, being so convinced of their rightness, apply it to themselves.",anuser999,e9ay55p,conservative
"i like the way the west wing put it:

""conservatives hate liberals because conservatives think liberal believe they are dumb, liberals hate conservatives because they are dumb""",sylect,e9aremk,conservative
"This is one of the top comments. Gilded too.

>All I want to know is where was Kavanaugh when it happened? Behind her?

>""I like beer""

>*crazy eyed push*

They're joking about Kavanaugh trying to murder her. They're laughing about this shit.

And the reply

>Kavanaugh was like ""this bitch isn't hot enough to drink beer to and rape, I'll just push her""

These people are sick.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9an43z,conservative
"Actual comment I saw: 

""If she dies and is on life support, can't we just keep her on life support until Trump's out of office? I know it sounds terrible, but why couldn't we do it?"" 

Diseased minds churn out diseased ideas. ",GenJuanitoPequeno,e9ano4n,conservative
"Agreed

And the fuckin harpies screeching ‘omg this can’t be happening to me right now’

Like, bitches, this has nothing to do with you
",CCPCanuck,e9aqio5,conservative
"Libs don't care about anyone they pander to. They want your vote, plain and simple. ",Kemaro,e9anom8,conservative
"They don't give a shit about her, they didn't give a shit about Christine Ford... Nothing matters to the left but delivering losses to President Trump. They sit there and point their fingers at Republicans, calling us all sorts of things from stupid to straight-up evil, while time and time again displaying that they are COMPLETELY morally bankrupt. It's all about political wins to them; people don't matter. People are nothing more than pawns to the left ",mnslice,e9b4s5k,conservative
"> They want an 85-year-old woman who is clearly too frail to continue doing her job (and has been for some time) to go back to work because fuck Trump I guess.

I literally don't. I want her to retire *today* to spend what time she has left with her loved ones, you useless liberal fucktards in r/politics, and if you didn't *collectively* have the reading comprehension of a retarded golden retriever, you'd easily see that. ",soylent_absinthe,e9b6zxj,conservative
"True, you can say what you want about her but she has been a fighter all her life",Isredditreal2009,e9awv9l,conservative
"That’s her decision to make.  Yes it’s sad that she is not likely to have a “golden years” retirement, but this is the life she is choosing and she’s a great justice that should be celebrated, regardless of her personal political leanings.  If she does retire or god forbid die in office then the duly elected government will appoint and confirm/reject the justice they see fit.  That’s the system and it works amazingly well!

Unfortunately some people in this country have no respect for this great system when it doesn’t go exactly the way they want.  Sad.",booblitchutz,e9c7ddr,conservative
So did you sleep through all the reddit conservatives celebrating McCain's death?,KingAegon6,e9axil3,conservative
[removed],,e9ankc3,conservative
[removed],,e9anlz1,conservative
"Many of her supporters may be NPCs, but she is not. She just has strong (and wrong imo) convictions, but gets along with people of different political beliefs. NPCs never welcome debate.",___-III----III-___,e9ajr08,conservative
"No he is pointing out how they don’t care about people, just politics and how we shouldn’t do the same as they do. Just pointing out a fact.",Ilikeminewelldone,e9aqg0v,conservative
".....?

no he's not

>we may not like your political views but you're still a human

not really ""demonizing",I-Jest,e9argav,conservative
There's a joke here about falling down instead of stepping but would be inappropriate before she makes a full recovery. Get well soon.,Finfan90,e9aoj24,conservative
"I think the people here do honestly want her to make it, regardless of ideological differences. They value life, even those of their enemies. ",mkgandkembafan,e9atovw,conservative
"Beyond a shadow of a doubt she cannot last 6 more years.  Two, though?  We'll see.  In any normal situation a justice would retire in her shoes.  She might just hold on out of pure spite, though",sputnik_steve,e9algqv,conservative
"Not to mention she's known to fall asleep in the court lol. 

But the liberals think it's cute because she's RBG. If good ol' Clarence nodded off during a case, I'd bet we'd get nothing but ""Is Clarence Thomas ready to retire?"" for months from CNN.",GenJuanitoPequeno,e9ans6q,conservative
I think it depends on the timing- if they start the confirmation before the new Congress starts we'll be in for a huge senate fight. If it starts afterwards the fight will just be in the streets. ,Maswasnos,e9ak028,conservative
True that,RomeoMyHomeo,e9aovww,conservative
"Yup, all sorts of infections are possible, especially in the hospital which is a highly infectious place. This is why so many elderly die after breaking bones. It’s not the fall that kills them, it’s the complications that do",phantomcut3,e9as7y3,conservative
"Again, shows how little they care about her as a person. They only care about her as long as she can be used to stop the big bad Drumpf.",allsystemscrash,e9ap0cb,conservative
It's strange seeing Democrats unironically appeal to God. The party abandoned Him long ago.,an0nymous_bosch,e9arlnv,conservative
">I hope she has whatever the opposite of a DNR is - a keep alive at all costs form. Even if she's brain dead, keep her hooked up and ""alive""

",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9anhvv,conservative
"Steve Scalise, Scalia, Barbara Bush, even that time a train carrying Republicans crashed into a truck. There were people in /r/politics either celebrating their death or hoping for and celebrating their injuries. They're a spiteful lot.",burtmaklin1,e9b5r2f,conservative
Kavanaugh was considered a 'slighly right of center' judge. Barrett this time.,unibuckeye,e9aypvu,conservative
Well that is good news. Suffering with cracked ribs for protracted periods is not anything you would wish on anyone.,Lepew1,e9b65zl,conservative
They're joking about Kavanaugh murdering her because she wasn't hot enough to rape atm. And the comment is gilded.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9anboi,conservative
"Exactly. She is a fellow human being, first and foremost. We should be caring about her health and happiness, not on the politics.",UnimatrixZeroOne,e9amgm8,conservative
"The roles being reversed Harry Reid would have done the exact same thing.  He already killed the filibusterer for judicial nominees, there would be no way that a Dem senate would have held hearings on, lets say, a Trump nominee in the last year of his presidency.  So, its time to get past it snowflake. 

I am actually referring to the disgusting people in the media and social media who celebrated at Scalia's death.  While I dislike the judicial philosophy of RBG, I wouldn't treat any human being badly if they are suffering.  For leftists, on the other hand, their politics has become a religion and they can use it to justify virtually any level of malevolent behavior.  

Also, here is a thought.  Maybe trolling on r/conservative, a sub that offers you nothing is a real good sign that you are a loser IRL.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9at7d2,conservative
"She is crazy. I would have retired January 21, 2009 if I was her. ",overide,e9b1d4s,conservative
"As far as I know there's also no real treatment, just bandage them up and wait for them to heal. Not the same, but I had a broken collar bone, just got a sling and told to wait.",bt999,e9bgj0h,conservative
Seriously. I had a great grandmother who lived to be 101 until she fell and broke her hip. She died in the hospital 3 days later. ,angethedude,e9ajsjy,conservative
Thats my concern too. Age can complicate recovery. ,Wiseheart1,e9ajtf6,conservative
"Saw on twitter someone mentioned a multiple rib fracture injury turns into a serious life threatening condition in about 22% of cases of elderly individuals. 

",Roez,e9amtws,conservative
"There’s also the possibility of a flail chest which kills perfectly healthy people all the time. I hope she recovers, but let’s be realistic here. She’s 85 years old and had cancer twice. ",Lawlosaurus,e9arv7t,conservative
"How was Con Law?  I don't take it until next semester, but I'm really looking forward to it.  I'm hoping to read plenty of Scalia dissents. ",coolphred,e9as4zl,conservative
It’s the difference between seeing the other side as misguided vs seeing them as evil.,Smitty7712,e9b8y1z,conservative
"Religion isn't required to be moral, but Judaism and Christianity serve as very good wards against resentment. ",NoGardE,e9b9plk,conservative
A legitimate case for packing the courts is non-existent. I don't understand how people can be this short sighted and genuinely stupid.,Galax-e,e9aoa34,conservative
"What's really irritating is how they try to frame it as a non-partisan issue. ""The Supreme Court is broken"", they say. 

No it's not, it's just not full of leftist crusaders. 

If Clinton had won, we'd be seeing these same leftist law professors saying ""The Supreme Court is functioning properly"", and everyone knows it.",paulbrevik,e9aq4tv,conservative
"> We have to get rural America on our side

I'm sure arguing that you don't really have constitutional rights and if you think it actually says what it means that makes you a racist, is a great way to get that rural vote back on your side. 

Lets be real though, those rural people probably didn't go to a college and get a liberal arts degree which makes them all uneducated indbreds so why bother talking to them anyway... /s ",ed_merckx,e9bg1ne,conservative
I would like to see more than Harvard or Yale in there. That is a real issue I think he's right on. There's like one southerner on there and that's Justice Thomas. There are no mid-westerners. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9atmch,conservative
I hope this is the catalyst for her to retire and recover and enjoy the rest of her life with her family.,RAZRBCK08,e9at86g,conservative
"Scalia liked her. And unlike the modern left she was able to put aside politics and share a fondness for him as well.

I do not like her, but I don't think she's a bad person.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9b8tof,conservative
"Possibly the worst show on television, especially that ham-fisted, God-awful, poorly-researched segment on the Christian character's beliefs.",richardguy,e9b7qli,conservative
"i dont mind dark jokes but those aren’t even funny. theres nothing clever about them..

",Highcyndaquil,e9anfex,conservative
"They are legitimately, actually mentally ill. I've found that they lose their minds as soon as you ask them if they are on anti-psyche meds, which most of these young SJWs are. Just because you have mental illness, it does not warrant being such an awful person.",FiveHits,e9awz5r,conservative
"I can't find this anywhere, least not near the top, or guilded. Do you have a link?

I just see a lot of people wishing she'd get better soon?",WongaSparA80,e9avcqt,conservative
"As a matter of law, if you are brain dead, you are dead.  It doesn't matter if they are on a ventilator and the heart is still beating, they are dead.",WIlf_Brim,e9asxo9,conservative
They're upgrading from dead voters to dead judges.,rjohnson99,e9at4b4,conservative
What despicable language. People don't think about what comes out of their fingers these days on social media; I guess its easier being crude when there isn't a name behind the account.,HighLatencyRaptor,e9b03mj,conservative
Until they have enough power that your vote no longer matters. ,RutCry,e9ax9v1,conservative
"Where were they, and were they anything other than a minority? ",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b2pd2,conservative
"I didn't see any celebrating a man's death. The closest thing I saw was people being excited that Lindsey Graham apparently grew a spine after McCain passed, which isn't exactly untrue.",mnslice,e9b503z,conservative
Part of human nature is to oppose stances and actions you find appalling.,sunder_and_flame,e9aw1ee,conservative
"No, her poor condition even prior to this accident, and the suffering she daily endures out of pressure and perceived duty to serve the liberal cause is what's sad.

Your willingness to feign ignorance and impugn another altogether unimplied meaning makes it easy to see which camp you're in. Intellectual dishonesty is a common leftist trait.

Stop twisting words and pretending to misunderstand.",Armageddon_It,e9axwdq,conservative
"""I can't imagine what this place would be -- I can't imagine what the country would be -- with Donald Trump as our president.""   

derp",chabanais,e9aju24,conservative
[removed],,e9aqykn,conservative
[removed],,e9arle7,conservative
"She needs to recover so she can enjoy her retirement. 

She should have stepped down when Barry could have replaced her but she probably deluded herself like all the other Leftists did that a Republican could never become president again.
",chabanais,e9aoqf6,conservative
There are always going to be bad apples. You can't' judge a tree off of a few bad apples. That's what makes the right different from the left.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9auhao,conservative
"Her retirement window was 2008-2010 and she didn't go for it. She'll stay on the Court until the end, I'm sure.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9almeo,conservative
She lives off of pure hatred for Republicans. It’s easier to swallow than to see what she has fought for is corrupted and anti-freedom. ,Dmfconrad,e9aqemg,conservative
"McConnell can wait, he has no reason not to.",1wjl1,e9amh4q,conservative
"You can say the same about any individuals or demographics: as soon as their political utility is gone, they're kicked to the curb. I mean, Dr. Ford was a 24-hours a day media darling just a month ago. Now? ",TruthfulTrolling,e9auzgo,conservative
Exactly.,1amF0x,e9asf7m,conservative
Denied Him 3 times during their convention. Watch the video its next level omen shit right there.,papatim,e9bdlsj,conservative
"The sad thing is I believe you, even if I don't want to. I'm afraid to even look for it. I knew many were awful, but not *this* bad.",UnimatrixZeroOne,e9ankkf,conservative
"Not that I'm drawing a comparison, but Hitler was a fellow human being also.",tenshon,e9atett,conservative
Agreed. I respect the hell out of her for not retiring just because a democrat is in office though. She said she’d work until she couldn’t and that’s exactly what she’s doing. ,TadKosciuszko,e9b9z7u,conservative
"Yeah cracked ribs heal on their own and are damn painful. Hope she does well. My 78 year old grandmother has been nursing a bad leg laceration for 5 months. Your body doesn't heal at that age like it used to.

All the best to RBG",LazyGoron,e9bizq7,conservative
Broken hips are like a death sentence for the elderly. ,larrykins,e9aoc6y,conservative
"Yea you have basically a 20-30% chance of dying in the next year if you break your hip over the age of 65, and it goes up if you don't fix it within 2 days. If you're a little old white woman, don't fall and break your damn hip. ",Chapped_Assets,e9b0zam,conservative
Same. Nana was 93 when she broke her hip. They knew that’d be the end right away. ,OstentatiousSock,e9b8vaw,conservative
"I saw someone mention pneumonia is likely also, because they’re unable to take deep breaths. ",Lucius_Funk,e9avzhp,conservative
Yea I think it was a Journal of Trauma study that said it's 20% higher mortality and 27% chance of pneumonia in the elderly with rib fxs and it goes up with each one. ,Chapped_Assets,e9b1qsz,conservative
"Like most things in law school, it depends on the professor.  My professor was a solid left-winger but who was really committed to academic honesty and paying attention to dissenting opinions just as much as the majority opinion.  That created an awesome environment to study con-law.  Dude retired three years ago and I feel bad for all the students who won't get to study with him.",TBSportsFan1254,e9b1l7q,conservative
"It was the class I was most looking forward to law school.  It was awful.  My professor was a bleeding heart leftist.  He exclusively lectured on the civil rights cases, affirmative action, and anti-gun laws.  He half-assed his way through any case or topic that wasn't part of his leftist career before teaching.  I feel absolutely robbed of a massive portion of my legal education.",sputnik_steve,e9aszyj,conservative
"I think that's it. They feel totally justified in being cruel. Americans who we call heroes shot Nazis in the head. If we're as bad as Nazis, yelling and insulting us is positively mild.

But it's 100% wrong. Most liberals talk to Republicans regularly and think of them as normal, nice people, and probably don't even realize they're Republican. If you asked a liberal if their neighbor Jim was evil, they would say no of course not. But they would say Republicans are evil. But their neighbor Jim is a Republican... and when forced to face reality they would admit that Jim obviously isn't evil, he's actually a great guy.",LibertyTerp,e9bb077,conservative
It's all they have since they were long dicked by trump in 2016. I mean two freaking justices in two years! And now an actual chance that rbg will retire never mind Mitch ramming young conservative justices at breakneck speed! Court packing (which will never work) is the only thing they have left.,brubeck5,e9axfto,conservative
"You now have leftists talking about abolishing the Senate.  But they were perfectly happy to wield the Senate's power when the Democrats controlled it.

It's all about power.",dafunkmonster,e9awmv1,conservative
">If Clinton had won

*""...but she didn't, because the Electoral College is broken!""*

&nbsp;

Yeah. Any system that doesn't let the Dems win is malfunctioning, it seems.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9aq9aq,conservative
Any segment of the American government that doesn't give them what they want and ** *now* ** is broken in the eyes of the left.,Khalinov,e9atbyx,conservative
"And if we proposed stacking the court, they'd be screaming about fascism at the top of their lungs.",Reven1911,e9azqlc,conservative
"That's some wholesome partisanship.

I think we need more of this.",dafunkmonster,e9awpyj,conservative
"I love it, favorite show. Yes, a psycho leftist wrote it, still, I have a raging boner for Aaron Sorkin's works",sylect,e9befsy,conservative
There’s nothing clever whatsoever at the jerk off echo chamber over there. ,MazzyFo,e9ar66e,conservative
"Well thats all they have, is just being mean spirited and dark. Look at r/politcal""humor"".",Eternal_Reward,e9aun6d,conservative
Have you seen the state of comedy today? The PC crowd has utterly killed it.,auryn0151,e9aqitv,conservative
It’s literally the second reply to the top comment. Are you sure you’re on Reddit?,gt4674b,e9axojh,conservative
"Also, it's kind of hard to make a case for removing the president from office on the grounds that he's not fit to do the job, while simultaneously making the case that a hospitalized vegetable is capable of hearing and deciding cases.

And yet, here we are.",dafunkmonster,e9aww04,conservative
"I think mods here and /r/republican did a good job cleaning them up, but /r/the_donald had a bunch (though mostly downvoted). https://imgur.com/Zprhk5v",KingAegon6,e9bckun,conservative
"Thankfully they were heavily downvoted, but they were way more frequent than you'd hope. Here's a selection from /r/the_donald I was able to pull up: https://imgur.com/Zprhk5v",KingAegon6,e9bchfi,conservative
"Ignore him, he’s a troll and he’s been doing this on other threads in this sub. Mods, do your job please.",NightFreak87,e9b5axa,conservative
KaVAnaUgH iS tOo pArtiSaN To bE a JusTicE,paulbrevik,e9akb9u,conservative
"He is literally calling for the right to take the high road. The left demonized Trump, Shapiro, Kavanaugh, and the list goes on and on. ",Ilikeminewelldone,e9astwq,conservative
Criticizing is not the same thing as demonizing ,darunia75,e9av3mu,conservative
"I appreciate the back up, but your just gonna get downvoted too. Sorry duder, didn’t mean to drag others down with this. ",Envy8372,e9ash9o,conservative
Saying the left demonizes the right is demonizing them?,ICameHere2LaughAtYou,e9asr0w,conservative
"She was greedy and wanted to retire under the first woman president and have a woman nominated to take her seat.  She wanted that more than she wanted a respectable female president.  

I really feel bad for her, that she took such a gamble on something she believed in so strongly, and lost.  But when you support a candidate as atrocious as Hillary, and put all your eggs in her basket of deplorables, this is what happens.",sputnik_steve,e9als1m,conservative
What reason would there be to wait for the new Congress? The Republicans gained seats in the Senate? It's not like they would try to sneak in a confirmation before Dems took power.,Drewbagger,e9amrkk,conservative
"Same happened to people like Ossoff and Beto. Got a lot of big money donations but then they lost, so they're old news.",allsystemscrash,e9b5k6t,conservative
Somewhere a rooster crows.,an0nymous_bosch,e9bdxx7,conservative
"https://old.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9vaabz/supreme_court_justice_ruth_bader_ginsburg_85/e9aizuj/

https://old.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9vaabz/supreme_court_justice_ruth_bader_ginsburg_85/e9alby0/",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9b98kt,conservative
"And for comparison, here's the Donald's pinned post [https://i.imgur.com/F97KglA.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/F97KglA.jpg)",McDrMuffinMan,e9ao39j,conservative
"He actually did evil things and was directly responsible for the deaths of millions.  RBG has done nothing close to this.

(Yes, I can see the abortion angle, but it’s not like she was part of the RvW decision)",Masterjason13,e9b5dy9,conservative
"We just went over this in school yesterday. According to my teacher, what often happens is the hip or sometimes the femur will crack due to wear and tear plus osteoporosis. And then comes the fall. The loss of bone density is what makes this so hard to recover from for someone over 60. Hopefully she gets some peaceful time with her family before she goes...",Nuevahombre123,e9atfmk,conservative
"They really are. It becomes dangerous when the anastomoses around the neck of the femur get ruptured. Blood accumulates and can clot or get infected, and it can often be lethal for geriatric patients.",Hayes_for_days,e9beaov,conservative
"My business ethics professor (who was a lawyer, just taught this specific class in the business school) was a raging leftist who used to work at a regulatory agency where she said her motto was ""guilty until proven guilty, because you can't work in finance and be completely innocent at least morally"". That said she was an excellent legal mind, prepared me incredibly well for the legal/compliance portions of future tests, gave us good insight into how regulators look at banking industry (I went to work at an investment bank out of college) and had an interesting spin on things, despite thinking she was basiclly wrong in her view on everything. For example when asked how the effect of ""ending for profit banking"" might be bad for the economy, keep in mind this was pre financail crisis, she responded that it didn't matter and tough measures had to be taken. She was dead serious about it. 

That said she was never once rude to you as a perosn, while she attacks your ideas she never once called you a piece of shit, or a racist, or thought you didn't deserve a response or conversation simply because she disagreed with you. I found out through a grad student who I kept in contact with that ended up getting a job at my business school, that she had basiclly been forced out of the law school because she wouldn't alter her legal curriculum in the way they wanted her too.... ",ed_merckx,e9bfrpo,conservative
"That's truly unfortunate.  I'm only going to law school part time, but so far my professors have not brought personal politics into the lectures.  ",coolphred,e9b22u9,conservative
I had a class similar to that with my master’s. I thought it would be fantastic and interesting and the professor killed the fun with his leftist bent.,skarface6,e9b3jqd,conservative
[removed],,e9c6doa,conservative
"Things like these make me glad I'm on the right. [Even r/the_donald is wishing her well.](https://www.reddit.com/r/The_Donald/comments/9vaf99/we_dont_like_her_ideas_but_do_not_wish_her_harm/) But man, you should have seen r/LateStageCaptalism when McCain died.",dgd_mobius_centurion,e9be0et,conservative
"If they ever control the senate again.  Given the way polarization is trending most red states may never elect democrats again.  Trump won 30 states.  Some of those are purple though, like Michigan, PA, and Wisconsin though.  In PA and WI we have one GOP senator each.  Florida now has two GOP senators and a GOP Governor.  And North Carolina does as well.  So the GOP has a virtual lock on the Senate for a LONG time and most likely beyond that.  Eventually Manchin will retire.  We'll recapture the lost seat in Alabama in 2 years.  The left will cry about low population rural states with too much influence, but nobody cares.",Reven1911,e9az3ry,conservative
"Can we just divide up the country already?  Seriously, I'm feeling like I have absolutely nothing in common with the left anymore.  It's probably better to just go our own ways before it comes to blows.",anuser999,e9axzex,conservative
And the same people call Trump a fascist... LOL.  It's all **projection**.  They project what they really are onto others because they know they're fucked up in the head.,Reven1911,e9az9t3,conservative
Yup can’t seem to figure out that in the real world everyone does not get a trophy,billswinthesuperbowl,e9au0ia,conservative
"Sorry, I normally have it default sorted by Best. Seems like a tasteless joke. ",WongaSparA80,e9ayyd3,conservative
Hypocrisy has always been their strong suit ,mnslice,e9b4woq,conservative
"Mm, that's the important bit. You can find a handful of people echoing literally any political sentiment imaginable, but the votes tell a much more important story of how many people actually agreed with it.

My thoughts on McCain are I'm glad he's not influencing politics anymore. I'm not gonna dance on his grave.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9bcq79,conservative
"Ah, well, I choose not to associate with those /r/t_d folks ",mnslice,e9bckww,conservative
[removed],,e9at2d1,conservative
"> She was greedy and wanted to retire under the first woman president and have a woman nominated to take her seat. 

I mean she can still get half her wish and have Trump appoint Amy Coney Barrett to take her place.",jwt155,e9asbaa,conservative
Trump might just nominate woman to fill her seat.,coolphred,e9aslck,conservative
"First of all, some people here are already assuming it's a vacant seat, which is a bit rushed in my view. Second, it may be easier to go through a confirmation fight without the seats in the Senate changing in the middle of it. Again, we have two full years to do this. Let's just be patient.",1wjl1,e9an38t,conservative
"Yep. I was watching stunned. They didnt do it once, they didnt do it 4 times, they did 3. Was crazy.",papatim,e9be58t,conservative
"She did play a pivotal role in Whole Woman’s Health v. Hellerstedt, the biggest abortion case since RvW.

Not to mention Obergefell v. Hodges, which played a big part in normalizing same sex relations which many believe could ultimately cause the fall of society.

My point is, though, being human in itself is not reason enough for giving someone unconditional respect, as was suggested by the comment.",tenshon,e9b6f9w,conservative
"Your inability to handle opposing viewpoints and your inability to conduct yourself in a civilized manner is why your party is crumbling and why you're probably a shitty lawyer.  

What else did I want to learn in conlaw?  Gee I don't know, the fucking commerce clause?  Takings?  Impeachment?  The whole fucking course outside my teacher's bullshit agenda?

Of a party of insufferable people, you really stand out from the rest.  I can't imagine what your parents could have done to raise someone as ignorant yet self assured as you.  I hope you don't fuck up your kids like they did to you.",sputnik_steve,e9c75ay,conservative
"They're just so much more brainwashed. Let's be honest, we all hear a lot from our side and are more likely to believe it than if we weren't on the Right. People are pushing agendas and maybe we also get influenced at times.

But it's real easy to completely shut yourself off from all non-liberal points of view. I'm sure many liberals never hear anything from conservatives or libertarians or any other way of thinking. 

Mainstream society makes sure liberals are comfortable in their cult. Us on the other hand, we can't avoid liberalism. Like it or not, we are spoon fed liberalism by school, the news, and Hollywood. So we have to see both sides. Liberals usually haven't even heard a single decent argument for our point of view.  ",LibertyTerp,e9c0b89,conservative
"I don't see how you can do that.  We have a common currency, shared debt, and we depend on interstate trade and travel way too much.  Plus, even within red states like texas, the major cities are deep blue territory now.  At best you can delegate more power to the states and local government.  But it should have been that way for a long time.  Blue states that love abortion, high taxes, millions of poor immigrants, and transgender bathrooms should go ahead and embrace that.  Leave us out of it.  The problem is they know it's not possible for them to survive.  Businesses will flee the high tax states for free red states if they pull that shit.",Reven1911,e9azgb9,conservative
"Not easily, no.  Who would take the debt?  Who would take the assets?

I fear it will come to civil war first.  I hope not, but I fear it.

We don't even have common ground on our basic human rights anymore.  The left only even mentions rights when it's convenient.  When rights are an obstacle to power, they seek to steamroll them.

Unfortunately, I think the deck is naturally stacked against individual rights and limited government.  It's incredibly easy to amass and centralize power.  It's extremely difficult to limit power and keep it diffuse.

More and more, I'm coming to the conclusion that a constitutional republic is always doomed to a short, finite life.  Human nature favors centralizing power in the hands of autocrats.

I've given up any hope of seeing any progress in the direction of liberty in my lifetime (not without avoiding major collapse).  The best I can hope for is to stick a few fingers in the dam and slow the rising tide of a life of servile obedience to the (leftist) state.",dafunkmonster,e9b1k5l,conservative
More like dividing rural and urban. Suburban is purple territory. Almost every city in every red state is blue.,AndYetAnotherMichael,e9b0q29,conservative
"It was a pretty big handful. I'm having trouble finding most of it now, but I remember being really disheartened when reading the comments when it first happened. ",KingAegon6,e9bcw5q,conservative
"Probably smart, but they will always be associated with conservatives and conservativism in general nowadays
",KingAegon6,e9bd5sm,conservative
"Generalizing and demonizing are different words 

He/she is generalizing the left without demonizing them. 

Edit: I meant to reply to another post, not specifically this one but oh well. ",wyattpatrick,e9axh8e,conservative
"Don't you know? Conservative women aren't real women, they just do what their husbands tell them to do so they're basically just men.",Mewster1818,e9b8xey,conservative
"It’s literally 3 months until the new senators take up their positions. There’s no reason not to wait if, god forbid, she doesn’t recover from this.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9as10n,conservative
[removed],,e9c7qsz,conservative
"That means its hard, not that its impossible. And quite honestly, if we keep going down this road for much longer, civil war will be on the table.

And regardless of how traumatic any separation might be, civil war is many times worse.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b2uwa,conservative
"I agree that it would be exceedingly difficult, but compared to the horrors of an actual hot civil war - especially considering the split is now urban/not instead of along a clear line - it would be preferable no matter how sticky.  Even beyond splitting debt and assets we would have to deal with huge numbers of people that would need to move to go to the new nation that aligns with their views.

Unfortunately I do think you're right that civil war would erupt first, and that saddens me.",anuser999,e9b1ym6,conservative
"This is more of a personal question that kinda came to mind, but where do you think the acceptable line in the sand is where you're allowed to be okay with an odious person being gone?

McCain didn't cross that line for me, but someone like, say, Obama would. His influence on my life and country is universally negative, and I think the entire planet would be better without his existence.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9bd296,conservative
not really,JobieWanKenobi,e9bj62s,conservative
my pronoun is attack helicopter ,Delta_25,e9bj9rb,conservative
"You're spending your evening combing through a subreddit you disagree with and wildly insulting people, like the unhinged leftist you are.  You're talking out of your ass and embarrassing yourself.  You're a joke.",sputnik_steve,e9c8gsv,conservative
"The US military is mostly conservatives, including officers, so I don't see how a civil war would even begin theoretically speaking.  And what presumably would that war be fought over?  Taxes?  Transgender bathrooms?  Immigration?  Abortion?  Nullifying the 2nd amendment?  The dem's primary powerbase is minorities and women, and they're not armed with weapons, because they're ideologically opposed to weapons.  

It's more than hard to imagine the weakest people in society, in terms of low physical strength (women) and weak economics (minorities), instigating armed conflict over something as silly as the current issues we debate over.  A **tiny** but **loud** minority of **white** liberal democrats (often women) are banging the drum of social conflict right now, but they're a paper tiger with no teeth, and they know it, that's why they want no guns.  Ultimately, they don't have the stomach for armed conflict, and they would lose badly.  It's only by the continued grace of conservative men that we allow this American experiment in democracy to continue and do not end it in a military dictatorship, like so many other nations.

The current power dynamic between states and southern vs northern men isn't anything like the civil war.",Reven1911,e9b68og,conservative
"It's a good question that I, like pretty much everyone, have no good answer to. Obviously, it's subjective and even an individual's ""acceptable line"" is bound to change drastically depending on circumstances. So for good measure, I'd say to give it until the body is buried. Unless its literally Hitler - that guy sucked. 
",KingAegon6,e9bdxtb,conservative
I’m not seeing them do any of these things while they are watching the other party literally tamper with still undeclared election results. ,justhere2havefun,e9d04ya,conservative
King and Dobbs were the last of the decent ones there.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bdlzu,conservative
“I think Donald Trump would be a dictator if he could.” Also said in the video.,poltergeist007,e9cm5mr,conservative
The other side of the coin is the republicans who distanced themselves from Trump.  They all lost and if they were doing because they thought it would help them win....too bad for them.  They are just the same as these democrats.  Abandon what you really think and lie to the voters because it's all about power and not principles and truth.,optionhome,e9cn021,conservative
Hey they're not too bad. Glad they lost though ,canIchangethislaterr,e9ckzq5,conservative
And some claim it was all individuals and “[Not a dime from a single PAC](https://www.vox.com/2018/11/7/18071054/beto-orourke-concession-speech-full-text-transcript-ted-cruz-texas) ”. How? We know [Wall Street donated more to democrats](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/07/us/politics/wall-street-election-donations.html) . We also have been told repeatedly that the democrats are supported and work for “poor” people. How can they afford to send those candidates so much money?,justhere2havefun,e9d23fm,conservative
"Seeing How the far left is fine with importing Islam, I would say voting republican is in their best interests. ",ozric101,e9d2q7y,conservative
Maybe because I think for myself and don’t use beauty magazines as voting guides.,jina100,e9d2y3v,conservative
"From The Hill:

>""Sorey said she also reportedly contacted *her friend, Democratic State Rep.* Shevrin Jones, who the newspaper noted was a *close confidante of Tallahassee mayor and Florida gubernatorial candidate Andrew Gillum (D)*, seeking help about the discovery.""",DBG1998,e9ci64u,conservative
If he is able to do this...then I identify as a 70 year old veteran...sweet sweet retirement. ,J0kerr,e9arrzb,conservative
"Who am I to tell him otherwise? Forty-nine is his personal truth and reality is just a social construct, anyway.",JaneTheThird,e9av76f,conservative
Can I identify as 21 so I can legally buy beer ,SussyPiff,e9ayo6y,conservative
I personally identify as 200 years old. Yes I am the oldest living American in the history of the world AMA,KrogerPornStar,e9az6xl,conservative
I identify as Jessica Alba's panties,RomeoMyHomeo,e9ap0k9,conservative
"By referring to him as 69 instead of 49, aren't they being intolerant? So now we're going to need another term for age that is less factual/biological and force everyone, including government application forms, to use that term instead.

Personally I admire him for taking up this fight, because it just puts the whole ""gender identity"" thing into proper perspective. 

The reality is simple: Feelings aren't facts. Once you blur that line, reality becomes ridiculous, and this is a prime example.",tenshon,e9apt5x,conservative
I'm a lesbian in a man's body.,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9axizy,conservative
"Sex is way more important than age is when it comes to biological differences. So if someone can randomly switch to whatever sex they want to be because they feel like it, there shouldn't be a problem with age. Can't wait for the 16 year olds to change their age to 21, for no specific reason of course.",AManHasNoFear,e9aud1e,conservative
69 is the new 20.,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9axlf4,conservative
The sliperay slope is a fallacy remeber ,Manchurainprez,e9axl0y,conservative
I thought this was a satire article. Damn you 2018.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9b31tk,conservative
"if a tranny can change male to female on his birth certificate(WTF), then all bets are off. ",VirginWizard69,e9ayikg,conservative
"Many women do this - I may be 50, but I identify as 29...can I change my driver's license? ;)",JFGFNY,e9b13nd,conservative
"What’s it to you, bigots?

If he wants to self-identify as a certain age, then he’s that age.

I self-identify as Kate Upton’s lover.",heyyoudvd,e9aui7p,conservative
I identify as a 21 year old billionaire!  Woot I have all the lootz!,nooneuknow42,e9b1q6l,conservative
Maybe this is the solution to social security.,Robo1p,e9barp1,conservative
That is some 3/4ths life crisis. ,TheJimReaper6,e9baz7k,conservative
Ben Shapiro warned us about this!!,Pls_No_Ban,e9bevf8,conservative
"Who are we to tell someone how old they legally are right?  Since DNA doesn’t matter, and it is purely off of wishes and dreams...of course he can change his age.",mattmcd20,e9b77r2,conservative
/r/notthebabylonbee,frowoz,e9bb421,conservative
"It's his truth, and we have to respect it.",Lepew1,e9bbdu7,conservative
"10 years ago this would be satire, today it's reality.",flippy76,e9bq6fd,conservative
That’s interesting because I’m going to identify as 67 and start getting my full SS benefits and finally retire.,volcanicpale,e9br9pt,conservative
And here we are sliding down the slippery slope. ,Undercovergeek24,e9c0gy4,conservative
Wait shit this isn’t Babylon Bee...,mdh431,e9caxhl,conservative
He's going to lose his senior discount. ,Armageddon_It,e9cbvbt,conservative
"Yes I identify as a poor 67 year old widdowed woman.  I would like my social security and My late husband's please, housing and food assistance and Medicare. ",Manchurainprez,e9axo2h,conservative
I was gonna say the same thing! ,Chapka69,e9aucui,conservative
I’d take 60 years old and take my 20 in a heartbeat. ,skarface6,e9b2b7l,conservative
"I do like that one clip of Ben Shapiro countering the transgender activist by asking her (a 22 year old student) why she is not 60.  I think her first impulse was to say, ""Because I'm not."" However, she has to catch herself and just ends up stuttering around for a few moments.

We are in terminal stage postmodernism as a society.  There is little hope of a cure.  The people have lost their ability to even reason properly. Language itself is meaningless.  We all search for ""truth"" while acknowledging such a thing does not exist.

How can reason ever be restored to a society that has stripped away all basis of logic and rationality?  The foundation is being eroded under our feet.",nited_states,e9b4h0h,conservative
He has the reality stone!,ExpensiveMention,e9b1fp5,conservative
What is it like being 200 years old?,FlankingZen,e9b64mn,conservative
What technological advances did you not see coming?,noiwontsharemyfries,e9bhl9m,conservative
In your day they chopped people's dicks off to stop them from reproducing now they do it themselves.,slotrot,e9bnsph,conservative
Underwear identity disorder?,tenshon,e9apw9l,conservative
I identify as jessica Alba's husband,ExpensiveMention,e9b1dzb,conservative
"Transgender people aren't real because this guy came up with something mildly analogous? You know this is just a lark, right? He doesn't actually feel like he's younger.",Tyg13,e9au9xb,conservative
[deleted],,e9beqrd,conservative
Don't you love it when fallacies slap you in the face.,tenshon,e9ayoqs,conservative
Literally rewriting history.,Martbell,e9bhkfv,conservative
I also identify as Justin Verlander ,Shipoffools1,e9bw65h,conservative
I identify as 70. Now gimme social security,ExpensiveMention,e9b1b7n,conservative
">  Language itself is meaningless.

It's only as meaningless as we make it though. There is a significant lack of clarity with terms like ""gender"", and what's worse is when dictionaries start changing their definition to not offend people. We need more clarity. Gender originally arose to describe characteristics often associated with one of the sexes (in the context of language, actually) - and the categories were masculine and feminine. Then people started asking for ""gender"" instead of ""sex"" on application forms - why? Likely because sex is a ""dirty word"" and gender is more palatable. But it is the wrong term. No application form wants to know whether your bear certain characteristics, they want to know what sex you are. And likewise they don't ask ""how old do you feel?"". It's practically meaningless to them. And now it's been appropriated by liberals who don't like their role in the natural order. 

What we need to do is petition to remove the word ""gender"" from all forms and surveys - and revert to use the term that actually has some meaning: sex.",tenshon,e9bluox,conservative
Do post-modernist seek to find something wrong with every aspect of the current world view?,J2quared,e9bs8e4,conservative
Yeah lol I love how that guy went straight to the panties instead of something normal,accountnumber111893,e9b28o2,conservative
"> He doesn't actually feel like he's younger.

And you know that how? Why are you telling him how he feels?",tenshon,e9auhdg,conservative
"> mildly analogous

What's the difference? 

Except for the fact that, unlike transgenders, his body might actually be the equivalent of a 49 year old?",orangeeyedunicorn,e9awebk,conservative
So you know that all transgenders actually feel like what they say they are?  The entire argument around transgender is that you must accept what they SAY.  But you’re suggesting that we not believe what he SAYS about his age.,jxfreeman,e9b6rg8,conservative
ageist. bigotry. ,VirginWizard69,e9ayknq,conservative
">This is one of the dumbest things I've ever read. I can cut my dick off and get a vagina - now I'm a woman.

Nope, still a man. You just have a hole in place of your penis. The hole will actually constantly try to close itself because the body only sees it as a body wound. Even still, the progressives say that a man who hasn't gotten their make genitalia removed,  but only *feel* like a woman is a woman. Case and point, Caitlyn Jenner still had a penis when awarded with ""Woman of the year."" 

>I can't get surgery to speed up the aging process or increase the number of times I've gone around the sun.

Yeah, how can these people deny scientific reality?! Someone can't just get surgery and magically they are something they feel like they are, that would be crazy, huh? ",AManHasNoFear,e9bls1x,conservative
You can smoke a lot and hang out in the sun without sunscreen though,nowaygreg,e9bjdj8,conservative
Yes. I find it bizarre that someone can change their birth certificate. ,VirginWizard69,e9bho2a,conservative
I'd just identify as 110 years old and walk around like a baws,slotrot,e9bn1yx,conservative
"His comments? ""If I could put that I was 49 on my Tinder, with this face, it would be luxurious."" Not to mention, no psychological evidence of actual belief. This is a troll, nothing more.

And even if he did, there's no physical way to reverse one's age. You can actually undergo surgery change your gender.

...Why is this so offensive to people again?",Tyg13,e9auvnx,conservative
"Transgendered people don't believe that their body is actually of the other sex. In fact, it is that belief that one's body is the wrong sex that leads to dysphoria.

I really don't understand the problem that conservatives have with transgendered people, or the constant obsession with ""proving"" that they aren't real or that they're delusional. Or constantly trying to find analogies that somehow prove a point. A man trying to say he is younger for the purpose of being able to lie on Tinder about his age is not equivalent to someone who is born with lifelong discomfort about their biological gender. Even if they were, what would be your point?",Tyg13,e9awq5e,conservative
[deleted],,e9bqr4z,conservative
"> You can actually undergo surgery change your gender.

To change your sex? No, you cannot. It's just superficial.

Like botox to change your age-appearance.",tenshon,e9av7fl,conservative
"Putting silicon in ur chest doesnt make u a woman

decades Decades of feminist telling us that women are more than boobs and vaginas just to have them tell us that women are just boobs an vaginas",ExpensiveMention,e9b1jis,conservative
why are you anti-science?,JobieWanKenobi,e9bjf98,conservative
"Lots of erroneous ideas and feelings in life cause discomfort. The answer isn't to ""pretend reality away"", it's to correct our ideas. When we try to pretend that reality is different than it is, then you totally obscure its rational, empirical foundation which ultimately causes anarchy and with it destruction.",tenshon,e9ax85m,conservative
"I don't have a problem with it. We have problem with how it's treated. If simply claiming to be a woman is all that it takes to be a woman then where do we draw the line? Can someone claim to be black even if they're not black? Can a 18 year old claim to be over 21 because he identifies that way and now you have to serve him beer?

When you ignore reality and focus on what people claim then he run a dangerous line legally. Not to mention these are the same people that claim Trump doesn't tell the truth

It's America. You can dress how you want you can do whatever you want. The question is to what extent do I have to participate?",ExpensiveMention,e9b1rar,conservative
"> Even if they were, what would be your point?

My point is society shouldn't bend to appease the mentally ill in any case. This includes individuals who believe they are or should be a different sex. 

By making it seem normal more people will engage in it, as has been shown by studies of ""clusters"" of ""transgender"" kids popping up in high school. It's not good for anyone, including trans individuals.

Work to cure the mind, not mutilate the body.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9b2pbq,conservative
"Allowing either Men, or Women-specially-allowed-to-take-Steroids, to compete in Women's sports eventually means biological women no longer being able to win any sporting competition. This is already beginning to happen.",jivatman,e9bf54x,conservative
"That's an incorrect belief. And forcing society to play along with a mentally disturbed person's delusion is detrimental to society. 

Nobody is saying that people with gender dysphoria aren't real. What is being said is that transgenderism does not exist, because you actually cannot change your sex.

There is also the issue of the left changing the definition of ""gender"" to be separate from sex when it's convenient, and considering it to be equal to sex when convenient. Sex and gender were synonymous for centuries until some activists decided to change it for their convenience. 

Promoting gender confusion is not good for for the health of a society. Men are men. Women are women. Sex/gender is determined by your DNA. It cannot be changed. There are physical realities and mental problems. Transgendrerism/gender dysphoria is a mental problem.",noiwontsharemyfries,e9bhg70,conservative
">Just because your ignorant of modern medicine doesn’t mean you’re right. 

Lol I'm in medical school as we speak. What modern medicine converts all of a man's cells chromosomes from XY to XX? Because that is the only way to make a man into a woman. Please enlighten me on this medical treatment, because my medical school sure didn't tell me about it.

>And even if it doesn’t make them a women (which it does) why the fuck do you care? 

I don't care. In their false reality they can be whatever they want. But in actual reality where the rest of us are, sex can be important especially when it comes to medicine. I don't have to play along with someone's fantasy because they might get offended if I don't. But if a man wants to dress up like a girl, put makeup on or even get their genitalia removed, they are free to do so as long as their actions don't affect anybody else.",AManHasNoFear,e9c1fkv,conservative
"Hence, Gender...I mean you literally ignored what he said and injected your own words to say what you wanted.

If a dude gets a ""sex"" change and wants to be a woman because he thinks like a woman and has highly feminine qualities, then why not? 

Sure, the biology doesn't change, but there are plenty of women who used to be men and you would have absolutely no clue the difference.",LrdCheesterBear,e9bbr3j,conservative
100% accurate.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9bhgya,conservative
"Coming from someone who believes in an all powerful deity, you sound fairly hypocritical.",LrdCheesterBear,e9bbwm2,conservative
"> Hence, Gender...I mean you literally ignored what he said and injected your own words to say what you wanted.

What do you think is the difference between gender and sex? And how exactly does this surgery change their gender and not their sex? ",tenshon,e9bcm0p,conservative
Are you suggesting that Christian belief is irrational?,tenshon,e9bcnir,conservative
"If you lack understanding of the two terms you shouldn't be having this debate.

Gender is the social construct that tells us what roles certain individuals would typically fall in in a specific community.

Sex is the biological makeup of your reproductive organs.

I didn't say the surgery wouldn't change their sex. In fact, it only further aligns their sex with their gender identity",LrdCheesterBear,e9bdjx3,conservative
Yes,LrdCheesterBear,e9bdcvx,conservative
"> If you lack understanding of the two terms you shouldn't be having this debate.

No it's not my lack of understanding, it's my unwillingness to adopt arbitrary falsehoods.

They said ""You can actually undergo surgery [to] change your gender.""

How does surgery change what ""roles [they] would typically fall in in a specific community"" ? Why would that need surgery if it's just a social construct? If this role or ""identity"" is not related to their reproductive organs, then why would they need to change them?",tenshon,e9bendt,conservative
"This isn't the forum for that discussion, but I'd happily assist in your understanding if you want to PM me.",tenshon,e9bepr6,conservative
"How accepted are individuals who look like men and women in roles outside of social norms? There are still people who think guys can't be nurses or homemakers and women shouldn't be in construction or have a medical degree. I'm not saying they all want to go have a sex change, but those that feel they identify as a woman or man shouldn't be told they don't feel that way because ""I don't think you can feel that way"".

This helps align their identity with a look they are comfortable with that allows them to operate at a level they feel good about. It doesn't matter how you or I feel, it is completely for their well being.",LrdCheesterBear,e9bfiyg,conservative
"I appreciate the invitation, but I'm a believer. I just know that in the realm of empirical evidence it's irrational to do so. But faith is not a rational term.",LrdCheesterBear,e9bezxl,conservative
"> How accepted are individuals who look like men and women in roles outside of social norms?

They are not just ""social norms"". Women have anatomical advantages in bonding with children, for example. They can breastfeed and through oxytocin that's released, they nurture a special type of close relationship while their child that wouldn't be possible otherwise. It's also factual that women are generally more empathic than men, they are also better mutlitaskers - they have many unique characteristics that make them suited to a particular role. So no, it's not simply ""socially constructed"" or ""socially imposed"" roles, it is biologically based, and these things cannot be changed with surgery. These actual differences are the basis of humanity's existence, why we're here today - we should be grateful for them.

That does not mean that men cannot be nurses for example, but it does mean that a male patient would likely feel more cared for with a female nurse than a male nurse. 

These are just facts, if they're offensive to you then perhaps you should change your beliefs rather than have others pretend to change reality. 

> This helps align their identity with a look they are comfortable with that allows them to operate at a level they feel good about. It doesn't matter how you or I feel, it is completely for their well being.

Hiding or obscuring reality isn't helping *anybody's* well being. ""White lies"" may have a role in little children's well being, but not in fully grown adults.",tenshon,e9bi97b,conservative
"https://www.the-scientist.com/features/are-the-brains-of-transgender-people-different-from-those-of-cisgender-people-30027

This is an interesting article that indicates the development of gender identity versus physiological sex characteristics happened at independent times in the womb. This is what can lead to something known as gender dysphoria. In essence this means that the gender that one begins to identify as masculine or feminine can be associated with certain biological markers while the sex of an individual could be different.",LrdCheesterBear,e9bitla,conservative
"Not at all, it merely concludes there are differences in our brain structure that, it concedes, could change through their own habits. None of this proves anything about ""gender identity"" - that part is just purely made up and projected onto these findings. The concept of ""gender identity"" that is somehow different to biological sex is a social construct, perpetuated by wishful thinking. It's been made up by people who hate nature and feel victimized by its apparent demands on them that interfere with their delusional feeling of entitlement to absolute freedom. 

Nothing in our existence requires us to ""identify"" as something. We just learn what we're capable of doing, and then do our best to use those gifts for fruitful ends. It's only when liberals start imposing their beliefs in rights to absolute freedom that this concept of identity even arises. 

The most dangerous of those that promote this are the ones who carry scientific qualifications and abuse their apparent authority to perpetuate these falsehoods and make them seem legitimate. It's just fake news at its worst.",tenshon,e9bkboo,conservative
Segregation is making a comeback apparently ,molon-labe7,e9bdayz,conservative
"Let's have water fountains designated only for minorities too.

 #Progress",Demplition,e9bede8,conservative
"Looks like the left is bringing back ""separate but equal.""",Martbell,e9beyso,conservative
lol isnt this shit illegal,donjohn1986,e9be4bt,conservative
"Minorities only = no whites. WTactualF?! This is just too bizarre. I’m not white but my husband is and I made white boys. As an American and a minority, this is...evil. Can we please stop vilifying white people and get back to being American? The obvious result of this is more white nationalism. I want nationalism. Not white nationalism. Just plain ole nationalism and, in the US, skin color, or any other immutable characteristic, is supposed to unimportant. A diverse country can’t withstand putting all this weight on race. It’s really fucking stupid and dangerous and you’d have to be a block of wood to not understand this.  ",Earthling03,e9boejr,conservative
"Martin Luther King Jr. just hit 10,000rpm",MadLordPunt,e9bgmol,conservative
David Duke loves this ,CASunDevil24,e9ber5a,conservative
Congrats. You segregated yourself. How far we’ve come. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9bq0gs,conservative
"""Hey guys, you know what *isn't* racist?  **SEGRIGATION!!!**  I'm *positive* this is what MLK Jr. had in mind!""",Jizzlobber42,e9bt6pe,conservative
Proposed by a diversity leader of all people....,SuperFunMonkey,e9by9jg,conservative
"I'm all for this. Let's bring it by back to schools, and public places, neighborhoods, maybe even cities. It's such a novel, innovative, forward thinking idea. What could possibly go wrong?",PigsAndCats,e9bkv4z,conservative
Water fountains is a better start.,Swarlos8888,e9btpk9,conservative
"separate, but equal? So, they will have one for whites only too?",YouLearnedNothing,e9c79xv,conservative
"Actually I wouldnt care if that's the only room they could use, some people are just annoying in the gym, ours had to make a rule that you're not allowed to tell even if you think its encouraging. Take that shit to the power lifting gym down the street. ",chugonthis,e9cnq0f,conservative
"Once again, it's Democrats doing it!",rf-engineer,e9bjbjq,conservative
Gym Crow laws,burtmaklin1,e9cjk7h,conservative
And designated areas of busses too.,ngoni,e9cdek3,conservative
In good ole dixiecrat fashion.,cavemanben,e9bpos8,conservative
Only if it's white people doing it.,Olipyr,e9cli9j,conservative
Yep,ConsistentlyRight,e9cfoxl,conservative
"What they’re correctly thinking:  “well wtf are you gonna do about it yt?”  

The fact is that liberal whites are pushovers and are going to let this slide.  Make no mistake, the minorities are purposefully doing this because they don’t want whites to be able to get in shape to defend themselves.  Anyone who says I’m racist is just denying reality.  ",ravenswin,e9cz2xj,conservative
couldnt agree more,donjohn1986,e9ctcn6,conservative
So could we solve climate change by powering the entire country from King spinning in his grave?,soxfan90,e9bhd57,conservative
He was a Democrat not that long ago so I'm not surprised,___-III----III-___,e9bgudg,conservative
"Let’s take this a step further, let’s develop voting laws specific to your race! To fight the stereotype that minorities tend to be poor let’s require all minorities to pay 5 years worth of taxes up front and to ensure that we stop the prejudice belief that minorities are illiterate let’s have them pass tests before they can cast their ballot! I love these new progressive ideas! ",Mythic-Insanity,e9cexmw,conservative
The real fun will come if this idea ever spreads to a campus where whites are in the minority... ,Mythic-Insanity,e9cf03h,conservative
"So, does this mean that the parties switched, *again*?!

/s, for the auto moderator's sake",rf-engineer,e9c287l,conservative
well you can still get in shape at the “all white” gym lol,donjohn1986,e9d3r2y,conservative
At least then some good could come of this BS.,SaiHottari,e9bnbpq,conservative
Show me an “all white gym” and I’ll show you an ACLU lawsuit ,ravenswin,e9d3uek,conservative
lol it was sarcasm. if they had a “minority gym” than the open gym of today would become “ ‘ole white gym” lol,donjohn1986,e9d3xxm,conservative
Lol that's fuckin hilarious,Nevaknosbest,e9bz9ft,conservative
Thank goodness,hipsterdufus84,e9avssg,conservative
"Thank God.  I want him to stay as SecDef for the rest of Trump's current term and hopefully all of the next one.  We need a steady, experienced, and apolitical hand in charge of DoD.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9awcxp,conservative
Good,Kman1759,e9ax7ie,conservative
And so Americans can sleep well at night because our enemies can't.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9b958o,conservative
Mathis has been a fucking rock,TomahawkSuppository,e9baiwh,conservative
more like the Pentagon is going to stay on Mattis ,Delta_25,e9blr02,conservative
For now. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9aw9vg,conservative
"The problem with this story is it did not cover the explosion of leftist outrage on Twitter over this announcement, as well as the wake of ensuing protests.",Lepew1,e9bby5o,conservative
"Mattis needs to go.  We need to be out of Afghanistan, Syria, and Iraq and he's a major stumbling block to these goals.  Worse he's allowed women in combat in the marines despite the marines studying the issue and proving that women in combat degrade combat effectiveness. He's done noting to clean up the political correctness Obama poisoned the military with and our armed forces are in bad shape. He's a big talking military guy who's actual polices are those of a progressive.",StraightNewt,e9awptv,conservative
Let's hope he stays around for another term no matter who wins. Let him be like the Greenspan of the DoD.,skilless,e9breic,conservative
Mattis has an 85% approval rating among the troops per military times survey.  Thats all I need to know. ,hipsterdufus84,e9ax4hc,conservative
"Mattis is like a god to most service members. For most of us he's our favorite candidate member and surprisingly one of his most level headed pics. 

Gen Mattis does what he's ordered and does it well. I don't think we should be in the middle East in the same capacity that we have been. But General Mattis did is not the reason we're in Iraq and Afghanistan.

How is political correctness poisoning the military?",Luke_Flyswatter,e9b3rp1,conservative
"I’m with you on getting out of these other countries, but it shows that you’re not in the service that you think he’s done nothing about the worst Obama era military policies. ",_manoftheyear_,e9b1jn3,conservative
Nah bro. Mattis is the only dude who if he pulled a coup on a president I would be conflicted about it for a minute or two lol,RepubliKin,e9c0v1m,conservative
Did Bernie attend?,Lepew1,e9aj7px,conservative
Breaking: Hawaii judge orders Trump to retract his statements and endorse communism!,paulbrevik,e9ajcy0,conservative
"I'm really glad to see this. I grew up in a country ruined by communism. Even today, thirty years later, we're struggling with the aftermath.

More on the topic, if you want some reading about what it was like, (and that's just from my tiny country in the heart of Europe):

[The story of Milada Horakova - a communist herself](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Milada_Hor%C3%A1kov%C3%A1)

[Heliodor Pika - a war hero, executed presumably because he saw the Gulags](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Heliodor_P%C3%ADka)

[Jan Masaryk - The son of our first president, likely murdered by the KGB](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jan_Masaryk)

[The Prague Spring - our attempt at a ""humane"" socialism](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prague_Spring)

I know that the above may be of little relevance to anyone outside the former Czechoslovakia, but I hope anyone can take a lesson from the past.

&#x200B;",SCPendolino,e9ayfp2,conservative
"Welp, I live in Michigan, I will be added to that list over the next 4 years.",mattmcd20,e9agete,conservative
There's a ton of 'em. Some complicit. Many more unwitting bystanders of moral and political decay. Most didn't deserve their fate,greatatdrinking,e9ajpat,conservative
God bless President Trump for doing this people seem to forget Communism has killed more people than that nazis ever did also it sickens me to the stomach that Stalin got a pass on his evil acts just because he fought on our side during ww2 ,funkyfiona25,e9b73bs,conservative
"Communism is one of the great evils of our time. It has a pile of bodies a mile high. And yet, it isn't vilified by the modern left. Communism should be looked at the exact same way Nazism is looked at. ",LumpyWumpus,e9anolz,conservative
"100 million innocent people genocided by communism yet the left refuses to condemn communism and the hammer/sickle. In fact they endorse it and even support communist terrorists like antifa
 ",LastationNeoCon,e9b0koz,conservative
This is just goddamn beautiful right on the heels of Antifa acting like such jackasses yesterday ,CCPCanuck,e9b9gz4,conservative
This is beyond hilariously awesome.,slotrot,e9bkes1,conservative
The only Engels we should tolerate is Laura Ingalls Wilder. ,LonelyMachines,e9bmf3n,conservative
Bernie is like a socialist ,DevilsAdvocateOWO,e9bacex,conservative
Sounds about right ,TomahawkSuppository,e9aq833,conservative
"Sorry you had to go through that. The Cold War between liberty and collectivism is still going on. I hope we win it so our country doesn't have to experience what yours did.

Academia is full of communists/socialists/whatever name they have for them being put in control to make things more equal. And they tell everyone that communism is ""a great idea in theory"", and keep trying to accomplish it, just without as much mass murder and oppression.

The problem is, socialism and all its variants (communism, fascism, social democracy) are all different methods of totalitarianism. Any theory based on equal outcomes for all must be totalitarian. Any theory not based on individual rights will trample them constantly.",LibertyTerp,e9bbmca,conservative
That NSDAP isn't even a drop in the bucket. And what they were doing was defending themselves from communism. They were renamed Nazi and used as a distraction while the Allies funded the genocide of tens of millions and fought against capitalism and freedom. Wrong side of the war we fought on.,slotrot,e9bkp65,conservative
"I honestly think that comparing Naziism to Communism isn't even close in the amount of evil done. The Nazis and Hitler we're certainly one of the most evil forces the world has ever seen, but communism blows even that out of the water by orders of magnitude. It really is ridiculous when you get into just how much evil has been perpetuated by communists. The hammer and sickle should be even more revulsive than the swastica. ",Slickford_IV,e9b1sax,conservative
"That's because it wasn't *Real Communism™* that killed all those people. We have yet to try the real kind.

.

.

.

.

/s (just in case)",MadLordPunt,e9az9ja,conservative
"> And yet, it isn't vilified by the modern left.

Why would they overtly compromise themselves?",HayektheHustler,e9aq0la,conservative
"No he is a *democratic* socialist. You know, a guy who thinks you load up a free market economy with as much socialism as possible before it collapses into inevitable socialist failure.",Lepew1,e9bauuu,conservative
"The difference is the “right wing” extremist regime of Hitler, and by nature any other is very meticulous and exacting in what it is they want to achieve. In the case of the Nazis it was the expulsion or eradication of the lessers. In a left wing extremist political system it is organized chaos. Devouring what was once their own and the will to power masquerading as compassion.

We all know the macro examples, but on a micro scale you can see the same phenomenon among cults. Right wing cults try to achieve power through order and obedience, and that is spelled out clearly, rarely responsible for killing more than a few people. Left wing cults like that of Jim Jones and Jonestown down in Guyana got over 900 loyal sycophants to drink the koolaid. He preached racial equality, equity among all, and often touted bringing forth a utopia. It became clear that this was merely a veil to mask a lust for power.",JackFucington,e9cg0av,conservative
"Minor history/definitions lesson:

They're actually correct, since the defining feature of communism is worker-owned means of production. That has never actually happened on the national level.

However, it doesn't matter when talking about how communism works, since the guy who literally wrote the book on Communism, Karl Marx himself, said: *Of course, in the beginning, this cannot be effected except by means of despotic inroads on the rights of property*

It's an important distinction, and I find it shuts up leftists a lot quicker when you point out what the guy who founded their ideology says it does, rather than quibble over the definition of it (which is actually pretty clear-cut).",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b3pkz,conservative
"It's always slightly unneverving to hear the ""real communism"" line because whenever communists try to ""fix"" communism, it almost always gets bloodier, more totalitarian, and more ruthless.

You can almost hear the voice of Stalin echoing through history: ""Well, yes, the economy is struggling and things aren't going great, but everything we've been trying until now has not been *real* communism.""

Just gotta purge the right people, after all.  That's always the implication with the ""No true communist"" argument: we just didn't have the proper people.  So, I guess we just have to get rid of all the ""wrong"" people then.

**Tl;dr:** Communists believe people are created to serve systems, not that systems are created for people.  They are more than comfortable removing as many broken cogs (ie. people) as it takes until their utopian machine finally starts to ""work"".
",nited_states,e9b3vu9,conservative
"Good question, especially when you see both antifa and BLM waving the hammer and sickle flag around so freely and in the open.
",PerceivedShift,e9b6tke,conservative
"What's the difference between a democratic socialist and a democratic communist?

The same as the difference between a janitor and a custodian.",LibertyTerp,e9bbeim,conservative
">the defining feature of communism is worker-owned means of production. That has never actually happened on the national level.

And I'd argue that this can never happen at any large scale (such as at a national level) without some form of despotic government, not just in the beginning as Marx said, but throughout its entire existence.

Whenever market features are eliminated, invariably you have to resort to some authoritarian way of allocating scarce resources.
",nited_states,e9basji,conservative
"The key here is 'democratic'. Once you put that in there, the process of having the tyranny of the majority help themselves to the fruits of your labor via involuntary redistribution gives moral sanction to the entire enterprise. People decided by vote to rob you, and that is so much more moral.",Lepew1,e9bd299,conservative
"When someone robs $40,000/year from my wife and I it makes me feel good to know that it's my neighbors voting to steal my money rather than some far off dictator.

Taking 5-10% of someone's money in taxes is within the reasonable realm. The federal government spent 3% of GDP for most of the US's existence. Everything above that is theft in my mind.",LibertyTerp,e9ber40,conservative
"The thing is, you do not know most of the people voting for your money. Your neighbors are a very small minority of the group helping themselves to the contents of your wallet. You may derive some degree of comfort trying to think of it like that, but really that is not what is happening, unless you take a very loose definition of all Americans as neighbors.",Lepew1,e9bfh01,conservative
I was being sarcastic. I don't feel better knowing my neighbors are voting to steal my money.,LibertyTerp,e9c0kzm,conservative
I’m so excited!,aluminum_lizzard,e9b5248,conservative
"This new guy looks like a straight dickhead, and I say that as a compliment. 

I’m glad he’s on our side. ",mikeygio,e9b70am,conservative
"I'm going to be honest, I don't like that he fired Jeff Sessions. I know that a lot of you are mad because he didn't defend Trump the way that Eric Holder defended Obama, but the AG is not supposed to be the president's  wingman.",MuricanStephen,e9c45iw,conservative
So much salt is about to flow lol,NCSUGrad2012,e9b43qq,conservative
This is about to get really messy isnt it...,guitmusic12,e9b4gmh,conservative
"Looks like Trump got himself a wartime consiglieri. 



Two points to the Godfather.",chaotic_zx,e9c01m1,conservative
"Good Meuller is not an independent council... the democrats did away with that after Clinton. He has limited scope and the AG is supposed to keep him on that limited scope, sessions recusal only let him run amok off scope all this time. He needs to be on task. ",Racheakt,e9bs71i,conservative
Stand firm Matthew. We are with you.,Lepew1,e9bcco3,conservative
Times up. ,inconspicuoujavert,e9b476r,conservative
[removed],,e9b5vof,conservative
"Seriously, homeboy looks ready to fight!",PigsAndCats,e9bkd8s,conservative
I don’t dislike him because he didn’t defend trump. I don’t like him because he didn’t do shit for two years. ,HonorMyBeetus,e9c71wp,conservative
"I don't agree.  Its been messy for two years because of Rosenstein.  Now, it will get cleaned up.  

Mueller will finish his investigation but the new AG won't allow an open ended, boundless investigation where Trump's political opponents and media continue on a endless parade of rumor mongering and hyperbole.   

They've had two years to investigate Trump (and spy on him).  Let Mueller finish but take absolutely no bullshit from anyone along the way.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9b5zyv,conservative
"Keep the dream alive! /s

Sessions resigned and Trump has the authority under the Executive Branch to appoint an interim AG.  And the Horowitz IG report was a 500 page justification for firing Comey.  

There is no obstruction of justice no matter how much you scream at the sky.  ",lastbastion,e9b80ui,conservative
He was very good on immigration.,MuricanStephen,e9c7cpb,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> Mueller will finish his investigation but the new AG won't allow an open ended, boundless investigation where Trump's political opponents and media continue on a endless parade of rumor mongering and hyperbole. 

The new AG will hopefully tell Mueller ""you've had 2 years, your investigation will conclude by this date."" ",psstein,e9bimps,conservative
"> political opponents and media continue on a endless parade of rumor mongering and hyperbole

I mostly mean excessive amounts of this when I say messy",guitmusic12,e9b649a,conservative
"People acting like what Trump is doing here is impeachment worthy, let alone something unique to him (replacing a member of a cabinet for a more favorable one), are people who have no understanding of government, or those who hold him to a higher standard because he is an outsider.

I for one welcome the new AG. Let this charade of an investigation finally end.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9b8mra,conservative
"> Keep the dream alive! /s

~~Rebellions~~ Resistances are built on hope!",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bglym,conservative
I don’t understand your logic. What is so magical about 2 years that an investigation has to be closed by 2 years? If Mueller has valid leads that he is pursuing he should be allowed to continue.,xxx_asdf,e9bl34l,conservative
"no, what he will do is cut Muellers funding. he was written that before.",JMB_was_a_god,e9ccbh8,conservative
[removed],,e9bhinc,conservative
They should be careful not to choke on their aspirations. ,LonelyMachines,e9bna8y,conservative
"The problem is this:  we were told on 11/09/2016 that Democrats had *proof* of a conspiracy (""collusion"" is a weasel word with no legal meaning) between Trump and Putin.  If such evidence exists, then it shouldn't have taken Mueller two *months* to present his findings.

If true, this would be the biggest conspiracy in our political history.  It would also have unraveled long before now.  We'd have proof, not the steady cascade of innuendo we've been fed.

Mueller isn't there to unearth a conspiracy; he's there to skulk around and hopefully find ways to be an albatross around Trump's neck.

Remember:  Monica Lewinsky had *nothing* to do with Ken Starr's mandate. ",LonelyMachines,e9bn1po,conservative
"He's had two years and found nothing relevant. Unless he's pursuing a lead **directly related** to his charge (i.e. Russian interference in the 2016 election), it's time to wrap the investigation up. 

Special investigations unfortunately devolve into fishing trips, as this one has. ",psstein,e9bofb0,conservative
"Well Trump is going to replace the member of the cabinet, and for now Whittaker is just going to be acting as you said. Since Sessions resigned, is it illegal for Whittaker to act as an acting AG? You should provide some proof for that statement (unless I read your middle section wrong).

Since Sessions resigned, Trump is going to be in the process of replacing, so technically you are correct, he hasn't replaced sessions **permanently** yet.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9blfyb,conservative
"""per even Conway's husband"" - gee whiz, thanks for that awesome reference.  He's extremely unbiased!  ",BeachCruisin22,e9bsuoj,conservative
"The idiots on that show *should* be in straightjackets and in a ""rubber-room"". You've gotta be off your rocker to watch that video and NOT see Acosta grabbing the intern...",LVDave,e9bqg19,conservative
"Who gives a damn about what anyone from the view has to say about anything?  Nobody assaulted anyone.  The amount of attention this two-bit ""reporter"" from a two-bit ""news outlet"" is getting is completely ridiculous.  Especially in light of all of the real issues that are going on in this country.",mlmack,e9bz5ge,conservative
So he accosted her?,cargopantspirate,e9bqy7h,conservative
"It's amazing how people can see the same video and perceive it differently. The intern is seen doing her job and grabbing the mic and only the mic while Acosta physically swipes her hand away but it's the intern that committed ""assault""",FallingPinkElephant,e9c0avz,conservative
Preach.,Applesauce_Police,e9c4f7v,conservative
"Due to the [Origination Clause](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Origination_Clause) all bills that raise revenue must originate in the House, so they basically write the budget.  I'm sure they'll introduce a budget that eliminates the deficit and pays down the national debt by significantly cutting wasteful government spending.

Next they'll pass a balanced budget amendment that caps government spending at 18% of GDP.

They'll also pass an amendment setting the number of Supreme Court Justices to 9 and end all of that crazy left wing talk of stacking the court.

After that they'll close redundant military bases and give the military the power to determine their own budget priorities instead of using military spend as pork barrel jobs programs in their home districts.

In order to further strengthen the booming economy they'll pass a series of deregulation measures, eliminate the minimum wage, and possibly even another tax cut.

Demonstrating their commitment to low income minorities they will fund the border wall and crack down on businesses who hire low-wage illegal aliens.

Since Health Care is a top Democrat priority they will repeal and replace Obamacare with a free market solution.

Continuing their fight against racism and sexism they will end affirmative action programs and bar colleges and universities from using race as an admissions criteria.

And finally, in a shocking display of political courage, they will make the tough choices necessary to reform entitlements such as Social Security and Medicare, even if that means reducing benefits and raising the retirement age.
",Yosoff,e9bc1c3,conservative
"Lol

Edit Incase you’re serious: immigration, healthcare and infrastructure.

They’ll do it in the usual compromising way however, by proposing bills asking for the moon in return for giving republicans nothing then say we’re stalling.",niresangwa,e9ba2qe,conservative
#ORANGE GUY BAD,art36,e9ba11v,conservative
"LOL.... 

But an actual answer

low hanging fruit is DACA for boarder wall, some sort of paper cut gun control branded as a ""compromise"", some prison reform bill that doesn't really matter, and healthcare price controls. 

Maybe they try to beat republicans to the punch with some sort of federal decriminalization of weed or something

Otherwise it will be Russia Russia Russia, we must protect Mueller, This is what democracy looks like nonsense. Tax return subpoenas and general harassment of anyone associated with anyone involved in Trump businesses. ",I_am_just_saying,e9baiuh,conservative
"Optimistic view: 

* ACA: Adjust ACA to get people with preexisting conditions out of health insurance markets and into separate state or federal risk pools. Premiums have skyrocketed due to covering people with preexisting conditions; removing them should make the insurance markets less risky for insurers which should result in lower premiums. Odds of this happening: 0-10%

* Infrastructure: Drop any nonsense about high speed rail and instead embrace intra-city public transportation and update the infrastructure for autonomous driving. We need to update existing rail infrastructure in mature cities (NY in particular) and focus on building new rail infrastructure in more modern cities. Odds of this happening: 10-20%

* Immigration: Amnesty for the Dreamers in exchange for an overhauled and merit-based immigration system. Odds of this happening: LOL

* Marijuana: Federal legalization. 62% of Americans are in favor of this, per a Fox News exit poll a few days ago. There aren't strong coalitions against this anymore. Odds of this happening: 25-50%

Realistic view: 

* Not a damn thing is going to happen for the next two years. ",Bhangus,e9bcqdj,conservative
"""Is hating Trump a political agenda?""

""No Patrick, hating Trump isn't a political agenda.""

*raises hand*

""No, hating Republicans isn't a political agenda either.""",MuricanStephen,e9bbzl4,conservative
"I just read this article in The Fiscal Times: [3 Areas Where Trump and Democrats Can Maybe, Possibly Work Together](http://www.thefiscaltimes.com/2018/11/07/3-Areas-Where-Trump-and-Democrats-Can-Maybe-Possibly-Work-Together). Basically, 1) prescription drug prices, 2) infrastructure, and 3) immigration (namely DACA).",wine_o_clock,e9bezaj,conservative
hate Trump,superdude411,e9bjzxn,conservative
"They won't want anything positive on the federal level, since it will be under Trump's tenure. i.e. marijuana legalization, with TLRY jumping 30% yesterday.",Saigunx,e9bjb33,conservative
Unlimited immigration to make USA 1850 again. ,socrates40000,e9baitg,conservative
"Open borders, on demand citizenship, free stuff, the usual. ",FallingPinkElephant,e9bc3xy,conservative
There is one agenda and one agenda only get rid of trump and sweep conservatives and conservative values into the trash ,Jokengonzo,e9bcb81,conservative
They had a legislative agenda? ,1wjl1,e9ba3q4,conservative
"Today's Democratic politician in the go doesn't have time for complex legislation.  He's got an anti-Trump rally at noon and a spot on Anderson Cooper's show at six.

He needs to look like *he's fighting* for or against something, but that takes *effort.*  What's a harried politician to do?

Why, wait for a shooting!  Preferably one involving suburban white people.  It's the very model of convenience, since the legislation to ""address"" the issue has already been written.  What could be easier?

He can *fight* to regulate something he hasn't taken the time to understand, he's got a built-in strawman with the NRA, and by Jove, he'll look *great* pushing it.  Look how Shannon Watts and Michael Bloomberg make eyes at him! 

Gun control:  it's just that ~~cheap~~ easy! ",LonelyMachines,e9bfce5,conservative
"1. Eliminate the Republican party
2. Take away all guns
3. No more elections
4. Ban all religions except muslim.
5. Ban all free thought and speech
6. Asign each person their role in society",scrubking,e9bg92t,conservative
">what legislative agenda are [Democrats] going to pursue to help Americans?

When has that ever been their goal?",PrawnsAreOk,e9bebwm,conservative
"Lol, good one. I needed a laugh",wasr_woes,e9bepdf,conservative
There's a huge assumption in the title there... ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9betz2,conservative
None? Is the correct answer none? Because wouldn't they first actually have to have an agenda that would help america instead of themselves?,SilverHerfer,e9bg1rm,conservative
"> what legislative agenda are they going to pursue to help Americans?

I wasn't aware that was an intention they were entertaining.  Is ""Resist President Trump"" a legitimate agenda?",Jizzlobber42,e9bghuz,conservative
"Unions, Health Care, Maternity Leave. Lots of stuff.",MyNewAccount962,e9bhtvx,conservative
Reminding America why we voted them out.,senatorpjt,e9bmvpv,conservative
Orange man bad!,stoffel_bristov,e9bfwzv,conservative
"Investigations, resistance, obstruction, and possible attempted impeachment. None of it helpful to Americans or the United States im general, but it’s what they will do. ",War-Damn-America,e9biraa,conservative
"Marijuana legalization might happen, prison reform will probably happen... and that's probably about it.


The Democrats are too divided right now to pass anything else. On issues like education, healthcare, and infrastructure, half the party will want to socialize everything and the other half still has a brain and will want a more moderate solution. So everything will become gridlocked in what's effectively a three party house.",Frashizzle,e9bpieb,conservative
"They are not. They are going to claim Trump is a Russian, and push retarded conspiracy theories, and try to impeach him.",TakeMeToTheArch,e9bvleb,conservative
The literal  opposite of what Trump wants.,SuperFunMonkey,e9bxgvx,conservative
An record setting pork barrel infrastructure bill so all of them can say look what I did for my constituents when they run in 2 years.,Bartalone,e9c0ucy,conservative
Hahahahahaha,retired-vet,e9ccc1n,conservative
Gun control.,M6D_Magnum,e9ck9ps,conservative
I'M PEACH,Autismprevails,e9cmp9k,conservative
"Mods, please post and share all the reports submitted for this sticky. I need a laugh today.",JustHereForTheSalmon,e9bes6b,conservative
I’m sure it will be a calm and civil discourse with all sides coming together in harmony to serve their constituents.,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9bfwu1,conservative
None,Manchurainprez,e9bhddi,conservative
Pass a bill to kill all white men.,nixfu,e9bzos9,conservative
Do you work for the Babylon Bee now?,chabanais,e9bf1pk,conservative
"> Due to the Origination Clause all bills that raise revenue must originate in the House, so they basically write the budget.

I know your post is sarcastic, but I wanted to chip in here to observe that this does mean that the next budget negotiation is going to be god-awful.  I fully expect a shutdown.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bfkb9,conservative
If this is what the republicans really want then why didn't they pass these bills when they controlled the president and both legislative houses?,Manuel___Calavera,e9bye6y,conservative
The Babylon Bee needs you on their staff. ,LonelyMachines,e9bev13,conservative
"If only, If only. We could never even get Republicans do all those good things.",Splickity-Lit,e9bssyj,conservative
"Amazing write up.

The humor wasn't lost on me.

",PrawnsAreOk,e9befn3,conservative
"God damn u/Yosoff , almost got me with that one",Jizzlobber42,e9bh5xj,conservative
I believed you until you said minimum wage... I wish it were true,GGtheBoss17,e9br83f,conservative
"Trump will Veto any bill not including funding for the Wall... so nothing is going to get done for 2 years.

On all the other matters, democrats have no good ideas or plans whatsoever.  The GOP will just set back all let the democrats fuck up for the next 2 years and then take the house back with Trump's re-election.   ",ozric101,e9bah1p,conservative
"""Want 4% funding for the wall in exchange for complete amnesty?"" which fake news spun as ""Trump wouldn't accept the compromise bill that gave him everything he wanted!!!""",___-III----III-___,e9bbxf2,conservative
#BOTOX LADY GOOD,unibuckeye,e9bnbxq,conservative
"> low hanging fruit is DACA for boarder wall

Ask Reagan how well that worked out when he trusted the dems on immigration.

> some sort of paper cut gun control branded as a ""compromise""

The second amendment is pretty clear cut, and gun control proposed is not a ""compromise"", it's a direct violation of the constitution. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9bbzkh,conservative
No Trump was planning on making MMJ legal after the midterms for months now. I like healthcare price controls. The healthcare industry profits too damn much which makes insurance expensive too ,canIchangethislaterr,e9batzf,conservative
"> some sort of paper cut gun control branded as a ""compromise"", 

I'm ok with this (e.g. something as 'useful' as a proposal to ban left-handed fully automatic .300 Win Mag handguns) as long as the compromise is something truly useful like constitutional carry nation-wide, or nation-wide CCW reciprocity.  

Other than that, a gun control 'compromise' that does not actually give anything to gun owners is not a 'compromise', it's a concession.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bfgxc,conservative
"> Amnesty for the Dreamers

Better not happen. Trump needs to learn from Reagans biggest mistake",LastationNeoCon,e9bfv1m,conservative
">ACA: Adjust ACA to get people with preexisting conditions out of health insurance markets and into separate state or federal risk pools. Premiums have skyrocketed due to covering people with preexisting conditions; removing them should make the insurance markets less risky for insurers which should result in lower premiums. 

What does that do to the people who have pre-existing conditions, though?",yet-to-be,e9bozds,conservative
"> ACA: Adjust ACA to get people with preexisting conditions out of health insurance markets and into separate state or federal risk pools. Premiums have skyrocketed due to covering people with preexisting conditions; removing them should make the insurance markets less risky for insurers which should result in lower premiums. Odds of this happening: 0-10%

This is actually a really good idea that I've never heard pitched before. It makes so much sense. Put those with prexisting conditions who can't find group coverage through work into Medicaid hospitals, let everyone else enjoy a cheaper and more efficient private system. It answers both the ""healthcare is a right"" people and also the argument of ""why should I have to go to a shitty medicaid hospital because someone else is chronically ill.""",Frashizzle,e9bp9fi,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> Infrastructure: Drop any nonsense about high speed rail and instead embrace intra-city public transportation and update the infrastructure for autonomous driving. We need to update existing rail infrastructure in mature cities (NY in particular) and focus on building new rail infrastructure in more modern cities. Odds of this happening: 10-20%

This would be a brilliant idea that won't happen due to Amtrak/union interests. High speed rail is a great pork barrel bill, and we all know how much Congress loves pork barrel bills. ",psstein,e9btm6c,conservative
"*raises hand*

""Impeaching Kavanaugh?""

""Sure, why not?"" ",LonelyMachines,e9bl8t0,conservative
But The USA was still 90% white in 1850 ,noaski,e9bvpwp,conservative
"I wonder how hard it wold be to go into a blue area, spout random far left bullshit, and siphon votes from the dems in that area. Bonus if you get elected and then backstab the dems.",LastationNeoCon,e9bfzuo,conservative
add 20 liberals to SCOTUS,JobieWanKenobi,e9bidk3,conservative
Thanks!,chabanais,e9bf2er,conservative
"""hurrr orange man bad, yousa nazi, yousa far right!!!!!""",LastationNeoCon,e9bfvza,conservative
Question: the senate can vote against any socialist spending bills right?,ExpensiveMention,e9bwz9d,conservative
"The Origination Clause applies to bills that raise revenue (e.g. taxation), no? The federal budget originates with the President’s budget request, then the House and Senate make their resolutions. I think that’s the process, right? 

Regardless, I don’t think budget negotiations will be that painful given that congressional Republicans have not shied away from deficit spending the past two years. Dems love to spend too, so I’m sure it’ll be a gay old time.",wine_o_clock,e9bp2mi,conservative
"It's what conservatives want, not what Republicans want.  Key difference.",NovaX81,e9c8ulq,conservative
Lack of resolve.,Buddha_Punch,e9c92qu,conservative
"> Trump will Veto any bill not including funding for the Wall... so nothing is going to get done for 2 years.

I hope so, Trump has blinked on the issue before though. 

He is a bit more pragmatic than people hope on immigration/border sometimes and one hand is tied given how the democrat run media reports things nowadays. ",I_am_just_saying,e9bao8g,conservative
How did you get your cool flair?!,InfiniteSomethings,e9bhqio,conservative
Which one,peeves91,e9bsn88,conservative
"> The second amendment is pretty clear cut, and gun control proposed is not a ""compromise"", it's a direct violation of the constitution.

That hasn't stopped them so far.",soylent_absinthe,e9bfapg,conservative
"> No Trump was planning on making MMJ legal after the midterms for months now.

Whoever actually pushes legislation will win that PR battle 

> I like healthcare price controls. 

I dont, you cant regulate away supply and demand economics, if you force lower profit incentive you will get less competition and lower supply, but I understand that a lot of people (a lot of Trump people included) like the idea, which is why the democrats will see it as an easy legislative victory to push through, it fits very naturally within their ideology. 

Or its entirely possible they stick to the Orange Man Bad routine and refuse to do anything with Trump because they view it as a victory in 2020 
",I_am_just_saying,e9bbvv6,conservative
Price controls are not a solution. Deregulation is.,fluffyfluffyheadd,e9bba10,conservative
">I like healthcare price controls. The healthcare industry profits too damn much which makes insurance expensive too 

Spoken like someone who knows nothing. *Looks at post history*. Oh, youre a high school student who primarily posts about doing drugs...big shocker.",jac5,e9bdmxw,conservative
"> The healthcare industry profits too damn much which makes insurance expensive too

Absolute nonsense. Here is what (almost certainly) makes healthcare more expensive and what that would look like in a more ""true"" insurance/service market, such as automotive:

* Forcing insurers to lump risky people in with non-risky people - imagine buying car insurance where insurers were required to offer the same price to someone who has never been in an accident as someone who annually at-fault in an accident, and how prices increase for everyone in that model to offset the bad bets.
* Forcing healthcare providers to provide services for those who will not pay - imagine a car dealership being forced to repair people's cars whether they could pay or not, and how prices increase for everyone in that model to offset the non-payers.
* Forcing insurers to provide coverage for birth control or non-relevant coverage - imagine all car insurers were required to only offer comprehensive insurance and cover oil changes as well, and how prices increase for everyone in that model even if they don't need comprehensive coverage.

Now add to this a *massive* administrative overhead that doesn't currently exist with automotive insurance and repair and you get America's health system.",soylent_absinthe,e9bgcn2,conservative
"Diocletion tried price controls all the way back in the 3rd Century, why don't you google what came of them?",Javalavadava,e9bg4m9,conservative
Have a source on this? ,W3NTZ,e9bi4gx,conservative
"I actually agree on principle, but when I'm most honest with myself I can't justify advocating for a solution that deports 3.6M people who were largely raised in this country. But my sympathy ends there. There are another 7M+ people here illegally that are not Dreamers, and I have no warm feelings towards them. If a deal was reached that gave them legal status without citizenship, great. If not, that's fine too. But I genuinely believe this country would be better off giving the Dreamers legal status compared with the status quo. 

But what it very clear is that we need a *legislative* solution to this. The executive brand and courts cannot continue to be used as a workaround to legislative failures. ",Bhangus,e9bhy6w,conservative
"What's different about this proposal from what existed pre-ACA? Pre-existing conditions represent a not insignificant portion of the population (on the order of tens of millions) and they caused a lot of trouble before the exclusions were eliminated. There has to be something solid to replace what existed before, which was long waiting periods or, if flat out denied, expensive high risk pools.",yet-to-be,e9bqxzd,conservative
"I imagine one of them would recognize me, then point and scream like Donald Sutherland at the end of Invasion of the Body Snatchers.",LonelyMachines,e9biwm5,conservative
Budgets began life in the house then they have to merge with the bill in the senate then they have to go to the White House.,chabanais,e9bx7mw,conservative
This. We better pray he doesn't cuck on amnesty like Reagan did. No to daca,LastationNeoCon,e9bfsvl,conservative
The mods gave it to me.,ozric101,e9bksq8,conservative
Just look at California. Although it's hard to imagine even a dem house reaching that level of gun control stupidity ,funnyfaceguy,e9bikk4,conservative
Now we have Kav.,craig80,e9c94l0,conservative
"I mean just like how college is super expensive now days, health care is expensive because of substidies. Take away substidies and prices will go down across the board",canIchangethislaterr,e9bcak6,conservative
As a Democrat voter I would be pissed if that last part happened and would rather things be accomplished. I just want the Mueller investigation to continue unimpeded that’s all,jadamsf51,e9bfpjy,conservative
"And we should start treating it like a foreign policy issue. Our domestic corporations need to make up more costs at home because of price controls in countries with socialized medicine. We need to pressure places like the UK to remove theirs and \#PayTheirFairShare as well as enforce IP laws to prevent our patents from being violated by counties like India and China. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9bc4w5,conservative
What type of deregs could be put in place to help with the ridiculous prices of medical care,canIchangethislaterr,e9bbqc1,conservative
Why the fuck are you people always so creepy? You post non stop about golf and politics and I'm interested in pharmacology and ethnobiology. Tell me who is the more pathetic one.,canIchangethislaterr,e9bfm6h,conservative
"$1,500 for a 1.2 mile ambulance ride is too much. ",canIchangethislaterr,e9bgsqk,conservative
You only proved my point that the health system is too expensive and government subsidies need to be pulled to bring prices down,canIchangethislaterr,e9bgvwm,conservative
Lmao how the hell was I supposed to know something that happened in 200 AD?😂,canIchangethislaterr,e9bgcju,conservative
"Here's one:

https://www.marijuanamoment.net/trump-plans-to-back-legal-medical-marijuana-after-midterms-gop-congressman-says/ 
",canIchangethislaterr,e9bi8mf,conservative
"The government's ability to fiat is what's different. Basically, not medicaid for all, but medicaid for the most risky and regular insurance for the rest.

It's the same basic concept as Medicare - a product that is inferior to regular insurance but way better than nothing and would allow the private market to exist and function for everyone else.",Frashizzle,e9br7x3,conservative
"""Hold our gluten free beer"" - Dems",arogozine,e9braug,conservative
"Sign by Ronald Reagan.

",Mr_jon3s,e9brqgd,conservative
for how many more fruitless years do you want it to continue?,JobieWanKenobi,e9bi4g1,conservative
"Ding ding ding, we have a winner!! This has to keep being hammered. It's 100% correct and almost nobody ever frames it in these terms. ",Gam3rGurl13,e9bdi8u,conservative
"The unfortunate issue is that countries with socialized medicine may threaten to void all pharmaceutical patents, which will screw US companies over and effectively eliminate R&D. ",psstein,e9bsvbs,conservative
"There are lots of technical tweaks that could be done regarding generics and testing that could lower costs and allow for more competition. 

increase the rate of drug approvals federally

removal of anti consumer gag orders like when doctors cant recommend cheaper generic drugs due to agreements in their PBM contracts. 

Increasing the number of doctors accepted and graduating from medical schools

Make it easier to get general prescriptions for non dangerous/ non addictive drugs like antibiotics. 

increased tax credits for private practice and primary care doctors

price transparency 

If you want the most healthcare for the lowest cost possible you want the market to look like the lasik or cosmetic surgery market as much as possible. Both fields have seen dematic cost decreases in a larger field where prices have dramatically increased. 

The more cost conscious consumers making decisions the better. The more competition within the marketplace the better. ",I_am_just_saying,e9bcm4d,conservative
"I mean, 'both' is still an option, right?

Kidding. I do hate it when people try to pull up post history as an argument. It's consistently an indicator of an underdeveloped argument or of someone with low confidence. Not to mention, most people look at the two most recent posts and assume they know everything about you lol. Few months back I had a few ""conservatives"" scan through my post history and declare emphatically that I was a liberal cuckold who was infiltrating this sub to discredit conservatism. Mods got on top of that real fast, thankfully. Still, I wish we were better than that.

edit: It is true that liberals often brigade this sub and troll us by pretending to be conservatives. That is a problem and in that case checking post history is warranted and can be helpful. But it's very clear that this is not what's happening in this thread.",danjvelker,e9btfg4,conservative
"> You only proved my point that the health system is too expensive and government subsidies need to be pulled to bring prices down

...that wasn't what you said at all initially. You said:

> I like healthcare price controls

That is literally the *polar opposite* of what you're now saying.

",soylent_absinthe,e9bhta7,conservative
"It's called an ""education""..........

Ever heard of the saying ""Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it""? Just because something sounds good, doesn't mean it is. Especially when it's been tried before and failed, multiple times.........",Javalavadava,e9bgpkc,conservative
Thanks I appreciate it! Dunno how I missed this ,W3NTZ,e9bios8,conservative
"Passing the expensive, risky people on to the care covered by federal tax dollars seems like it's hiding the costs rather than dealing with them.

Even if I get cheaper insurance on the private market, I'm still paying the taxes to support the Medicaid coverage for others. Why is that a gain?",yet-to-be,e9brqiq,conservative
California has the best beer in the country bar none,Manuel___Calavera,e9bygro,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> removal of anti consumer gag orders like when doctors cant recommend cheaper generic drugs due to agreements in their PBM contracts. 

Just to build on that, eliminate ""no generic substitutes allowed."" ",psstein,e9bsxyb,conservative
"Control the prices as in medicine can only get so expensive like maybe 15% price hikes and stuff like that. Idk why you guys are going nuts because I said a $1,500 ambulance ride for 1.2 miles is really expensive ",canIchangethislaterr,e9bhzlf,conservative
No shit but something needs to change in the health system,canIchangethislaterr,e9bh3ed,conservative
The MSM hates Trump so they would never report on something like this. There are many more articles about this too but hardly any are from MSM sources,canIchangethislaterr,e9bitdl,conservative
"I meant I thought it was a good idea as a compromise rather than the optimal plan. We're never going to be able to go back to the days where insurers could assess prexisting conditions. We didn't even have the votes for that when we controlled the house.


So either way, you're going to be paying for their care if you have health insurance. It can either be through a tax or equivalently higher premiums.


So the best solution, given these conditions, is to hope that the government just fiating costs like they do with Medicare can achieve some minimal savings.",Frashizzle,e9bs3zs,conservative
"Because capitalism breaks down when the proper incentives aren't there. That's exactly what happens to people with pre existing conditions. They are inherently more expensive to cover and lumping them in with the general population ends up costing all consumers more. You can't include them without the entire price increasing. And not including them is untenable. Not being able to pay for this particular product leads to death or massive debt. So you need to separate these individuals from the market, and allow the insurance companies to cover the low-risk population normally. ",fellinsoccer14,e9cdsc5,conservative
Colorado and Oregon beg to differ ,The_crew,e9bz2fx,conservative
">Control the prices as in medicine can only get so expensive like maybe 15% price hikes and stuff like that.

How do you enforce it without creating an even larger unaccountable regulatory state? ",psstein,e9bt1rn,conservative
"And repeating the failures of the past isn't going to fix it, how is this such a hard concept to grasp?

How about instead of adding regulation, you reduce it? How about we reduce the amount of paperwork healthcare providers and insurers need to keep? How about you actually allow people to see the cost of healthcare, instead of sending it out for a third party to pay for it? How about you allow a situation where general healthcare can be treated the same way Lasik eye surgery is treated? It used to be very expensive about a decade or two ago but now it's very affordable due to it not being covered by insurance. I'm no healthcare expert but I'm at least educated enough to understand MORE government involvement won't fix the problem. If anything it will exacerbate the problems, but you won't care because you won't see the cost.",Javalavadava,e9bhub6,conservative
Any brands you can recommend?,Manuel___Calavera,e9bz691,conservative
What do you mean? Like a black market? There already is. Still keeps the overall price of healthcare down. ,canIchangethislaterr,e9c8hs1,conservative
This is one of the few times I think government involvment would be okay. It would be nice if the government prevented things like the insulin and epipen incident from happening,canIchangethislaterr,e9bi5u9,conservative
Elevation from Colorado is really good.,tendrils87,e9c6a7b,conservative
"Can’t remember names off the top of my head (only one I remember is the Avery brewery, as I have always only traveled through and gone to breweries), but will be in Boulder next week so shoot me a PM and I’ll let you know where I go.",The_crew,e9c0l8o,conservative
"And you are wrong, because the reason those medicines can be so expensive is because of government regulation! Epipens are expensive because the government PREVENTS competitors from entering the market due to patent laws and other extreme costs associated with getting a medical product to the market. That's Government regulation causing the problems you're complaining about, and you're response is ""MORE REGULATIONS PLEASE!""

Riddle me this buddy, do you think more government regulation of drugs will solve the drug problem in this country? ",Javalavadava,e9bii66,conservative
"Someone bought the epipen patent. People shouldn't be able to do that and raise prices. Medicines should only be able to be increased so many percent per year or at all. That's what I mean. Government subsities should be pulled to make it less profitable also.

Do you mean the illcit drug problem? ",canIchangethislaterr,e9birlk,conservative
"Why would anyone want to invent a new medicine, if they can't make money off of it? How about instead of price controls, something I've already pointed out does not work, you remove the ever greening aspect on medical patents? Or how about you reduce the amount of time patents last? Also, it's Subsidies not subsities, and subsidies are not the root cause of the problem. The root cause is the anti-free market aspect of patents and regulation associated with bringing a new medical product to market. Why don't you ask for the government to lessen the regulation associated with passing FDA hurdles?

Yes, I mean the illicit drug problem. Do you think having MORE regulations will solve the drug problems such as the Heroin epidemic going on? And no, you don't get to just say ""make drugs legal"" because that would be reducing regulations, which is what I've been saying. ",Javalavadava,e9bj9fz,conservative
"It's almost like the legal and illegal drug problems in this country are two extremely different things. How are you honestly able to go from ""why would anyone want to make a new medicine if they can't make money off of it?"" to ""how about we make the drug patent periods shorter"" which would make it harder for companies to recoup the costs of developing a new medicine.... at least stick to one argument ",canIchangethislaterr,e9bjlnz,conservative
"Because there's a difference between the current situation where drug patents can be extended to stupid lengths and having no patent period. 

I only have one argument by the way, reduce regulation. Which would bring down costs. If it costs less money to bring a drug to market, then the patent period being shorter wouldn't have that big of an effect on profitability of said drug. 

And, congrats on missing the point of bringing up the illegal drug problem in the country. The point was that MORE regulations cause more problems. Making drugs illegal didn't magically make drug use go away, the same outcome would come of price controls. Rather than creating ""acceptable prices"" you would just create shortages and speculation because there would be less incentive to produce said product.

Try to remember this next time you suggest something like price controls. ""The road to ruin is paved with good intentions.""",Javalavadava,e9bmv1k,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> I only have one argument by the way, reduce regulation. Which would bring down costs. If it costs less money to bring a drug to market, then the patent period being shorter wouldn't have that big of an effect on profitability of said drug. 

Part of the reason it takes forever to bring drugs to market is the (justified) paranoia about human health risks. That paranoia is largely grounded in the thalidomide disaster, though there's an argument that medical knowledge has significantly advanced since the 1950s/60s.  

Outside of major health crises (HIV/AIDS is probably the best known one), it's extraordinarily rare to just shove drugs forward. ",psstein,e9bt872,conservative
The people’s faith in Democracy dies when Democrats pull shit like this. ,link_ganon,e9bxo8n,conservative
Stop letting this slide. Contact your local republican senators and representatives. This is an atrocity. The death of our party will not be because of Democrats but spineless Republicans who let things like this go. ,MoarBaconStrips,e9byv8s,conservative
"Fuck it let’s do the same thing. I think we didn’t lose Michigan, Nevada and Montana. We still have “air ballots” which are ballots that fall from the sky and for you to not accept that is racist. ",latotokyo123,e9bybm3,conservative
Does this mean we get to riot and try to intimidate these crooks?  The Dems are scum.,GMU1993,e9byfcw,conservative
HAHhaahah this is so funny I hope those dem  candidate wins. They deserve it more.,Bootleking,e9cklrw,conservative
"The democrats who pull these stunts don't really want democracy, just their way no matter what.  ",ChewieWookie,e9bxta4,conservative
"Great point. And I will add that Republican voters are cowards as well.  Look at Montana's senate election. Republicans are the majority of the voting population and yet they let Tester slide by. Republicans still think that Democrats mean well and that things just don't go the way they intend them to. But the reality is, the Democrat party only cares about power and revenge. Look at the way they treated Kavanaugh, not a single Democrat defended him. Look at Obamacare, it was a disaster, how many Democrats voted to repeal it? Oh and border security... holy crap... they don't give a shit about anything but power, whatever gets them more political power. ",Rightquercusalba,e9c3ob0,conservative
"Voter ID laws are essential. Preferably a Federal one to cover everyone at once. And make sure they're enforced.

&#x200B;

People who have a problem with getting voter IDs have 2 years to sort it out AFTER EVERY ELECTION. Seriously, if we can deal with the DMV we can deal with this. I keep my passport proving my citizenship in a known location at home... should be no problem for me to take it with me every couple of years. And it shouldn't be for most people...",Terra_green2,e9byvrg,conservative
Look at this semi full of republican votes I just found! Looks like we kept the House afterall boys!,severeneckpain,e9cdao5,conservative
"Well, *normally*, turnabout is fair play. But, I'd advize against it ",rf-engineer,e9c34i0,conservative
Why? This is democracy. The race was already very tight! You are anti democracy if you dont count every legal vote. I know you want your own party win. So I can understand your rage in some sense.,Bootleking,e9ckp1t,conservative
"There are laws in place about getting votes in on time, which your party obviously can't follow. Not surprised you disagree with laws that don't favor your stance. ",ChewieWookie,e9cocjq,conservative
"Democracy was on Tuesday, when the vote deadline was.

This is lawlessness.",quadrophenia515,e9cucfo,conservative
Probably why the republicans lost seats in cali tbh. That early house call was at 649 pacific while the polls were still open. It might have turned some people off from voting,iwasthebeaver,e9c3405,conservative
"Fox was not good this coverage. I was shocked with how they called things. They’ve been the best in the past but god, were they awful this time around ",xPineappless,e9cgcj3,conservative
"I abhor CNN, but found their midterm coverage to be considerably better than Fox's.

Time to step up the infographics, Fox.",Armageddon_It,e9ccmx2,conservative
"Seats and viewers - the hosts seemed perceptibly annoyed by how early the prediction was.            

Not sure what the point was...",tau_decay,e9ca5dh,conservative
How many close ones in Cali were there?,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c6d36,conservative
The point was discourage west coast republicans from voting. Controlled opposition,iwasthebeaver,e9caivy,conservative
3 or 4 if memory serves,iwasthebeaver,e9c8070,conservative
Interesting. Yea the fox thing might have had a hand.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c8b0r,conservative
And these numbers don't even begin to account for the hundreds of millions of dead and dying due to the lack of net neutrality or a climate accord. /s,ngoni,e9cynif,conservative
"Good. If Trump was genuine in assuring the American public that he is completely innocent, then he will be cleared and this can be put behind us. 
If not, then he needs to be held accountable for his actions just as any one of us would be. 
",Nevaknosbest,e9bz479,conservative
yet NPC's were protesting today about this.. ,Delta_25,e9c1ssv,conservative
Holy fuck it’s about time ,rharravs,e9cqasl,conservative
If mueller held info for 2 years that a sitting president was colluding with the Russians he needs to be held accountable as well,dudeman4win,e9c19nw,conservative
"What's an NPC, in your context? I've seen this before and I'm not in the loop.",Nevaknosbest,e9c4be6,conservative
">If mueller held info for 2 years that a sitting president was colluding with the Russians he needs to be held accountable as well

Wut?",Dunkeliness,e9cfaxq,conservative
"Why? I surmise that if I were an investigator sitting on something as heavy as possible collusion of a sitting President with a foreign hostile country, I'd be fucking triple checking my shit and compiling everything that isn't nailed down. Coz God help him if he was wrong, that's a career-ending, legacy destroying mistake. 

No, as an American I want to see what may have been unearthed, if anything. The investigation needs to continue unimpeded.",Nevaknosbest,e9c1vi8,conservative
"You know that if you plan on bringing criminal charges, or recommendations for criminal charges against the president that you need to be rock fucking solid in your case? You need to have every hint of doubt not eliminated, but obliterated.",riseoftheorange,e9c5kqq,conservative
"There is no such crime as colluding, just saying. ",ozric101,e9c4f6t,conservative
https://knowyourmeme.com/memes/npc-wojak?full=1,AlternativePenguin,e9cerx3,conservative
It both needs to continue unimpeded and it's good that he's writing his final report coz Trump bad.                ,tau_decay,e9c24kg,conservative
"The definition of collusion is ""doing an illegal thing""",Bilxor,e9coofy,conservative
Uhh......okay,Nevaknosbest,e9c2i1r,conservative
The perils of mindlessly typing out talking points include embarrassingly contradicting yourself.                                 ,tau_decay,e9c3es0,conservative
What talking points am I espousing? I must be shameless because I seem to be unphased by some contradition I appeared to have made that you claim to be so bad as to be embarrassingly so. ,Nevaknosbest,e9c3oc9,conservative
You're assuming Mueller has evidence of Trump's guilt and his meticulousness is the reason why no evidence has been shown in two years. I wont entirely ruin the surprise for you but I'll just tease that it's literally the total opposite of that.,Solypsys,e9cf6mc,conservative
"Josef Stalin: **""Those who cast the votes decide nothing. Those who count the votes decide everything.""**",guanaco55,e9d0wbt,conservative
"The last few days should be evidence enough for everyone that the left is circling the wagons and trying to ensure they squeeze us out of political power in 2020 and cement their takeover of the country. We have to unite and fight back with everything we have. 

As Franklin said, we must all hang together or we will surely hang separately. ",YankeeBlues21,e9cb1jz,conservative
And the leftist mob scattered like cockroaches in a cheap and dirty fridge once the fuzz showed up... When are we going to institute RICO on these beasts?,ENEB1487,e9b5yf7,conservative
Here it comes.,GreekLogic,e9bb0dm,conservative
"More typical behavior from the domestic terrorist organization that’s the militant wing of the Democrats, encouraged and condoned by them. And of course it’s likely they will not be punished for their terroristic threats and destruction of property, much less their Democrat leaders that incite these violent mobs. 

Law enforcement is far past overdue in getting involved and restoring peace, law, and order. It’s almost to the point where use of lethal force isn’t just legally an option due to what these violent domestic terrorists do, but the last option left. ",VictorVonEffyou,e9b6mfz,conservative
"[The police report details also have more information](https://pbs.twimg.com/media/Drf5iWWX0AElk0b.jpg:large)

",aCreditGuru,e9bdnrw,conservative
This is disgusting.  Antifa should be deemed a domestic terrorism organization.,JillyBean1717,e9cq8tm,conservative
[deleted],,e9b5jur,conservative
[removed],,e9b5sce,conservative
"Hmmm, that's odd. It works for me. ",peeves91,e9b5qb5,conservative
"LOL.  The party of the perpetually triggered calls us snowflakes.  

However will we cope? /s",lastbastion,e9b7rto,conservative
You think this is an appropriate thing to do to someone you disagree with?,peeves91,e9ba7xc,conservative
Maybe it my phone. ,mods_blow_goats,e9b7fhb,conservative
"This thing has been in the pipeline (pun intended) for 10 years.  It's been studied enough.  
  
It's a political question at this point, and the voters chose Trump.  Build the damned thing.
  
",FelixFuckfurter,e9d4ku4,conservative
"Transporting oil by train is far more potentially damaging to the environment, the studies have been done, there is no argument left.

Just as with nuclear energy, the lefts desires are not in like with their goals. ",ozric101,e9d4unt,conservative
Interesting Obama-era article on how department heads are appointed and confirmed that Liberals didn't have a hard time with when Obama was President-elect. ,MSUicetrucker,e9cv4x9,conservative
As a Florida resident if this vote gets flipped I'm going to lose my goddamn mind. This state will be utter chaos if dems take control. I can't stand being helpless here as the dems try to change the outcome of an election...AGAIN.,xJownage,e9c3apb,conservative
They don't even try to hide their henchmen.,SickofInternetProgs,e9c4auh,conservative
The economy is doing great. This will give Dems cover to raise taxes and create new regulations to suck the wealth of the state dry slowly so that the damage is revealed only after a new recession hits. Then they will advocate more government spending and regulations to fix things. If Republicans don't take back power and fix things the state will begin to look like California. ,Rightquercusalba,e9c4qbt,conservative
If even liberal ass Washington declines it then probably yes ,Zac1245,e9cw087,conservative
Speaking of lessons. Can anyone confirm one of the hags from the view blaming the Senate loss on gerrymandering?  Those damn Republicans drawing new state boundaries to win elections,BrockLee76,e9buuyc,conservative
"The voter didn't learn. Why should politicians, ",DozerM,e9buelq,conservative
[It's true.](http://thefederalist.com/2018/11/07/watch-joy-behar-claims-democrats-lost-senate-races-due-to-gerrymandering/),MarioFanaticXV,e9c8ezr,conservative
"What does Shapiro mean, that Cruz is deeply wounded or whatever he said?",jina100,e9c3qu1,conservative
"Trump made me laugh so much, during the press conference.

""Mike Coffman... Too bad, Mike!""

Just endlessly rubbing salt into the wounds. :D

""Mia Love... She gave me no love, and she lost!""",ConvolutedUsername,e9c4dkq,conservative
"I believe he means he made enemies on all sides. Establishment already hated him, Trump Conservatives were convinced he was a liar, and ""Never Trumpers"" were upset that he supported Trump after all that Trump did to him.",ultimis,e9c3x51,conservative
"Oh, gotcha. That makes sense. But it seems to me that Cruz redeemed himself.  
  
I campaigned for Gov Abbott and heard a lot of support for Cruz at the same time, so the win honestly didn’t surprise me. Even people who expressed dissatisfaction with Abbott seemed to have a positive view of Sen Cruz.  
  
Shapiro is right about the purple/suburban vote though. I saw it here in KS especially, where Kobach lost the gubernatorial race precisely because of and solely due to the purple/suburban counties... despite heavy and hard Trump endorsement. Very unfortunate, and I wonder what we can do to hold the R vote in the 2020 presidential election.",jina100,e9c4ano,conservative
"There was pretty wide consensus among conservative media that there is absolutely no way in hell that Cruz' race should. The number one take away I saw from the race is Cruz needs a reevaluation because he is a deeply unlikeable candidate, even though I personally am a fan. ",SirRollsaSpliff,e9c6hdu,conservative
"If this is true, this is incredible.  

Dems have a razor thin lead in the house and lost the senate.  

EVEN IF articles get passed in the House, which they won’t, there is zero chance the senate will follow suit.  

What a waste of time.  ",IWurgency,e9ah7ji,conservative
"Yes, despite there being no evidence that Kavanaugh did anything remotely criminal in his life, the Dems must impeach him - on principle, of course.

Because:

1) Regardless we must believe Blasey Ford (by the way - where is she now?)

2) The Dems didn't get their way - and their way is the only way unless you want rioting, threats, property destruction.

3) To make a point and show us all that though they label Conservatives as ""Fascists"", ""Nazis"", ""Zenophobs"", they're really just deflecting - we know who the real ""Fascists"" are - you can tell by their behavior.",JFGFNY,e9anr6x,conservative
Doubling down on Kavanaugh objections is the best thing Democrats can do for the Republican party. ,mrsassypantz,e9aljxf,conservative
It is a good thing Democrats have learned absolutely nothing from their Senate losses in midterms.,Lepew1,e9akgam,conservative
"Their policies are disastrous, and they know it, so all they can do is 'resist'.  It's also what a big bunch of their voters want, so in that sense it would make more sense for them to investigate than legislate.  ",puddboy,e9am7d7,conservative
"This is a click-baity subject line.

He literally said ""You can't do it quietly.""

We're better than that. Taking shit out of context only hurts us in the long run.
They want to claim perjury on a technicality of mis-remembering which newspaper ran a story first?

That'll go over well.",AnarkeIncarnate,e9b2pfd,conservative
Please do this. This will backfire so fast.,shawn77,e9azz9y,conservative
"Aim for a brick wall and step on the accelerator. 

Good luck.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9aoo0y,conservative
"""do it quietly""?

No such thing, how do they think it will go? That the right will not notice? Just have him disappear one day and us shrug our shoulders? ",Racheakt,e9awjwh,conservative
"Yes, but you fail to account for just how petty these people are. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e9aijys,conservative
"If they want to piss away their chances of keeping the house in 2020, let them. ",Dank_Cartographer,e9ajo1a,conservative
But surely pushing for impeachment and for Ocasio-Cortez style policies are the surest way for Democrats to keep victory in the house next election. Who cares that many of the Democrat pickups were won on narrow margins and in areas that are more moderate in politics? Full steam ahead! ,houseoftolstoy,e9alsz6,conservative
"The Senate doesn't pass articles of impeachment.

If the House passes articles of impeachment, the Senate has to hold a trial. So while the Senate is unlikely to convict, the trial would happen. Such a trial would be more serious than confirmation hearings.",skilless,e9bqtdn,conservative
"Kavanaugh lied under oath, repeatedly. How are you okay with him being on the Court?

There are 24 other names on that list that are perfectly fine candidates and haven't committed perjury.

It's a shame that the Senate confirmed him. Huge dereliction of duty.",ModernDemagogue2,e9au17p,conservative
"Ford vanished after saying she doesn't want Kavanaugh impeached. 

Guess she doesn't see herself being able to milk yet another GoFundMe so it isn't worth her time.",GenJuanitoPequeno,e9ao05r,conservative
"> where is she now?

Hiding from folks like the ones camped outside Tucker Carlson's place. Fuck extremists.",skilless,e9bqwzu,conservative
"You forgot:

4) Muh Merrick Garland",gizayabasu,e9bke2s,conservative
[removed],,e9au8u2,conservative
We need more people who don't sensationalize these type of things this is fake news people the literal thing we hate the most do not stoop to their levels,chulocolombian,e9b88j6,conservative
"> We're better than that

I'm glad you said it. I used to tell people that Conservatives were like everyone else, just better at math. Now I don't believe that :( ",skilless,e9br560,conservative
"They are this dumb. Instead of focusing on their usual voters: people that want to have a job so they can put food on the table, they do everything else but that. ",sjwking,e9bpxwf,conservative
"I didn’t say the senate passes articles of impeachment.  

You don’t read so gud, do ya. ",IWurgency,e9c82i1,conservative
"What were his lies?

And you would have done the same thing to absolutely any candidate selected.",allnamesaretaken45,e9auiv0,conservative
Lol. Do you think it's funny or amusing to make shit up to annoy people?,mnslice,e9b9k5h,conservative
"List one lie and provide proof that he knowingly made a false statement.  

I have vetted dozens of claims he lied - all have been false.  ",IWurgency,e9bf4g1,conservative
Those 24 names are perfectly fine until they’re actually appointed,Dranosh,e9aw2cq,conservative
"I really enjoyed the part where your entire comment was made out of other people's talking points.  
  
It's honestly impressive that you can write a comment that long without a single original statement/idea.",diehardgiraffe,e9awkgf,conservative
"It would be a shame, if what you said was even true in the slightest.

You can't prove he lied under oath, and if he had lied under oath he would not have been confirmed to supreme court.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9b0i5b,conservative
I can't even imagine being this delusional 😂,CAGUnion404,e9awdx0,conservative
"Ford lied under oath. repeatedly. How are you okay with her being taken seriously?

There are 0 other names on that list that wouldnt have the same accusations against them. Because dems pay sluts to accuse them

",ExpensiveMention,e9b15mh,conservative
"> Kavanaugh lied under oath, repeatedly.

Nope.  ",lastbastion,e9avsqz,conservative
"What did she get? 1.6m? Carefully invested, she's set for life. All based on a lie and the most ridiculous performance ever!",JFGFNY,e9apjwb,conservative
She's probably more worried about going to jail for being part of the fraud.,mlmack,e9blqqk,conservative
Yeah - when did the fringe (on both sides) become so much bigger and aggressive?,JFGFNY,e9brppe,conservative
So true - Dems are very payback oriented.,JFGFNY,e9brrfh,conservative
Is this the left version of pizzagate but dumber?,Spysix,e9axpk6,conservative
"> Kavanaugh actually lied under oath in 2006

Those claims are extraordinarily flimsy.

> he lied under oath a few weeks ago when he was talking about what a Devil's Triangle is

You know you're a moron when your grand hard on for an impeachment is ""lying"" about what they were talking about in a high school yearbook because it doesn't align with what you think it means almost 40 years later.",nmj95123,e9b153w,conservative
"Yes, everyone knows that back in the 80s everyone used Urban Dictionary to make sure their slang was the same as everyone else's in the country. Oh wait, they didn't have access to the internet then. I know that's a crazy concept to all of you leftists.  
  
Further, several other people in the yearbook used the phrase *devil's triangle* in the context of a drinking game.  
  
Perjury is a criminal offence, which means you must prove beyond a shadow of a doubt that kavanaugh **meant** that phrase in that specific definition. Which is likely impossible. 
  
Add to this that he has 3 classmate backing up his definition and you have 3 more witnesses backing his story than Ford has backing hers.",diehardgiraffe,e9awzd8,conservative
"> Kavanaugh actually lied under oath in 2006 

Nope.

>he lied under oath a few weeks ago when he was talking about what a Devil's Triangle is


This is just sad.

>Four of Supreme Court nominee Brett Kavanaugh’s former Georgetown Prep classmates said “Devil’s Triangle” was a drinking game.

>Two former Boston College students said their roommate, a high school classmate of Kavanaugh’s, taught them the game.

>A Georgetown Prep alumnus corroborated Kavanaugh’s claim that ‘boofing’ refered to flatulence.

https://dailycaller.com/2018/10/04/kavanaugh-devils-triangle-boofing/
",lastbastion,e9aw88h,conservative
"What did he lie about in 2006? How did he manage to pass multiple background checks and serve in a judicial capacity for 12 years?
I don't care about something written in a year book from 30 years ago. ",JFGFNY,e9b0y6d,conservative
"Kavanagh did not lie about what a Devil's triangle was. Several people had stuff about ""Devil's triangle"" written by them in the yearbook, including one guy who is noted to have ""lost"" at Devil's triangle. Also, two separate former classmates of his described how to play the game. ",AF_Fresh,e9aw3ti,conservative
"Oh so if it wasn't Kavanaugh, Democrats would have made the confirmation a smooth process? ",allnamesaretaken45,e9aun8y,conservative
Your username is *extremely* appropriate. ,Mahanaus,e9azcjx,conservative
">Devil’s Triangle


Lol ",Dranosh,e9aw6nv,conservative
"The wider the tent, the more people on the fringe.

",AnarkeIncarnate,e9bszlt,conservative
"“Follow suit” means hold a trial and convict the accused?

If that’s what you meant, I’ve got to say, you don’t write “so gud”",skilless,e9cb0aa,conservative
"As a prof at PAU she's already been making over $150k/yr (possibly a lot more). I have a feeling she was already set for life.

",skilless,e9br2ql,conservative
But the npc never heard about it. So clearly it isn't real. /s,LumpyWumpus,e9ayb7t,conservative
Don't know - all those extra exits cost $$$ ;0,JFGFNY,e9brnvi,conservative
"No he read an Urban Dictionary page on it, and as we all know, language and slang are static and don’t differ over time or location.   


/s",RanchRelaxo,e9bbfx4,conservative
"Woah, I’m shocked, this is unconstitutional!  He’s totally encroaching on our fourth branch of government, Robert Mueller",gster50,e9btodm,conservative
"This appointment seems to be unconstitutional possibly, [according to Clarence Thomas.](https://twitter.com/nycsouthpaw/status/1060419200324419584) 

",memberCP,e9bvovk,conservative
Good. Sessions showed that he was too weak for the job when he pulled that shit. ,GuitarWizard90,e9bvoi3,conservative
[removed],,e9c0nc1,conservative
"Of course not, sheesh.

You got highly partisan, conspiratorial texts from democrats working on the investigation about how they're going to get Trump, did the Democrats even **once** care about that?  No.  Double standard anyone?",BrighamYoung,e9btrw7,conservative
Impeach!!! Haha. Lower democrats. Trump has enough seats in the senate to never get impeached. ,Nostraadms,e9bwm36,conservative
I guess every president needs a *wingman*.,rf-engineer,e9bv723,conservative
5th. You forgot the media,Enzo_SAWFT,e9btx87,conservative
"> It's a criminal investigation being lead by Robert Mueller, a Republican, 

Lol

>under guidance of Rod Rosenstein, also a Republican. 

LOL

>Both with rather impeccable records.

HAHAHAHA",PrawnsAreOk,e9c2p6d,conservative
Not the same scenario as Obama Holder. There is no reason for him to recuse himself. ,Rightquercusalba,e9bxwo8,conservative
I once had a liberal friend that *literally* suggested the media should be a branch of the government.,MarioFanaticXV,e9c9hop,conservative
"Well I see you disagree, do you care to elaborate as to why you find the particular statements I made to be funny? I don't make it a habit to say things that aren't true, at least certainly not on purpose. ",Nevaknosbest,e9c2wet,conservative
">Not the same scenario as Obama Holder. 

Right. Holder made sure nothing made it this far. I think Trump's administration been way way more above board than Obama's.

>There is no reason for him to recuse himself. 

I agree. ",rf-engineer,e9c0lqb,conservative
"> do you care to elaborate as to why you find the particular statements I made to be funny?

Because their quite literally laughable.

You're going to tell me that ""but their republicans, they even say they are!"" Yeah, well if I told you I was the queen of england, would you believe me? 

If I told you something about myself which was demonstrably false, and someone else repeated it as fact, would you not find the situation laughable?

Mr. Rosenstein & Mr. Mueller may have, at one time, been progressive neo-cons, but they are not, today, republicans in any definition of the word.

You may even say some gay shit like ""But that's no true scotsman! Just because they don't fit your definition doesn't mean they aren't! Their true patriots trying to protect us from the evil fascist Trump!""

And to that, I would say, again, LOL.",PrawnsAreOk,e9c3j1v,conservative
"I will agree with you in one main aspect. I don't surmise that many conservatives find themselves comfortable with the direction the Republican politicians are taking the party, perhaps to include Mueller and Rosenstein. To include myself. Unless you yourself believe that the party is adhering to the ""small government"" and ""states rights"" tenets that once made up the party platform. Those are just feel good statements now, they hold no value to the modern Republican polititian. Some of us still believe in these words, and want America to return to it's senses.",Nevaknosbest,e9c435m,conservative
Can you imagine if a republican was caught on tape bashing the state?,the-divine-comedy,e9btgs4,conservative
I know everyone's freaking out about Florida but something's going down in AZ too lol,mbarnar,e9br4ej,conservative
How do you call your state a meth lab and then win?,YankeeBlues21,e9bs760,conservative
"400K votes left. A lot of the ones remaining are those brought to polling places on election day and military ballots. 

Fingers crossed. ",memberCP,e9bw1te,conservative
"Laura Ingraham is now saying it's likely Sinema wins, Arizona just got a absentee drop that wasn't previously accounted for putting sinema up 9000 with more to come. Post 11th hour unaccounted for absentee drop loses the state for us, all in favor of the dem of course.. Same may very well happen in florida.",Zyrioun,e9bvjut,conservative
"We are heading into Friday. How in the hell do they not have all votes counted yet? And how the f does one person suddenly lose a plut 10,000 vote lead?!  This is BS",MaddSim,e9btu47,conservative
media not doing its job (as usual) to highlight how horrible Sinema is. This shouldn't have even been a contest.,Terra_green2,e9bt8cq,conservative
"Shits not over yet ladies and gentleman, we got a long way to go for some of this...",Zac1245,e9brzbi,conservative
"Have Republicans ever had a seat won to magically appearing ballots? 

It seems to only ever go one way with this bs",greeneyedunicorn2,e9bw9gn,conservative
Not shady at all,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bsbti,conservative
"The dems have flipped 2 senate seats in 36 hours and 2 more are looking like they go the same way, and the republicans are going along with it, dems may yet have control of both houses at the end of this",johnson881_,e9bwo88,conservative
So we're jus gonna let them get away with this aren't we...,latotokyo123,e9btd25,conservative
This is starting to turn into a blue wave,the-divine-comedy,e9bueqw,conservative
Nooooooo!,ChironInTheSky,e9br6sr,conservative
No. She cheats into the lead.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9c1zqz,conservative
Wtf,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9brx9n,conservative
"345,000 more votes to count in Maricopa County left to count and some from smaller counties. ",Zac1245,e9br6p4,conservative
"345,000 votes left to count I think McSally will pull it off but geeze man. Shouldn’t be close. ",Zac1245,e9bsqxu,conservative
These are the people that voted for Flake and McCain. ,SickofInternetProgs,e9c2ilm,conservative
[deleted],,e9bsath,conservative
Most are from Maricopa County as well. Seems the ones posted today were from liberal-leaning Pima County. ,Zac1245,e9bw8tu,conservative
"There is some 350,000 votes still to be counted, so we will see. ",Zac1245,e9bvpas,conservative
A lot of people in AZ vote by mail. ,Zac1245,e9btzcb,conservative
This happens every election in AZ and the Republicans have won every one of them. ,Zac1245,e9bwfgh,conservative
Even if they win every outstanding race the Democrats don't win the Senate. ,c6fe26,e9bwxzk,conservative
I don’t think it’s possible. Republicans already have 51 senate seats for sure.,wine_o_clock,e9by1o3,conservative
AKA “as many votes as it takes for the Dems to seal victory”. ,Knollsit,e9brtza,conservative
"I'm not seeing that.... And Maricopa is currently breaking right. abc is reporting that everything in maricopa county is reported.
",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9c3dvy,conservative
"This is what happens when you have pundits 24-7 call Trump “racist” and the GOP “nazis”. People think that electing anything but a Republican is a good thing, no matter how bad the “not Republican” actually is. 

It’s the “lesser of two evils” that got us where we are today. ",justhere2havefun,e9buucl,conservative
"I mean, McSally is a war hero and Sinema was protesting America and defending people who join Al Qaeda. This shouldn’t be close, they’re voting between America and treason. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bsh1n,conservative
How do a whole bunch of ballots suddenly appear out of nowhere favoring the democrat. Honestly isn’t there some method to this or do you declare someone the winner then say “oh hey wait I just found a huge box of ballots.” ,the-divine-comedy,e9bw2n9,conservative
"We have three weak seats, so we need a 53 seat majority to be effective, otherwise we will get screwed over by Collins, Romney and Murkowski. If we have a 52-set majority or less, we will be in a far worse position.",hello_japan,e9cpev4,conservative
"Read the article Original article. There is 350,000 votes left in Maricopa. The state election board will be making announcements at 5pm every night until it’s completed. Could take a few days, so into next week. 


“Maricopa County Recorder Adrian Fontes expects ballot counting to continue for several days. Officials will continue to update the results daily at 5 p.m.”",Zac1245,e9c3lnc,conservative
We are really going down a dark road. ,Zac1245,e9bzmu5,conservative
"They are mail-in ballots, you can send them up to election day in AZ. Still, hundreds of thousands to be counted. ",Zac1245,e9bw7gp,conservative
"Yep and who was winning Maricopa County? Sinema. Almost no chance with McSally. I just wish every race was intervened with. Why are these elections so vulnerable to fraud. There needs to be a higher govt entity that oversees these. Local Police, FBI. I think we could afford resources to ensure a legitimate election. 
",xPineappless,e9cgsnt,conservative
"If they want non-citizens to vote, that kinda blows the shit out of any “Russia collusion” claims.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9aoun7,conservative
PRISON TIME.,StephenScherer1,e9awq2n,conservative
Sincerely hope to hear of state and federal indictments for this individual in the very near future.,MarvinsBoy,e9aksx5,conservative
"""from early voter we have tons of them"" referring to non citizens voting.

Democrats, once again, showing they will do ANYTHING to win.
",Lepew1,e9bc8a0,conservative
[removed],,e9b23ih,conservative
"Lol.  This isn't r/politics.

When someone asks whether it matters if the registered voter is a citizen or not, answering no, as long as they are registered, is not good.

Someone needs to figure out a reliable way to determine if a person is actually eligible to vote, because the problem is only going to get worse.",mlmack,e9b6yuz,conservative
[deleted],,e9b9iy4,conservative
[removed],,e9b7hyc,conservative
"r/republican would be a subreddit name corresponding with one of the two major political parties.  Each party has it's own liberal and conservative members.

If these volunteers don't know what the requirements are for voting, other than being registered, then they shouldn't be answering questions like they do.  If they knowingly let non-citizens vote, then they should face legal action.",mlmack,e9b9cyg,conservative
It is not the job of volunteers to determine anything more than if a person is registered in the system provided to them. They would face a lot more criticism and attention if they turned away registered voters on the basis of just hearing that they are non citizens. That would create even more problems and be seen as voter suppression since that could be claimed of anyone the volunteer wants to turn away. The issue with non citizen DACA recipients voting is not to be addressed on the spot by volunteers. It is something to be handled by others prior to Election Day. Post about that. ,Dally4,e9bb3xa,conservative
"not migrants, they are illegal aliens ",Delta_25,e9b8wy6,conservative
Foreign Invaders,KrimsonStorm,e9boiq6,conservative
Criminal Trespassers on US soil. ,ozric101,e9bao70,conservative
"“Israel has hypnotized the world, may Allah awaken the people and help them see the evil doings of Israel. #Gaza #Palestine #Israel

Remember when the media pretended to care about anti-semitism?  Man, that was like, 10 whole days ago...",puddboy,e9akqtj,conservative
And yet an overwhelming percentage of jewish americans continue to vote for these very assholes that call for their destruction.,optionhome,e9abt4l,conservative
"That's one small step for the DNC, one giant leap for anti-Semitism.",Lepew1,e9ajvh5,conservative
"She's also a supporter of female genital mutilation and she married her brother to commit immigration fraud.  
  
She also is a supporter of radical Islamic terrorism, having voted against a bill that would deny insurance payments to families of terrorists.",FelixFuckfurter,e9aohyw,conservative
By it doesn’t matter in Minnesota they will vote for any d.,Chastethrow316420,e9b48o0,conservative
"I hate this tactic regardless of which side uses it.  An accusation is pretty meaningless.  

The Israel/Palestine conflict seems to me to be really difficult.  It certainly seems likely that her issues are with the actions of Israel itself.  

I have read several books on various sides and I still have a hard time taking a firm stance on the issues at play.  ",The__Imp,e9b375l,conservative
"Remember when anti-semitism and anti-Israel became the same thing?  I don’t...

If this were a religious issue that would be one thing, but if you don’t know what’s going on between Israel and Palestine I would suggest catching up.",zerovampire311,e9ank6w,conservative
INSANITY is strong with Librards .,StephenScherer1,e9arhk9,conservative
"There have been at least 4 white supremacist holocaust deniers running on a Republican ticket this year, so the mealy-mouthed outrage in this thread is a bit much...",Horrid_Proboscis,e9blhpj,conservative
"She’s not a white male, so everything she says is sacred. ",diagramoftruth,e9aqa84,conservative
"Talk about a dog whistle, news media",art36,e9auc8m,conservative
How is that anti Semitic? Israel is not synonymous with Judaism ,Vonbrau,e9aqjc9,conservative
They believe that makes them separate from Israel but their enemies don't see the distinction.,glockedup1,e9adrar,conservative
There’s a very big difference between being ethnically Jewish and practicing actual Judaism. Most practicing Jews lean conservative.,tim_tebow_right_knee,e9as6ub,conservative
"Liberalism trumps race, religion, or even logic.",soracrowe,e9b6iy1,conservative
"> She's also a supporter of female genital mutilation and she married her brother to commit immigration fraud.

She sounds like the perfect democratic candidate. ",optionhome,e9apd6a,conservative
Fraud and Incest and Genital Mutilation; what's wrong with that?,StephenScherer1,e9arq3j,conservative
They'd vote for Ramzan Kadyrov if he were a Democrat.,zwiebelsaft,e9d3qme,conservative
We all know what's happening.  Israel wants to live in peace and the Palestinians want to drive Israel into the sea.,FelixFuckfurter,e9aojjr,conservative
">  I would suggest catching up.

I suggest that you catch up to see that people like those mentioned in the article are for the destruction and elimination of all jews.  Not simply the jewish state.  And it's not going to matter to them if the person in question is a loyal leftist.  To them all jews are evil.",optionhome,e9apb2f,conservative
"""How dare Israel claim a homeland for it's people. War Crime."" - Noam Chomsky probably",CreativeRoutine,e9b663y,conservative
Remind me again how many won and are being praised by the media for it?,Buddha_Punch,e9cc4eg,conservative
Yup.  The good ol' intersectional progressive stack at work.  Then they wonder why white racism and racial identity is back on the rise - turns out that once you make race the single most aspect of a person people start to cluster by it.,anuser999,e9b0vuo,conservative
"It is and always has been a common notion under anti-semites that the jewish people control and hypnotize others, tho. She most likely would have never used the word ""hypnoticed"" speaking of any other country than Israel.",TheEatingGames,e9asnvu,conservative
"Standard behavior.  Since there's still such a visceral reaction to the cry of ""antisemitism"" it's used as a shield for any and all of Israel's misdeeds.",anuser999,e9b0xrd,conservative
"A Jew who will not support Israel is a coward.

Israel is the first and last line of defense of discrimination against Jews.

It's ""I'm not on the bad team. You can trust me"" worminess. It's ironically the kind of stuff that anti-semites, and Zionists both, hate to begin with.

Come on, guys.  This is your family and YOU you need to worry about.",CreativeRoutine,e9b5xl3,conservative
"> There’s a very big difference between being ethnically Jewish and practicing actual Judaism. Most practicing Jews lean conservative.

But what's your point.  These people hate jews no less than the nazis.  That's like saying it was OK with hitler if you were an ethnic jew not practicing your religion.",optionhome,e9askj2,conservative
"It's only incest if they consummated their marriage though. I wouldn't be surprised since Muslim countries are the best at that especially in Pakistan, to be fair it's usually just first cousins that they marry, that doesn't make it any better btw.",RAZRBCK08,e9avhre,conservative
"Right, right, hence the regular defense of settlements and continued expansionism into territory that's not theirs.",anuser999,e9b14bz,conservative
"Just like “all conservatives are racist” and “all liberals are mentally diseased criminals”?  Blanket assumptions don’t serve the benefit of anyone.  There’s a big difference between a Jewish person in America and an Israeli on the Palestine border.  Now don’t get me wrong, both of those sides have their transgressions in that whole affair, but it’s short sighted to label a whole country as extreme.",zerovampire311,e9awb5k,conservative
I got the number wrong. It's at least 8. I appreciate that focusing on specific minutiae is the only possible way to defend it.,Horrid_Proboscis,e9ccu83,conservative
"My point is, I consider Judaism to be strictly a religion. When we look at people who practice Judaism, they tend to vote right. 

My parents were both Catholic. I was baptized as a Catholic. I haven’t spent a second in a Catholic Church since I was 7. Should I be considered a Catholic? I think not. 

My comment was strictly about voting patterns. I also don’t feel the need to make a distinction about who crazy Islamics hate, because they hate anyone who isn’t Islamic.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9ativs,conservative
Possible. Man comes home from an exhausting day of gang rape and doesn't have anything left over for his sister (I meant to say mutilated wife).,StephenScherer1,e9b0501,conservative
"This is the only question you have to ask yourself about the Israel situation.  Israeli has the capacity to kill every Palestinian.  They don't do it.  
  
What would happen if Hamas had the capacity to kill every Jew in Israel?",FelixFuckfurter,e9b3751,conservative
"Ok, same question. How many won and got media praise for it?",Buddha_Punch,e9cdazb,conservative
"> When we look at people who practice Judaism, they tend to vote right.

totally agree on the voting patterns.  I thought you were saying that crazy islamics made a distinction between religious and ethnic jews.  So now we can agree that of course they don't.",optionhome,e9ayz7p,conservative
"> I consider Judaism to be strictly a religion.

Legally, that's wrong.

Jews have had [court cases over this and won](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/acts-of-faith/wp/2018/07/20/louisiana-judge-says-jews-are-a-race-are-protected-by-anti-racial-discrimination-laws/?utm_term=.c0a1a50f5ef5), that being Jewish is a race, and thus a protected class.",PrawnsAreOk,e9az1nh,conservative
They don't do it because it would be obvious. Slow and steady wins the race.,GeorgeOlduvai,e9bkza8,conservative
"I'm not going to go and look that up for you, because it's not particularly important. They're self-confessed or openly racist, whereas the woman in OP is merely ""accused"" because she made comments about the State of Israel (as opposed to Jews) and their human rights abuses. The false outrage is laughable.",Horrid_Proboscis,e9cdpe8,conservative
"Uh, how is them failing to win not relevant? They have no support from the voters or the party or the media. This woman has all three. False equivocate in r/politics. ",Buddha_Punch,e9cdwgh,conservative
"Oh, it's certainly not equivalent. I agree with you there.

I looked some up. Lots of winning (some unopposed), tens of thousands of votes, and even congratulations from Trump for one Alt-Right candidate.

https://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/390291-more-white-nationalists-are-running-for-office-than-ever-before

https://www.haaretz.com/us-news/record-breaking-number-of-white-nationalists-run-for-office-in-u-s-1.6272263",Horrid_Proboscis,e9cen9h,conservative
"First article is from June, second is from July. The election was three days ago. *How many won their races?*",Buddha_Punch,e9ceutg,conservative
https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2018/11/7/18064670/white-supremacist-candidates-2018-midterm-elections,Horrid_Proboscis,e9cg3zo,conservative
">self described Nazis did poorly

So none. Got it. Forgive me for not taking a far left rag like Vox's definition of ""white supremacist links.""",Buddha_Punch,e9cgzqc,conservative
"Steve Scalise

Steve King

There's two white supremacists for you. Gonna equivocate over their views, links and track records? Not to mention their party and voter support? Are you a little disturbed that you have to in the first place?",Horrid_Proboscis,e9chx82,conservative
"Yea, I'm not taking Vox's word for calling people white supremacists. All your nazis lost. ",Buddha_Punch,e9chzwk,conservative
I never even mentioned Nazis. That's you moving the goalposts... again. Enjoy your ongoing denial. Adiós.,Horrid_Proboscis,e9ci3ij,conservative
">There have been at least 4 white supremacist holocaust deniers running on a Republican ticket this year

Forgot your own first comment? Oops. ",Buddha_Punch,e9ci6mx,conservative
">It’s exactly how it’s supposed to work. It’s exactly how the Senate was designed. Every state has two senators regardless of population. In the Senate, no state has any more power than any other state. In the House, that’s not true. In the House, California and New York have more representatives than Rhode Island or Vermont or Missouri.

He forgot to mention the fact that the house is not proportionally represented based on population due to the 435 member cap, thus favoring smaller states as well. If proportioned properly CA should have around 80 representatives and not 53 (in proportion to Wyomings 1 representative). ",Sofakinggrapes,e9cpeso,conservative
I think pretty much anyone could run against Jones in 2020 and win at this point,Marko_Ramius1,e9b0lkt,conservative
I look forward to the all the people protesting his resignation tonight calling him a racist in 2 years lol,mbarnar,e9b01my,conservative
"yeah, I say do it. ",iwasthebeaver,e9aypqf,conservative
">The problem for Sessions is that, while he's a beloved fixture in Alabama, his time as Attorney General has done little to improve how potential 2020 voters see him. In fact, Politico reports his former constituents have ""soured"" somewhat on their former senator, largely because of President Donald Trump's ""relentless attacks"" on Sessions' character.

Complete garbage. Trump savaged Ted Cruz (lyin' Ted) and Heidi Cruz, and then made up for it and backed him for Senate. I bet Trump would support Sessions without reservations for a run in AL.",Lepew1,e9bcpgv,conservative
"There are better candidates in Alabama that are interested in running. Better as in more likely to win but not experience. Trust me when I say that the Republicans are not going to screw that election up again.  

Potential candidates: Mayor Tommy Battle(Huntsville), Rep. Bradley Byrne, Senate Pro Tem Del Marsh, Secretary of State John Merrill, Rep. Gary Palmer, Rep. Martha Roby. [Some information on each](https://yellowhammernews.com/whos-running-previewing-alabamas-2020-u-s-senate-election/). Another to add to the list is Ex Jefferson County commissioner David Carrington. He has eyes on the Governorship but would also make a great Senator(he is about to be a major player in Alabama one way or another).

My guess is Bradly Byrne or Del Marsh. 

I think Sessions needs to ride off into the sunset. Alabama is as red as they come and his friction with Trump has rubbed some the wrong way in Alabama. When they first started having conflict, Alabama largely backed Sessions. Then as it continued, the support flipped to Trump. So Sessions running wouldn't be a home run. The Republicans are going to want that home run to avoid the possibility of another Doug Jones term. 

Source: I am from Alabama.",chaotic_zx,e9c1gv3,conservative
"He would never have won, except that his opponent happened to be so loathsome.  As it is, he's a one-termer at best. ",LonelyMachines,e9bg645,conservative
Yep. He is essentially Heidi from nd.  Liberal that ran against a bad Republican candidate that got lucky. ,hipsterdufus84,e9b1pd6,conservative
"The difference is that Cruz and Trump were in a heated Presidential campaign. There was some name calling but no long term damage to either. Sessions was an absentee AG who allowed the forces of the left to run roughshod over the rule of law and have an unimpeded multi year witch hunt all the while allowing criminal Democrats to get away scott free. If the Democrats continue to use the Mueller probe to attack and attempt impeachment of Trump into 2020, GOP voters will place the blame squarely on Jeff Sessions weak spindly shoulders. I would rather see a strong Mo Brooks run than a weak Jeff Sessions.",PhilosoGuido,e9bdk8k,conservative
Maybe Mo Brooks is still interested? ,Buddha_Punch,e9cckj4,conservative
"Roy Moore is pretty much the only person he’d beat in 2020, and even then it’s no guarantee because Jones voted against Kavanaugh ",Marko_Ramius1,e9bntt5,conservative
That seems objectively false,BeachCruisin22,e9cx6tr,conservative
Citation needed.,PubliusVA,e9cx83o,conservative
Why is our voting system so freaking archaic and broken? ,tenshon,e9ce9s3,conservative
Cheating piles of human feces. ,TakeMeToTheArch,e9ce83j,conservative
Sinema is garbage and I still hope she loses when everything is counted. She deserves nothing.,Terra_green2,e9chb58,conservative
"We keep electing archaic and broken people.

",binaryechoes,e9cf4sm,conservative
[removed],,e9cehpk,conservative
When those votes are manufactured out of thin air yeah. Its pretty shit.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9cejga,conservative
"What a great opportunity to point your stereo system speakers out the windows and play some 80's classics or something weird on repeat.

Non-lethal shotgun shells or paintball guns would also be great but I think you'd be the one getting arrested instead which is unfortunate.",cavemanben,e9bkfjv,conservative
I don’t think enough people know or care who James Woods is though.,justhere2havefun,e9buz72,conservative
"James Woods might have an IQ of a million, but he's still an idiot. ",shitter_glitter,e9c4j5x,conservative
"My opinion on less than lethal ammunition is this: don't point a gun at something, unless you plan to kill it.

Dead men can't sue.",Cr8er,e9bm62r,conservative
Probably best known through family guy nowadays ,i_floop_the_pig,e9bwneb,conservative
"If you point a gun and aim to wound, you clearly weren’t in fear of grave bodily harm and you will get fucked in court. Shot to kill or don’t shoot at all. 

Also, what the hell sub is this? People are advocating paintball rounds on this sub? If someone is breaking into your home, that is reasonable cause to believe you are in imminent danger. ",RampantAndroid,e9cqz5c,conservative
"For fuck sake, genius. Now if you’re ever in a self defense shooting you’re likely going to prison. It’s shoot to end the threat, not bury them so they cant sue. Stop being a tard ",_Dialectic_,e9bovuz,conservative
"Liberals like to show up and spout their bullshit sometimes. Just gotta hit them with facts and logic, they'll run away screaming.

This is what I was taught: DO NOT point your gun at someone, unless you plan to kill them. Treat every gun as if its loaded, even after verifying that it isnt. If you conceal carry, keep it concealed, its that way for a reason. Shoot to kill or don't shoot at all. Guns are tools, not toys. Respect your tools, keep them clean and in good, working, condition. Keep the shotgun loaded, remember that it is always loaded, act accordingly. And, finally, DO NOT POINT YOUR GUN AT SOMETHING UNLESS YOU PLAN TO KILL IT! There can be no warning shots, no mistakes, no accidents. You are wielding the power of a GOD in your hands. The power over life and death.

Realise this, understand what that means, respect the BURDEN that places on you, and prepare yourself for that decision, if you are placed into that situation, God help you.",Cr8er,e9cs9br,conservative
If I'm in a self defence situation in my house? Castle doctrine. If I'm in a self defence situation in public? If they have a gun or other deadly weapon as well? Justified. Fire arms ARE FORE SELF DEFENCE. Stop being a tard.,Cr8er,e9buplu,conservative
"Unfortunately you don’t have a clue what you’re talking about. If you shoot someone in the leg to disable they will turn around and sue you into oblivion. The police might also arrest you for attempted murder because the assailant is free to tell any story they want. You think they’re not going to lie? 

No, it’s be been proven again and again. If you are forced to fire your weapon in self defense you shoot to kill. To do so otherwise is very bad for you. Very bad. ",SexAddictRecovery,e9bym10,conservative
">  Stop being a tard 

He isn't being a 'tard', it is a legitimate issue.  [Google it.](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/burglar-sues-calif-homeowner-90-who-returned-fire/)  Happens far more often then it ever should",Jizzlobber42,e9bsqeu,conservative
"This is what I mean, because you have no idea what you’re talking about and it’s dangerous for your own legal protection and conceal carry rights for everyone else.

I also conceal carry, and I also live in a castle doctrine state. The law is specific, you must shoot “to end the threat.”

If you have stated publicly , or you state to police, or the prosecutor, or the prosecutor gets wind of, you saying “shoot to kill” or “kill so they don’t sue” then even in a castle doctrine state you could face prosecution.

Your INTENT , your MINDSET matters. Don’t screw things up for the rest of us ",_Dialectic_,e9bv89j,conservative
"Correct , you don’t shoot to wound. You also don’t shoot to kill. You shoot to end the threat. And your ignorance is dangerous ",_Dialectic_,e9cq4ny,conservative
"If it's them or me, I'm choosing me. Till there is no more threat to myself, I chose me. That is my mindset. If it comes to killing them, so be it. THEY chose to break into my house or threaten my life. I chose to defend myself. Play stupid games, win stupid prizes. I hope and pray I'm never put into that situation. It's one of the few things I'm absolutely frightened to the core of ever experiencing, but I know that if it comes to it. I will defend myself.

My INTENT is to survive, my MINDSET is SELF DEFENCE. Get your head out of your ass.
",Cr8er,e9c7829,conservative
"Here’s why you’re ignorant of the law: you think my previous statement means I disagree with what you just posted (I don’t), and you think this because you don’t understand the difference between shoot to kill and shoot to end the threat. 

When faced with a lethal threat, you respond with lethal force until the threat ceases being a threat. That MAY mean death, or simple incapacitation 

Edit:  the funny thing here is I’m just trying to help yall from landing a 10-20 year prison sentence. Just go read your state’s laws on employing lethal force ",_Dialectic_,e9cs254,conservative
"Lol, dude, I live in Texas. Read the laws for my state. A quick glance at your account show you may be from Ohio. Maybe you have different laws? A quick Google turned up this.

When is Deadly Force Justified in Texas?

Under Texas law, the use of deadly force to defend yourself is justified if: 1) the actor would be justified in using deadly force to defend against an attack because the actor reasonably believes that deadly force is necessary to protect the actor from the unlawful use of force; or 2) when the actor believes that deadly force is necessary to defend against illegal use of unlawful deadly force. In layman’s terms, this means if the average person is in a situation where someone is using unlawful force, deadly or not, in an attempt to harm the person in question.

You good? Cool. Have a good one.",Cr8er,e9czx9q,conservative
"Again, you literally are incapable of reading what I write or originally posted against. Use of deadly force is not “shoot until they are dead so they don’t sue”

This is pointless i suppose. If you’re in a self defense shooting, please get an attorney ASAP and say very little to police. Actually, consult conceal carry defense league or whatever it’s called for precisely what to say after a SD shooting. Hopefully none of us ever have to be in that situation though ",_Dialectic_,e9d1wk7,conservative
"Not sure if you're reading my posts, bud. I'm not going to point my gun at someone unless I feel the need to kill to defend myself. Again, I hope and pray I never have to make that decision, but there is no in between when it comes to guns. No grey area, it's either life or death. 

If you can't agree with that, cool. Not your life to live, and I didn't ask for, nor do I need your ""help."" I don't, currently, conceal carry. I don't feel the need to, as the culture in my area is such that I feel safe enough to live my life without it. If someone breaks into my house or one of my vehicles, I have the right to defend myself and my property, and will be justified in doing so. 

Now, I've stated my opinion, you've stated yours. We've come to an impasse, and I think at this point discussion can no longer progress. So I will, again, wish you a good day.

Have a good one.",Cr8er,e9d3fsd,conservative
[deleted],,e9bvjnv,conservative
"""Just got a text that Pima County (Tucson) numbers just came in and Sinema is now up by 9,000. Very unlikely McSally wins at this point. The trend will likely continue.""- Laura Ingraham https://twitter.com/IngrahamAngle/status/1060702412963569664",Zyrioun,e9bvu0z,conservative
"Ok, at what point do we do something about this? Democrats trying to steal Florida and Arizona from us, and they’re succeeding. Our leaders are letting this happen, at what point do we start our protests? Republicans only have one or two pres elections left before we are fucked out of power permanently. The time for grassroots organization is now.",Jebytu,e9bvwvg,conservative
Man this disappointing. I really had a feeling McSally would win. But it’s not looking good. When might we know? Are we headed for a recount? ,KnightofFaith26,e9bwk0f,conservative
"The dems have flipped 2 senate seats in 36 hours and 2 more are looking like they go the same way, and the republicans are going along with it, dems may yet have control of both houses",johnson881_,e9bwqc7,conservative
Eww.,rf-engineer,e9bv42c,conservative
[deleted],,e9bvti4,conservative
[removed],,e9c3qm4,conservative
How do you know they favor McSally?  My understanding is that many of them are from the urban areas of Arizona.,xOxOqTbByGrLxOxO,e9bvoga,conservative
[deleted],,e9bwasn,conservative
"This makes no sense, there are 345,000 votes still to be counted in Maricopa County alone. Im not saying Sinema cant win, but its dumb to call it over 9,000 votes from liberal Pima County. Versus Maricopa which is more conservative. ",Zac1245,e9bw3ok,conservative
"I know we laugh when the left protests, but we need to get off our asses and do something about this. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bw67l,conservative
I mean what can we do? If they get away with this I guess all there is to do is encourage Republicans to start stealing elections as well........Obama really did destroy this country.,SnickersReese,e9c1siu,conservative
Sinema taking the lead is stealing? What election laws have the AZ democratic party broken to get this result?,c6fe26,e9bwo37,conservative
"As soon as the GOP candidate is winning, stop the counting immediately. Or just cut to the chase, cancel the election completely and only declare our candidates the winners. 

It's the only way to be sure.",McDonald5,e9c9b2x,conservative
They are doing 5pm updates until they are done. May not know until next week. ,Zac1245,e9cqxos,conservative
"Montana, Arizona, Florida, and....?",YankeeBlues21,e9bwtmn,conservative
no it isnt lol,Manchurainprez,e9bvwq7,conservative
Are you at least holding taco night in the basement? I want to at least look forward to taco night and some xbox or something ,Ledcookey,e9c65h1,conservative
MAricopa county has gone red for the last idk? 10 elections,Manchurainprez,e9bvw6e,conservative
Many of the urban areas of AZ are red. Pretty much all the Phoenix suburbs. They are all just as urban as Pheonix. ,Zac1245,e9bvryv,conservative
"350,000 in Maricopa alone to be counted. Silly to call it over 9,000 from fucking liberal ass Tuscon of all places lol. ",Zac1245,e9bwe8c,conservative
"It's  possible she has insider info on which precincts are left in maricopa and they favour Sinema. Either way, this isn't good.",Zyrioun,e9bw6a4,conservative
Hope your right man ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bw5w1,conservative
"Interesting, according to nytimes, Maricopa county is leaning towards Sinema. Crazy, thought I’d never see the day.",RollingGoron,e9bxg02,conservative
"Honestly I’m tired of pretending we’re above all the things Democrat’s do. They play to win every time, by any means. It’s time we start doing the same.",Jebytu,e9c3ymw,conservative
Are we pretending this is normal? There are no delays with mail votes in other states. Most credible pollsters on the ground called it for McSally on election night. ,latotokyo123,e9by4sq,conservative
Romney,notviolence,e9byiis,conservative
"Nevada.  When I woke up Wed morning, all of those were red and it was 55-45.  By lunch, NV & MT had gone blue.  Now 2 more...",Rogdaddy,e9cot15,conservative
NYTimes currently says Maricopa is leaning Sinema rather than McSally. Crazy.,RollingGoron,e9bzotn,conservative
[deleted],,e9bwk5p,conservative
"With the current votes counted yeah but that could and very well may change as they count the remaining 350,000",Zac1245,e9bxofc,conservative
I feel that way with the whole “Spying on Trumps campaign in 2016”. The media says it’s fine and so do the Democrats so hopefully Trump is spying on whatever Democrat challenges him in 2020,SnickersReese,e9c4e3i,conservative
In AZ ballots mailed on Election Day are counted. On election night I remember reading that we wouldn’t know the result of the AZ senate race until tonight at earliest. There are at least a few other states like this that I can’t recall. ,wine_o_clock,e9c5qo5,conservative
"What? We held Utah. 

Or are you saying Romney’s win was a Democrat flip because he’s a RINO? I seriously doubt he’ll be McCain. He’ll be a Rubio type. Someone who tut-tuts about attacks on the media and such, but votes the right way when push comes to shove  ",YankeeBlues21,e9bz1g0,conservative
"Yeah, and NYT has Maricopa at 100% reporting. Pima still has outstanding votes, at 99% reporting, so more  votes for sinema. I don't see where the votes can come  from  for her to regain the lead.",Zyrioun,e9bzvky,conservative
Yeah no doubt it will be close but I’m not agreeing is Ingram’s assessments that “it will continue”,Zac1245,e9bwnox,conservative
"NYT has Maricopa at 100% reporting now, but Pima at 99% reporting. This doesn't seem like  McSally has anywhere to pull the needed votes?",Zyrioun,e9bzrgw,conservative
Yeah Arizona is this way every election. If you go back and look they didn’t call it for Trump until four days after. Now Florida is some shady shit lol. ,Zac1245,e9cqww7,conservative
Yea Romney if he does join with Murkowski and Collins he will be the right anchor to them,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bzk7j,conservative
"That’s not counting early and provisional ballots. Just the actual votes done at the precinct. I posted a different article about it that explains it. Look at my post history. There is still 350,000 or so Maricopa County votes left. The State election board if doing night updates at 5pm until they are all counted. We may not know until next week. ",Zac1245,e9c0aqe,conservative
Many people in my family were *huge* Herman Cain supporters.,r4d4r_3n5,e9bj6yn,conservative
"Maybe they're uncomfortable with their ***policies***, not their demographics. Get your minds ""out of the gutter"" progressives....",Mewster1818,e9bkexe,conservative
"Bullshit. We're uncomfortable voting for leftists, regardless of their race. I have no problem voting for black conservatives. ",GuitarWizard90,e9bqy2v,conservative
I know plenty voted for John James. I know I would have if I lived in the crap tank that is Michigan. ,justhere2havefun,e9bv25j,conservative
Is Bernie saying it’s because they associate those candidates with Obama and Obama was a garbage President? If so then Bernie is probably correct.,SnickersReese,e9bpf8q,conservative
"Bernie went from a hilarious but honest old man with his ""healthcaree is a hue-man roight"" to a scum completely embracing identity politics",FallingPinkElephant,e9c0ira,conservative
"Why would I have a problem with it?  I was ready to support Ben Carson but later learned, as did a lot of people, that his knowledge of foreign affairs/policy was lacking to a great degree.  Happy as all hell he stuck with Trump.  John James would have my vote too, in a heart beat and I hope like *hell* that he remains in politics even though he lost his election attempt",Jizzlobber42,e9bt0zy,conservative
"2008 - Obama won 43% of white votes (vs 55%)
[2008 presidential elections by demographic](https://ropercenter.cornell.edu/polls/us-elections/how-groups-voted/how-groups-voted-2008/)

2012 - Obama won 39% of white votes (vs 59%)
[2012 presidential elections by demographic](https://ropercenter.cornell.edu/polls/us-elections/how-groups-voted/how-groups-voted-2012/)

edit: didn't link correctly",InsiderT,e9bjauq,conservative
He's senile ,cmiller1225,e9bon6l,conservative
:| Nothing factors in except your politics and your track record. That's literally it.,GFZDW,e9bjfip,conservative
I supported Cain too. I also like Dr. Ben Carson. Liberals are the real racists.,FloridaBobPatriot,e9bjcni,conservative
"Once again, ""choice"" is limited to the things they want you to choose.",justhere2havefun,e9b1qyn,conservative
I for one am in favor of letting the intersectional coalition tear itself apart,burtmaklin1,e9b9q82,conservative
This is the one of the few times you will find Democrats praying. ,yeroldpappy,e9bjy8e,conservative
"was seriously expecting this to be a babylon bee article, and now i'm severely disappointed",fireball3k,e9c80en,conservative
Well wishes can’t stop the Reaper. Satan has used her well for over 8 decades. The tab is being called in. Trump justice part 3 imminent. ,mods_blow_goats,e9bixly,conservative
"This idea has promise. If we could set up a site like GoFundMe to facilitate octogenarian Democrats harvesting organs from young progressives, we could keep Nancy Pelosi, Maxine Waters, and Bernie Sanders leading the left for decades to come!",PubliusVA,e9brcm6,conservative
"I wouldn’t offer a dollar to this crazy old hag. Just retire already 

Democrats are gonna do every thing possible to keep her there ",Chapka69,e9bizbn,conservative
"Tick tock, bitches.",BrighamYoung,e9bu768,conservative
"If people are offering organs, can someone give her a brain transplant?  I mean an intelligent one for a change...",UrsaPater,e9c58wf,conservative
A vocal leftist would demand someone else to give up an organ.,superdude411,e9brapr,conservative
"  "" I am an ite member of the Reality-Based community. How do transplants work?"" /s",wizardglick412,e9by78z,conservative
Thoughts and prayers are not enough! /s,tmv4,e9bz96f,conservative
"That’s a human, dial it back dude ",Applesauce_Police,e9c9re9,conservative
Really glad we kept the Senate now.  Next one should be easier.  2 or 3 Rinos can't hold it up anymore,BrockLee76,e9bupew,conservative
Lol,yeroldpappy,e9c3d8i,conservative
My thoughts exactly ,Chapka69,e9bwgzo,conservative
Hahahaha...let the games begin!,cmiller1225,e9b397j,conservative
And we continue down the slippery slope.,Warm_Winds,e9b1kst,conservative
I tried this with a bartender once. It didn't end well.,DogBeersHadOne,e9bczhk,conservative
"file under:  trans-ableism, trans-racialism, trans-speciesism, trans-ageism

I’m generally *‘live and let live’* and *‘mind your own business’* and *‘if it doesn’t pick my pocket nor break my leg it’s none of my business,’* so I will assiduously contend that loony weirdos can do anything they want and say and think anything they want – I’ll even defend their right to do so until I die (it’s written on my car).

================

But, as a classical liberal, not a neo-Marxist leftist, I am also free to criticize what they’re saying using logic and reason, as well as condemn any divisive tactics, and all they’re owed by me is tolerance... not acceptance and certainly not nurturance. But you’re a bigot with oppressive age-privilege if you don’t accept this as truth (truth being abundantly subjective now)... or you may be one day, anyway. Who knows where identitarianism, intersectionalism, post-modernism, and victimhood prestige will take us?

================

All clear-thinking people should tolerate what individuals do but should criticize bad ideas, particularly if those bad ideas are ever leveraged to a) try and warp the minds of children, b) pass laws and policies making it a crime or a breach of rules to not subscribe to this way of thinking or to not use the right “language” or to even criticize it in the first place, or c) gain any other undue collective identity group authority. 

================

I remember a thing a while back talking about Otherkin – people who have so drank the post-modern Kool-Aid that they believe they are fairies or wolves or angels. Could you imagine, after 25 more years of ""progress,"" that denying that someone has invisible pegasus wings, or even criticizing the whole idea that you can just think you’re another species and impose this on other people, could be a hate crime? I can. And even if it doesn’t contradict government law, over the next few decades the digital / meta / virtual domain will increasingly be where the discourse and the socialization and the living takes place – and the few mega-corporations that run it and enforce their own arbitrary rules will have long since usurped government and law in terms of power and influence. 

================

Between the metaverse of the future and radical body alteration via CRISPr and 3D printing of body parts and other biological and cybernetic technologies, identity and self and reality is going to be taking enough of a hit anyway, without people imagining things and using their “struggle” as a way to gain authority and influence and social stature over others.

",kevynwight,e9b4du5,conservative
Who cares,Nevaknosbest,e9b5qjg,conservative
"thinking about senior discounts makes me want to try it
",TripJammer,e9b8rdf,conservative
He's absolutely correct: Age is as fluid as gender.,JoeWinchester99,e9cl4zt,conservative
"Perhaps it is time for ""common sense"" knife control. ",beati_pacifici,e9cu6y2,conservative
If only there was a tool one could use to defend themselves against such an attack. ,txsxb,e9ctopa,conservative
"English longbow? I don't think they're legally required to train with that each Sunday anymore, or that they bother. The yeomen just aren't what they used to be...",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9cwfnm,conservative
"It may *sound* like a good idea, but it's a prime example of Google becoming a dictator of how the Internet should work. So now if you have a website where someone signs up, you have to do it on Google's terms... you have to make sure you're very clear with the pricing and fee structures before they sign up. Because clearly Google doesn't think its users are smart enough to protect themselves. Or, rather, it just wants to be the ""nanny state"" of the Internet. ",tenshon,e9cchwe,conservative
Duck duck go is a much better search engine without the bloat and tracking. And Vilaldi a better browser that is compatible with Chrome Extensions. ,cmiller1225,e9cxo77,conservative
Soon Google might just decide that you shouldn't be able to view gab.com,sjwking,e9ce1db,conservative
"Most people wont have damn clue who I am talking about but Athene from WoW back in the day, I am talking over 8 years ago predicted this was going to happen. He made very long YouTube videos with his partners about how slowly but surely the EU and major corporations were going to start cracking down, censoring and controlling websites and the internet. Internet service providers would start selling you what websites you were allowed to use. Tbh he was onto something. ",a93818,e9ce2j2,conservative
"How long will it be before Google start warning us that the site they're about to access contains ""hate speech"" ? And this, of course, would be Google's far-left idea of hate speech that basically covers anything in the Bible, any negative opinion on homosexuality or transgenderism...

I can definitely predict this happening soon... and that'll be the end of free speech on the Internet for everyone who uses Chrome. 

Chrome is basically a trojan horse, or a ""siren"", for liberals to take over free speech and basically the Internet.",tenshon,e9cewuc,conservative
"12 gauge, double ought buck, and some fire arm training for the wife and kids? Perfect early Christmas present!",Cr8er,e9b25z6,conservative
"ItS nOt A mOb, ItS a PeAcEfUl PrOtEsT! (where your door is peacefully bashed in and your family is terrified!)",Jizzlobber42,e9b5qrx,conservative
"These are people that will not talk things out and instead will make demands with threats, violence and destruction of property - the literal definition of fascism. I just don't understand why nothing is ever done even in the face of clear evidence of continued domestic terrorism. ",FallingPinkElephant,e9b7zi0,conservative
She should have put a round or two through the door while on the phone to the cops...... scum,Klaus_RSA,e9azcq0,conservative
That's what Joe Biden advocates.,mlmack,e9b584k,conservative
">[""Know your target and what's behind it.""](https://www.nrafamily.org/articles/2015/10/6/8-gun-safety-rules-you-may-not-have-heard-of/)

You should read that article about 30 or 40 more times before giving people any more bad advice.",ngoni,e9bckgo,conservative
Thank you ,Dmfconrad,e9bg497,conservative
"Yeah really.  I'm all for 2A, but bad advice makes us all look bad",Castaway77,e9bg4sv,conservative
"Yawn....... 

Grow up..... ",Klaus_RSA,e9bkmzq,conservative
"Kamala Harris is the best nominee for the Dems, she would break two glass ceilings for them:

1. She would become the first ever black female on a major presidential ticket.
2. She would become the first ever black female to lose a presidential election.",1wjl1,e9aspjl,conservative
I think Tulsi Gabbard would be the dems best choice. She is a woman and minority. Her views appear to be a bit more moderate. ,AlternativePenguin,e9b3zwv,conservative
She does rank pretty high on the instersectionality priority chart.,mattyice18,e9augzf,conservative
"It's the new McCain.  He's going to be a TV star, and pain in the butt.",ChunkyArsenio,e9c9q4h,conservative
"Ugh, go away Romney.",jina100,e9c9nua,conservative
"Swamp monsters like him got trump elected. Nobody cares what you think, Trump kicked your ass and you hate him for it.",dash47,e9caiuu,conservative
This guy loves to lose,unityrootts,e9cd9uz,conservative
This guy is asking to be victim of the Trump curse.,expendable_Henchman,e9cynbo,conservative
"How many times does he need to lose before he goes away?

Maybe he and Hillary have to duke it out so that one of these losers can finally win by default.",nited_states,e9ca43f,conservative
"Someone needs to remind Romney about the way Democrats treated him when he was running and why he shouldn't be trying to court their favor with some faux-bipartisan cred.


*They will never like you, Mitt.  You will always be someone who literally wanted to re-enslave black people to them*.

The Mueller investigation needs to end because it hasn't found anything but random financial rimes in two years.  You're telling me that rich people fudge numbers and cook books?  *Gasp*. 

Unless we want to set the precedent that the FBI keeps an ongoing investigation into every sitting President for the full length of their term, this charade needs to end.  

You're a fool if you think the Trump administration conspired with the Russian government to rig the 2016 elections and proof exists, but it just wasn't found in two years of intense investigation by the full force of the FBI.",Telineye,e9cd6ok,conservative
Mitt Tardney.,chabanais,e9cgv4v,conservative
As prophesied by everyone except Utah primary voters.        ,tau_decay,e9c9x4b,conservative
"And with only 52 Senators, he's going to put a bloody revolver to our heads. The Murk, Collins, Romney triumvirate is about to hold us hostage.  Again.",nited_states,e9ca6hy,conservative
"Oh God that’s a terrible idea... but... maybe a good idea if it meant getting rid of both of them forever. Of course, the Bushes don’t seem to be going anywhere even after Jeb’s spectacular loss, so I don’t know.",jina100,e9cdgpg,conservative
"I don’t mean this in an offensive way but I’m really curious, why are Mormon voters attracted to squishy Republicans such as Flake, Romney, McCain, and McMuffin? ",Knollsit,e9capb4,conservative
"Scott is going to win. No way we can let them get away this shit. At least 53, and probably should be 54. ",latotokyo123,e9cay30,conservative
Mormons love illegals,tja_1478,e9cdux2,conservative
"Hey broward county: ""how many vote you have left to count?"" (two full days after election).  

Answer: ""Don't know yet because Palm county isn't done counting either and we don't know how many Nelson needs.""  ",stoffel_bristov,e9bggpg,conservative
This is absolute bullshit. [Look at the reporting stats](https://floridaelectionwatch.gov/CountyReportingStatus) Broward isn't done with their early voting or their vote by mail. The fucking democrats are going to win. This is fucking bullshit.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9b5y4w,conservative
"Recount ordered in the governors race now, as well.  It is always Broward county every fucking time.  Get ready to get dicked in both races, ladies and gentleman. ",TBSportsFan1254,e9b6rvw,conservative
Some bullshit is about to happen,Dank_Cartographer,e9b4dgd,conservative
Following in the long honored Floridian tradition of trying to steal elections via endless recounts and vote counting irregularities.,Silicon_Avatar,e9b4ef5,conservative
There are still panhandle votes to be counted,tja_1478,e9b54n7,conservative
How are they not finished with early voting ballots?,tmv4,e9b6sra,conservative
"Rubio just called them out for this on a huge thread on Twitter.  I'm going to lose it if we get defrauded out of these two races.

&#x200B;",TBSportsFan1254,e9b84ei,conservative
DeSantis is fine.  He had a bigger lead.,tja_1478,e9b8rut,conservative
"Yup.  Fully prepared for the Bush v. Gore karma to catch back up to us this time.  With his vote total shrinking, I don't see this ending well.  Have to hope the recount in the governors race doesn't take away DeSantis, as well.",TBSportsFan1254,e9b6uhj,conservative
You sure about that?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9b600f,conservative
"Because it's a lie, they are committing voter fraud. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9b70iy,conservative
"> How are they not finished with early voting ballots?

Because liberals are still in the process of printing out new ones, filling them out, and stuffing them in ballot boxes until ~~Gore~~ Nelson has enough to win.",Silicon_Avatar,e9b7q3t,conservative
"How would they know ahead of time, how many rental trucks are inbound with mysterious absentee ballots?",mysql101,e9bbdlo,conservative
His lead is shrinking at about the same ratio.,mysql101,e9bbau5,conservative
yep,tja_1478,e9b7uz9,conservative
Talk about voter suppression! Nullifying the voice of the people.,tmv4,e9b7gvd,conservative
Look at the reporting stats.  I don't think you are correct.,TBSportsFan1254,e9b85hx,conservative
Bay County still has votes to drop,tja_1478,e9b89fc,conservative
"Not according to the state counting stats.  Post where you are getting your information.

[https://floridaelectionwatch.gov/CountyReportingStatus](https://floridaelectionwatch.gov/CountyReportingStatus)",TBSportsFan1254,e9b8fiu,conservative
"Maybe, just maybe you reporters should demand better out of your fellow reporters. ",Racheakt,e9c3vqa,conservative
"And please stop using the word ""reporter"" to describe Acosta or the other 99% of those @ CNN.",RigsbyQuist,e9bz3zh,conservative
"Oh shut up Chris, he's not a reporter. And your club of ""reporters"" has been pulling this shit for years now, and where has Chris Wallace been? Playing  fair and balanced on Fox News. Oh great job Chris, 80% of your club is Democrat Pravda and now one of them has embarrassed themselves so much that you just now ""find it hard"" to defend them. It's like knowing your wife is cheating on you for years and when she finally does it in public for all your friends and family to see you ""find it hard"" to defend her. No, you didn't do a damn thing when you first noticed it and now you want Democrat Pravda to tone it down so you don't have to feel so uncomfortable admitting you are still in the same club. ",Rightquercusalba,e9c5nse,conservative
I think that's the same justification Germans used during the Nazi years.,GMU1993,e9byio8,conservative
"Wallace is just another Democrat media guy, he just happens to be more moderate and honest than most of them.",hello_japan,e9cprit,conservative
Performance Artist. ,memberCP,e9c4yv9,conservative
"too bad opinion polls show that supporting the Muslims, instead of Israel, is a basically the fringe of American opinion.",JohnChrissy,e9bc6g3,conservative
wows. how tolerant the left. ,donjohn1986,e9be8xt,conservative
The Women's March is simply a proxy for the Nation of Islam.,FelixFuckfurter,e9bcou5,conservative
"We really need to start compiling all the Anti-Semitism on the left. I don't understand how a single Jew can vote for them (other than George Soros, since he seemed to be fine with the genocide of his own people).",MarioFanaticXV,e9cljew,conservative
"I'd like to see people rewarded based on merit, rather than a ""category"" that they fall under. People need to accept that there are differences across genders, race and belief systems, amongst many other variables - and that's all okay, but you can't then start filling quotas because you want to self fallate your virtue. 

Participation trophies shouldn't be a thing, but my generation was spoilt by it, with the end result being that losing out to first place and not being rewarded for it in adulthood, makes individuals blame external factors rather than looking deep within themselves. ",ATableForOnePlease,e9d3mbh,conservative
Glad world hunger is taken care of. Now onto the real problems. ,molon-labe7,e9bklyh,conservative
"God, just screw the EU already.  F'ing idiots. 

And they wonder why we don't want to be *anything like* them.",BrighamYoung,e9bu0vq,conservative
That’s one small step for. One giant leap for.,tmv4,e9bz50m,conservative
"On the View, Behar says the Democrats lost the Senate races because of ""Gerrymandering."" You have laugh at how dumb she is. [link](https://freebeacon.com/politics/behar-blames-gerrymandering-midterms-dowd-explains-constitution/)

Meanwhile, her state of California only allowed democrats to run in their senate election.  They changed the rules in 2011 so elections are only between the two top winners of an open primary, regardless of party.  So the voters had a choice between 2 democrats for the CA senate seat. [link](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/primary-elections-california/)",ThruHiker,e9b91p6,conservative
"You think this is bad, you should see what happened the time they lost a *war* against Republicans.",MarioFanaticXV,e9b7bwk,conservative
"No it's because you aren't even trying to understand why they are protesting. Obviously the left does not like Sessions because he's quite conservative. But the actual reason they are protesting is because with Sessions gone, the new acting AG will now oversee the Mueller investigation instead of Rosenstein. And this AG has already been quite critical of the investigation and the left sees this as a threat to the investigation, as the new AG could shut it all down. Obviously the left is clinging to Mueller and him being removed might end the investigation altogether which is something they do not want.

So let's actually be honest here and understand that, yes, there is a reason to their madness. ",I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e9b4ofp,conservative
Anyone else see the irony in MoveOn organizing this since it was founded to try and deflect blame from President Clinton and forestall his Impeachment for lying under oath?,Spacecraft_Owner,e9bg2nn,conservative
"No, no, no... They're all ""organic"" and ""grassroots"" protests! There is no financing or media planning done at all!",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9ao7lx,conservative
"Not just an election... anytime they lose ANYTHING. Elections, court cases, anything. ",soxfan90,e9aip7p,conservative
"Elections aren't like sporting events, the results actually have an impact on society. People are willing to fight for their what they strongly believe in.",Tropical-Rainforest,e9cfv7u,conservative
"Let's be honest, they really didn't do this until Trump came along. The MSM, and local urban governments have blessed their activity as legitimate so it just eggs them on.",SickofInternetProgs,e9ax5c6,conservative
"They organize protests every time they're mad about something, which is all the time.",SirCheekyLongballs,e9av6pe,conservative
Because when conservative/moderates lose they still have a job to go to.,general--nuisance,e9b0ypq,conservative
"Everyone whines when they lose. 

thats life",GaoGao77,e9akt5g,conservative
They went to the theater?,rf-engineer,e9bj21r,conservative
A lot has changed since the 1860s.,Tropical-Rainforest,e9cfgzc,conservative
[removed],,e9bzugi,conservative
My critique would be to stop protesting over every little thing. At least until (if) they fire Mueller. It's a boy that cried wold scenario at this point. ,stanleythemanley44,e9bdxri,conservative
"I’m undecided if they’re going to be emboldened by this protest when the Mueller investigation concludes. Patting themselves on the back saying, “We did it guys! Our protesting has finally made drumpf back down!” Or if the investigation is going to show nothing nefarious occurred, and then just start protesting about how it was rigged from the start and demanding Trump’s tax returns...",OMGorilla,e9bmxws,conservative
"No, that’s not true.  I voted against Obama twice and lost.  I didn’t whine or destroy shit and throw tantrums",MigzMando,e9asn63,conservative
"







i thought they won?",mlmack,e9b4fq2,conservative
Not really; they just wear black masks instead of white hoods now.,MarioFanaticXV,e9ckv24,conservative
"[Oh hey, this conspiracy theory again.](https://www.reddit.com/r/POTUSWatch/comments/6kt7fv/president_trump_on_twitter_fraudnewscnn_fnn/djpncll/)",MarioFanaticXV,e9c1p6z,conservative
"But wouldn't it be more of the rabbit's tale then? They didn't come for muller, so why say anything? What would a protest do if they shut down the investigation? No point in putting out a house that's burned to the ground. ",fleetfootfortune,e9bxr5u,conservative
You're one person,GaoGao77,e9b00ev,conservative
Who won?,GaoGao77,e9b56dw,conservative
[removed],,e9c2b6f,conservative
This right here.,Nevaknosbest,e9bzo9d,conservative
There’s actually a whole party of us. Did you see the right rioting or protesting Obama and all the dumb shit he did?,rpm3311,e9b1dpg,conservative
"The democrats, apparently.",mlmack,e9b5gvf,conservative
"Yes, we've all heard this conspiracy theory before. Unfortunately for you, the lands are not magical nexi which influence its inhabitants to vote a particular way. And no, the Republican party was not more progressive- they fought a war to end slavery for crying out loud, how much more opposed to  progressivism can you get?

By the way, a number of states that voted for Obama voted for Trump... What does comparing which states voted for whom have to do with anything? If all this is true, why haven't Republicans embraced the ideals of the Democrats of old? Shouldn't they be pushing for heavy socialist controls so they can bring back slavery under a different name? Why is it that Democrats are the ones in fact doing this if there was some big switch?

Why is FDR still praised by Democrats? Why isn't he praised by Republicans? Why does the NRA still support the Republican party? Why does Planned Parenthood still support the Democrat party? Your story has more holes that those of Holocaust deniers for crying out loud.",MarioFanaticXV,e9c4nh3,conservative
"You literally said I in your last comment.

Trump literally threatened riots himself if he didn't get nomination.",GaoGao77,e9b1mpm,conservative
"Actually yes there were quite a decent amount of conservatives that targeted minorities after Obama’s election. [Here’s one ](https://www.splcenter.org/fighting-hate/intelligence-report/2009/racist-backlash-greets-president-barack-obama). [And don’t forget Obama hanging from a noose.  ](https://www.sbs.com.au/news/obama-effigy-found-hanging-by-noose). Did you see Dems protesting like they do now when Bush was elected? If you want to say yes, [here’s Obama’s noted list of protests ](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Protests_against_Barack_Obama) vs. [Bush](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Protests_against_George_W._Bush) vs..[Trump](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Protests_against_Donald_Trump).This incline isn’t about the party. Everyone protests when they’re angry and everyone is always angry. This is more importantly about Donald Trump. ",Sirenx8,e9b8zbl,conservative
"My story? You're replying to me as if I'm the one who wrote history, or personally wrote the article that I shared. I'm not here to pick a fight with you. You obviously have a different interpretation to the history of the political parties and their stances nearly 200 years ago. I disagree with your belief system. I don't see how it is a conspiracy theory. It's not like it occurred thousands of years ago, we literally lived through it just a few generations ago. I thought the knowledge was indisputable, but I'm not here to change your mind. You see it one way, I see it another.",Nevaknosbest,e9c5qoy,conservative
"No, “I” said that.  And conservatives don’t go riot and destroy shit.  We have jobs and lives.  We get over it when we lose.  Unlike  brain dead liberal fuckwits.",MigzMando,e9b1zib,conservative
Please provide me with a quote of me saying that,rpm3311,e9b1w0c,conservative
"Lol nope.  You’re providing anecdotes.  There were nowhere near the amount of protests for that shit stain Obama, even though he was a much worse president.",MigzMando,e9bix9a,conservative
"And yet you can't provide a single counter to any of my points. Your argument basically boils down to ""I believe it therefor it's true."". You're going to have to provide some evidence of this revisionist history of yours, but no one ever wants to do that. You can't just switch histories because your party's history is bad.",MarioFanaticXV,e9c62l4,conservative
"Dude see i tried to have a reasonable conversation and now you go off on an ad-hominem riddled tirade.

Maybe leave the discussion to the big boys.",GaoGao77,e9b2mse,conservative
Sorry wrong person.,GaoGao77,e9b2ooz,conservative
"Huh. Revisionist history. Okay, I enjoyed our conversation, very insightful. Thank you Mr. Fanatic.",Nevaknosbest,e9c6bbu,conservative
"You’re not having a reasonable discussion.  You’re saying “everyone is upset when they lose”.  No, many of us are rational people who move on.  It seems it’s mainly liberal fuck wits that don’t.  Sorry if you identify as liberal.  Maybe try to promote to your friends that you don’t always get what you want, instead of coming here and trying to play “everyone does it”.",MigzMando,e9b4cgi,conservative
"You posted a link claiming the Dixiecrats switched to the Republican party. This is revisionist history. Historically, only one of them- Strom Thurmond- switched sides. [All the rest remained loyal Democrats to their death, including Robert Byrd, a close friend of presidents Clinton and Obama, and Al Gore Sr, father of Clinton's VP.](https://youtu.be/I3LqPedoxSk)

Meanwhile, what did Nixon- the supposed instigator of this switch- say about the Dixiecrats? He said they were ""seeking to squeeze the last ounces of political juice out of the rotting fruit of racial injustice""... Yeah, sure sounds like he was trying to win them over...</sarcasm>",MarioFanaticXV,e9c6m8c,conservative
"Dude you're so triggered right now.

You voted in a president that threatened rioting if he didn't win. That's reality.

This discussion only became unreasonable when you started Insulting me for no reason.

And I thought the right was the side if reason and logic.",GaoGao77,e9b4yh6,conservative
"Not to interject, but you realize the irony here, right? I can see you're upset that it's being suggested that **ALL** conservatives are being lumped together, when in fact it's made up of different groups. You then turn around and say all democrats are the same. That's a little backwards my friend. Also, don't forget our country went [bonkers](https://www.splcenter.org/fighting-hate/intelligence-report/2009/racist-backlash-greets-president-barack-obama) when Obama was elected, and I'm relatively certain it wasn't democrats doing that. To be fair, most happened at night, so it didn't interfere with anyone's jobs. ",fleetfootfortune,e9byj6r,conservative
Lol literally none of what you say is accurate.  I think you need to go back to r/politics ,MigzMando,e9bhqul,conservative
I don’t see the irony at all.  I never claimed “ALL democrats are the same”.  I said it’s mainly Democrats.  And I stand by that comment.,MigzMando,e9bz8ik,conservative
"But it is, because I didn't insult you. You insulted me first.

And Trump did say if he lost there would be riots. 

So here we are.",GaoGao77,e9bih5n,conservative
"> . And conservatives don’t go riot and destroy shit. We have jobs and lives. We get over it when we lose. Unlike brain dead liberal fuckwits. 

[are you sure?](https://i.imgur.com/auM1Xmb.mp4)

if you were a marksman I'd compliment your grouping. one to the right, one to the left. 

Both ""sides"" do [terrible things](http://www.fox5dc.com/news/local-news/driver-accused-of-running-over-protesters-at-charlottesville-rally-charged-with-federal-hate-crime) \- making one appear as less than human only stokes the flames for both sides to [light torches](https://www.cnn.com/2017/08/12/us/white-nationalists-tiki-torch-march-trnd/index.html). And I think I can speak for both sides when I say those people are not on either of ours. Antifa is not the democratic movement, white nationalists are not the conservative movement. But every time you act like they are you draw others to the same conclusion. And then we get [more shit like this.](https://www.nbcnews.com/news/all/antifa-group-chants-outside-vandalizes-fox-commentator-tucker-carlson-s-n934131)",fleetfootfortune,e9c6t06,conservative
I’m not sure what you’re talking about.  No one insulted you.  Not sure what you’re talking about with trump.  But you seem to be liberal leaning.  Find a new sub to invade.,MigzMando,e9bj0gr,conservative
Totalitarian Left.,chabanais,e9akd9i,conservative
Don’t you go using the “m-word”!,justhere2havefun,e9aljua,conservative
This is what Democrats voted for.,hello_japan,e9b1jhc,conservative
"DC has laws against this kind of harassment.

Stalking Section 22-3133 An individual is guilty of stalking if the individual deliberately acts in a manner that is directed at a specific person, and: (1) The intent of the course of conduct is to cause that person to (a) Suffer emotional distress, or; (b) Fear for the person’s own safety or that of another person, or; (c) Become very alarmed, frightened, or disturbed; The penalty for stalking is up to $2,500 in fines and/or up to one year in jail.
",ThruHiker,e9bdwik,conservative
Or what?,mlmack,e9b4bwd,conservative
"I was supposed to go to this but I had a lab.... My friends made it out safe. Fuckin hell I can't believe this.

Edit: Some info: Luckily, the bar has a lot of windows so many people broke windows and escaped. There was over 100 people there it could have been much deadlier if it weren't for that. One of my friends was shot but he is all good now. Bullet went straight through him.

Shooter was former Marine Corp. member with a mental health history. He was cleared though. PTSD is confirmed. No previous criminal record besides traffic collision and traffic citation. Most likely committed suicide during the shootout.

Weapon used was a .45 caliber glock. Gun was legally purchased and the magazine was illegal in the state of California. 

Rest in Peace to the veteran Sergeant Ron Helus that was shot at the scene. He was a year away from retirement.  ):
 
FBI and ATF are confirmed to be investigating.",TheEsophagus,e9aj71g,conservative
"Oh damn, wasn't aware the gunman had died too. Thought he escaped for some reason.

Well, there's a silver lining. Hope they can find out the motive.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9ah0uh,conservative
"Wow, I hope this was just some random nut-job and not political.",rjohnson99,e9aeowj,conservative
Suspect used a handgun. Get ready for a new-and-improved AR-15 ban in California.,paulbrevik,e9akgrn,conservative
What is crazy he threw smoke bombs in and started shooting. I dont even know how to defend against that. ,Nonsenseism,e9ag00s,conservative
"My city. I’m heartbroken. I’ve been there many times. I’m furious st the media salivating over this in joy to cover another shooting and scream about gun control when people I know have died.

Helus is a goddamn hero.",neemarita,e9bcck8,conservative
"I can’t find any articles in /r/politics about it.  I guess when it happens in one of the most gun restrictive states, and they don’t yet have a Republican to blame, they keep quiet?",r777m,e9ahd8v,conservative
"Feinstein looking all sweaty waiting for the next opportunity to use these bodies in a push for more gun control. 

It's a real shame. Everyone can feel the tension but ignores it.",glockedup1,e9aex0q,conservative
And so logically we will have to make sure a mentally ill person never uses a gun to do this again by infringing upon the right of the people to keep and bear arms. That is the only possible way to prevent this from happening again.,Lepew1,e9akacm,conservative
People willing to break laws will break laws. When will the citizenry be allowed to be reasonably armed and prepared to defend themselves against these situations? ,for_the_meme_watch,e9ajlfk,conservative
No discussion about the fact that SSRI’s were involved in 3...2...,nixfu,e9aibh6,conservative
"[Witnesses described the suspect as a Middle Eastern man in his early 20s with a beard, wearing all black with a hood and his face partly covered.](https://news.sky.com/story/multiple-people-shot-as-gunman-opens-fire-in-california-bar-11547848)
  
The motive will never be known.

Update:  They have identified the attacker and the initial witness reports were wrong.  https://www.foxnews.com/us/massive-police-response-after-reports-of-shooting-at-california-nightclub

Apparently we should eventually find out the motive after all.",Yosoff,e9aj5b7,conservative
"""I'm 100% positive this person voted for Trump, and more importantly, he obviously represents every piece of sub-human filth that voted for Drumph"" - /r/politics in about 30 minutes, regardless of political affiliation ",Jizzlobber42,e9anvfm,conservative
"I've already heard multiple people at work (in CA) saying the fact that the gunman was ex-military is a convenient excuse because he was white. Not surprised to hear these things, but quite annoying to say the least.",SirCheekyLongballs,e9avepp,conservative
"""But...but..but, we have gun control! REEEEE!"" - Californians.",M6D_Magnum,e9ai67a,conservative
I'm very glad you're safe and am wishing your friend a speedy recovery. ,Staplepuffs27,e9at401,conservative
Is your friend at Los Robles? Do you guys need anything? I'll pray for your friend's quick recovery. This is awful for all of us here in TO.,neemarita,e9bv76m,conservative
Who goes to a bar at 5am,Dranosh,e9awaxm,conservative
It going to be political no matter what,Kickmull,e9ahg7v,conservative
Apparently terrorism.,chabanais,e9ai982,conservative
The Dems will make it political.,DogBeersHadOne,e9ahpcm,conservative
Twitter is already propping up the anti-gun hashtag,ExpensiveMention,e9b2eip,conservative
CA is going to ban smoke bombs,Opienus,e9amzds,conservative
"Man was a former marine suffering from PTSD apparently. Not his first rodeo, but thankfully his last.

Police and mental health professionals were called to his home but didn’t deem him a threat.",deepfeels96,e9ba0cs,conservative
"There's no political connection yet. If politicians start mouthing off about it, they'll probably allow articles about the political commentary. ",PubliusVA,e9ahu23,conservative
"*""This is why we need gun control! ...what? It happened in California?""*

&nbsp;

**Input Error: There is no script engine for file extension "".CAshooting""**",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9aptqw,conservative
Or it was some crazy that shot up a bunch of people who would historically be conservative so they're trying to bury it.,HonorMyBeetus,e9ai7g9,conservative
"Yes... more gun control. In California. The state with probably the strictest gun control in the country.

Gun control is an all or nothing kind of deal. Can't do that much passing gun control laws in one state if you can just buy them in another. It would probably result in fewer gun-related deaths if we banned guns in every single state and grabbed all the guns from all the people and destroyed them, but (i.) that would be clearly unconstitutional, and (ii.) good luck with that lol.",GorathThorgath,e9ahy9i,conservative
It’s pretty common for certain practices to be illegal because of a small but influential group of assholes ruin it for everyone. ,iLoveBO4,e9cbz1u,conservative
"Do you honestly believe more people being armed would have helped here? A trained police officer couldn’t defend himself and I’m willing to bet he was carrying. You think a group of untrained citizens, firing at a target in a crowded bar, late at night, possibly drunk, would lead to a more favorable outcome?",nsfw10101,e9b0hic,conservative
What do SSRIs have to do with this? ,MethuselahHoneysucle,e9aqv5w,conservative
">original witness reports were wrong


It seems they usually are about 90% of the time ",Dranosh,e9awdo7,conservative
Motive? It suddenly didn't happen. ,DozerM,e9ajnjr,conservative
[deleted],,e9akimy,conservative
Maybe aloha snackbar.,chabanais,e9akl28,conservative
Absolutely. ,skarface6,e9b1jin,conservative
happened at 11 last night,TheEsophagus,e9b8s2j,conservative
A tragedy like this and that's your response? Damn,Bohrez,e9axyw5,conservative
West coast man.,Son_Of_A_Plumber,e9ayucd,conservative
"Yeah, the media will make it political no matter what, but I mean increase the likelihood of civil war type of political.",rjohnson99,e9ahqlw,conservative
"Link? Source?

Only thing I've read is ""no link to terrorism.""",kevynwight,e9akp4w,conservative
I know you are joking but seriously I have no clue what someone at the bar could do to defend agaisnt this. ,Nonsenseism,e9aqxui,conservative
"How will that work, sugar wax and an oxidizer will make a rather effective smoke bomb ",Wittyusernameman,e9asu16,conservative
But seriously why do we need smoke bombs to protect ourself? I understand handguns for protection but when on earth does a normal American citizen ever need to use smoke bombs?,Naithen92,e9b3arw,conservative
"I think that, *in general,* gun-free zones create soft targets. Whether armed bar patrons is a good idea or if anyone could have prevented the killings in this particular instance is a matter for debate.",kevynwight,e9b3i8d,conservative
"How long did it take for police to arrive? Did the gunman already have the entrances covered? Police are easy targets when an active shooter has already determined that there are no other threats besides whoever walks into the door to engage them. Or as they exit the building it's easy to identify the threat as everyone else is running away. What matter more is that people who are there from the start have a means to defend themselves more than anything. When seconds count, police are minutes away. ",Rightquercusalba,e9b4e07,conservative
A lot of mass shooters take/took SSRIs. ,Lawlosaurus,e9askh2,conservative
That’s why there are always so many conspiracy theories around every shooting.,acada,e9b40na,conservative
because it was a white male.,SCONN1E,e9apct5,conservative
maybe you're wrong.,SCONN1E,e9apder,conservative
"To be honest, most of these *should* be classified as terrorism.  It's indiscriminate violence to create generalized fear. ",LonelyMachines,e9bgd44,conservative
"We'll see what we learn about the ""Middle Eastern man in his early 20s with a beard, wearing all black with a hood and his face partly covered.""

Or maybe he was a Trump voter.  Time will tell.",chabanais,e9al2ev,conservative
A ban doesn't have to work or make sense for California to implement it.,diehardgiraffe,e9axxv0,conservative
"Bump stocks can be made very easily, too, apparently. Same for suppressors. ",skarface6,e9b1neg,conservative
Mhh damn other commenters have a point when saying its easy to build own smoke bombs.,Naithen92,e9b3dqf,conservative
"to put down cover?

its hard for enemy forces (whoever that may be) to put well aimed fire on friendly forces if you have a smoke screen

edit: concealment not cover",mbrowning00,e9b50ib,conservative
"The deputy went in to distract the gunman and gave his life. He was the only one there at the time and by the time other police showed up, the gunman had killed himself. Don't blame the fucking heroes in this case--the police. Our police here in Thousand Oaks are amazing.",neemarita,e9bn4m8,conservative
"So do tens of millions of Americans, I fail to see the equivalency you're trying to draw",MethuselahHoneysucle,e9atj5e,conservative
"Maybe I said ""maybe.""",chabanais,e9apl1u,conservative
"I usually think ""terrorism"" is at least partially political or ideological in motive. ",kevynwight,e9bj96a,conservative
I see that on Sky News now. I haven't seen it anywhere else. I do hope we get a semblance of truth out of this.,kevynwight,e9aldv6,conservative
"True, can’t wait for teens to be charged for felonies for being teens ",Wittyusernameman,e9b1ckx,conservative
"Correct, not hard at all. We used to make them as kids with saltpeter and sugar.",FortunateHominid,e9b4wqv,conservative
"Whooooosh... THAT'S THE POINT. I didn't blame the police, it's reality. That's why people own guns for self defense. Is this hard for you to understand? ",Rightquercusalba,e9bv5jd,conservative
I’m not drawing an equivalency. A disproportionate number of mass shooters were prescribed SSRIs. It might have something to do with the violence and it might not. No one really knows. ,Lawlosaurus,e9aufow,conservative
The percentage of non-political spree killers who are on them is high enough to give cause to want to investigate further.  For some reason there is absolutely no research in this direction despite enough correlation to warrant it.,anuser999,e9b1c4n,conservative
The faster this story disappears the more we'll be able to know why.  The loss of life is terrible. ,chabanais,e9alzh8,conservative
"I own a gun, so obviously I understand. ",neemarita,e9bvavs,conservative
">A disproportionate number of mass shooters were prescribed SSRIs

So you can say all of them were previously diagnosed with depression and/or a mental illness, therefore put on medication. Chicken or the egg...",FortunateHominid,e9b594c,conservative
Doesn't seem like terrorism. He was former Marine Corps. He had a mental health history but was cleared,TheEsophagus,e9an2u5,conservative
"Oh, so you just got worked up and accused me of something based on pure emotions. ",Rightquercusalba,e9bvs4r,conservative
I mean you pretty much have to have something mentally wrong with you to kill an innocent person so it's not that surprising.,funnyfaceguy,e9bey54,conservative
"Wasn't the Ft. Hood shooter in the Army?

A crazy guy assembles smoke bombs and plans an ambush at a country bar and wears a black hood over his face?  Seems like some meticulous planning whatever it is.",chabanais,e9anhcp,conservative
"That's military training for you, deadly efficient.",Cetingira,e9ao0my,conservative
Watching the news now. It is confirmed PTSD. ,TheEsophagus,e9anlkc,conservative
[About the only efficient thing the Government teaches.](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=a5IWK9sRYTs),chabanais,e9ao9l6,conservative
"A nebulous term.  You just said he was ""cleared"" from his mental health exam.
",chabanais,e9anwgb,conservative
"Yes, he was cleared by mental health professionals but he still acted on PTSD",TheEsophagus,e9ao0bl,conservative
"> he still acted on PTSD

This remains to be seen.   He clearly planned this one. ",chabanais,e9aobko,conservative
I agree. It may have been planned. Witnesses say he was reloading at one point so he may have brought several magazines.,TheEsophagus,e9apif9,conservative
"What I find interesting is why did he choose that country bar?  Had he been rejected there,  was he going after a certain demographic,  was it simply a busy place?

",chabanais,e9aprkt,conservative
Busy. Student night at Borderline is always busy. I think that's the main motive why. You wanna kill a lot of people? Do it in a closed space like this with lots of people. :(,neemarita,e9bn8uk,conservative
"I think that's what the FBI is investigating currently. Unfortunately, we don't always learn what these shooter's motives are.",TheEsophagus,e9aqc63,conservative
It is a logical assumption but it would be nice to know more if possible.,chabanais,e9bowk8,conservative
"What happens in Vegas stays in Vegas, apparently. 
",chabanais,e9aqovd,conservative
"I wish we did. I know two people who died. I am heartbroken over this and even angrier at people politicizing the deaths of my friends or saying somehow they deserved it since we're a conservative area (yes, I've seen that on Facebook today and I wanted to throw my fucking computer out a window).",neemarita,e9bv5wf,conservative
Nobody deserves to get shot at a bar like that.  California makes it tough for people to defend themselves.,chabanais,e9bvaze,conservative
Nope. But that is the toxic world we live in these days. If you disagree with me you deserve to die rhetoric. What the fuck is wrong with people.,neemarita,e9bvdvf,conservative
Not sure but it certainly isn't good for society or the country.,chabanais,e9bxegw,conservative
"He should kill himself first. It's called leading by example, but he's a leftist, so he'll just sit on his ass and expect everyone else to do it for him.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9bi1a2,conservative
"He just made a deal with Holland yesterday, they will more buy oil from us instead of Putin... Germany agreed also",trachelleex,e9cpelj,conservative
Too cold?  Try heading **SOUTH**,Jizzlobber42,e9bsgd1,conservative
Entitled.,tehForce,e9bj5kk,conservative
I demand a boat to take me to Bermuda,RomeoMyHomeo,e9bjy01,conservative
No.,ChironInTheSky,e9blkr7,conservative
The only bus you deserve is one to take you back to Mexico or South America ,LastationNeoCon,e9blc10,conservative
i demand boats to take them to cuba,Delta_25,e9bki31,conservative
"Too close.

Let's fly them to Venezuela",gbimmer,e9bl7qb,conservative
"I hear they have the socialism, and that is supposed to be good.",Buddha_Punch,e9bulg2,conservative
More activist judges.  Don't worry.  We have 6 more years of appointments to stop the activist Judges.,tehForce,e9c6hwd,conservative
Dumbshit says what?,DogBeersHadOne,e9c6g9x,conservative
FFS *someone* impeach and disbar these activist judges. The president does not need their permission to approve this.,Buddha_Punch,e9cfkpc,conservative
Leave it to Florida to make an election an absolute shitshow,ENEB1487,e9b64e2,conservative
Broward County.  I'm shocked.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9bd824,conservative
"Its amazing how they always ""find"" ballots in places like Broward, but never anywhere else. ",iwasthebeaver,e9b40nc,conservative
This has Franken written all over it. There never seems to be ballots found after a concession or on the days after that would help a Republican candidate.,ThatJimKid,e9b8ae0,conservative
">~~""Since that time, it has become clear there are many more uncounted ballots than was originally reported.""~~ We found out that if we can successfully commit voter fraud in Broward county, we might be able to steal an election.

FTFY
",Hayes_for_days,e9bxnd5,conservative
"If it’s still not enough votes, a couple dozen boxes of uncounted ballots will show up in a storage locker.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9b2doy,conservative
Spread the word about this. Don't let them steal another election.,scrubking,e9b3h7j,conservative
I hear Al Gore wants another recount for 2000,RomeoMyHomeo,e9b23hj,conservative
Democrats always seem to find miracle votes in these drawn out contested elections. These were insanely close. Should have never been this close. Every vote is becoming more and more important in these elections. No one can stay home.,the-divine-comedy,e9b24tf,conservative
It's called Lefty Magic!,JFGFNY,e9b9m16,conservative
How do you unrescind your concession? It doesn’t work like that buddy. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9brcoy,conservative
What the hell,MaddSim,e9b360m,conservative
"FAKE ballots, sure.",BrighamYoung,e9bubfl,conservative
This is why we can't have nice things.,Hayes_for_days,e9bxh81,conservative
"Imagine if Republican counties started ""finding"" ballots too. /r/politics would explode.",burtmaklin1,e9b9m7m,conservative
Maybe that's where all the missing socks from the dryer go!,ZarahCobalt,e9bnb4r,conservative
"Remember the van full of 9,000 “absentee ballots” Brenda Snipes “found” outside her office in the primaries this year in Broward? ",YankeeBlues21,e9b8jbi,conservative
ask chad then,Delta_25,e9b3hjw,conservative
they would be shooting election officials. ,iwasthebeaver,e9ba5js,conservative
Pregnant Chad or hanging Chad? ,Dunkeliness,e9bc6d7,conservative
They’d send them ricin and the media would refuse to cover it,burtmaklin1,e9ba8zt,conservative
Happy Cake Day iwasthebeaver! Use what talents you possess: the woods would be very silent if no birds sang there except those that sang best.,EncouragementRobot,e9ba5o1,conservative
"The election kind of took center stage.  It's sti going on:

https://www.foxnews.com/us/migrant-caravan-faces-border-bottleneck-as-trump-administration-tightens-asylum-rules

The apparent corruption in Florida and possibly Arizona have taken center stage.

Could be a great opportunity for you to post an article about it.
",chabanais,e9d1vhn,conservative
Thank goodness. Vice is garbage. It's just another BuzzFeed. ,4KDoritos,e9arrt1,conservative
why not 100%?,superdude411,e9awsf5,conservative
Couldn't have happened to nicer people.,Silicon_Avatar,e9b7xqq,conservative
Bye Felicia!,Hayes_for_days,e9bxpc3,conservative
They were on till they went unfettered liberal. Their “reporters” stopped hiding their bias as well.,trelium06,e9cb4s3,conservative
"Get woke, go broke. ",Armageddon_It,e9cf244,conservative
With more aesthetic stuff they release. That’s how they reel people in.,menardo3,e9asshq,conservative
"Hold up, the article does not say what the headline says.  don't be fake news",BeachCruisin22,e9cykdp,conservative
No he doesn’t. He expressed this opinion in 2016 right after Comey let her off the hook. ,justhere2havefun,e9d00q5,conservative
"Man, that guy looks like a super mean bulldog, and I mean that is exactly what we need as AG.
",masternarf,e9czjmz,conservative
"If he's gonna do that, he will need a LOT of secret service protection, since Arkencide is a thing that happens to
those who mess with the ""Clinton Machine"". Of course that ""machine"" dearly NEEDS to be disassembled.. Hope you have the cojones, Mr AG. We're praying for you!!!
",LVDave,e9cznb2,conservative
IT'S GOING DOWN,BundyPolkHigh33,e9cxx8s,conservative
"Okay, the [USA Today](https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2016/07/05/reasonable-indict/86731608/)  article linked from this one (written in 2016 by Whitaker himself) says he *would have* indicted her. Now that he’s up for the job, I doubt he still would or would be allowed to. 

Since he voiced this opinion in 2016, it is *not* “Breaking News”. ",justhere2havefun,e9czwwd,conservative
I question the veracity of For Best Game.com. ,JaneTheThird,e9d38yb,conservative
The op-ed that Whitaker wrote was written two years ago. We'll see what happens.,Quazimodal,e9cymf8,conservative
Exactly.  I think we should be extra diligent here to not post up dishonest things that give the other side something to point at.,BeachCruisin22,e9d13f9,conservative
No shocker there... TBH.,ozric101,e9bapzg,conservative
I used to love him on The Gentleman’s Rant YouTube series. Very disappointing when he sold out to make it to the big time with The Daily Show. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9bqc3q,conservative
Stop wasting our time and money...there was NO collusion except on the part of the Clintons...and illegal aliens voting.,Bubbacat7,e9c5lg2,conservative
"Its really simple. Let the investigation finish unimpeded. The burden is on the American government to prove that Trump is guilty. Trump assured us that he is innocent, and if that is true, then he has nothing at all to worry about.

If he lied and committed a crime, then he needs to be held accountable for his actions just as any one of us would be.",Nevaknosbest,e9c7mms,conservative
"There was no widespread instances of illegal aliens voting, and what do the Clintons have to do with anything? The American people have a right to the truth about the integrity of our officials and elections.


And if you truly believe there was no collusion: let the results of the investigation prove that.",riseoftheorange,e9c6i1j,conservative
Quit spreading this idiotic narrative. ,Rightquercusalba,e9d3650,conservative
Clinton openly paid for Russian stories about her opponent in order to influence the outcome of the election. This is a fact not in dispute.,ngoni,e9c738v,conservative
I have never seen this before. Do you have any sources on this?,riseoftheorange,e9c7cdw,conservative
"http://thefederalist.com/2017/10/25/top-10-things-to-know-about-dossier/

",ngoni,e9c7wyh,conservative
Fusion GPS was originally hired as Oppo Research for the Free Beacon. The Clinton Campaign later took on the fusion investigation commission. Steele was the head of the MI6 Russian Desk and his sources were trusted Russian contacts who he did not pay.,riseoftheorange,e9c8eip,conservative
"Freebeacon took delivery of their information before Steele started working for FusionGPS. That talking point is tired and thoroughly debunked. The article I linked shows that.

Steele was acting as a private citizen, not as an official of the British government. Fusion GPS is fully intertwined with Russians and the Russian Government-

https://www.nationalreview.com/2017/10/steele-dossier-democrats-collusion-russia/

https://www.wsj.com/articles/the-coming-russia-bombshells-1509059214",ngoni,e9cb9oa,conservative
"No, no guys, this is ok because this violent mob is ANTI-fascist! ",rjohnson99,e99rhyk,conservative
"How does Twitter allow this account to remain up? Not the first time they've openly threatened violence.


> @SmashRacismDC
> 
> “Racist scumbag, leave town!”
> 
> Every night you spread fear into our homes—fear of the other, fear of us, and fear of them. Each night you tell us we are not safe. Tonight you’re reminded that we have a voice. Tonight, we remind you that you are not safe either.
> 
> \#KnockKnockTucker

-[Source](https://twitter.com/SmashRacismDC/status/1060319798184284160)

",PrawnsAreOk,e99osxa,conservative
Everyone who voted for “moderate” democrats last night said this was ok.,the-divine-comedy,e99nc4q,conservative
"Imagine the shitstorm if a Republican mob showed up outside Acosta’s house and did this. We would never hear the end of it. 

We’re just a little ways away from left wing lynch mobs. ",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e99ogan,conservative
"Strange mentality some of these liberals have. Was just reading through a thread on r/politics and someone made some sensible, non-threatening comments and was from NY. Morons on there were saying he doesn't belong in NY with those mentalities.. who the hell gets to dictate who has what beliefs and where they can voice them?",bricox171,e99unab,conservative
So they are against a free press?🤔,yeroldpappy,e99p5az,conservative
"Normal Americans can no longer peacefully coexist with the left.

Let's hope our inevitable separation can occur peacefully.",Silicon_Avatar,e99qnqz,conservative
How did Carlson trigger them again? Or which leftist implied that he must go. ,postonrddt,e99p5hl,conservative
"BTW, these are Bolshevik tactics. After Russia had the first revolution that overthrew the Czar and created a republic  the Bolsheviks took power through a terrorist revolution despite being a small minority party.  If you opposed them they'd warn you that bad things would happen. If you ignored their threats you'd come home from work one night and find your entire extended family murdered.  Soon people who opposed the Bolsheviks stopped trying to stop them and just let them have their way in votes in the governing body and they were able to vote for total Bolshevik power without ever having won an election.

Not that letting them have their way saved any lives.  Soon enough the Bolsheviks murdered everyone who didn't support them immediately for not being leftwing enough. ",StraightNewt,e9a3skr,conservative
The meltdown continues eh?,BeachCruisin22,e99nouj,conservative
"I voted R in this election because of this stuff. If Ds don't condemn this immediately, I'm never voting D again. And I hope many moderates will follow.

&#x200B;

After posting my walkaway story here yesterday and wishing you guys luck, some troll immediately sent me an email calling me a c\*nt and telling me to ""go back where I came from."" He called Trump a fascist but I think that today's leftists should look in the mirror when they say this, since they are proving themselves to be the true fascists. ",Terra_green2,e99zx0d,conservative
"Tucker, time to remember a simple rule.

Rule 303. 

Not endorsing violence, just saying protect yo 6.",patb011,e99obni,conservative
Sounds like other mob activities that the Democrats do. ,The_Fyrd,e99s02a,conservative
"Communists deserve death

Not that I'm advocating violence or anything",fightmeinspace,e99p86p,conservative
"That is why we have the 2nd amendment.  

One of these deranged leftist lunatics comes in your property after threatening your family? Take them out.  They are a menace to society and our democracy as a whole.",Mormonster,e9a5qyo,conservative
"“SAY HELLO TO MY LITTLE FRIEND” 
bring it mob!!!!",donjohn1986,e99oddp,conservative
Did they also burn a cross on his yard like they used to?,RutCry,e99yfws,conservative
so... who is going to run into Tucker at the gun store tomorrow?,Plazman72,e9a1i28,conservative
"One of these days they're going to knock on the wrong door of someone crazy and with a loaded shotgun, and I'm going to have to hear about their ""bravery"" all over the news.",polycarpgyarados,e9afcpq,conservative
That twitter has a history of breaking the rules. They need a permanent suspension,Yumyum95,e99tajg,conservative
How civil.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9a21uk,conservative
LOL. Democrats pulling out their old favorites. Maybe they'll start burning wooden vaginas on people's lawns next.,AddictedToGlue,e9ab32s,conservative
First one would be rock salt just to be nice and as a warning. The rest would be buckshot.,Littlebigman34,e99w7xu,conservative
"Wtf they gonna do, not a damn one of them likes guns, and you know tucker is packing enough heat to melt steel.",mkov88,e9a08n5,conservative
"I’m feeling really badly for his wife. If she wasn’t armed to the teeth, she will be now. ",Earthling03,e9abqu4,conservative
Conservatives dont like CNN but we dont threaten their lives because we dont agree.,nertthegert,e9ahxi3,conservative
"This is getting ridiculous, almost like a South Park reverse racism episode.",LibertarianP,e9a2dbx,conservative
"Time to get a good home alarm system, a Glock 21, and a couple spare mags. 

This kind of behavior should not be tolerated in a civil society. But I bet the media won't even cover it. Hell, Maxime Waters encouraged this. It's disgusting. ",LumpyWumpus,e9abvsn,conservative
Get some very aggressive dogs... nobody will show up at your house. I could think of a hundred ways to get liberal off my property. All of them I would thoroughly enjoy carrying out. Paintball gun? Pepper spray system activated from inside the house? ,TheJMatt,e9aej66,conservative
"I don't watch FOXNews... or any TV news. But I listened to Tucker vs. Cenk, Tucker on Rubin, and Tucker on Carolla, and though I started to hear some of the same themes and platitudes repeated by the end of the fifth hour, the idea that he's a ""racist scumbag"" or ""hurts people"" with his ""hate"" is just a huge, grand, distorted, nihilistic LIE. 

I had this quaint notion that the culture would be giving it a rest for a little while following the Midterms, but clearly I was a grade-A moron for thinking that, however briefly. 

Very glad they suspended this group's online activities. 

Forget about an Orwellian or Huxleyan or Kafkaesque or Bradburian or PhilKDickian dystopia, we're swiftly entering a **Machiavellian** dystopia. 

""no border no wall no USA at all"" is not what I want to hear from the ""progressive"" wing of politics. To me that is an illiberal globalistic socialist view, and as plainly Anti-American as any slogan has ever been.  ",kevynwight,e9ajnwv,conservative
"I'd invite a few friends over, and the next time they rang the doorbell, we'd open the door armed to the teeth.",BeauRyker,e9a8r6h,conservative
More liberal tolerance and moral high ground I assume?,PBR_Sheetz,e9afe5s,conservative
This has to be some form of harassment right? Like enough to get the police involved? These liberals can't go on thinking they can just get away with harassing people with opposing opinions ,Straight_Ace,e9afns1,conservative
He should shoot anyone who steps foot on his property ,ravenswin,e9ajljk,conservative
"They didn't just show up outside his house, they tried to break in and cracked the door.

Let's be clear here. They knew he was at the studio getting ready to do his show. They did this to scare and assault his wife and kids who were home alone.
",Sumner67,e9ajybu,conservative
"this is actual press supression. 

An angry poltically motivated mob going to a highly visable member of the press to indimidate him.

Revoking Jim Acostas press pass is not a violation of the 1st amendment this is",Manchurainprez,e9aufof,conservative
"This is why we have the second amendment. One of these mobs is going to go to someone's house and the owner will open fire.

That's on people like Maxine Waters and others for encouraging this insanity.",Argonut32,e9b4jji,conservative
I think the worst thing that happened before the midterms was the maga bomber.  There seemed to be good momentum pointing out the hate of the left and then that moron showed up. We need to keep pointing out the lunacy and hatred of the left but not encourage the same behavior or retaliation.  I wish the maga bomber never happened. ,Conservativeone,e9ad3bu,conservative
Bonus points if you can link Smash Racism DC to George Soros.,Lepew1,e9aiye5,conservative
This STALKING will continue until the mobs are arrested and prosecuted or until victims start shooting the assailants.,StephenScherer1,e9alzed,conservative
Any one notice how the media and most of Reddit is barely reporting this. They threw a fit when Acosta got his pass revoked but don't give a shit when Carlson's family and home is threatened by a masked mob. You have commie subreddits like Chapo house encouraging it too. Fuck them.,Yumyum95,e9atrhk,conservative
"The worst part? Tucker's wife was the only one home at the time. So, congratulations to the progressive mob that accomplished nothing except threatening a woman who's only crime was loving someone they disagree with politically.

If nothing is done about this, we're allowing the establishment of a scary-as-hell precedent.",TruthfulTrolling,e9aueh6,conservative
[removed],,e99x9ex,conservative
"While I'm opposed to doxxing and identity politics, the people claiming violence in their responses should be ashamed. They had a sign that said he is a 'racist scumbag' but there isn't evidence of physical violence here in this article. Is calling someone a bad name physically harmful? NO. FACTS BEFORE FEELINGS was the stance of the right-wingers just not when they are triggered SNOWFLAKES.",CamoShortsKid,e9aj2x8,conservative
Did they have a permit?,lax714,e9ak0hd,conservative
This is what the rise of authoritarian fascism looks like. ,TooMuchButtHair,e9ard7e,conservative
This is when you start investing in some guns and big dogs.,Stunner900,e9as2fn,conservative
Jobs not Mobs!,Gnome_Sane,e9axo5y,conservative
"A response on Twitter

>this is the America tucker wanted to come out. the only problem is that the wrong side did. of course, he will claim innocence & harassment. if you can't stand the heat get out of the kitchen & off of FOX.

The left's mob violence will *always* be justified as a form of defense. ",jd_porter,e99yucb,conservative
"""But , but,  but, there's no such thing as an 'alt or 'extreme' left!"" ",SnarkyUsernamed,e9ambrd,conservative
"You jest but their response is going to be to trot out the usual ""nobody *akshually* got hurt so it doesn't count"" bullshit.  They're doing the old child's ""I'm not touching you neener neener"" thing except replacing ""touching"" with ""killing"".",anuser999,e9b8yfg,conservative
"Truly, the mental gymnastics of antifa and those who defend it is astounding.",art36,e9auffv,conservative
"Because twitter is a leftist organ. Remember, to the left our speech is violence, but their violence is speech.",StraightNewt,e99shnw,conservative
"Report it to your local police, seems like a terroristic threat by definition. ",ozric101,e99ss4n,conservative
Twitter left up en-masse doxxing of “Proud Boys” members in New York City after the guys defended themselves from an antifa attack. Twitter is a leftist shithole. ,Knollsit,e99v9xk,conservative
"account suspended by twitter. Good. That's clearly a threat though. And they followed through. Plus they tried to doxx him and family. There's got to be further repercussions for that kind of behavior. 

I'm no expert on the law in DC but couldn't that be considered simple assault or making terroristic threats? That tweet is basically a confession that they intended to instill fear of physical violence in Tucker and his loved ones.",greatatdrinking,e9a8vzl,conservative
TV programming at mastery. They don't like it yet won't shut it off. There getting more than their allotted 2 minutes of hate. ,bklyndamsel,e9aqv3n,conservative
I seriously still can’t believe they were rewarded for their behavior and radicalism. The Dems shoud have been run out of town last night across the board. They’ve been sowing chaos since the election and their views continue to become more and more extreme by the month. ,YankeeBlues21,e99oxyx,conservative
If a GOP mob showed I can guarantee they'd be arrested at be facing charges or terrorism within 5 minutes.  This only works because the justice system in leftist areas allows the left to commit crimes with impunity.,StraightNewt,e99stlz,conservative
I'm really getting tired of the double standards the left sets. ,WarferJerBerger,e9aigct,conservative
"Imagine the shitstorm if a Republican mailed bombs to CNN, critics of Trump and former Presidents.

We’re just a little ways away from rightwing terrorists assassinating Jews in synagogues. Oh shit... wait a minute!",oTHEWHITERABBIT,e9a7oiz,conservative
"Now? The leftists progressive extremist minority.  They’re the loudest, the most self marginalized, the most radical and the most dangerous. ",steelallz,e9aaskm,conservative
"This may sound extreme, but it's really not: the motivations of the left are satanic in nature.  How so?  Did not Lucifer see himself as perfect and corollary to God; equal in all respects?  When you have glorified yourself to the extent the Left has, you really begin to believe that you possess the god-like capacity to sort out all manner of human relations and conditions.  Having rejected God, the see themselves as being wise as God, as compassionate as God, and as knowledgeable as God.  Is this attitude not apparent in everything they do?  Their refusal to argue on an issue's merits, their piousness, their self-justified wrath?  It all bears the troubling marks of a pseudo-religion where the adherents have set themselves up as the principle deities.  

&#x200B;

You don't even need to be a Christian to recognize this.  ",MojoHand052,e9afvqb,conservative
">who the hell gets to dictate who has what beliefs and where they can voice them?

Mobs. 

",TruthfulTrolling,e9aty5x,conservative
Socialism can't have a free press as the media has to be owned by the state. ,Trisagion-und-Isolde,e9a5gxe,conservative
They expect a free press from you because that is part of your principles.  They don't grant a free press to others because it isn't part of their principles.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9aes9q,conservative
Not the left 🤭,JAK4189,e99zpj3,conservative
Let's hope. But I'm not betting on it. ,ConsistentlyRight,e99vmwo,conservative
It won't.  The police and military will win if the Democrats join the group against them.,CreativeRoutine,e99yevx,conservative
"It's an op organized by a far left activist group 

[quick rundown](https://twitter.com/nickmon1112/status/1060341687766138880?s=19)",fightmeinspace,e99q04e,conservative
Don’t hold your breathe buddy ,i_floop_the_pig,e9ad74c,conservative
"When faced with a mob like this, I ask myself what I would do?  What I came up with was ""Don't taze me, Bro!""  Normally not lethal or causing permanent damage, but seeing one of their number go down and do the funky chicken would do a great deal to get the crowd to disperse.",WIlf_Brim,e9ah5mx,conservative
The nazis are coming for him,ExpensiveMention,e99zcwo,conservative
"Uh, if I have a group of people on my property threatening me and then one knocks on the door, it isn't ""crazy"" to be armed.",soylent_absinthe,e9afpml,conservative
I would donate to that patriot’s legal fund.  What you describe is a self defense castle doctrine situation ,ravenswin,e9ajnsg,conservative
"> They need a permanent suspension

What they need is to be sitting inside a jail cell right now.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ajwv8,conservative
"Really probably a bad idea to do the rock salt.  It's still considered use of a lethal weapon, and if somebody is armed they are going to react accordingly.

If one is going to use a firearm use it with lethal intent, because that is what the target will think you are doing, and legally that is what it is considered.",WIlf_Brim,e9aija6,conservative
"Good luck!  In the peoples republic of DC, self defense is frowned upon.",Midnight_Cowboy_DC,e9awi8y,conservative
"Ehh leave the animals out of it.  You shouldn’t train them to be more aggressive than they are.  If they step foot on your property in a threatening way and don’t leave, shoot them yourself ",ravenswin,e9ajrct,conservative
I actually want them to chant things like that and act like absolute fools. Why would I turn down free red pills?,Herr_Rambler,e9b5h29,conservative
"Technically, neither is. Remember first amendment protects free speech from government suppression. Obviously a whole bunch of laws were broken outside the constitution in this instance.",GodzRebirth,e9azrst,conservative
"> Tucker's wife was the only one home at the time. So, congratulations to the progressive mob that accomplished nothing except threatening a woman who's only crime was loving someone they disagree with politically.

Antifa would consider that just as much, if not more, of a win.

They are domestic terrorists, with the goal of terrorizing their political enemies. Terrorizing a woman who's at home alone better serves their goal of intimidation and violence. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9aunso,conservative
"> I’m at a very liberal university and I’ve never heard anything this extreme. 

That's where I don't believe you.

[1](https://stanfordreview.org/antifa-thugs-find-a-champion-and-leader-in-stanford-professor-3/)

[2](https://www.apnews.com/163a0eecb86647ecab18b3e2f0ecfc13)

[3](https://www.voanews.com/a/us-colleges-confront-new-era-sometimes-violent-protest/3826959.html)

[4](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/08/04/education/edlife/antifa-collective-university-california-berkeley.html)

",IndefinitePresent,e99xmls,conservative
"You should threaten a cop with physical violence next time you see one. See what happens. After all, you're just saying something not acting it out. See how well you do in front of the judge after they book you.",GodzRebirth,e9b04ch,conservative
"From TFA:

> “She had been in the kitchen alone getting ready to go to dinner and she heard pounding on the front door and screaming. ... Someone started throwing himself against the front door and actually cracked the front door.”

And since when has taking offence with a mob coming onto your private property chanting ""we know where you sleep"" become a ""SNOWFLAKE"" response?

I have a feeling you don't actually have a clue what you're talking about.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9bgnjn,conservative
"It’s funny bc people assume he’s on Fox he’s just a right wing guy all the way. He actually leans left on a number of topics but he’s just not crazy enough to call himself a democrat. 

Yet everyone acts like he’s some homer who has a hack show. Do people know he used to work for CNN? He’s really a pretty fair news guy especially for being on a right wing network like fox ",primitivo_,e9afynb,conservative
Everyone uses Twitter. ,TheLonelyLemon,e9a5z7z,conservative
"Funny enough, political party is a protected class in DC. Doubt they enforce it if republicans are being targeted. ",Zac1245,e9ajqft,conservative
"> I seriously still can’t believe they were rewarded for their behavior and radicalism. 

The US is entering into the same sort of political violence that the late Roman republic experienced. It's going to get a lot worse.",StraightNewt,e99sorr,conservative
"This is the reason our founding fathers were so apprehensive of an entrenched two party system. It's no longer about voting for the best option in people's minds, but only for the least bad.",AddictedToGlue,e9ab5ph,conservative
"But Republicans are becoming more radical. The graphics from big data people tell me so! /s


Seriously, I saw that all over my timeline on twitter: a graphic showing the Dems as staying static on the political spectrum, but Republicans moving right. It makes no sense. I'm assuming the people who made it changed the baseline for each year (i.e., as mainstream views shift left, especially on social issues, then the Dems appear static, whereas traditional GOP views, though unchanged, will appear more radical). The fact that anyone can say the Dems aren't turning radical is beyond me.",RPwhitefrost,e9ar0sy,conservative
It might have been a lot closer if the vote was right after Kavanaugh was confirmed. ,skarface6,e9b24fd,conservative
"The mayor in Seattle let ANTIFA stop traffic and abuse drivers, and supported them.  This is the type of thing where people let it slide because they like the end result, not realizing it can gain a life of its own and go too far, too quickly.  ",Roez,e9afvrj,conservative
"1) they were fake bombs

2) that dude wasn't attached to the republican party at all. He hated us for not being antisemetic. 

3) literally everyone condemned both actions immediately.  Yet the left refuses to condemn any violence from their side. ",LumpyWumpus,e9abnsh,conservative
"Oh wow, look everyone it's a moron.",Batterytron,e9ab6pw,conservative
"There was a pretty big ruckus, don't know why you are pretending otherwise. But thanks for proving his point precisely. When a Republican does that it it's headline news for days. When a Democrat mails ricin to Ted Cruz or tries to shoot up the Family Research Council nobody learns of it.",Martbell,e9abjmz,conservative
No.  They just have different political views ffs.  This demonizing the other side simply hurts our country.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9aw0wp,conservative
Good for me not for thee. ,yeroldpappy,e9bpdua,conservative
"Exactly. If you’re trying to start  a civil war it’s not a good idea to demonize gun owners, the police, and the military. ",JAK4189,e99ztgs,conservative
"There will be no ""winning"" if millions of people decide they no longer will conform to society.

We'll look like Syria but with nukes to protect. ",Cetingira,e9aq83x,conservative
Curious it's taken place **after** the election.,Reven1911,e9afc0t,conservative
I have no expectations which is why I'm pissed. I blame the dems for this.,Terra_green2,e9bjdep,conservative
I veil my posts vaguely in case someone is stalking my reddit account to ruin my livelihood.,polycarpgyarados,e9afxll,conservative
Glad to hear it!,polycarpgyarados,e9aykzh,conservative
"That isnt true the constitution also protects citizens from eachother, an angry poltical mob trying to intimidate a meber of the press",Manchurainprez,e9b689e,conservative
"I guess the Kremlin on the Charles isn’t as bad as it could be. #2,3,4 are pretty shocking, ngl. I’ve definitely heard people advocating to abolish ICE, establish open boarders, and some pretty absurd other views (immigration as reparations to Central America???). I was mainly talking about the “no more USA” thing- I’ve never heard anybody actually advocate for the end of the union. Would love to see someone prove me wrong here. ",raggedoldflag,e9a0ayk,conservative
"He is, yes.  His show is the most moderate on the network.  I wonder if any of these kids can provide any reference to Tucker being “racist” or “hateful” or if they’re just doing as their told (paid to do).  This is very suspicious.",booblitchutz,e9agecr,conservative
"They hate him because his views aren't boxed in and easily caricatured, therefore he makes for terrible controlled opposition. Also because he is willing to talk about what is really going on, and the only thing that matters if conservatism is to survive: demographics. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9ahher,conservative
They should listen to his Shapiro interview. He is a huge fan of government intervention.,HonorMyBeetus,e9ahygl,conservative
"He is left on what topics specifically? No sarcasm, I'm genuinely curious.",Nevaknosbest,e9at37m,conservative
I don't. There are a lot of people who don't,molon-labe7,e9abu9y,conservative
"isn't intent the most difficult thing to prove around things like that? I'd assume you normally need private texts and emails that show a pattern.. But a tweet with #knockknocktucker after saying ""you aren't safe."" That's intent. They basically put it on a bulletin board",greatatdrinking,e9ak3v4,conservative
"I'm glad other people are starting to see it. I'm so tired of the naive, sheltered, and historically ignorant ""it can't happen here. It's the 21st century. That doesn't happen anymore"" mindset/attitude.

Humans are humans. We haven't changed one bit. 21st century Americans with iPhones and Starbucks are *every bit* as capable of becoming violent as a Roman was. Another civil war or total collapse into mass rioting, starvation, violence, and widespread famine and disease due to civil breakdown *can absolutely* happen here and now, and we're in fact getting much closer by the year. ",ConsistentlyRight,e99vm9r,conservative
"The *really* interesting bit will be how the Internet affects all of this. Will things be made better or worse by instant, mass spread of information?",erikthereddest,e99vmgb,conservative
"Ancient Rome callback, love it! ",StockSkys,e99u1sd,conservative
"That's kinda my worry as well. The respect is gone. You used to be able to disagree but at least talk about it.

Now we're subhuman to the Left. This isn't going to end well unless they figure out how to re-attach their heads and find some way to be reasonable.",mnslice,e9ald0v,conservative
">political violence that the late Roman republic experienced

What did they experience? ",molon-labe7,e9absoj,conservative
Going back a little further we are basically modern day Athens minus the wall. People have no sense of history. ,rjohnson99,e9bhqv4,conservative
Exactly. Look at the party platforms and see which would have fit in ten years ago and which has pushed the limits of extremism. Not to mention the Dems tearing away at the social fabric attacking the sorts of things “we all agreed on” even a few years ago ,YankeeBlues21,e9b4pec,conservative
"Suggesting that they are people with ""different political views"" is intellectually disingenuous.  The manner in which they conduct themselves *regarding* their political views deserves to be described thusly: Demonic.  ",MojoHand052,e9axp2r,conservative
"While I agree, they are a hop skip and a jump away from Lucifer level rebellion and logic.  ",polycarpgyarados,e9ayw7d,conservative
They know this. That is why they are waging information war and censoring Conservatives little by little,CreativeRoutine,e9a01td,conservative
Iran is a model example ,CreativeRoutine,e9b4x1d,conservative
A country without borders is no country... how can it be?,Reven1911,e9afkom,conservative
you cant ask them for specifics. theyll only give out vague reasons for Tuckers so called racsim. ,joshuab01,e9ahdng,conservative
"It’s probably because he once called a black guy for saying something racist against white people, and of course black people can’t be racist.",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9al24q,conservative
Their knowledge of their own ideology is about an inch deep.,rjohnson99,e9bhugn,conservative
That Shapiro interview was pretty eye opening.  It made it pretty hard to take Carlson seriously.  ,FelixFuckfurter,e9b29fg,conservative
I'm not the person you responded to but if you want to listen to Tucker explain his views he was on Ben Shapiro's Sunday Special and the Rubin report recently also Adam Corolla's show I think. They're good commute listens if you have a decent commute time.,RAZRBCK08,e9avya6,conservative
"I don't

&#x200B;",TheJMatt,e9aeb0w,conservative
Yeah exactly. But I live right near DC and am there daily. No one is going to do anything. DC government and especially the police are useless. ,Zac1245,e9akd6e,conservative
"At the very least, I think we're fighting a Civil Cold War right now. We might not be experiencing the same violence as Rome did, but the parallels are there: the polarization; increasing dependency on a welfare state; violations of tradition and norms; inflating the currency away; an inability to control borders, etc., etc. 


It's only a matter of time until the republic falls. The only question is will we devolve into the empire or something even worse? ",RPwhitefrost,e9arawl,conservative
Yup.  I am becoming more and more firmly entrenched in my view that we're past the point of no return and need to start plotting out how to peacefully split the country into two or more new nations before we devolve into a full-on civil war.,anuser999,e9ba0mq,conservative
I’d say worse. Kinda think it’s already showing horrible effects and I don’t see it getting better. What are your thoughts? ,StockSkys,e99w1c1,conservative
Worse.  Social media is a cancer.,mlmack,e9agal1,conservative
"It's clearly being made worse. Total strangers ""screaming"" at each other all over Facebook, Twitter, Reddit... These attitudes will only breed contempt and violence. I'm very worried it's going to get ugly. But I'll be ready.",mnslice,e9alg2h,conservative
">Now we're subhuman to the Left. This isn't going to end well unless they figure out how to re-attach their heads and find some way to be reasonable.

A strong rebuke at the polls might have worked, but it seems that isn't going to happen.  Time to start forming tight nit groups for self defense and protection of our own.",StraightNewt,e9atyry,conservative
Civil War,HuskarDc,e9afkvj,conservative
"Being anti-gay marriage is a radical position apparently (I'm pro gay marriage, fwiw), but Obama entered office against gay marriage. Hillary didn't support it until her 2016 run. Trump is our first president who supported it upon entering office. So Republicans who stayed static on the issue and don't support it haven't shifted their views at all, whereas many of the Democrats have shifted towards it. Yet somehow it's the Republican views who have shifted according to the press. Relative to the new norm, the GOP is more right, but they haven't moved more to the right— the country moved left. They haven't become more radical at all, whereas the Democrats have become quite radical on economics and some more minor social issues. ",RPwhitefrost,e9b91kp,conservative
I couldn’t disagree with you more.  But I don’t think you’re demonic.  Fuck - even the shooter today isn’t demonic.  That’s just a way to dehumanize groups of people and does nothing to help except maybe make you feel like you have a moral high ground.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9ay4fj,conservative
I don't follow. Are you talking revolution? ,Cetingira,e9b5568,conservative
"Or they’ll look at your license plate and tell you to go back to where you came from. 
",skarface6,e9b1ser,conservative
"If any of those puppets actually had one concrete example of Tucker being racist or hateful I’d eat my hat.  These are political plants, just doing what their puppet master commands.",booblitchutz,e9azw5u,conservative
Don't forget he is also against illegal immigration.,FortunateHominid,e9b5gri,conservative
I like that term “commute listen”. I have a common trip I make that’s about 45 minutes long and podcasts make it extremely bearable. ,skarface6,e9b1wqh,conservative
"I'll check that out, thanks for the reply",Nevaknosbest,e9awc0w,conservative
damn. That's depressing. I suppose a twitter ban will have to suffice for a guy who's not only been threatened online but had actual people come to his house and tell their supporters exactly where his family lives. So messed up,greatatdrinking,e9akl52,conservative
"It will get worse, before it gets better or even worse. We will wake up and comport ourselves better online, or we will devolve into a riotious mass at every perceived injustice or sleight.

Buckle up, we're going for a ride.",unibuckeye,e9aakhi,conservative
"I agree and I’ve gotten into some conversations about a range of topics and there is no end point to the conversation for (let’s say someone aligns with the left). I’ve admitted here and there this might be wrong and then I ask if they can at least give some credit to [blank] and they won’t budge. It’s not normal for someone to think they are right about EVERYTHING and you have to agree with them. That’s not how the world works, we learn from each other and gain knowledge that we might not have had. 

But you’re right it is always just a screaming match which ends in nothing. ",StockSkys,e9amkf5,conservative
"Like three times

between Caesar's campaign in Gaul and the official end of the republic and rise of the Empire there were **THREE** full scale civil wars and a handful of lesser revolts and skirmishes. In less than 20 years!

Rome was insane man. Look at [this](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Roman_civil_wars_and_revolts). And that's **just the civil wars**. Not even counting expansionist wars in Gaul and Germania, Punic Wars, Mithridatic Wars, etc... 

They say America has been at war for the majority of existence, but *at least we* try to focus on like one war at a time. Rome would overlap like 13 at once. ",MattThePossum,e9aif3c,conservative
"> It's not normal for someone to think they are right about EVERYTHING

Yeah, this is why I have such a hard time with liberals. It's either 100% their way on every topic or you're whatever the favorite ""-ist"" insult is that day.

I align with the left on *many* social issues but because I don't like taxes and I have a strict textual interpretation of the Constitution, I am an enemy and cannot be reasoned with. Apparently. 

It's sad but at least I can sleep with a clear conscience because I have *real* principles and not a militarized view of how to respond to people that disagree with me. And I am content with that.",mnslice,e9asvmx,conservative
Straight facts. Good to know not alone on this. ,StockSkys,e9attwc,conservative
I'm hesitant to believe this article- I can't find a single article from any other source about this. Is there anyone else who can confirm?  ,Maswasnos,e9cwgo7,conservative
No she won't. They will weekend at Bernie's her ass until 2020,iwasthebeaver,e9cvh05,conservative
"I wanna see multiple news outlets reporting this first.

Damn though having to deal with colon and pancreatic cancer. I may not like her judicial philosophy, but she’s a hell of a tough woman. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9cvti9,conservative
Looks like her cancer came back on top of the broken ribs. Thats real fucking rough. Hope she lives a few years in peace. ,Dank_Cartographer,e9cvj85,conservative
How credible is this source? I've never heard of it before and it seems strange they would have this before anyone else.,j3utton,e9cy6xt,conservative
Seems very likely that this is a fake article ,jac5,e9cydi4,conservative
"If she does retire, I have a friend who is supposed to do a SCOTUS clerkship under her in 2019 I hope that he can get reassigned or something so he doesn't miss out on that opportunity.",mbarnar,e9cvrzy,conservative
"Drudge hasn't picked anything up and I'm not finding any other articles either.
The OP article, supposedly published today, doesn't even mention her falling and cracking 3 ribs yesterday.
So far this isn't passing the smell test.",MooMooCudChew,e9cxgw6,conservative
Google search produced this one same article and nothing to corroborate it. I’m very doubtful this is true. ,justhere2havefun,e9d12ft,conservative
Agreed. ,molon-labe7,e9cvmi7,conservative
"> Look For Democrats To Blow Their Meager Success By Being Jerks

I'm confused; was there any other way that they ~~would~~ could ~~be programed to~~ react?",Jizzlobber42,e9b1m7t,conservative
"The article mentions the actual probable cause toward the bottom: her race is not yet called. It was also in California so during the primetime coverage it wouldn't really be on the radar to talk about. At least one first for a Republican woman -- Marsha Blackburn -- was mentioned in the reporting last night, probably others I just didn't take note.",RobAtticus,e99c20u,conservative
Treveor Noah mentioned it on the Daily Show.,Iamthesmartest,e99varu,conservative
Also Asians are low on the oppression pyramid.,joozian_,e98zr6o,conservative
Same with Kristi Noem being the first woman governor in South Dakota.,zeldaisaprude,e98x1vg,conservative
"Cool, and I don't give a shit what ethnicity she is either. That's how it should be. ",TankerD18,e99agol,conservative
"Given the amount of Asians that are socially conservative, often descendants of refugees from communist countries, it boggles my mind that so many of them vote blue in California.
",Tomcat_AL200,e993ibo,conservative
But they can't shut up about the new Muslim congresspeople. ,Gam3rGurl13,e9908sj,conservative
"Slowly but surely the left is pushing Asians to the right. Asians don’t  identify as victims of oppression, they value education, value the opportunity of capitalism, and are pretty conservative in the traditional sense (responsibility to the family). ",hungryhungryhadrian,e996750,conservative
"Tons of media attention gushing about the number of women, gays, Muslims, racial minorities, etc. running and/or winning this cycle but they never talk about the Republican ones. It's uncanny . . . and it's pretty obvious if you know to look for it.",Martbell,e99176v,conservative
Shame we couldn't get the first African-American senator in Michigan too,Gunsofglory,e99grc3,conservative
"Can anyone find one major publication (NY Times, WA Post, MSNBC, CNN, The Intercept, etc), that highlights the fact Young Kim is the first Korean-American women to win a seat on Congress. I've given my local stations gruff over it, like KXLY 4 News, as they covered the first gay governor in Colorado, the two muslim women winning in Michigan & Minnesota, Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez in New York, and lesbian Native American Sharice Davids for winning in Kansas...but completely left out Young Kim. Talk about bias. All because she's Republican.

i've searched Google, Facebook, Local News, etc. I mean, she's mentioned. And there are articles from a few days ago saying she hopes she wins.

But nothing like what you see for the aforementioned people (Cortez, Davids, Tlaib, Omar, Polis, etc).

I feel like if you're going to be the party (Democrats) that champions diversity, support for women, and identity politics...they should've given Young Kim similar praise, despite being Republican. Maybe even more so.",nousemercenary,e99g88f,conservative
Asians aren’t good for the left agendas. They’re a minority that doesn’t rely on government welfare,Stevienines,e99d0uc,conservative
"diversity is cool but democrats don't understand that the person most fit for the job should get the job. race and gender shouldn't matter. i would take a non-diverse group that is great at what they do over a diverse group that is mediocre any day, because it shouldn't matter",motivate_cs,e99f4yo,conservative
She won? ,MDMCrab,e99fcrx,conservative
"Here’s what bothers me: the Left screams about diversity and equality. But that diversity and equality only counts when the person is a Democrat. 

A black/female/gay republican is worthless to them and laughed off as a gimmick. They treat these groups as if they are ignorant. These groups will wake up and violently leave the Left one day. ",_TheConsumer_,e99vp8u,conservative
"Republican’s are slowly claiming Asians in the racial politics draft. One of these days the Democrats are gonna realize and start decrying them as being racist monsters, just wait. ",ImportantWords,e99ang9,conservative
Honestly.  Are we surprised? ,SugarDaddyVA,e99eecp,conservative
Liberals hate Asians too. They are way too intelligent for them. They need mob mentality and yes people.,sioux_pilot,e99h4gc,conservative
Also skipping over the first female fighter pilot.  Too busy being sad about a taliban supporting witch lost.,kvhdutch,e99f01h,conservative
"They also ignored the following people for the same reason:

1. The first African American woman to be the National Security Advisor and Secretary of State

2. The first African American chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff

3. The first African Americans to serve in Congress

4. The first Hispanic American to become a full fledged member of Congress

and so much more.

This is why I want Condoleezza Rice to become president as not only the first woman but also the first African American woman to be President.",sangjmoon,e99ma15,conservative
they also ignored the white male democrat defeating the black female republican. cant recall which state. But CNN and company tend to ignore their own racism and bias 'for the party',proteios1,e99fuil,conservative
Oh yeah it’s so true. I watched about three different liberal live-streams last night at all they could do was suck their own dicks for having such a diverse group of senators and HOR’s get elected. Making it seem like they were entirely elected due to their culture and gender rather than policy. ,Jabronies96,e99c7ou,conservative
"I'm laughing here in Georgia how they say abrams is refusing to concede until absentee ballots are counted from gwinnett county, which is heavily Asian. 

It's like they dont get it, being a minority doesn't mean they are gonna just automatically vote for left wing idiots.  Hell they lost a lot of Hispanic votes this time around as well. ",chugonthis,e99qb1r,conservative
Doesn't fit the narrative of the propaganda press.,Lepew1,e9aiug0,conservative
Sounds about right. ,Upasaka-paul,e99f170,conservative
A picture of Young was posted on r/pics.  I made a very bengin comment.  This guy/girl is a lost cause. https://imgur.com/a/Aqm82sQ,ChasedByHorses,e9a07cu,conservative
"It took me about two minutes on google to find dozens of stories across every broadcaster mentioning her as one of the woman poised to make history. 

CNN was on at a bar we went to last night and was covering the South Dakota and Iowa female wins as well. ",anon_in_colorado,e99ga5p,conservative
Some would say they are on top of the oppression pyramid!,guitmusic12,e991r3b,conservative
"I mean, that's the reason why affirmative action apparently isn't racist.",unityrootts,e997mok,conservative
I think the Left actually hates Asians because they've managed to overcome terrible oppression in this country via hard work and family values.,FelixFuckfurter,e994ozu,conservative
"Good. We've never wanted or needed their ""help.""",the_mad_mad_cow,e99cm6a,conservative
Noem has been one of the kindest most genuine leaders in South Dakota for years now. We love her. So pleased to see her become governor.,JRS0147,e9a0osd,conservative
And Iowa’s first female governor ,Applesauce_Police,e99aaz4,conservative
Isn’t that the truth! When will it stop being a milestone and just this person is qualified and deserves the position? ,Tekshow,e99apx2,conservative
"Damn, preach! I saw a headline over at CNN saying that Alexandria Cortez is the youngest female whatever to be elected and that was my first thought.

Like, who gives a shit what she is. Is she qualified?That's the only thing that should matter",Archaengel,e9a0t94,conservative
"i think the way my asian immigrant father in law votes encapsulates the paradox of many asian voters. He votes straight D for candidates yet votes for every tax cut and against any tax increase.

reason being: R’s have done a TERRRRRRRRRRRIBLE job connecting with immigrants and promoting assimilation to immigrants. My father in law still believes in the “American Dream” and its path built by free market principles and social conservatism. But the only party doing any real outreach to immigrants in any meaningful way are the D’s. 

as an english speaking person with access to endless options of being informed, it’s hard for us to understand why they would vote that way, but the fact is, most immigrants have very few sources of media that informs them of current events and often is simply news or perspectives that is copied from major newspaper sources. 

there is no “fox news” no conservative talk radio, no right leaning blogs, no alternative resources other than their limited sources that just mimic MSM. 

so voters like my father in law subscribe to conservative both fiscal and social views, but if no one is there to inform or guide them, and if no one is reaching out to them or providing a counter point, why wouldn’t they vote for the individual that actually makes an effort to connect with them? ",booyah777,e99he4s,conservative
They vote blue because those are the ones that want to take in refugees today instead of sending troops to the border or instituting travel bans. To show people today the kindness they were shown before,DisposablePanda,e99aq2g,conservative
Asians populate the colleges and universities.,LibertarianP,e9a1w1y,conservative
What irks me about this is Muslim isn’t a race. Literally anyone can be Muslim but they act like this is some beacon of progression.,trelium06,e99az5a,conservative
One of them literally married her biological brother. I imagine if they were republican and Christian they would be endlessly mocked. ,spongish,e99h5ln,conservative
"As an Asian i can tell you most asians are completely Republican especially socially conservative.

The biggest thing holding back the Republican's is the white supremacist alt-right attachers whom i've tried to explain to libtards that Trump supporters are NOTHING AT ALL like alt-righters. Im pretty sure the MSM have convinced the public that Republican = Alt-right.",rook2pawn,e99gqni,conservative
"I'm honestly sick of it all.  I dont care if they are a cys white male, gay transgender women, albino Latin muslim amputee, can we just have people be voted for their polices.  What they stand/ vote for and not their ""identity""",callthereaper64,e99kl76,conservative
You've clearly never been to a major city with a significant Asian population.,DEFCON_TWO,e9ai4pj,conservative
"It would be best to think of race or gender as one of many selling points and not THE selling point. Whatever the position (senator, rep, etc) its fairly reasonable that the person on the ballot has some qualifications for the position and isn't there just because of some racial or gender quality.",touch0ph,e99fmhi,conservative
77% of Asians voted for the Dems in this election compared to 50% in 2014. ,Trevor_awesome,e99ey1g,conservative
Harvard already has. Just recounting what Harvard has done towards Asians just repulses me i cannot even type it out.,rook2pawn,e99gtrw,conservative
"From my view, the Jedi are evil!",thispenismine,e99h1a6,conservative
Glitch in the matrix ,duckfallasbdn,e9970or,conservative
"Overcome? We're still struggling. We just don't complain as much. Asians have to work harder to get in college. Despite this, Asians in the tech industry are paid lower than white, blacks or Latinos. There's statistics that prove it but you never hear about it because we are underrepresented and stay silent because we are grateful for the opportunities we have. 

Of course this is for first gen Asians. Our children.
, statistically speaking end up being equal to an average white in academics since we assimilate so well 😂 ",Bulok,e99fg1j,conservative
"I know, I was frustrated not seeing this one on the front page. First Korean American and conservative? Not newsworthy or progressive compared to a Democrat who doesnt understand simple fundamentals about politics or electing people with a history of abusive thoughts and behavior. ",PM__ME__CUTE__ASIANS,e998eiz,conservative
Wow a minority group not claiming “white privilege” as a reason for failures... IMPOSSIBLE!,l3ryce,e99eiyn,conservative
Bingo ,GlenGanges,e997ppt,conservative
and they do it without weaponizing the government ,SpineEater,e99fi3o,conservative
Maine too.,200lbRockLobster,e99gg6i,conservative
Reynolds was an incumbent after Branstad went to be ambassador to China. But she is Iowa's first *elected* female governor. ,LegionBaby,e9aykfh,conservative
Probably when humans are replaced by robots. ,BatterseaPS,e99h6cy,conservative
"I live in the Bay Area. In my precinct, it's probably 1/3 white, the rest mostly Asian. I was one of 7 people to vote for Trump. I know my wife was the another.

The Republicans can't reach out because there are so few of us, we don't exist.  My wife can't even vocalize it at work because she is in danger of getting ostricized or eventually fired for supporting evil (one guy at work admitted he voted Trump and a month later her boss asked her is she felt he needed to be let go because people were uncomfortable with his presence).

My point is Asians come to California, and mostly there is no Republican Party to reach out. The GOP is finished here. They even redistricted the state so they have half the congressmen they had 20 years ago.


",SickofInternetProgs,e9a1tip,conservative
"I see a similar thing with my Chinese in-laws, though they're both from countries that no longer exist due to progressives... It's a good chicken or the egg discussion, did Republicans not reach out to them because they voted Democrat and didn't think they would be receptive or did they just vote Democrat because they landed in California?
I agree that outreach is a good solution, and a good point to hinge on is affirmative action being so detrimental to Asian American students, and that's a linchpin of the Democrat platform.",Tomcat_AL200,e99qaf8,conservative
"> and if no one is reaching out to them or providing a counter point, why wouldn’t they vote for the individual that actually makes an effort to connect with them?

Absolutely. I think affirmative action might be one of the biggest winning issues for republicans, but my parents didn't even know about it until I applied for college. ",Robo1p,e9a41z1,conservative
"> To show people today the kindness they were shown before

No kindness was shown to the Asian community. There was the Chinese exclusion act, internment of Japanese Americans, and then police abandoned K-town during the LA riots. They succeeded because these conditions were *still* better than in the old world.

More relevantly, it must be interesting to have relatives with PHDs on waitlist for greencards while people located close to the border get to skip the rules altogether. This is the #1 complaint the Asians I know have with the Democrats in California.",Rytho,e99fcwx,conservative
"lol, no. Legal immigrants typically despise illegal ones.",regollyek,e9affov,conservative
"that's complete and utter b*******, it was California Democrats that were voting against legislation that would allow for refugees from an ally that fought to The Bitter End, South Vietnam, like my mother-in-law, to come here. ",Tomcat_AL200,e99qcd5,conservative
"""refugees""

Just because someone claims asylum doesn't mean they deserve it. They're mostly economic migrants.

But yes, it is interesting that the US doesn't pay attention to true refugees and people in danger, like religious minorities in muslim countries...",noiwontsharemyfries,e99jj55,conservative
"> To show people today the kindness they were shown before

What 'kindness'? Most Asians come here because of skill based visas. There's no kindness there, just an economic win-win (for companies and the immigrants, not so much American citizens but I'm a hypocrite in this regard, as that's how I got in).",Robo1p,e9a44a7,conservative
"The same thing happened with JFK being the first president who is Catholic.

It will happen when there is a first openly atheist, or Buddhist etc wins.

If anything it means a change in the demographics of congress/the country.

I bet these people have a large Muslim population that voted for them.

It's cool to see one of your in the big show.",cabritar,e99vo1t,conservative
"It is because they're openly anti American. They consider more and more elected officials being known to be proudly anti American and still getting elected to be progress.

Oh look the tankies are here. ",ConsistentlyRight,e99b7w2,conservative
"The hypocrisy is unbearable. Did they praise Justin Amash when he first won MI's 3rd district? He's a first generation Arab American. But he's Republican, and Christian to boot so he fails the diversity lottery. ",RightMillennial,e99vpe9,conservative
"What a rabbit hole...

https://pjmedia.com/davidsteinberg/address-records-show-rep-ilhan-omar-d-mn-still-lived-with-her-first-husband-throughout-her-second-marriage/",Hirudin,e99kiqo,conservative
Source??,crash94,e99jxib,conservative
"> As an Asian i can tell you most asians are completely Republican especially socially conservative.

Can you back this up? Asians vote predominately Democratic.",-Shank-,e99lhv2,conservative
"I worked the primary election. A Vietnamese gentleman came in to vote. When we asked him what language he wanted his ""I voted"" sticker in, his response was, ""English! This is America, isn't it?""

It was beautiful watching my fellow poll workers (hard core leftists, each one) die a little inside. 

EDIT: did I say something wrong? I'd think we got brigaded except no one else seems to be getting downvoted, which leads me to believe you guys have a problem with something I said... ",d_grizzle,e99njz0,conservative
"> Republican's is the white supremacist alt-right attachers whom i've tried to explain to libtards that Trump supporters are NOTHING AT ALL like alt-righters

This is true. 

There is actually a huge coalition of white supremacist who voted for Hilary Clinton.

Edit: You can downvote til you're blue in the face but you can't ignore this problem.

If you are a white supremacist, nazi/enthic cleansing type you are not voting for liberals.

We are losing the suburbs because of it. 

Rural is still hanging on but now the big cities and suburbs are gone.",cabritar,e99mbtm,conservative
I said SLOWLY damn. ,ImportantWords,e99f011,conservative
Well then you are lost!,tk1712,e99hev5,conservative
r/prequelmemes is leaking,tk1712,e99hel5,conservative
[deleted],,e99ezoe,conservative
The pay is likely due to H1B's.  Man is there ever a system that needs to be reformed.,weeglos,e99hx0u,conservative
"I think most on the right recognize that Asians have it rough.  Hopefully, the new conservative supreme court will outlaw affirmative action soon.  I certainly hope so",accountingqqq,e99m793,conservative
"I was born in PA, first gen Korean in an all white town. We were discriminated against in so many ways, and i have been all my life. I have never understood the value of screaming white privilege or agreeing with the complainers. There is only do.",rook2pawn,e99gkf8,conservative
IMPOSSIBRU\*,JackFucington,e99yj3h,conservative
How can one woman govern so many states? Amazing! ,ripecookies1,e99gqpz,conservative
Or South Vietnamese that got evacuated from rooftops in Saigon with bullet holes in them.,Tomcat_AL200,e99qefd,conservative
I hate how true this rings,trelium06,e99dg77,conservative
"Get ready for Sharia.

Edit: [Deny it if you want.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ThJdMXbxChs) That just means you'll be caught off guard.",noiwontsharemyfries,e99jh3l,conservative
That’s our new congressperson!,SonOfSite,e99pn9j,conservative
"https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ilhan_Omar#Personal_life

In 2002 Omar became engaged to marry Ahmed Hirsi (né Ahmed Aden). They applied for a marriage license, but the application was not finalized. The pair had two children together before separating in 2008. **In 2009, Omar married her biological brother Ahmed Nur Said Elmi, a British citizen. In 2011, she and Elmi had a faith-based divorce,[38] and in 2017 the two were legally divorced.[39] In 2011, she reconciled with Hirsi, and they were married in a traditional ceremony, despite her still being legally married to Ahmed under state law.[18]** They had a third child in 2012, and in 2018 they were legally married.[40] Omar, Hirsi, and their three children live in the Cedar-Riverside neighborhood of Minneapolis.[15]
",spongish,e99k1q9,conservative
Right... Lmao.,jake456271,e99glqb,conservative
Its been more of a fissure for a while now,samurguy990,e99lnzb,conservative
Default back to Orange man Bad subroutine,dtlv5813,e9a9ila,conservative
H1B’s?,samurguy990,e99lpse,conservative
"You. I like you.

I’m sorry your experience has been shitty in that regard, but I’m glad you have such a good outlook. Perspective and attitude change everything. Best of luck to you pal.",tk1712,e99hh5w,conservative
"Shut up, Dad",tk1712,e99hdsg,conservative
"Separation of church and state friends.

We need to not set the president that religion can shape laws and we will be fine.",cabritar,e99vqc6,conservative
They changed it on wikipedia since you posted it.,Mewster1818,e9an6wu,conservative
Jesus wow she literally married her brother ,crash94,e99palm,conservative
"Foreign worker visas that are nominally supposed to be importing top talent from overseas to work at US companies, but in effect are suppressing wage growth in high tech fields by importing labor that works cheaper than equivalent US workers will.",weeglos,e99nue0,conservative
"Good.

I have no problem with press asking tough questions.   Hell, I applaud it.  This is something else.  A journalist's job is to REPORT the news, not CREATE the news with their behavior.
",Arm-the-homeless,e99iqr5,conservative
“Dear Diary “,AcornToOak,e99ig0x,conservative
"Should have been done a long time ago. He isnt a journalist, he is a proganda mouth piece. ",iwasthebeaver,e99hu52,conservative
“I’m Jim Acosta. I don’t know if you know this but...I’m kind of a big deal. “,AcornToOak,e99jld5,conservative
He was acting like a total child in front of his colleagues. He appears to be extremely entitled to his time in the spotlight. I can't believe others in the press didn't tell him to sit the fuck down and let someone else speak. This is not how adults should behave especially in a professional environment. ,pk3maross,e99k7dy,conservative
"*Takes a peek over at /r/politics, shakes head and downs a glass of whiskey*",SinisterPaige,e99ii5x,conservative
"This is amazing.  That man was a disgrace to his profession and it should have been done 2 years ago.

I'm literally fucking cheering over here",Mormonster,e99i03g,conservative
"> ""Only [the mainstream media] would attack the President for not supporting a free press in the midst of him taking 68 questions from 35 different reporters over the course of 1.5 hours including several from the reporter in question.""

Solid Gold",d_42,e99tumd,conservative
"Just the other day I posted a question asking why this hasn’t fucking happened yet. I was downvoted to hell and back. 

I’m glad. No revoke it permanently!",SexAddictRecovery,e99j51u,conservative
" His name was *Very* Fake News.
",zroxx2,e99ibtu,conservative
"There would be less controversy about this if the WH used a better reason, like him not respecting the WH  (ie the intern) repeatedly signaling his turn was over. Making it about laying his hand on the intern makes it a lot more subjective about who's right or wrong.",Demplition,e9af5yv,conservative
Finally!,coffeewallet22,e99huyi,conservative
"Suspending one problematic reporter =/= the same thing as restricting free press.


CNN has become a tabloid, and Acosta acts like a TMZ reporter. You wouldn't let someone from Weekly World News in there to ask about UFOs and weird conspiracies. And Acosta is basically no different.


MSNBC is the original and most openly left-biased news channel out there. But at least their reporters are usually actually acting like reporters. I can respect a press organization with views opposite mine but that still acts like a press organization.


At this point, CNN is just spouting tabloid, clickbait nonsense. ",PM_ME_LIBERTARIANISM,e99o1t7,conservative
"Finally.  His conduct was appalling and he acted like that because he believed he could get away with it.  You establish this narrative that the White House is against freedom of the press, then act like a total asshole so if they ever react to your total assholishness, you can turn yourself into a martyr, when really it's just a reaction to you being a pompous asshole.",soracrowe,e99nueb,conservative
"The only reason he was allowed to keep his pass for so long, is because he made a damned fool of himself on a daily basis. He was kept around to serve as the court jester essentially. He definitely crossed the line this time, though. Glad the rat is gone. ",GuitarWizard90,e99jf8f,conservative
LMAOOOOO BYE BYE JIMOTHY,aburks41,e99i194,conservative
"And nothing of value was lost...
",CCPCanuck,e99isxj,conservative
"Leftist Twitter - ""REEEEEEEE FREEDOM OF THE PRESS!!""

CNN can send a different 'journalist'. I'm sure the White House will give him/her/ze/fe/fi/fo/fum a press pass.",Moonthrower,e99mm01,conservative
It is about time....  the press needs to be respectful and have some decorum or they should be banned. ,ozric101,e99hzhc,conservative
r/news is having a meltdown. Raging and calling anyone that disagrees with them a troll. It's hilarious how much they defend this man.,valmeister,e99pov2,conservative
"Glad he's out.  Disappointed that they tried spinning this into him shoving a woman (the video doesn't show that)  rather than the truth: he spent a few years acting like an entitled, spoiled child and was finally treated as such.",cathbadh,e99u83d,conservative
This was his plan all along.  Now he can play the martyr/victim card.,rustyshakelford,e99n7wz,conservative
Excellent news,tja_1478,e99iadj,conservative
This is all much better than the new season of House of Cards.,Doran902,e99ioeu,conservative
"Loving the cucks in /r/[redacted] cucking out over this.  

Orangemanbad.exe is being looped into overdrive.",silvertongue93,e99lk7b,conservative
"""I'm Jim Acosta. Look at me! Look at me!""",erikthereddest,e99v3yg,conservative
Oh shit ,Snowmittromney,e99iujq,conservative
"TIL that NJ has a ""Rapid Response"" protest protocol for these kinds of stuff.  Am I the only one that thinks this is worrisome?  There are protests planned for tomorrow all over the state.",Big_Test_Icicle,e99udvj,conservative
Progressive guy here...  CNN is cancer and Jim was a dick.,Dudehitscar,e99yhn3,conservative
The Onion is a more credible news source than CNN.  Good riddance to this twat.,Scrotom,e99xg49,conservative
"Apparently [Abilio Acosta](https://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jim_Acosta) thinks decorum applies to other people, not him.",Lepew1,e9aj4l8,conservative
"Awesome, he went way too far several times. What a disgrace he has been.",Kite23,e99xz4b,conservative
Oh boy... this is gonna rustle some jimmies...,I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e99pis9,conservative
"Acosta could probably fix this easily by apologizing to the intern who was just doing her job, and to the President and his press team for being an ass and holding the mic after his turn.  But he won't, because he is a left-wing hack.  I don't feel bad for him at all.",TBSportsFan1254,e9b0p6g,conservative
Nice!  About time.  ,DevonWeeks,e99vdx2,conservative
"Good, he should be suspended. He hit her arm when she was trying to take the mic back from him, as she had a right to. ",rizenphoenix13,e99l3i3,conservative
About frickin' time.,trustymutsi,e9afbih,conservative
His actions deserved a quick response. He brought it on himself. I felt so bad for that girl.,FuriousChef,e9a7ino,conservative
The [Video](https://twitter.com/NBCNews/status/1060338258402365440) evidence speaks for itself. He brutally hurt her and was very rude to the President. I wonder if all the liberal feminists will have something to say about that? NO. Double standard much. ,QuiteLife,e99tzou,conservative
"Also, they should be tough on every president, not merely the ones with an R after their name. ",skarface6,e99mc21,conservative
"If anyone deserves this, it’s Jim Acosta.",derrima,e99sxwn,conservative
The female intern was accosted by Acosta.,nano8150,e9a16ga,conservative
"He's kind of a nutjob.

I legitimately think he's got a few screws loose. I look at this guy and I'm not seeing the behavior of a normal adult man.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99onhk,conservative
It's hilarious to see the twats in news and politics complain that about this. He didn't physically assault her but he did directly ignore and disrespect the orders of the President of the United States then proceeded to push the interns arm away when she's clearly trying to do her job. I'm glad the blowhard won't be bloviating during question time anymore. ,SirRollsaSpliff,e99rk6w,conservative
[removed],,e99ub3f,conservative
[removed],,e99jgep,conservative
"“Look at me, I’m Jim Acosta.”",skarface6,e99midp,conservative
"""Jim Acosta loves him some Jim Acosta.""",FortunateHominid,e9b5n51,conservative
They can’t. They might invite the ire of their fellow travelers. ,skarface6,e99mh15,conservative
I can't believe they're actually defending and supporting him after this. Absolute nonsense.,danjvelker,e9bu0fn,conservative
"Can you imagine if a Fox reporter had ever acted towards Obama the way Acosta does? Like even once?

Every single one of those hypocritical retards would’ve cheered that reporter’s removal. ",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e99o47d,conservative
"I won't venture in there anymore. Let me guess, Acosta is the victim here?",BrockLee76,e99isn4,conservative
lemme guess...they are comparing it with the actions of hitler and putin? ,tifuforreal,e99ppns,conservative
How do I stop seeing r/ politics in r/all,Aaron1570,e99r3yw,conservative
Tried to engage in conversations with regards to this in that the piece of shit sub and immediately get attacked. Never again. Such childish melodramatic people.,rgm89,e99nekj,conservative
Sounds like fascism to me. /s,Mewster1818,e9axqsm,conservative
Trump can ban anyone he wants from press briefings.,superdude411,e99pkzc,conservative
[removed],,e99vdux,conservative
"Yeah, I hope people start sending messages to the admins and making some noise. Those subs need their moderators purged.",Richandler,e99tyjt,conservative
He intentionally made an unwanted touching on her.  That’s battery ,ravenswin,e9ayqk4,conservative
Too bad he's on tape pushing away a white house intern physically.,cornshelltortilla,e99np3m,conservative
How is the season without Spacey? ,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99ou3h,conservative
"When have any of their rallies mattered whatsoever? The American people just spoke, and a large number of them just said that the media and the crazy mob that they inspired are out of touch with reality.",r777m,e99w34p,conservative
"Something we can agree on. I dislike MSNBC, but I don’t feel they are full of crap like CNN. Just they are on the opposite side but hey there’s a market for it and different opinions is good. CNN is a different monster.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9agsgj,conservative
"I take shits more ""brutal"" than that. Stand behind his ban for other more legitimate reasons, not for that sensationalized BS.",senkaichi,e99uee8,conservative
">He brutally hurt her

He did not. Don't sensationalize this into something it isn't. He barely touched her. So disappoting to see the WH posting an info wars edited video too and spinning this into ""he assaulted her"". He's a whiny, disrespectful jerk. They should have banned him for that, especially after what he did during Trump's meeting with North Korea. Not some made up bull.

Edit: a word",Dunkeliness,e9a19gj,conservative
"Yep, if this guy was a Rep and did this kinda crap with Obama he woulda been gone day one. I haven’t followed much of what he has asked, but I’m fairly certain that if he has asked pertinent tough questions, he hasn’t asked those questions to get an answer, but to stir up the pot. ",RKfan,e99pj3e,conservative
"He wants this.  He wants to play the martyr.  Been pushing the envelope for some time, hoping for this.  Thinks he’s immortalizing himself...",Rogdaddy,e99t6f5,conservative
"but this sub doesn’t hide its conservative lean, CNN pretends to be objective.",rainyforest,e99ukmh,conservative
It's about respecting the Office of the President. You can disagree and still show respect.  Conservative outlets never did this to President Hussein Obama. ,nano8150,e99uul8,conservative
"The ""right of the press"" is not talking about journalists. It's a right of the people to publish/print whatever they want without the government stopping them. Journalists employ this right, as do countless other groups.",ultimis,e99nd1l,conservative
"Link me to a recent journalistic piece published by Jim Acosta. Twitter not allowed. Also getting a white house press pass is a priviledge, not a right. He can say whatever he wants, but when you act like a spoiled brat you shouldnt expect to be able to keep the priviledge of a white house press pass. ",iwasthebeaver,e99jndx,conservative
"Trump hasn't banned CNN. If CNN wants to send over a reporter who doesn't act like an obnoxious assclown, I'm sure they'll be let in. Being a member of the press doesn't absolve a person from the responsibility to act professionally. ",PhilosoGuido,e99n9wh,conservative
"How is that suppression of the free press?  He's still free to report whatever he pleases.  

",Tea_is_unAmerican,e99k0gb,conservative
"Don't be obtuse. CNN can send another reporter who possesses a sense of decorum. Now I'm not sure if they have anyone like that currently on staff, but the network isn't banned. Just Jimmy the kid.",Armageddon_It,e99jxlu,conservative
"Freedom of speech, not freedom from consequences. ",sendintheshermans,e99k29u,conservative
He karate chopped a woman lol,ALuckyManNamedTrent,e99jhvx,conservative
"""That's ""J"" as in ""Jim Acosta,"" ""I"" as in ""I bet you wish you were Jim Acosta,"" ""M"" as in ""Mom, hurry up and get over here, Jim Acosta is on TV,"" space...""",EdgeBeard_NeckLord,e9agvy1,conservative
*Yelling Intensifies*,Big_Test_Icicle,e99uh2t,conservative
"A reporter from The Daily Caller did something much more minor during the Obama admin, and the media's reaction was...predictable - https://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2012/06/15/155117900/neil-munro-of-daily-caller-interrupts-president-during-rose-garden-address ",tifuforreal,e99pwvv,conservative
"I don't think Acosta ""assaulted"" the girl.  He was certainly acting immature and the microphone did not belong to him.

Personally i think Acosta should have been banned after the NK episode but so it goes.",Cinnadillo,e99oyc1,conservative
"Trump went full dictator.

I'm not kidding, that was one of the comments. ",SinisterPaige,e99jwij,conservative
"Yup.  He refused to give the WH's property back, physically stopped a woman from attempting to get said property, and now he is a hero of the left.

It is an utter embarrassment that they put these leftist wackjobs on such a high pedestal.  

Acosta's problem was he always wanted to create news instead of report it",Mormonster,e99j4fq,conservative
"The main thread on /r/news is saying he didn’t touch her- she manipulated him into hitting her with her forceful actions. Really? Pick one.

I’m not saying that he meant to hit her or that it caused harm, but the dude clearly hit her in the video. I’ve never seen such blatant blindness ",hephaestus1219,e99uas9,conservative
"If Stalin, Hitler, Nero and the Devil had a love child, the left would rate Trump as much more evil.",SinisterPaige,e99pygx,conservative
"Look to the right hand side of your screen. Under the bold **all**, there should be a filter box to put in any subreddit you don't want to see. My life has been a breeze after I threw in 70+ spam subs.",r-magnificient,e9a05mf,conservative
"Just don't click on it. But I can't help, it's like a drug.",SinisterPaige,e99rjm0,conservative
RES feature ,ravenswin,e9ayahy,conservative
The white house doesn't have to give press briefings at all if it doesn't want to. But it's hand in hand with their positive rights view of the world. ,Richandler,e99trkk,conservative
"Yeah, you are allowed to use a microphone to address a head of state. You ask your question. Your turn is over and you give back the microphone. You **do not cling to someone else's property like a petulant child and start batting at staffers to try and keep control of a microphone that's not even yours.** I've seen elementary school children with better comportment. If you can't follow the rules, you're out. If you **dare raise your hand to someone doing their job** while you are a guest of the President of the United States you should be summarily thrown out on your ass.

Someone got **way** too full of this left-wing ""rules for thee but not for me"" attitude of squatters, rioters, and protesters having their way with other people's property, persons, and space because they think they are on ""the right side of history.""

Jim Acostanintern can go eat his hat.",kaioto,e9a5gu6,conservative
I don't care that he brushed some intern's arm. I care that he's a shameless propagandist and an enemy of the people. ,FMERCURY,e99z852,conservative
Yea that is the big part of it,Enzo_SAWFT,e99q7nh,conservative
The show's been trash since season 3. First two season were incredible and then they started focusing on Claire - who is about as interesting as a block of wood (read as Chris Cuomoesque) - and all the other weird bullshit. ,SirRollsaSpliff,e99ruyt,conservative
"Some might call it.......*Space-less*.

I'll see myself out....",unibuckeye,e99s2n0,conservative
"I could only watch the first episode. It was pretty terrible, but the show had been trending downward since season 2 ended",Marko_Ramius1,e99sqsq,conservative
Obama had a reporter removed and then spied on another one he didnt like,lipidsly,e9aatkn,conservative
"Literally nobody did this with Obama. The press gave him a free pass.

Not that I think that the press should be behaving like this with _any_ president.

But Obama didn’t have to deal with this. He just got FISA warrants on the reporters and... what? Blackmailed them? What is the point of getting a FISA warrant on a journalist unless you are going to attempt to coerce them?",HuluForCthulhu,e99qvug,conservative
"He asked the President about his comments about the caravan being an ""invasion"".",LZ_OtHaFA,e99qrp1,conservative
[removed],,e99wjx3,conservative
"Ironically unless you have a billion dollar enterprise publishing your blog, you get censored nowadays for having conservative views.",BuyChristianSlaves,e99t563,conservative
[removed],,e99k40b,conservative
He doesn’t follow the rules and talks over everyone and creates a huge scene. He should be banned.,the-divine-comedy,e99k50z,conservative
"> CNN can send another reporter who possesses a sense of decorum.

Do they have any?",FuriousChef,e9aeptz,conservative
"""...as in the empty space in my head...""",skarface6,e9am16o,conservative
"Wasn't there another incident where Obama had security remove a reporter while the other reporters were chanting ""Obama! Obama!""?",unibuckeye,e99rww9,conservative
"Agreed.  They're trying to make it sound like he manhandled her.  He raised his elbow a bit and didn't let go of his microphone just like any spoiled child with their favorite toy.  Hell he wasn't even as violent as that one campaign manager of Trump's who grabbed a female reporter and shoved her.

Acosta should have been booted long ago for his antics or even yesterday for his antics.  They just don't need to spin it as an assault.",cathbadh,e9ade59,conservative
What was the NK episode?,sjsyed,e9a44pr,conservative
"No one, other than random social media users I suppose, are claiming he assaulted her. Don't fall for the strawman.",Solypsys,e99rei9,conservative
"You’re right.  He battered her, not assaulted",ravenswin,e9ay823,conservative
">Trump went full dictator.

Wow, Acosta was tortured and imprisoned? That seems harsh",BrockLee76,e99k0fp,conservative
I must've missed the firing squads and labor camps ,Marko_Ramius1,e99sp1p,conservative
"Of course he's a hero, that is how you should act when confronting hitler /s",BrockLee76,e99j9y8,conservative
"Put his hands on her, too. 

**\#BelieveAllWomen**",skarface6,e99mep5,conservative
"It's not an assault or anything, but he did push her arm away, and was rude as fuck to her and to the other reporter",Ricardo1701,e9a4fgv,conservative
"You need rehab, my friend.",unibuckeye,e99rxw0,conservative
"Yep, stopped watching it after s3.  That season was tough to get through.",Big_Test_Icicle,e99ukvo,conservative
">Some might call it.......Space-less.

Probably less young boys being raped on set this season.... who am I kidding, it's pedowood, of course they're still raping young boys on the set.  Trump's new AG needs to open up a case on all those Hollywood pervs.  They need to pay for their crimes.",StraightNewt,e99sdmr,conservative
Obama did a lot of things that the media refused to cover.,tim_tebow_right_knee,e9ashm0,conservative
"No but they went into hysterics when a congressman yelled, “you lie!” The press can call Trump a liar to his face but at no time was it allowed with Obama.",8K12,e99thpo,conservative
ScAnDaL fREe PrEsIdEnCy,stanleythemanley44,e9admht,conservative
"> Literally nobody did this with Obama. The press gave him a free pass.

I thought Bill O'Reilly was pretty tough / borderline disrespectful during that sit down interview he had with Obama.",remybob78,e9b5c1k,conservative
These people care more about Trump's word choice than they cared about Obama's drone strikes.,the_mad_mad_cow,e9a4lko,conservative
Trump answered that one politely. It got heated when Acosta tried to push over Trump's intern when his turn was over.,BuyChristianSlaves,e99t2k5,conservative
"Those accusations came from fringe media outlets— InfoWars etc. They were not even close to being as front-and-center as the accusations we’re seeing these days. 

The larger media conglomerates never treated Obama is the same fashion as they are Trump. 

Although, Trump and Obama are separate situations, so you can’t compare directly. ",Yung_Money_Yung,e99yauo,conservative
"The government won't stop you from using a printing press, but you can't rent one, you can't buy one, you can't buy the tools to make one, you can't buy the materials to make the tools to make one, the banks won't let people pay you to buy the materials to make the tools to make a press, and the government protects all the monopolies that make it possible.",ElbowWhisper,e9a5vgw,conservative
Did he ban CNN or did he ban just Mr. Acosta? Why is he entitled to be there? CNN is just going to send someone else and they are able to report on behalf of CNN.,WebSliceGallery123,e99kk11,conservative
">Good to know you’re cool about limiting a free press though. You’d be right at home in china.

No, im all for removing a grandstanding narcisist who thinks he is more important than he is from the white house press pool. Je never asks sincere questions, but injects his own narrative into gotcha questions. Hes a hack and doesnt deserve to be there with the way he has acted over the last 3 years. 

Amd referencing china when you more than likely get all of your news from outlets whose owners have deep ties to that communist nation. 

",iwasthebeaver,e99kkpa,conservative
Oof,EdgeBeard_NeckLord,e9amjs7,conservative
"""June 12, 2018, Acosta interrupts a historic signing ceremony with North Korea, shouts questions at President""

That's a quote from this twitter thread below from Ryan Saavedra, who put together links/video of several times Acosta has been all about Acosta.  

https://twitter.com/RealSaavedra/status/1060346245753954304",Roez,e9ag9ly,conservative
"“Ms Sanders, in a statement posted in a Twitter thread, said the White House would ""never tolerate a reporter placing his hands on a young woman just trying to do her job"".”  http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-us-canada-46133268",TCesqGO,e99tri8,conservative
"> That seems harsh

Well, to be fair, not *that* harsh",IndefinitePresent,e99obre,conservative
My thoughts exactly.,SinisterPaige,e99k54o,conservative
"Way worse. Dug his own grave, they pushed him in, then they shot him. Terrible.",blaspheminCapn,e9acv98,conservative
"Are you honestly saying that unless a bad behavior is the *absolute worst possible form of that behavior* it does not count as bad? Because it seems like that is what you are arguing. 

",Tularemia,e99x1am,conservative
It's not your turn. They'll be around sometime Monday between the hours of 12 and 4.,SinisterPaige,e99srno,conservative
"Yes he did. Can you imagine John Roberts from FOX ever doing that during Obama's tenure?

The difference between a professional and a slimy diva",Mormonster,e99molk,conservative
I..I...I...can quit any time...really!!!,SinisterPaige,e99stc1,conservative
"Honestly, even though it doesn't have the inevitable collapse of the house of cards, the ending of season 2 is amongst the best I've ever seen. It would have been perfect either ending it there and leaving us to wonder if his sins catch up to him. I haven't watched the British three-part mini-series, but I imagine they actually wrapped shit up. ",SirRollsaSpliff,e99usoe,conservative
"Honestly, i would be 100% okay with the media if they treated every president like they treat trump. But of course they dont",lipidsly,e9bc0ze,conservative
"Did you even watch the video? He said pardon me ma'am to the intern and that was it, stop with that bullshit that he tried to push her over.",funk_man1,e99wtoi,conservative
[removed],,e99lmjx,conservative
Quote me the word assault because I'm not seeing it.,Solypsys,e99txdw,conservative
Not as harsh as having to listen to Acosta whine.,unibuckeye,e99rqdk,conservative
"His rights haven't been violated because the White House decided to revoke his credentials.

Going to a press conference in the White House is a privilege.  He chose to make a scene by refusing to give the microphone to somebody else.  I would hope that any administration would do the same to any reporter that acts like that.

I would feel the same way about a Fox News reporter if he were acting like that at a Democrat president's press conference.  As would most people here, I imagine.  It's not journalism, it's grandstanding, and it's not helpful, informative, or respectful to the other reporters or the office.  And definitely disrespectful to the young woman who was trying to do her job.
",Arm-the-homeless,e9a4l1t,conservative
Damn government can't even repress efficiently! ,hisverbisdictis,e9a2h9t,conservative
Are you saying he didn't push her arm away when she tried to take the mic from him? Do you need screenshots?,oren0,e9a4hq8,conservative
"I don't disagree with you but it was just as ""violent"" as when a Trump staffer grabbed a reporter trying to rush Trump.  That was front page news on this site for days.

It's always the hypocrisy that gets to me.

Edit: It was Lewandowski and he was effin charged with battery for this.  LOL.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Pd1vWYr51tk",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9alq5e,conservative
"So if that was your wife, daughter or girlfriend you would be fine with it? The look on that poor girl’s face said it all. The guy got what he deserved.",FuriousChef,e9a7gn2,conservative
"Lol, yep. My weeks of research into the topic is totally irrelevant because you called me a conspuracy theorist. Take some time and research the effect the Telecommunication act of 1996 had on the makeup of ownership on media in the united states. ",iwasthebeaver,e99m1c2,conservative
"I don’t know where cinnadillo pulled the word “assault” from. I’m arguing that Acosta didn’t even commit the lesser charge of “placing his hands” on her, as Sanders claimed. If the White House wants to revoke his press pass because they don’t like the way he asks questions, so be it. But to invent a claim that he put his hands on her is absurd. ",TCesqGO,e99uk0v,conservative
"So he didn't push her arm away? 
Or is your argument semantic like he used his wrist not hand?

No one is claiming assault or a crime. What he did was unprofessional. How you can watch the whole interaction and come away thinking his behavior acceptable is beyond me.",TheShakinBacon,e99vpub,conservative
No. He literally didn’t push her arm away. ,TCesqGO,e99vxd7,conservative
"He literally did not push her. His arm was up, gesturing to Trump. It was already up. She reached across to grab the mic, and he actively backed away and said “excuse me”. It boggles my mind you could think that is unacceptable behaviour.

Whatever you think of Trump or Acosta, if people held Trump to this standard he’d have been booted about 3 minutes into his election campaign.",BarneyBent,e99ynsn,conservative
"Ok. What did he do? I'm willing to discuss where the difference is in what we see.

I see him push her arm down in an attempt to get it away from the mic that she is trying to take from him. 

",TheShakinBacon,e99wq03,conservative
"> It boggles my mind you could think that is unacceptable behaviour.

What!? Whatever you think of Trump is one thing but to say that type of behavior is acceptable for a White House press corps reporter is outrageous. This was a presidential press conference.",FuriousChef,e9adsg2,conservative
"I’ve watched the video like a dozen times, and though he seems to turn away from her, I don’t see him push her arm down. Can you show me which clip you’re looking at?",TCesqGO,e99xini,conservative
"His left arm at 1:30 of [this video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zdFe-LmFRV8) clearly pushes her arm down. You might argue that it wasn't intentional, but he clearly touches her.",oren0,e9a4mmi,conservative
"At this point, anyone who has their data exposed through a Facebook ""leak"" only has themselves to blame.

You're voluntarily handing over your personal information to a company that cannot be trusted in the slightest. They have demonstrated this on numerous occasions.

&nbsp;

*“There's an old saying in Tennessee — I know it's in Texas, probably in Tennessee — that says, fool me once, shame on — shame on you. Fool me — you can't get fooled again.”*",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ak64r,conservative
I guess Fascistbook founder Zuckerberg is just too important to appear.,Lepew1,e9amjx2,conservative
Makes me happy to hear about these things. Briefly. Then I remember that nothing will likely come of it.,Nevaknosbest,e9bzzf4,conservative
George bush. Mah man. Any jcole lovers here?,AnIntellectualPerson,e9ao4tu,conservative
"Oh something will come of it, Facebook will share their data exclusively with state governments. All they are doing is shaking the Facebook tree to see what falls out. Facebook is big enough now that they can be milked for everything they are worth. And Mike *uckerberg will walk away with biliions no matter what the outcome is. ",Rightquercusalba,e9c60tz,conservative
And now I'm sad.,Nevaknosbest,e9c6j0d,conservative
"Be happy that Facebook is dying, be wary of whoever else steps into their place. ",Rightquercusalba,e9c6ok1,conservative
It better not be Christie. I hope Trump is smarter than that. ,MaddSim,e9bsrz1,conservative
Actually I would love to see Rod Rosenstein become AG. What would be wrong with that?,Nevaknosbest,e9bz7xf,conservative
Trey Gowdy,successiseffort,e9bt4xz,conservative
"FreeMartyG is also looking for a number of volunteers in a number of capacities. We need webdev people, researchers, video editors, and any pretty much any other help you could imagine. ",twinkletwit,e9bt6ps,conservative
"Not as long as Kushner's in the WH IMO. (Kushner's dad prosecuted by Christie, allegedly why Christie never got a WH role in the first place.)",twinkletwit,e9bt0at,conservative
Vote in the poll? https://twitter.com/FreeMartyG/status/1060251962296410114,twinkletwit,e9bt8mh,conservative
"He's talented at consequence-free political theater and has publicly defended Comey and Mueller, yet would be seen as ultra-partisan and hard to confirm - so worst of both worlds.           ",tau_decay,e9bu2mm,conservative
"When your time is coming to an end might as well just go full out libtard 

Sounds like Oprah. You get released, you get released, EVERYONE GETS RELEASED",Chapka69,e9b48id,conservative
What a day that must have been for the kids going up in front of the judge. Hilarious lol,DallasStarsFan-SA,e9b5w9r,conservative
My hero lol,HolsterOfNuts,e9b327h,conservative
These fools need to be prosecuted.  Where is the justice?,BrighamYoung,e9bfzfs,conservative
Anyone know where giraffe neck hangs out at? ,mods_blow_goats,e9bdiem,conservative
DC police are reportedly investigating the incident as a hate crime.,ngoni,e9c84aj,conservative
Waiting for a pedo to run a defense on being a 40 Y.O. who identifies as 15.,expendable_Henchman,e9b45l5,conservative
Age is a social construct,slimline7,e9b39r2,conservative
"I should go get a huge loan, spend it all up, then identify as being debt-free.",MarioFanaticXV,e9beekp,conservative
"I just changed my age to 3,000. I get to collect super social security and I successfully sued and won a lawsuit against the Guinness book of world records for not being inclusive and listing me as worlds oldest Apache attack helicopter. ",mysql101,e9bb7m7,conservative
"I hate that we’ve created a world where his argument is entirely logically consistent with accepted norms 
",YankeeBlues21,e9bbnvx,conservative
"I identify as 70 years old, where is my social security check?",superdude411,e9brhbh,conservative
How long before an 18 year old sues to change his age to 21?,Javalavadava,e9bo41u,conservative
"More people should be trying to ""change"" things about themselves.  It highlights the insanity of liberalism",optionhome,e9azzte,conservative
This is just stupid.,Nevaknosbest,e9b5wad,conservative
Or a 15 year old being above the age of consent.,pandaSmore,e9bufac,conservative
Humans made up time in the first place. Just change the definition when it doesn’t suit your ideals ,KilliamWallace,e9bekhd,conservative
Kind of like getting to choose your gender,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9b6e5c,conservative
"Sure, but why is either newsworthy?",Nevaknosbest,e9b6kpx,conservative
Because the left is making it a huge deal,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9b7joo,conservative
Voter fraud is underway as we speak.  Pretty easy to win when you can pull votes out of thin air.,BrighamYoung,e9btygu,conservative
And voter fraud?,the-divine-comedy,e9bp6v7,conservative
They're already tossing out a shit ton of provisional ballots,tja_1478,e9bpkw4,conservative
With margins like this all it takes is the Broward County Supervisor of elections to find a bag or two of uncounted provisional ballots to put Nelson over the top.,Metafx,e9bquip,conservative
I think the fact that Scott has declared victory shows his analyists are pretty confident he’ll win.,XMAGA_1776X,e9bosth,conservative
"I think that recounts should have to be complete in a set time (24 hours) and if not, gets passed to a judiciary committee or judge to review. Dragging it out is wasting time, money and allows them to scrounge up votes.",gab907,e9bq2ni,conservative
That made me feel a little better.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bv6ib,conservative
"I hope so. Between Rosen, Romney, and Sinema the Dems picked up 3 seats.",SickofInternetProgs,e9c2r58,conservative
"Great post. I just have two completely unrelated questions: Are you Dr. Gonzalez? If so, what advice do you have for a current medical student who is aspiring to be an orthopaedic surgeon?",Hayes_for_days,e9bzovx,conservative
"To be clear, this is just Jim Acosta, not CNN right? If so, CNN can find some other annoying activist, or maybe a fair journalist for once, to fill the void.",unityrootts,e99n5x9,conservative
Good. It’s time bad behavior starts being handled accordingly. Being a White House reporter is a very special honor; the thought of someone being disrespectful and unprofessional is unbelievable to me.,WebSliceGallery123,e99kda0,conservative
"He won't turn over the mic after being disruptive and his turn was up, so he is not welcome back. Seems reasonable to me. 
",TheShakinBacon,e99qgtp,conservative
"Oh, man. Ben is gonna have so much fun with this tomorrow.",noiwontsharemyfries,e99wi0y,conservative
Good riddance,Seeker_234,e99k99c,conservative
Well that took far too long.,BrighamYoung,e99l1ys,conservative
"I agree, long overdue. I’m sick and tired of the press thinking the first amendment gives them the right to behave like jackasses.",searanger62,e99ksn7,conservative
This won’t cause a media shit storm tomorrow...not at all /s,WDKJokerr,e99sogn,conservative
about time,donjohn1986,e99kl58,conservative
Dear diary...,_Gardien,e99m1ej,conservative
"Acosta refused to give up his microphone after the President went on to another questioner. Imagine how these press briefings would go if everyone did that. You could just hog the mic and not let any other reporter get a chance. To portray this as persistence is false and harmful. Acosta showed poor decorum here, and he failed to live up to basic standards of behavior as expected in these briefings. Give his slot to someone with manners. This is not about political leanings, but about decorum and manners.",Lepew1,e9ajiv9,conservative
"This is not a good thing. A question is a question. The President doesn't have to like it, in fact if the press is doing their jobs, he should hate it. I want the harshest people asking harsh questions of my political representatives, no softballs for anyone, left or right.",Nevaknosbest,e9aldag,conservative
"I don't like ""until further notice"" punishments.  Either give it a time frame or give it a stipulation (like he has to apologize to the woman and to the other reporters for derailing the conference).

I don't think he gravely assaulted her, but *any* amount of aggression is too much given that he was a guest and she was simply trying to do her job.  

This wasn't some Trump staffer trying to wrestle the mic away from him apropos of nothing, it was literally her job to take the mic from person to person at the President's orders, and when she tried after the President moved on, Acosta forcibly held her away and struggled to retain the mic.",Telineye,e99kwsp,conservative
Good. Acosta is a joke,LumpyWumpus,e99phg8,conservative
About damn time. I predict Trump get very aggressive in his actions here soon. ,Jebytu,e99log8,conservative
The fact that CNN didn't reprimand him for misbehaving multiple times makes you question why CNN is still allowed a spot in the first place. Revoke all their credentials and don't return them until their reporters behave like adults. ,giobbistar21,e99p7po,conservative
Finally. This guy is a fucking douche.,grafxbill,e99u6yg,conservative
"> I’ve just been denied entrance to the WH. Secret Service just informed me I cannot enter the WH grounds for my 8pm hit

""Hit""?

Like a Hit Job?

",Racheakt,e99jfj1,conservative
Reddit liberals seem to be more than average upset since yesterday.  Even when they win the house they are still bitchy.,easye2889,e9age2k,conservative
The meltdown over in politics is insane. What a solid bunch of idiots. ,BooshDag,e9b2ptg,conservative
What is conservative about kicking out a member of the press?  Don't we want leaders held accountable?,Mediocre_Sex_Machine,e9ba4yy,conservative
"Hahaha yes. FUCK Jim Acosta. Dude doesn't give a shit about reporting anything, he just wants to catch some fame on POTUS's coattails ",mnslice,e9ajr6j,conservative
**BTFO**,LobsterWithAnOpinion,e99mh6z,conservative
Finally,LibertarianP,e9a29kp,conservative
"Historically speaking , the name Jim Acosta is going to be linked to Donald Trump, much like Lincoln-Douglas. ",Amoreena23,e99ook0,conservative
[removed],,e99m2xh,conservative
This is actually what Jim wanted. Now he can whine about on social media.,jihad_dildo,e9a11e7,conservative
Yes,Karen125,e99o8mn,conservative
">or maybe a fair journalist for once, to fill the void.

This is CNN.  They don't have any of those.",WIlf_Brim,e9ajtb4,conservative
[removed],,e99xog6,conservative
"Right, he's wildly unhinged. What's next?  Grabbing chicks by the pussy?",ShatterProofDick,e9b1uku,conservative
Imagine the meltdown if a Fox reporter put his hands on an Obama administration intern and refused to let go of the mic.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9aj2hr,conservative
[deleted],,e9a39oz,conservative
"Andrew Klavan has been ripping on him for ages, he's gonna have a field day.",cornshelltortilla,e9a9lqy,conservative
Bye Felicia  ,NCSUGrad2012,e99mw4m,conservative
"It does. We need to remember that. That’s why Acosta hasn’t been disappeared like he would in other countries. He will,however, get put in the corner for time out for poop etiquette lol.",jcamp30,e9a90h9,conservative
"They have the right and responsibility to ask the president hard questions.

The people need to know the answers. As the president you can’t just throw a hissy fit because a reporter is asking you a question you’re afraid to answer man. That’s just fucked up. 

Either you say you can’t answer at this time and move on or answer the question. It’s not that difficult to hold it together when a reporter asks you a question.

And if you can’t? Well maybe the office of the President of the United States isn’t for you. 

The majority of people I know understand that’s not ever how you act in that situation, whether you’re the POTUS or just someone at work doing their day to day job.",dzank97,e9b0g4u,conservative
"Did you see the video, he was answered, he refused to move on or hand over the mic.",Racheakt,e9aljkw,conservative
Where is the aggression? Everyone on r/politics seems to think there was no aggression and I haven’t seen video ,oclotty,e99s2lv,conservative
She assaulted him; if he cared he could probably have her prosecuted. The video is pretty straight forward. You can't take something out of someone's hands. This isn't a dictatorship.,ModernDemagogue2,e9auk8i,conservative
"Well I mean the dude deserves to be thrown out, but they obviously used this as a reason to get rid of the idiot. They should have just thrown him out for being disrespectful to the president of the fucking United States. Like him or hate him, Trump IS the president and that office deserves respect. ",IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e99si2c,conservative
Yeah! Ban the media! What country do these people think they're in- America!?,oTHEWHITERABBIT,e9a7rok,conservative
"I work in news. Individual segments where we talk to a reporter on the field during a broadcast are called ""hits.""",angethedude,e99k7wg,conservative
More like a hit of drugs. ,TheWhiteFalcon,e99o9kn,conservative
I think Acosta (and liberals as a whole) were upset that Trump was not crying for them over the loss of the house.,Racheakt,e9agwof,conservative
"The bar for ""average anger"" amongst the left keeps moving up and up, so that's pretty impressive.

I'm honestly kind in awe at how they find all this energy to be so riled up all the time. Seems like a super unpleasant way to live life",mnslice,e9ak93u,conservative
You mean Abilio Acosta.,ngoni,e99xx6s,conservative
No he would have been shot if this was actually a dictatorship. ,CITY_F0X,e99mi11,conservative
CNN could send a journalist instead of an activist,Pavulox,e99mt92,conservative
Damn dictators and banning people who assault interns!!,greeneyedunicorn2,e99mq6l,conservative
Let him. And don’t apologize. ,Richandler,e9b5z41,conservative
That's what we have the electoral college for. Obviously Trump didn't do anything bad enough to overturn the will of the American people,GeoStarRunner,e9ai31c,conservative
With elections? Something like that ring a bell?,orangeeyedunicorn,e9a2khu,conservative
"https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/30/opinion/sunday/if-donald-trump-targets-journalists-thank-obama.html

Yeah this kind of bad behavior is deplorable.",ngoni,e99xrip,conservative
"Imagine if a CNN reporter put his hands on a Trump administration intern.

Seriously, you can only imagine that because it didn't happen.",jacob2815,e9asatd,conservative
"Obama would do the same thing, everyone would chant his name, and the reporter would be accused of assault?",aboardthegravyboat,e9antsg,conservative
"No he didn't lets call a spade, spade... she actually tried to pull the mic

&#x200B;

Edit: Added Video links:

Slowed down:  https://twitter.com/joshtpm/status/1060350630127120384 ",Mrbaby,e9abdve,conservative
"No he didn’t. 

Reject your eyes and ears. Smh. ",AndrewNathaniel,e9aai5s,conservative
“Look at me I’m Jim Acosta”,i_floop_the_pig,e9adb41,conservative
"It doesn’t in the press corps. That entire arrangement exists at the pleasure of the executive. Trump could disband the whole thing tomorrow or replace all of CNNs journalists with OAN or Fox and they couldn’t do jack about it.

The first amendment doesn’t give the press a guaranteed room and time at the White House.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9aeinr,conservative
Hey Jim...there’s an exclusive interview with the Saudi Crown Prince...have fun,Charlie7107,e9adz13,conservative
I wouldn't call it an 'aggression' so much as just trying to brush her away. I think both sides are overblowing it but that's not to say that Acosta isn't a yammering sphincter always looking for a sound bite.,jgriz,e9acg12,conservative
"Its extremely minor. Picture a parent trying to stop their child from reaching for something. It in no way could be considered violent but it did seem inappropriate in a ""that was rude of him"" kind of way.

Edit: https://mobile.twitter.com/NBCNews/status/1060338258402365440

There's the vid",senkaichi,e99uq8m,conservative
The White House justified his revocation with a doctored video to make it seem more aggressive than it was. ,DunbarNailsYourMom,e9amn2h,conservative
"...She's retrieving a microphone, which is the property of the White House, i.e. her employer. She did this because Acosta's turn was over, yet he refused to give up the microphone. 

Then he refused to give up the mic, pushed away her attempts to retrieve said property, and thus resisted (mildly, not harshly) an attempt to take back the mic. Acosta does not have a right to always have the microphone and keep lobbing questions after they have been answered and set aside. 

You're right, this _isn't_ a dictatorship, which means one person doesn't get to override the rights of others - like the other journalists in the room who want to ask their questions, but can't because Acosta kept hogging the mic and refused to give it up when asked, and then resisted the attempted retrieval of the mic.",hawkloner,e9awrkg,conservative
"This is not true.  I'm a lawyer.  

It boils down to what is and is not reasonable in this situation.  The intern works for the White House and her duties involved moving the microphone from reporter to reporter.  Part of the decorum expected at a press conference would involve handing over the microphone to the next reporter or employer after they have asked their question.  The microphone is not their property, after all.  When a reporter breaks that decorum, it would be reasonable to expect an intern employee to use reasonable measures to retrieve the microphone.  

If Acosta sued for some sort of assault or battery, he would 100% lose and the judge would laugh at him. 

BTW, at least on the Hill, Capitol Police requires a certain amount of congressional staffers at each oversight hearing to sign a form that basically says that if a protester ever gets unruly, that they are authorized to use reasonable force to help remove someone.  I wouldn't be surprised if the White House is doing the same thing.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e9azyxk,conservative
"They didn't say ban ""the media"". They said ""Ban CNN"" - two very different statements and the fact people so often confuse the two is part of how we got into the mess that is modern journalism in the first place. There are other news outlets than CNN, even other left wing ones, that can get that spot if CNN aren't able to conduct themselves properly.",Zizara42,e9aiz35,conservative
"Being ""the media"" doesn't entitle you to be rude or put your hands on people to try and disrupt a press conference.  The media doesn't even have a right to that press conference in the first place.  Fuck 'em.",DevonWeeks,e9a960b,conservative
Does every news outlet have access to every admin? I'm pretty sure Obama had very few right wing outfits in his press corps. CNN has the same viewership as Nickelodeon. Should Slime Time Lives crew have a white house press pass? ,sumgidan,e9aheu7,conservative
What makes you think the media has a right to a specific time and place to shout questions at the president?,Shadilay_Were_Off,e9aek3o,conservative
"I figured it may be lingo, with JA though he was always trying to do ""hit piece"" on Trump.",Racheakt,e99kv8e,conservative
"They don't have any of those working for them though, only activists ",ConsistentlyRight,e99vbqj,conservative
Liberals on Twitter are asking people to find her full name and info and block any future employment.  What the heck. ,Karen125,e99oe8c,conservative
"Why is it Obama’s fault that trump is targeting journalists? Doesn’t make it any less professional. I’m tired of this “well the other party did it too so our guy can continue being a shithead too” argument. It’s pointless, irrelevant, and toxic to this country.

Stop justifying questionable actions and start holding our representatives and elected leaders up to standards on what the office should be.

I’m saying this not necessarily in this context specifically, but in general. It’s absurd",dzank97,e9azxkv,conservative
"Assaulted? Meh, not really, no. Put his hands on? [Barely, but yes.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xYNM6UQVW04) I do agree that the reaction has been overblown.",metaknight1138,e9b0guq,conservative
"That's her job when potus says their turn is over.  Not his mic.  He was grandstanding and refusing to return property, and time, that was not his to take.

He didn't punch her in the face, he just acted like a 5yo that didn't want to give up the neighbor's ball when it's time to go in.",gabrielmodesta,e9aeeao,conservative
No he chopped at her arm. Watch the video,tshep16,e9akjm5,conservative
You can watch the video where the girl does her job by trying to take the mic and he pushes her away. ,pfabs,e9aews4,conservative
"""Find you someone who loves you the way Jim Acosta loves him some Jim Acosta.""",sir_fenwick,e9ahe4n,conservative
Technically putting your hands on someone when you have no right to do so is assault. ,Shadilay_Were_Off,e9aem3z,conservative
"Yeah, if you did that at any Q&A panel, you'd be escorted out immediately. ",aboardthegravyboat,e9anxy7,conservative
"I don't think that is ban worthy without seeing the buildup. If he was speaking far beyond his turn sure, but that action in and of itself wasn't as violent as I expected. ",justathrowawayte,e9ac6si,conservative
"It's not violent, but if someone did that to you at work, you'd consider it unprofessional and would expect them to at least be talked to.

Since we can't expect CNN to even discourage his actions, let alone reprimand him, we have to do it ourselves.",Telineye,e99ysel,conservative
"It's also such a far cry from ""ban the media""... it's ""ban a single outlet with bad manners from a few official press conferences"".  Nobody's seizing CNN's servers or jailing their reports and editors.

But of course that's how CNN framed it.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9ajcyh,conservative
Source?,dzank97,e9b0rla,conservative
"Because the precedent of having a free and open society, with a well informed electorate. Being able to interview the president to understand his decisions is pretty gd important in that process ",dzank97,e9b0ubg,conservative
"Or you could judge Trump in historical context and see that a vigorous back and forth has existed since the country began-

https://www.history.com/news/presidents-relationship-with-press

Trump was elected, in part, because he pushes back on the leftist narrative. Republican voters have been asking for their elected representatives to do so for decades.

Obama took battling the press to a whole new level with spying on them and using the courts. There is no comparison.",ngoni,e9cda42,conservative
"No His job is to get answers from any administration. That is what free press means. It has nothing to do with being liberal or conservative. That is his function as part of maintaining transparency for any administration. 

It was a tough question for Trump and he acted rude and childish... Let me run the country you deal with CNN,...  
",Mrbaby,e9auvsg,conservative
https://twitter.com/joshtpm/status/1060350630127120384,Mrbaby,e9aug7s,conservative
You can watch the video and nowhere in the video does he push her away,jacob2815,e9asd94,conservative
This is why we need to add the /s,Krieger117,e9af8ep,conservative
">Technically putting your hands on someone when you have no right to do so is assault.

Then she was assaulting him. This is nonsense.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9auijx,conservative
"The behavior reminds me of a disrespectful child in a classroom. Parents at home are probably enabling him and will do nothing to help correct the issue so the teacher/school has to deal with it. You can bet your ass that kid wouldn't be in class the next day after a display like that. Act like a child, get treated like a child. ",TheOldSaltyDog,e9agig3,conservative
The ban is worthy regardless of this altercation,oclotty,e9agnbk,conservative
"I would say the whole exchange on both sides is unprofessional, but that I expect the President to have more integrity and respect than anyone in the room. That’s the kind of person I want leading my country. ",dzank97,e9b0l4a,conservative
*cough cough POTUS cough cough*,JohnLocksTheKey,e9an8i8,conservative
"None of what you just described amounts to a **legal right** to a specific time and place to shout questions at the president. And have an extra laugh at the idea that the person shouting questions at the president yesterday was attemping to ""inform the public"".

The press corps could be disbanded tomorrow and their recourse would be precisely jack and shit. The media can do its job without white house coddling, and the white house can get its message out without their assistance.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b0wqa,conservative
"> No His job is to get answers from any administration.

It's not that simple. Unless Acosta is the only press in the room, then I'd agree with your statement without qualifications.

However that's not the case, as you say, lets be honest here and call a spade a spade... Acosta was not simply asking questions, he was arguing a point of opinion with the president.

There's a fine line between advocacy and journalism, and Acosta crosses it constantly - and we all know it.  Even during previous dust-ups with Acosta, other press have admitted that Acosta has a habit of grandstanding and trying to make the news instead of report it.  A bit of a drama queen.

CNN should fire Acosta because he's a bad reporter, not because he assaulted anyone.",gabrielmodesta,e9b86nc,conservative
"Generally putting your hand on someone’s arm to prevent them from grabbing something you’re holding is considered pushing away. 

In 2018 though words have no meaning, all the matters is the agenda. Jim was just politely asking questions to the president when this amped up republican Nazi came and assaulted him in order to get the microphone back! ",whiplip,e9aweil,conservative
I need coffee before I reddit,pfabs,e9agvhx,conservative
"Only if you ignore ""right to do so"".",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9auk7e,conservative
*cough cough POTUS cough cough*,JohnLocksTheKey,e9anba8,conservative
"It’s definitely not clear cut. 

Both sides of the argument aggravated each other, because neither wanted to step down. 

I would say that, if the WH hadn’t called what he did assault (which it 100% is not), and simply said that Acosta would be suspended for 1 month or something for disruptive behavior, I would understand and say that’s within reason. 

But the method by which the administration is trying to deceptively frame this, trying to use the intern to gain sympathy points,  just escalates the situation. It’s deflecting the focus from what was a relatively heated argument (for a professional workplace) to something it just doesn’t need to be. I don’t understand why things can’t just be cut and dry. The decision making just doesn’t make sense ",dzank97,e9b1lg6,conservative
">Generally putting your hand on someone’s arm to prevent them from grabbing something you’re holding is considered pushing away.

Generally pushing someone away is understood to mean that you are putting distance between the two of you.

You know, away from you.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9axyb3,conservative
"Literally has no one used those words in the context of this. Stop creating false “quotes”, mixing together rhetoric, it’s toxic man. 

All you’re doing is making things worse. Why can’t you just have a normal civil discussion? ",dzank97,e9b033n,conservative
">In 2018 though words have no meaning, all the matters is the agenda.

Interesting, considering the white house is doing just that by calling a natural defensive reaction ""assault."" Difference is, they've gone to the next level by doctoring/using doctored footage to try and prove it. 

Nice strawman, though. 

I wouldn't call what the aide did assault, personally, but it was much closer to assault than what Acosta did. 

The problem isn't that either of them are in the wrong. I think the aide was a bit aggressive but she was just trying to do her job, same as Jim. 

The problem is that during the briefing, the President was being far more rude and disrespectful towards Jim than anything Jim did or said. Hell, a different reporter stood up to ask a question when called on and went out of his way to vouch for Jim and Trump goes, ""yeah well I don't like you either.""

How can you watch that stuff and think its normal behavior for a human being, let along the president of the united states?

Additionally, it's pretty clear that the ban was for two reasons. 

1. Because Trump is petulant and wants his way.
2. Because the White House wants to test how far they can go. Banning Jim for not following the rules of the briefing is one thing. Banning him for **actually** being rude or disrespectful would be fine (too bad he wasn't). But they're lying and saying it's because he assaulted the girl and went as far as to use doctored footage. They're blatantly attempting to deceive the American public while calling the media the enemy of the public. That is unacceptable. But based on your reply, you've been caught by their propaganda hook, line, and sinker. ",jacob2815,e9azxuy,conservative
">Only if you ignore ""right to do so"".

She has no right to touch him, either. She's an intern, not a law enforcement officer.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9aumyh,conservative
In this situation? Absolutely not. ,TheOldSaltyDog,e9aox61,conservative
">Both sides of the argument aggravated each other, because neither wanted to step down.

One side of this argument is a guest, with specific obligations and deference required of them. The other side is the owner/controller of the space and gets to set the specific rules for conduct therein, including who gets to speak and when. This power is absolute.

It is not the WH's job to ""step down"" when disruptive behavior is occurring in the press room. I've said this before and I'll say it again, but that room, that opportunity for questions, that everything, exists not as some guaranteed right, but as a tool of the executive branch to use as they see fit, and a revocable honor on those that sit there.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b1rkb,conservative
">She has no right to touch him, either.

Actually, yes she does. She was trying to retrieve the mic, which is not Acosta's property last I checked.
",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9aupr3,conservative
"I don't know enough about the legal specifics to throw around the term ""absolute power"", which in the context of the office of the POTUS should make any American who believes in a republic shudder.",dzank97,e9b3z1j,conservative
"I edited. She's not law enforcement, she's an intern. She has no right to touch another human being against their will.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9auzdi,conservative
"When I said ""absolute"", I'm pretty sure I directly linked that to ""setting specific rules for conduct therein, including who gets to speak and when"", and it is dishonest of you to omit that.

If Trump wanted to give a speech and take no questions, he can do that.

If he wanted to ban specific media outlets he didn't like (as Obama did), he can do that.

If he wants to enforce specific call&answer rules on who gets to talk, he can do that.

If he wants to only take questions from the winner of a pool noodle fight, rock/paper/scissors game, or coin flip, he can do that.

The press corps exists at the pleasure of the executive branch. Its rules and existence have no constitutional concerns, because the existence of the press corps is not a right.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b47z7,conservative
"[This is what we're talking about](https://v.redd.it/mz9ev3e74yw11/DASH_600_K). Staffer tries to pull the mic away (literally her job), Acosta tries to swat her away.

The first thing is not a problem. The second thing is.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9av3fz,conservative
"Sure, I would say omitting that changes it significantly, my apologies on that. 

And all those things are true, we agree on that, I just think that the institute of these press conferences should be respected *as if* they were a constitutional requirement. However that is really just a personal outlook.",dzank97,e9b616y,conservative
">Staffer tries to pull the mic away (literally her job)

She has no legal right to touch another person against their will. She isn't law enforcement. Her job (again, she's an intern) does not give her the right to commit assault.

It's not a problem because she caused no actual harm and therefore nobody cares, not because she's allowed to assault people.

>Acosta tries to swat her away.

He pushes his arm down. Swatting her away would imply that he touches her with his hand at all or puts any amount of force towards her center of gravity.

This is incredibly overblown.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9avfx3,conservative
"I can respect that.. and I would probably even think the same way if I thought the media as a whole still had ""informing the public"" as its primary job. Unfortunately, they seem more interested in propaganda these days.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b68a6,conservative
"> She has no legal right to touch another person against their will. She isn't law enforcement. Her job (again, she's an intern) does not give her the right to commit assault.

So I did some reading.

1. There's no crime of battery on the books in DC - it's all under the bar of assault. Not really relevant to our discussion, but useful if you go look this up yourself.

2. Accidental touching is an affirmative defense to assault in DC. There is a very valid argument that the staffer's intent was to retrieve the mic, not touch Acosta. The only contact she initiated on him was brushing the top of his closed hand, while attempting to retrieve the mic.

3. Acosta's touching of the staffer was intentional. He clearly tries to push her arm down at 0:01, and we can back this up since he grabs the mic with his other hand at 0:02.

None of this is based on my dislike for Acosta. He broke the law.",Shadilay_Were_Off,e9b04zi,conservative
">Accidental touching is an affirmative defense to assault in DC. There is a very valid argument that the staffer's intent was to retrieve the mic, not touch Acosta.

There's a very valid argument that Acosta wasn't even looking at the staffer. The only contact he initiated on her was slightly moving his arm while gesticulating.

>Acosta's touching of the staffer was intentional. He clearly tries to push her arm down at 0:01, and we can back this up since he grabs the mic with his other hand at 0:02.

He becomes aware of her trying to take the mic after he accidentally touches her and moves the mic to his other hand afterwards.

No prosecutor would ever try this case.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9cgmoz,conservative
Orin Hatch bro why'd you have to retire. Mitt Romney can potentially be worse than Flake. At least Flake rarely voted against Trump. ,latotokyo123,e9arf3q,conservative
To think I once supported him...,gbimmer,e9au00g,conservative
"As usual, Mitt is a total disappointment. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9ars3g,conservative
"Wait a minute! You mean to tell me that a *republican* doesn't like Trump *and* just got elected to the senate? But I was told that only democrats would be against Trump. /s

All seriousness though, Romney can be counted on to be the moderate we knew he was (and thus why he failed to beat Obama).",justhere2havefun,e9b3cvi,conservative
"I’ll never forget Mitts angsty tirade against Trump. This guy is a total snake. He said really, really awful things about The Donald and I haven’t forgotten. ",link_ganon,e9as9xu,conservative
RINOs gonna RINO,ngoni,e9ar95v,conservative
"With McCain, may he rest in peace, and Flake out, you would think we wouldn't have to deal with this bullshit.",gizayabasu,e9b3vhy,conservative
"This is not surprising. This is, after all, the same Mitt Romney who said ""the media is not the enemy"" after his treatment at their hands during the 2012 election.

He may be a good man, a man of integrity even, but he is hopelessly naive and completely unfit for national politics.",Strait409,e9bn9uv,conservative
We got like 54 seats now tho so Romney cant have an impact like flake,mbarnar,e9axtc5,conservative
"I haven't forgotten Trump going in on him afterward, too.  [""I could have said 'Mitt, drop to your knees...'""](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sLVOo4FhcA4)",Tea_is_unAmerican,e9aw0ji,conservative
Lying Liberal pretending to be a Conservative.  I despise him more than I do the dems.,StraightNewt,e9aw4z8,conservative
"Yeah, but two of them are still Collins and Murkowski.  Starting to run out of margin already and they haven’t even started the new session yet.",Jackoffalltrades89,e9b2iqh,conservative
"Remember when the left hated Comey for getting into Hillary's email case, but then liked him when Trump fired him?

Good times. ",uniquecannon,e99v2b0,conservative
Technically he wasn't fired. Just asked to resign. ,MaddSim,e99qkrm,conservative
"Trump breathing is an impeachable offense. 

I can see the headlines now.  ""Maxine Waters opens investigation into Trump's offensive breathing"" ",nooneuknow42,e9air2e,conservative
"It's almost as if there's gray area and every issue isn't perfectly black and white. You can not like him personally, but still support him staying in his position so the Mueller investigation doesn't get tampered with. This isn't that hard to understand, guys.",costwy55,e9akn6j,conservative
"The left is going crazy because ""this means there will be an AG that isn't recused from the investigation"" (real top comment quote from politics)

How is this protest and impeachment stuff? You mean if you don't have every member anti-trump or recused then it's not fair?",Death_AllHisFriends,e99sqpk,conservative
"I'm honestly convinced if Trump found a cure for cancer and released it the left would all of the sudden say cancer is a good thing and it's bad he cured it.... they oppose him on literally every little thing to the max, it's getting old.",yamsHS,e9adkdp,conservative
"Don't forget, he's against weed so we hate him, until Soros tells us to love him...",JobieWanKenobi,e9agqsd,conservative
It's almost like your personal opinion of someone shouldn't influence your perception of the law or the desire for it be followed.. ,LrdCheesterBear,e9abg8i,conservative
"Ok, so I'm out of the loop with Sessions' and Trump's relationship. Why did he get removed from the position?",TenRedBullsANite,e99qh7i,conservative
"Racist

rac·ist

/ˈrāsəst/

noun

noun: racist; plural noun: racists

1. a person who disagrees with the Democratic party.",Lepew1,e9ajynt,conservative
"Well, Trump did this. When Trump coughs it's an impeachable offense. Everything Trump does is an impeachable offense to the left.",Terra_green2,e9a0r17,conservative
Sessions was wildly unpopular and I thought really no one liked him.  Now when he’s fired apparently he was God’s gift to man and the mueller investigation is going to go down the tubes. Guess what? The mueller investigation will stay until conclusive if trump wanted to do something to mueller he would have done it a long time ago.  ,Derp2638,e9agvvo,conservative
Don't forget the protest being organized ,Delta_25,e9aiq81,conservative
[removed],,e99yws7,conservative
"It doesn’t really seem contradictory.  I can oppose a particular candidate or nominee but would still oppose a wrongful firing.  

",The__Imp,e9b1yp4,conservative
"The left doesnt care about being hypocrits, that attack will never work on them.

They also dont have honor or believe in compromise which is why the Conservatives constatnly try to be the upstanding good guys and intractably we slide further and further left. ",Manchurainprez,e9axrv0,conservative
"They're not mutually exclusive. He's still a racist, and was not qualified to be AG. But his firing *is* an impeachable offense.",wholeyfrajole,e9av772,conservative
"Jeff Sessions is a pretty well documented racist, bigot, pedophile defending pos.

But, you better dance with the one you brought. The desire for a leader who is stable should be universal. 

A president whose catch phrase is **Yous fired** isn't normal, and it is harmful to the country.

Just as harmful as embracing a racist like Jeff Sessions.",lolapops,e9b9tag,conservative
In a literal 5 second span on the Colbert late night show.,orangeeyedunicorn,e9a300d,conservative
"Which is actually really important, because that allowed Trump to appoint a new acting AG. If he'd been fired, the role would default to Rosenstein. 

You know, I don't wanna rag on Sessions too hard. His justice department busted a lot of child traffickers, and that was nice. But on the whole he's been about as useful as a blown glass crash helmet, and I think overall the most worthwhile thing he's done has been quitting. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e99rvpo,conservative
Key distinction that NPC's weren't programmed to counter,BeachCruisin22,e9ae1w1,conservative
I fucking hate Jeff Sessions but his being asked to resign is a very big deal. People on this sub really are this dense.,siamesedeluxe,e9aq4cg,conservative
"It's because the new AG has openly and loudly said he thinks the investigation is a waste of time, and people are legitimately worried that he would shut it down.

If that happens, I think we both can agree that's a bad thing. Regardless of what you think is true, the investigation should continue, so we can actually find out what is true.

Also, since when is Mueller anti-Trump? I've never heard him say anything publically to that effect. The guy is a Republican for christsake.",Tyg13,e9au4z9,conservative
Most did not feel he was doing as good a job as he should have been doing. And he never should of recussed himself for the Russia investigation ,MaddSim,e99qjz7,conservative
"https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9v2p35/jeff_sessions_resigns_as_attorney_general/e98wuok/

and this thread have decent TLDR reasons 

https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9v2p35/jeff_sessions_resigns_as_attorney_general/",I_am_just_saying,e99umiu,conservative
[removed],,e99up9r,conservative
"Like an idiot he recused himself from the investigation opening the door for Mueller to investigate Trump and all his associates for anything, ever without probable cause or due process.",SickofInternetProgs,e9atx0o,conservative
How so? The supreme court decided that the president can remove the AG at will.,mfinn999,e9bbd48,conservative
"Comey was fired!

*clap clap clap* 

No, no, no that's bad

*booo orange man bad*",ElbowWhisper,e9a73ng,conservative
He seemed rather weak in looking into news stories of political corruption (I don’t mean Clinton) and support of civil asset forfeiture is ridiculous.,MyCustomUsername,e99zlgc,conservative
"No, people on reddit lol",EBT_CARD_HOLDER,e9avmlb,conservative
"Its not that big of a deal, under sessions watch he is allowing rampant and unfounded investiagtions to continue for poltical purposes indefinately, he is running a marijuana policy that is against the administrations goals and has overseen a total corruption of the FBI and the people in the FBI.

He has been, by inaction or circumstance, a bad AG and the president has every right and every reason to fire him.  The only reason it took till after the midterms was to avoid a Politically motivated attempt to impeach over nothing. ",Manchurainprez,e9axxn5,conservative
"He has not openly said this; correct. But nearly the entirety of his staff has been made up of Democrat lawyers, and several have ended up getting fired for blatant or perceived bias. Certainly doesn’t give the impression that a fair and objective investigation is being conducted.",mattyice18,e9auytw,conservative
"Because Republicans all love Trump! Not a single one hated how successful he was, how he trashed all of his Republican establishment competition. No sir, no people like McCain who despised him and took every opportunity to oppose him possible. No terms for a lot of Republicans like ""never Trumpers."" He's a republican, so he must be Trumps buddy right?",soracrowe,e9b12z7,conservative
">The replacement has to happen now because otherwise Trump can't protect his kids and taxes. 

huh",richardguy,e99yxo0,conservative
Literal NPC programming in action right before our eyes.,FuriousChef,e9a7ki5,conservative
">Under sessions watch he is allowing rampant and unfounded investiagtions to continue for poltical purposes indefinately

Ah, so that's why you're trying to down play this.",siamesedeluxe,e9b8klv,conservative
He literally did say that. Read his Op-Ed.,ElongatedTime,e9azxxb,conservative
"[here’s the link, it’s embarrassing ](https://youtu.be/RCVBEE1SfXI) ",juicyjerry300,e9av867,conservative
Anyone else think Flake will attempt to primary Trump or run as an independent to siphon votes?,justhere2havefun,e9b1pd3,conservative
"Flake may have stayed true to his name sometimes - but Romney looks ready to take up the failed presidential nominee mantle and be a thorn in the side of Republicans in the Senate. 

Welcome John McCain - back from the dead ",c_ward5,e9bbdq3,conservative
I would have to disagree with the President on this one.,Nevaknosbest,e9b5s4e,conservative
"Our infamous Supervisor of elections, Brenda Snipes, won’t even say how many uncounted ballots there are in Broward. Probably because she’s filling out new ones as we speak. 

Democrat Nikki Fried just pulled ahead of Republican Matt Caldwell in the race for Sec of Agriculture in this “recount” sham. ",YankeeBlues21,e9b7qsd,conservative
oh look the oldest trick in the book losing a race all the sudden find some extra ballots... ,Delta_25,e9b79ta,conservative
Broward fucking county bullshit.  Fuck these people and their finding of ballots two days after the election should be over.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9bdeeu,conservative
Lawsuit time,Enzo_SAWFT,e9b932s,conservative
"hmmm they had a school shooting, the mail bomber and now this all happen in there county i think its related. ",Delta_25,e9bggsh,conservative
"On the other hand, it's their biggest gain in the House since 1974 (in the aftermath of Watergate).",PubliusVA,e9bibcr,conservative
That's because the only people stupid enough to take voting advice from Jim Carrey are already Democratic voters.,Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9arwzs,conservative
Good. ,Quazimodal,e9arrv7,conservative
I’d say the endorsements turn more blue collar voters off than attract them. Most people know Hollywood are liberal freaks.,the-divine-comedy,e9au5q5,conservative
I've never understood why some people think that working in the entertainment industry somehow qualifies a person to be a political analyst. Most actors sound like morons the moment that they talk off-script. ,zobix,e9banyo,conservative
"They say only the dead vote Democrat....

And people who follow celebrities are virtually dead inside. ",c_ward5,e9b5eal,conservative
"I don’t think celebrities influence anyone. Honestly, who gives a shot what an overpaid actor or singer thinks? Am I going to vote for Joe Schmo because Will Smith is? Am I a lemming? 

",SexAddictRecovery,e9cjvzp,conservative
"They have fame and want to use their celebrity status to make changes (and get even more famous), so some of them butt into politics with no real knowledge, instead of doing something clearly good and less brain-intensive like working with a charity.",ZarahCobalt,e9bor7n,conservative
Takes 2/3 of the senate to confirm the removal. Not gonna happen people. Let them waste time on this and let them show the American people what they are all about.,allnamesaretaken45,e9anhno,conservative
"Here they start! Already talking about throwing wrenches into Trumps gears 

Didn’t 2 “victims” confess to making it up because they didn’t like him. They’re gonna have to interview more witnesses because the ones that already stepped foreword were just so accurate and true ",Chapka69,e9a9xpx,conservative
"They just don't listen, do they? They start this now and they will certainly lose all houses again in 2020.",cmiller1225,e9ajgx4,conservative
Go after Nadler...,lax714,e9avyxa,conservative
"Democrats lost any chance they had of taking over the Senate with their Kavanaugh debacle. Now they're going to do the same thing in the House? And they have zero chance of succeeding because the Senate isn't going to cooperate.

You can always count on democrats showing people exactly who they are.",SilverHerfer,e9b3mzu,conservative
Pathetic old fart...,Bubbacat7,e9cauwo,conservative
the problem is they have been showing people how bad they are and they still got the house. ,scrubking,e9aolvc,conservative
"They performed worse than Reagan's first mid-term. Given that 95% of the media coverage of Trump has been negative, all of Hollywood hates him, and the internet tech companies suppress conservative speech, they should have won in a wipe out and they still didn't. ",allnamesaretaken45,e9au3qj,conservative
Nothing says Anti-Fascist like going to someone's house and intimidating them ,Napoleon-Bonaparty,e99vokb,conservative
This Domestic Teorrism... plain and simple. ,ozric101,e99vwfw,conservative
"Braindead spoiled children are now doxxing people they disagree with politically. And I'm sure the democratic party will demand that Donald Trump apologize for the demeaning, racist, abhorrent rhetoric of conservatives that have obviously directly caused antifa to dox people. Welcome to America, everybody.",xJownage,e99ytpj,conservative
Taking the House meant nothing to these people. They want nothing less than total social domination. Expect lots more of this. 2020 will be the breaking point.,jd_porter,e99zni5,conservative
">Not bannable. It’s not like he made a joke about a Ghostbuster actress. Now THAT is ban worthy


Twitter",Enzo_SAWFT,e99uuvo,conservative
"""You guys hate the media""- Democrats

""LETS DOX AND AGRESSIVELY PROTEST MEDIA MEMBERS""- Also Democrats",guitmusic12,e9abvjy,conservative
I bet Antifa thinks of themselves as if this is their fighting in the trenches or storming the beaches for freedom. ,StockSkys,e9a0dfk,conservative
They used to be called the KKK. Now they call themselves ANTIFA,ripperman1969,e9abmso,conservative
JOBS NOT MOBS,soxfan90,e99w4vm,conservative
"So a group of Trump supporters HECKLE Jim Acosta at a PUBLIC RALLY and they are vilified by the left, BUT liberals TERRORIZE and THREATEN members of the conservative media and their families at their PRIVATE RESIDENCES and it is ok, GTFO.

",bumpy-meyers,e9ac2lu,conservative
"The American left can't even gain something in peace (like the house in this case), they HAVE to start fucking it up with more stupid protesting and harassment of political enemies. 

&#x200B;",CptMaovich,e9ahj6f,conservative
Did the DC police stand around and watch like the Portland police does?,mlmack,e9aglkg,conservative
How is this not bringing a major lawsuit to twitter?  They are breaking the law,HowRememberAll,e9a11me,conservative
Can anyone find the actual twitter account?,bored-rillard,e99uz2z,conservative
I wonder how the new DOJ feels about this ,TrumptraintoDC,e9agqhy,conservative
Good way to get themselves killed.,BeauRyker,e9a8z2b,conservative
Turn it over to the attorney general. See if they will press charges.,girllawyer,e9ahvkk,conservative
"Ah, yes... Neil Patel and his intolerant, racist inbound marketing consulting business. ",deuce_2x,e9agdo7,conservative
"It's not the TV programming people. Its social media. Its beyond extreme. Before they were making us stupid. But now they are making us violent. 
I say smash the TVs, all of them. ",bklyndamsel,e9aslma,conservative
"And what happens if they defend themselves with a gun? Why the Antifas will claim victim status. And if they succeed in breaking into someone's home and assaulting or murdering someone, will we be able to march around shouting, ""No Justice, No Peace!"". No, we'll be told that they were just standing up for their rights or Trump pushed them to act out.",JFGFNY,e9b1juj,conservative
Who funds these guys?,Lepew1,e9ak2g4,conservative
It's a shame this didn't happen days before the election. Of course the Dems have done outrageous things you'd think more eyes would be open to the fascism tendencies the DNC has become. ,Beechboy96,e9ak6qb,conservative
This is just disgusting ,StanLay281,e9aqfte,conservative
Look at all the little ISIS wannabe's. Won't life seem different when they grow up and have to start paying bills. ,Rudeirishit,e9avwmz,conservative
"No joke. I would have grabbed the 12 gauge. Fired a warning shot and given them 30 secs to clear out my yard. Not only is this a felony on “DC smash racism”, but it’s hypocritical. ",AnIntellectualPerson,e9anvc6,conservative
Lol for realz..  total scum.,Dudehitscar,e99zddi,conservative
"According to Guy Benson, they rang the door bell then started to ram the door itself.  It cracked the door.  Tucker's wife ran and hid in the pantry and called 911.  

It's amazing these people don't think this will escalate into something really, really bad. It's almost there already.  ",Roez,e9an5rp,conservative
It is.  I'm rather hoping that Trump's new AG will do something about it.,StraightNewt,e99wemn,conservative
"If they weren't already on there, surely this will earn them a place on the hit list put out by the Southern Poverty Law Center, *right*?",I_am_really_shocked,e9a7kyz,conservative
It's only a matter of time before they start indentifying non-celeb registered Republicans and assaulting and harassing them at home. The Purge so to speak.,JFGFNY,e9b1q1z,conservative
Wasn't he just complementing the hot black guy in the movie?,nooneuknow42,e9aj3gm,conservative
They have a sub here you can check out. They absolutely think this.,AddictedToGlue,e9abv4n,conservative
The party of white supremacy is now the party of white inferiority.,doobsftw,e9axmzp,conservative
Guess the country is fine with mobs.  Sad.,StraightNewt,e99wdpp,conservative
Why shouldn’t they?  Leftists did crap like this and people elected their Democrat supporters.  What exactly indicates they should stop?  From their perspective the lack of severity of the “blue wave” was the result of not going far enough.  They will double down on everything they did running up to 2018 for 2020 starting now.  Expect this and much more.,booblitchutz,e9aibpf,conservative
"What law is Twitter breaking? Doxxing is legal from what I can tell. It's just that before now people had the decency not to do it, so it wasn't as big of a deal.",hockeyfan1133,e9ab4lx,conservative
Yeah if any of these soybois showed up at me house they would get a chest full of lead. Of course I live in a Castle Doctrine state.,unibuckeye,e9ab58j,conservative
Mom slaps down a $20 bill before heading off to work,GFZDW,e9annxr,conservative
You don't need funds to be an asshole.,StupidAmericanRednek,e9aqj7h,conservative
Or when they break down the wrong door and need reconstructive surgery to patch them up if they are still breathing. ,Rightquercusalba,e9b51m5,conservative
Why bother firing a warning shot? If that stray bullet kills or injures someone that wasn't an immediate threat you will be screwed. ,Rightquercusalba,e9b58mv,conservative
"Can you imagine the crap storm if they broke into a house in a stand your ground state?
",skarface6,e9b19h2,conservative
Those completely nonpartisan folks? Absolutely. No question about it. Yes sirree. It’ll happen annnnny day now. ,skarface6,e9b1bse,conservative
"The silent majority grows bigger everyday.  Howmany people do you think are actually walking away from the Democratic party without posting about it in fear of retaliation?  I imagine a shit ton.  Most people don't vote in the house and Senate elections.  If the Republicans can put someone on the ballot who isn't incompetent, we should have a sure fire victory.",Castaway77,e9b0n2j,conservative
Unfortunately you are correct. The media and politicians keep condoning the worst they have to offer.,CptMaovich,e9ailgy,conservative
I read in another thread about doxxing in Georgia. It's somehow legal if they're voters as voter registration information like current addresses are public information. ,Cetingira,e9aojjk,conservative
[removed],,e9adg1y,conservative
I’d rather not kill someone. Preservation of life above all else. No matter what. ,AnIntellectualPerson,e9ba3h5,conservative
It wasn't enough to take the population-based chamber so I'm not sure how true this is.  More and more it's looking like there are just two distinct peoples in this country with radically different values from one another.  That's not a good sign for the long-term unity of the nation since historically no nation of multiple peoples without shared values has stayed intact.,anuser999,e9b1q2s,conservative
"Totally agree. Wish we could find a way to get more people to vote - what is it? 50% of the population doesn't bother. If they did, maybe the Left would have a clear picture of what America really believes. Not that that would force them to dial down..",JFGFNY,e9b1xyy,conservative
[removed],,e9avy26,conservative
That's a great way to get killed yourself. ,Rightquercusalba,e9bv79z,conservative
"See, if you actually put any kind of faith into CNNs polls then I'd imagine you'd feel that way.",Castaway77,e9b9tfj,conservative
"Those manufacturing jobs aren't coming back!

Can't make iPhones in America,!",SickofInternetProgs,e9c3cg1,conservative
Based Israelites,aljout,e9axf2g,conservative
Can't make her quit though. She's a tough old bird,Quazimodal,e9asn5d,conservative
"Highlander.

--

Colon Cancer? Beat.

Broken ribs? Beat.

PANCREATIC CANCER? Pft.

Broken ribs? Beat.

--

Can't say she isn't tough.
",blunt_person,e9b1dzv,conservative
"To politicize the legal system, is the next lasting bastardization of what used to be a justice system.",TybeeMutt,e9asxcs,conservative
Why does she keep falling? This is unusual.,svengalus,e9b5xcu,conservative
Wtf is she doing that's giving her broken ribs? Did she just fall 3 times? ,FallingPinkElephant,e9bg77r,conservative
Spite can work wonders,orangeeyedunicorn,e9awk9s,conservative
"The reaper comes for us all, it is only a matter of time. ",ozric101,e9az30j,conservative
" She is old, it not unusual at all. The leading cause of death for old people is falling. ",ozric101,e9b7amh,conservative
"No it's not. Heart disease is #1, all accidents combined are #8.",svengalus,e9b7o7t,conservative
https://www.cdc.gov/media/releases/2016/p0922-older-adult-falls.html,ozric101,e9b9vqg,conservative
"You are looking at a stat for ""Injury + death"". Look at the stat for death alone.",svengalus,e9baprr,conservative
"Cause of Death: Old Age/natural causes
      
You act as if what is put on death certificates are really meaningful data. its not.       ",ozric101,e9bb3q9,conservative
"If Jim Acosta was a conservative, he would have manners and this incident would have never transpired.",mikecx79,e9b1z8w,conservative
"Old, but it's still hilarious.",FelixFuckfurter,e9biwkd,conservative
"Shit like this (regardless of which side does it cuz eventually they both do) annoys the hell out of me.

Let the woman recover in peace. Quit making it about yourself or your political beliefs. ",mbarnar,e9axp16,conservative
"> ""Ruth Bader Ginsberg can have my ribs. And my kidneys and a lung. And anything else she needs. **She can even have my husband on Thursdays.""**

Running right on past the obvious ""Milano's 'parts' are pretty used up already"" quip, I'm going to dash for the multi-point finish line here; First, *she's married??*  Second, *she's married to a man???* Third, *that poor bastard just got pimped out (#metoo?) to the Crypt-Keeper*",Jizzlobber42,e9b0214,conservative
PAY ATTENTION TO ME!,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e9az19u,conservative
"If they put Ginsburg's brain in Milano's body and Milano's brain in Ginsburg's body, which one would be allowed to serve on the court? #ShipOfTheseus",Martbell,e9azliz,conservative
But she has neither a heart or a brain?,unityrootts,e9bfrbb,conservative
"Milano:

༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ RBG TAKE MY ORGANS ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ",PubliusVA,e9bc7rw,conservative
"> If they put Ginsburg's brain in Milano's body and Milano's brain in Ginsburg's body, which one would be allowed to serve on the court? #ShipOfTheseus

Depends on ^forgive ^me 'who's the boss'

I'll show myself out",Jizzlobber42,e9b067g,conservative
"I'd ask if you're talking about Milano or Ginsburg, but I think the answer is just ""yes.""",Hayes_for_days,e9c08w8,conservative
😆😆😆😆,Hayes_for_days,e9c05ti,conservative
Isn't this exactly what the left wants? Maxine Waters pretty much told them to do this.,xJownage,e99y9n6,conservative
"Disgusting. 

ANTIFA chants: *”We know where you sleep at night!”*

These actions are awful. Democrats are complacent. Their silence on ANTIFA makes the matter worse. 

This is not normal. This is not free speech. If you think their comments are passive or protected under the First Amendment, then I challenge you to put yourself in the shoes of the victim while a mob tells you they know where you sleep. This is harassment.",nathanaelorange,e99xu9m,conservative
Antifa once again proving they are the real brownshirts.,Kutepov,e9a05u0,conservative
"This is why we need to fight to keep the 2nd amendment.  Liberals want to take away your right to self defense.

The first time one of these insane leftist fucks comes on your property after threatening your family, aim for the center of mass and take them down",Mormonster,e9a5o5d,conservative
Tucker is packing enough heat to melt steel beams. Antifa has a death wish.,M6D_Magnum,e9aeyzq,conservative
It's about time these scumbags get treated as what they are...terrorists. ,GuitarWizard90,e9a3vd5,conservative
"Freaking HELL.

If Democrats don't condemn this IMMEDIATELY, they will lose my vote permanently. I can't be a moderate and vote for a party whose leadership encourages such behavior.

&#x200B;

ETA: I also adore Tucker. He's actually pretty moderate. He just has sympathy for Americans hurt by bad immigration policies and isn't hesitant to criticize both parties. The left harps on sympathy for unfortunate immigrants. Many of us have sympathy for them and I certainly feel bad when they show pictures of adorable Honduran children, but charity starts at home and there are also adorable American children who will be hurt by this. As a legal immigrant who received citizenship, I refuse to vote for immigration policies that will destroy the life of the American people who gave my family many opportunities, by voting for policies that exposes them to reduced wages and potential criminals. The road to hell is paved with good intentions.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",Terra_green2,e99yjpg,conservative
Alright this is getting more and more ridiculous ,goldmouthdawg,e9a43ac,conservative
"Even in local local elections, where party often doesn't matter and we are friends with all candidates, if Democrats don't denounce this, no Dem will ever have my vote again, friend or not",RomeoMyHomeo,e9a8ayy,conservative
Funny how once the midterms are over the mobs magically reappear.,weeaboo_swordsman,e9ahlmp,conservative
And to no ones surprise they scheduled this when he was on the air so they knew he wouldn't be at home.  Nothing says fascism like terrorizing women and children. ,Zanios74,e9aj6ex,conservative
"Color me confused, but isn't this behavior what actual fascists practice? What exactly did Tucker do beyond practice free speech. Surely an Anti-Fascist group doesn't want to limit free speech?!",JFGFNY,e9anwjw,conservative
"Suspended on twitter, think it's their second or third offense so they're probably gonna be gone",chugonthis,e9a9fwk,conservative
Domestic terrorism?,plastiqmanb,e9ahbwz,conservative
I'm personally not a big fan of his but I hope some arrests are made. This is unacceptable.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9at29q,conservative
"F these guys, [new hat](https://i.etsystatic.com/17734754/r/il/8c2380/1713754221/il_570xN.1713754221_miix.jpg) I will wear proudly.",LZ_OtHaFA,e9agzyh,conservative
The DSA are Neo-Bolsheviks.,BruceCampbell123,e9b5rh3,conservative
I bet Tucker owns a few guns. Probably would not go well for the mob if they tried anything.,Okchud,e9ahzkh,conservative
It would take a lot out of me to not fire warning shots at people like this.,InPaceViribus,e9aj14i,conservative
"The left needs a civil war. This is how they are trying to get it started. Steve Pieczenik, State of Emergency. Fiction book, but this is how it was started in the book.  ",StillANNONin,e9abbzo,conservative
"She absolutely did. 

Can you imagine if a conservative congressman said her words? ",nathanaelorange,e99ybmb,conservative
"This is harassment, stalking, and threatening.",MikeyPh,e9aqisf,conservative
"This isn't technically harassment, at least not from a legal standpoint.  It is a crime, though.  In New York, I believe it is 3rd degree menacing.  If they got charged and then did it again, then it would be 2nd degree.

Most places also allow this behavior to be charged as disorderly conduct, though I'm not sure about New York specifically.",DevonWeeks,e99z1gu,conservative
"Harassment? It's terrorism. There's a huge difference between some idiot getting in a beef with another person all on their own versus doing something like this - a group of people, politically motivated, threatening journalist safety.",SickofInternetProgs,e9aws03,conservative
"Rubber bullets and tear gas ought to do this trick.

Going through basic training was great. I got tear gassed and honestly once your out your fine. There’s a picture of me smiling as my nose and tears are running like crazy. Funniest thing.

But these people, if you tear gas them oh my god they would all have claim to have PTSD lol.",nathanaelorange,e9ay7wp,conservative
"> I also adore Tucker. He's actually pretty moderate. He just has sympathy for Americans hurt by bad immigration policies and isn't hesitant to criticize both parties

He's indistinguishable from a 90s Democrat on most topics with some social exceptions.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9a2xhz,conservative
I highly recommend watching his recent sit down on The Rubin Report on youtube. I enjoy Carlson's perspective on right/left and the shifts and changes over the years.,Duotronic93,e9ahx6v,conservative
"I used to be moderate, or at least I thought. I thought I could side here and there with both. 

But in the last few years the left has gone so far left and become very perverse. 

Hate to say it but you won’t hear them condemn this.

Edit: THERE... I put their instead of there. ",nathanaelorange,e99yocx,conservative
"Welp, I’m a just call it now welcome to our side of the political spectrum where we don’t become an angry mob or endorse them.  What’s going to happen is it won’t be a condemnation, it will be a soft mode to them or blaming of the other side. Edit: Love the tuck ",Derp2638,e9ahdmg,conservative
[deleted],,e9aiuy2,conservative
"I guess the Dems will get fucking owned again, then.",soylent_absinthe,e9aftjc,conservative
I want somebody to go up to her and ask her if this is okay. See how she tries to justify this nonsense.,xJownage,e99yhk1,conservative
Isn't this textbook assault? It's an obvious that of physical harm.,AddictedToGlue,e9adapn,conservative
"I'm a 90s Democrat, which is why I like him. ",Terra_green2,e9bjfr6,conservative
I found it thanks! Will watch it ASAP.,Terra_green2,e9bja8h,conservative
"I am more annoyed than ever the Ds didn't get a definitive smackdown in the midterms. It's true the results are not at all bad for the Rs, and kind of lukewarm for the Ds, but it's still not enough. Hopefully that change in 2020.

&#x200B;

I don't know how long the MSM can keep covering for them with propaganda and lies. If they didn't agitate about Trump 24/7 and report the facts the nastiness on the ground would be exposed and voters will be able to make more informed choices. 

&#x200B;",Terra_green2,e99zcip,conservative
I don't understand why antifa changes any of your policy preferences.... ,Dudehitscar,e99z7uu,conservative
"Yes, it's one of the primary reasons why I voted all Rs this election. The 2 year meltdown from the left is insane and very worrisome.",Terra_green2,e9bjc4q,conservative
fixed,LZ_OtHaFA,e9aiyp8,conservative
Me too. Sometimes I think about being a journalist just so I can go to these politicians and honestly make them eat their words.,nathanaelorange,e99ymge,conservative
She'd just smile and cackled like ~~the wicked witch of the west~~ Hillary.,StraightNewt,e9a2esa,conservative
"It depends.  In my state, yes, you could charge it as assault.  It's commonly referred to as ""simple assault by threat.""  I'm not sure about Carlson's state, though.  But I know for certain 3rd degree menacing is applicable.  ",DevonWeeks,e9b9gjs,conservative
Absolutely. Unfortunately they are covered for a week already thanks to Sessions. It’s downright irritating now. ,nathanaelorange,e99zei0,conservative
"No they don’t at all.

I said they’ve become increasingly left and perverse. As in their policy has become extreme. Plus I’m in college now and I’m majoring in economics and that kicked me so far to the right when you look at how a liberal chooses policy. It’s awful. They have no consideration for economic impact. Only fucking environmental impact. They cater to minorities only and have fooled the black community since the 60s. I could go on on and on.",nathanaelorange,e99zcjw,conservative
"Because they're the militant arm of the Democrat party.  I watched a bunch of Dems and the fake news media sucking up to them repeatedly, and the media endlessly covers up their crimes by victim blaming.",StraightNewt,e9a2gx8,conservative
Literally the republicans are playing this the right way. The crazier the left get the more leftist they run and get through to a race for senate or for Congress the more moderates and disenfranchised democrats will vote red. ,Derp2638,e9bjtdh,conservative
"No shit.  They're all patting Acosta on the back for his hyperbolic attacks on Trump, but have any of them taken Mad Max to task each time another conservative has been attacked/harassed, including civilians?  Maxi gets a pass.  ",I_am_really_shocked,e9a7g2x,conservative
You didn't need to cross that out.,xJownage,e9a2qvw,conservative
[removed],,e9a09hd,conservative
"Why does what the dem party support change MY policy preferences?

For example I was pro gay marriage when the dem party including obama was against it.  What they do doesn't change who I am.  Does that make sense?
",Dudehitscar,e9a2sv7,conservative
"Trust me, I understand what you’re saying but you said it yourself, *humans are humans* and to be honest that lumps us into categories. 

Without getting to deep into I do believe in national interest. I believe the left out of control in this country. It’s violating our ideals. I believe every single man and woman in congress violates our ideals. Nothing as it was supposed to be in relative terms of our Founding Fathers.

I just have to choose my battles that’s all. I believe in the individual. I believe we all make choices even if it’s selling ourselves out and mostly for the sake of money, again like you say. I agree with it all, but choosing my battles to me means that their is a part of the spectrum, provided they all go for money and most got into Congress by kissing ass and using the magical revolving door, that is very dangerous to civility that allows for the United States to prosper in the western world and ensure it stays in a place of prosperity at that. 

However I do know squat about how liberals choose their policies, and yes it is choosing which leads to developmental ideas across the board. Their policies are very focused on minorities and making sure they feel victimized. Making sure they feel like they’re somehow cheated. Then they create arguments based on emotions and Al Gore facts that says Florida should be under water right now. They create unrealistic economic nightmare plans for free college and healthcare that is virtually impossible. Again using emotional arguments and maybe citing to Sweden or someone. Sweden, the place with a homogenous population of white people, about ~2/3 the size of Texas, anti-business policies (Look at CA), and I could go on and on. I’ve learned a lot. 

I’ve found out all I care about is economics because just like the individual, you’re not shit if your finances go down the drain and you’re in debt. You won’t be able to climb out in your lifetime. ",nathanaelorange,e9a1jqb,conservative
"When you support a party that using political violence, then you're supporting political violence.  That's how party support works.  

It's like the Nazis, lots of Germans supported the party because they wanted Germany to stop being a basket case economically not because they supported brown shirts beating people or attacking Jews.  Didn't change the fact their support of the party by voting for it was also support of mass murder and world war.  Once you embrace a party of evil, you become evil.

Do you really think Antifa will stop with just attacking Conservatives?  People who are not as Marxists will soon come under attack as they grow in power and numbers thanks to the Dems unofficially embracing them.  It's not a accident that highly liberal towns like Portland get endless Antifa attacks and disruptions.  The only way to stop political violence is come down hard on the people embracing it.  You seem to be advocating the opposite approach.",StraightNewt,e9a3e0i,conservative
"How many categories of humans are there politically speaking in your view?  And what percentage of voting age adults fall into each? Just curious...

",Dudehitscar,e9a1qkh,conservative
"In 2017 42 % of folks identified as neither Democrata or GOP.     Independent voters are a thing.  

antifa should be labeled as a terrorist organization and arrested on sight. 

But what antifa does or doesn't do has no affect on my broad policy preferences and especially has no impact on my local town elections..    I don't like trump but I wouldn't shy from voting for a GOP candidate if I liked the outcomes of their term..  and I have voted for 'non-progressives' before even during the Bush years where I was probably more disgusted with the Iraq war than you are with antifa.  

I don't understand your need to smear everyone of a party affiliation with the worst members behaviors..  it would be pretty silly if me to abstain from voting for a local GOP member because of the Iraq war..  I just want to get my roads repaired and my firefighters deserve a raise...  can you see that?

",Dudehitscar,e9a3wmd,conservative
To be honest I do generalize so continuing to do that I would say there are men and women today that are idealistic enough and willing to sacrifice and come to a conclusion for the sake of future generations. Then I believe there are those who are too idealistic or radicalized and their perception of the world is very skewed. These people are most often found on the left and on the universities. ,nathanaelorange,e9aucis,conservative
">I don't understand your need to smear everyone of a party affiliation with the worst members behaviors.

&#x200B;

A) I'm not smearing them.  The Dems have embraced Antifa.  Liberal areas refuse to prosecute them for their crimes. An Antifa professor attacked 6 people with via bike lock attacked to the head trying to kill them.  He got no jail time because the local Dem prosecutor was on his side.   Similarly a jury in Berkley let off a bunch antifa people who beat people in the streets with metal poles. All caught on video, zero convictions.  They can commit as much violence as they want as long as the area is controlled by the Dems.

&#x200B;

B)  Because political violence is a bridge too far.  During the end of the Roman republic there 3 factions: The faction that supported political violence to enable change, the Faction that supported normal change through voting and tradition, and independent faction that supported each side in turn based on policy preference but who refused to deal with the political violence.   Regardless of the policy preferences of each faction the political violence eventually lead to civil war and the end of the republic.  The whole mess could have been prevented if the majority had viewed political violence as the threat it is and crushed the people who where enabling it.  I see the same sort of apathy to political violence in the US.",StraightNewt,e9a4fo7,conservative
So.. two categories?,Dudehitscar,e9auflg,conservative
"Ok.. but why do I need to stop wanting gay marriage to be legal because of what happened in Berkeley?    In short what does that have to do with me and the folks I vote for?  Because a jury in Berkeley let some violent idiots walk I need to drop my values and vote GOP in order to not be evil?   Doesn't make much sense to me.  I'll give you the last word.  It's been an interesting conversation but in general I can't say I am convinced your broad brush partisan worldview is the way to go.. for either side.

",Dudehitscar,e9a4zzk,conservative
"But I do note that my first statement barely defines anyone in Congress. I listen to Waking Up with Sam Harris and he runs 0 ads. This is because he wants you to know that what he’s saying is his thoughts, not held to a boundary by an advertiser. Just like our politicians who are in some interest groups pocket, he doesn’t want to be that.

Essentially yes. In terms of willingness to work selflessly, which our nation prided itself upon. We all know JFKs famous quote about looking out for your fellow Americans and it’ll grow to do this same for you. I don’t believe everyone is so altruistic but I believe in Adam West’s invisible hand. 

Nonetheless I see a growing divide of radical people and people who still believe in the American dream. ",nathanaelorange,e9aur7m,conservative
">Because a jury in Berkeley let some violent idiots walk I need to drop my values and vote GOP in order to not be evil? 

I'm not asking you to drop your values, I'm asking you to punish the people supporting these violent scumbags.  Vote against them until they stop supporting political violence.",StraightNewt,e9au7tg,conservative
Just to be clear... I can't vote for a dem in any position of government until they do what exactly?,Dudehitscar,e9aubqd,conservative
"I don't know if I agree with this article. Why are Obama's two elections an outlier but the Bush-era the mean? The GOP had that map for around 5 years, before that Clinton had Obama votes + southern states and then before that Republicans won in a landslide. The electoral map changes every decade. ",latotokyo123,e9bt9s2,conservative
"Last year they demand his resignation, this years they protest his resignation. ",Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e9bnjyz,conservative
"So, we can officially call her ""not press"" like Hannity was called for showing up at a Trump rally, right?",justhere2havefun,e9bak44,conservative
Didn’t she say that she wanted him removed after he recused himself? Or am I thinking of someone else? ,ThanksForNothin,e9bapmj,conservative
"He was not fired, he resigned.. End of Story... ",ozric101,e9bb8se,conservative
I wonder if they will have the Pink Pussy hats or not. ,SnickersReese,e9bbr1q,conservative
"So, did she organize a protest 2 years ago because he was a racist, as well?",okwhynot64,e9bgqd1,conservative
Their heads are still spinning,cmiller1225,e9bos1d,conservative
"Hannity himself said he's not a reporter, he's just an entertainer.",Nevaknosbest,e9c96md,conservative
I think she actually argued in favor of him staying on *because* he had recused himself from the investigation. A replacement would have not recused and could therefore take it over.,justhere2havefun,e9bbh8o,conservative
"in fairness he did say he was resigning at the request of the president. Its still stupid to protest over it, but whatever. They will get like 100 people at each ""protest"" and it will be forgotten by Trumps next outrage inducing move. Its all so tiresome ",iwasthebeaver,e9bbhnb,conservative
"Legally speaking, he resigned. Technically, he was fired.",unityrootts,e9bee7f,conservative
"Yeah they usually say resigning because it sounds way better than ""The prez sacked me.""",Nevaknosbest,e9c996j,conservative
Maybe it was a congresswoman. I just remember reading about someone doing that. Thought it might be her. ,ThanksForNothin,e9bgq4e,conservative
"He can say whatever he likes in his registration letter, that does not make it a fact. ",ozric101,e9bcmfi,conservative
he resigned... or he would have been fired.. so no. ,ozric101,e9bkvlf,conservative
Either you’re intentionally misrepresenting the situation or you simply don’t understand. Both are very unfortunate and hamper your credibility. ,Broseidons_Brocean,e9chhmy,conservative
WTF are you talking about? ,ozric101,e9d1fun,conservative
">What's Behind Educated, Suburban Women Flipping To Democrats

A decades long culture war against masculinity, against whiteness, and the ""sexual revolution"".",Silicon_Avatar,e9b362n,conservative
They make more money than the men they date so that want to put the men on welfare? /s ,ozric101,e9b1g44,conservative
Trump.  Saved you a click,hipsterdufus84,e9b080r,conservative
Dems painting women as oppressed snowflakes that they will protect actually working? Sure hope not.,the-divine-comedy,e9b28no,conservative
They will probably be back to Republicans in 2020. I feel like the lonely cat women were over represented in this election. Notice they never said “Married Suburban Women” flipping to Democrat.,SnickersReese,e9b3tob,conservative
It IS concerning that Trump and the GOP get blamed by this demographic for being “offensive” or “divisive” when they’re only responding to decades of leftist hate and tearing at the American social fabric. Not once does the left’s behavior ever seem to enter into their calculus. ,YankeeBlues21,e9bbal0,conservative
[I'm from GA and really enjoyed the thread on Trumpism in our state](https://np.reddit.com/r/GAPol/comments/9v0kpo/georgia_midterm_election_results_megathread/e9ahxb0/?context=3),nekkomori,e9b0msi,conservative
It’s more on Cruz. Abbott did just fine. Cruz needs to up his personality game especially when being challenged by someone like Beto.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9b1ugl,conservative
"I'm glad Cruz won but this was too close for comfort.  

Beto will resurface in 2020. ",lastbastion,e9b855j,conservative
"Despite my username I’ve lived in Texas for 6.5 years. A lot of people in my area are conservative and don’t like Cruz because of his personality. They think he’s swarmy and obnoxious. They either skipped voting for him or voted Beto (sad but true). Look at Abbott. He had no problems. When Cornyn is up for re-election I bet he will be fine too. 

Cruz is a smart guy but he’s gotta work on some image issues. ",Florida_Boy,e9bccbc,conservative
"If you look at the numbers it's roughly 5% of Greg Abbot voters didn't vote for Cruz and went for Beto. I think it's true that Cruz has an issue with people just not liking his personality. That's tough to change and maybe another 6 years will help smooth it over with voters. Time will tell.

The numbers are still there for Texas to be solid red. If those Abbott supporters would have went for Cruz, Beto would have been crushed and it would have been very embarrassing. It would have looked like the Abbott race and a +10% victory.",MajesticMulva,e9b5w8q,conservative
"If licenses or permits are required to carry firearms, this should be all the justification needed to carry them across state lines. ",LonelyMachines,e9bnh9i,conservative
"Ok, I'll bite - no idea what this means. 

Does it mean that other states should honor your medicinal marijuana card and your right to have and smoke your ""Medicine""? For example?

Unless Congress says ""No, you don't have to do that"" with some general laws... in which case they don't?",Gnome_Sane,e9apnrq,conservative
"How does this affect professional liscensing? Lawyers, Doctors, etc.. ",hikinator,e9c79dj,conservative
"A couple of examples would be if you legally change your name in one state then other states have to recognize that or if you get married in one state then you are considered married in all states.  The part about Congress being able to prescribe the manner of such acts means that Congress can say that other states don't have to recognize your marriage to your pet dog just because California recognizes that as a legal marriage.

Your medical marijuana card is only valid in the state it was issued.  But Congress could pass a law requiring all states where medical marijuana is legal to recognized the cards from other states.  If they tried to make it valid in states where it's illegal then you have a constitutional conflict with state policing powers and it would get challenged in court.

The purpose of this section is to make life easier for everyone, not to force through controversial measures.",Yosoff,e9aric2,conservative
"> A couple of examples would be if you legally change your name in one state then other states have to recognize that or if you get married in one state then you are considered married in all states. The part about Congress being able to prescribe the manner of such acts means that Congress can say that other states don't have to recognize your marriage to your pet dog just because California recognizes that as a legal marriage.

Great example. And recent too.

",Gnome_Sane,e9arz30,conservative
"And I think that this would have been a much stronger argument for same-sex marriage in Obergefell than the one they went with. I still disagree with it, but it's a better argument. ",awksomepenguin,e9bdecj,conservative
"Ben Shapiro and Mitch McConnel pointed out that Rs need to work on reaching out to suburbs. I also think that reaching out to the black population will be useful; investing money in propping up and giving max exposure to conservative black voices until it doesn't seem like an anomaly. The R percentages of black voters seem to be up a bit in some sectors.

&#x200B;

How are the percentages going in turns of turnouts? Was it a case of a red wave cancelling a blue wave, or normal turnout for both?

NPR seems to claim there was a blue wave that was cancelled by a partial red wave:

""Voter turnout on Tuesday was massive: More than 47 percent of the voting-eligible population cast a ballot in the midterm elections on Tuesday, according to early estimates from the United States Election. Voter tallies for the House races, as calculated by The New York Times, show that more Democrats voted than Republicans. That was expected, given Democratic outrage at the Trump administration. But the total increase in turnout, compared with 2014, held true for both parties.""

&#x200B;

[https://www.npr.org/2018/11/08/665197690/a-boatload-of-ballots-midterm-voter-turnout-hit-50-year-high](https://www.npr.org/2018/11/08/665197690/a-boatload-of-ballots-midterm-voter-turnout-hit-50-year-high)

&#x200B;

Not sure if it's good or bad news for conservatives-- it could be that Ds exhausted their max outrage in turn of voter turnout so as to produce this turnout, since Ds don't normally vote in midterms compared to Rs.

&#x200B;

I also want to understand why the house keeps flipping. Is it demographic change, or partisan re-destricting (gerrymandering), or both? i.e. just because the house swung blue, does it mean it will remain blue, or will both parties try to keep playing it to go their way in ways other than convincing the electorate?

&#x200B;",Terra_green2,e9bu1im,conservative
"Texas getting more blue every election, AZ about to put in a radical leftist who bashed them over a war hero, Florida was a few votes away from lurching far left (and still might). I don’t know how a Repub wins the presidency again if this keeps up. Soon conservatives will not be welcome here and we’ll be taken over by identity politics and open borders. Wish I was more optimistic but I’m not.",the-divine-comedy,e9bvjyl,conservative
"I mean, we always need to do more.

I wouldn't read too much into this as a loss. It was expected based on history.

But, we always need to do more.",SuperFunMonkey,e9c298a,conservative
"It's hard to say. A lot can happen between now and then. I can't imagine having Pelosi as the face of the Democratic Party will help them, though.",GuitarWizard90,e9bryhx,conservative
Dr. Savage says to be worry. ,loafhunternow,e9byn8f,conservative
"Lax voter ID laws and abuse of birthright citizenship is what led to this situation. In other words, Congress not doing its job. It can still be fixed, preferably soon.",Terra_green2,e9bzug5,conservative
">having Pelosi as the face of the Democratic Party  
   
Hahaha... this is brilliant for us, though.",jina100,e9bztzq,conservative
When you have a city that demonizes the police why would you expect anyone to actually act civilly.  Anyone think anything of a serious nature is going to happen to this girl who punched the teacher?  Anyone think this slime is going to go onto to lead a productive life?,optionhome,e9b0ftw,conservative
But let’s raise people’s taxes and pump more money into these public schools! That’ll fix em!!!!,jina100,e9b0qbd,conservative
My sister and brother in law work at charter school in a city. She says more than half her time in class is getting the kids to pay attention. Some try arguing with her. One even pointed his hand like a gun and pretended to shoot her. These are 7th graders btw.,sasquatch_pants,e9b4p67,conservative
Wow. I might become a cop in this city smh. I might meet that student on the street one day. ,Thanos_damadredditor,e9b0bll,conservative
"This is what happens when children don't have a stable home life, or good family role models. Inner city teachers are heroes but they cant be that for children. Change starts at home.",bitERRORrate,e9bbqdt,conservative
"Damn. She took it like a champ though. Feel bad for her, hope that kid gets charged.",Nevaknosbest,e9c9po2,conservative
The police are really mental health field workers at this point. ,ozric101,e9b16vr,conservative
"> Change starts at home.

And the leftist praises single motherhood and the lack of need of men in the lives of kids.  Liberalism destroyed the family unit in our country just as they have in others.  ",optionhome,e9bc5ri,conservative
This is why I support funding state mental health programs. There was a transition in the 80s to treat mental health at home. This also made funding easier to cut. Eventually the mental health facilities in the inner cities went away leaving only the police. Now we heavily rely on our police and prison system to deal with mental illness and addiction. ,bitERRORrate,e9bc570,conservative
"The ""living Constitution"" doctrine is a transparent excuse to ignore the Constitution. Every judge that votes based on it should be impeached for ignoring their oath to the Constitution.",LibertyTerp,e99d846,conservative
"The only constant is the grab at power and the hypocrisy. 

- Racist southern hick religious republicans marry their siblings jokes, elects rabidly religious islamist who married her brother

- MeToo, elects people like Ellison and Menendez

- Against corruption votes for Gillum or Menendez

- Against ""dark outside money"" Cheers on politicians like Beto or Hillary Clinton 

- The supreme court is a pillar of the US unless its controlled by people who read the law as written

- The Senate is unfair because its not proportional to population when republicans control the Senate

- The House is a gerrymandered abomination when Dems don't win, the ""people's house"" when democrats do win. 

- Presidential power and executive orders are bad, unless it's doing what democrats and the media approve of. 

- The congressional republicans are obstructionists unwilling to compromise with Obama shutting down the government, the congressional democrats opposing Trump is just what a healthy democracy looks like. 

The post modern progressive democrat party is openly against the 1st, 2nd, 4th, 5th, 9th and 10th so it's no surprise they dislike basically the entirety of the US constitutional system. ",I_am_just_saying,e99ffvb,conservative
"I do think I heard someone compare the Senate situation (15 point popular vote advantage but no majority) to the Electoral College last night, and it is a pretty stupid because that's how Congress is supposed to work. The House is a more direct representation of the popular vote and the Senate is evened out so smaller states get more representation. ",Gene_Pool_Sartre,e99hthp,conservative
bUt tHe wIlL Of tHe pEoPlE!,better_off_red,e99wpvx,conservative
"I don't think it's the Constitution itself, but just the fact the Democrats don't like rules. 

They think the rules don't apply to them, only to other people. It's childish.

And, it's one of the major signs of being a sociopath.

If you go to any legit source and read up on all the behaviors of sociopaths..it's practically just a checklist of how Democrats act.

If you look at flat-out psychopathy, as opposed to sociopathy, you go from merely thinking you are better than everyone to also thinking you have the right to hurt them too.. you get people like Jim Acosta, Hillary Clinton, and many Democrat leaders, including the ones who beat thier girlfriends, ally with terrorists, encourage Antifa violence, and tried to destroy Kavanaugh.

edit: clarity in last para",jade_crayon,e9a47la,conservative
"Which is perfectly fine. You can hate the Constitution and the flag and America all you want as long as you're also willing to follow the law. Toss it, burn it, wipe your ass with it for all I care. 

It's a free fuckin' country, baby",GorathThorgath,e99eyva,conservative
They *really* hate not being able to steamroll everything they don’t like with populism.,mobyhead1,e9adzs6,conservative
Well put,CherryCokeNixon,e99ba10,conservative
[removed],,e99scdz,conservative
Democrats do not let things like a principled understanding of the Constitution get in the way of political spin.,Lepew1,e9aktsu,conservative
"I think if you believe there are no problems with the electoral college in national votes like for President then you are being intentionally one-sided and blind.

The major problem with the electoral college isn't that it gives more power to lower populated states. It's that it's actually taking power away from a vast majority of voters themselves. A republican voting for a president in California essentially has no voice. Their vote will count for nothing because California is guaranteed (in the past 30 years and the foreseeable future) to vote Democrat. There were 4.4 million votes for Trump from California and because of the fact that winner takes all per state, those votes counted for nothing. Likewise there were 3.8 million votes for Clinton in Texas that counted for nothing.

So due to the electoral college giving winner-take-all electoral votes per state, and the fact that the vast majority of states **always** vote one way, the election is decided on the states that ""swing"". In 2016, there were 12 swing states. Any minority voter in the other 38 states essentially had no say whatsoever in the presidential election. THAT is the problem with the electoral college.


The electoral college was created 200 years ago prior to a time when it was reasonable to expect commoners to be able to vote - not to mention a large portion of the population was simply *not allowed* to vote. *Electors* were selected to represent the commoners instead.

We live in an era where it should be entirely possible for everyone to vote. We don't need ""electors"" running as middle-men between the commoners anymore. Let's not even dig into the issue that the *Electors* (who ironically aren't elected) [can often times ignore all voters and vote for whoever they choose](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Faithless_elector), meaning NONE of the votes from that state would be worth anything.

But how can we convince people to actually go out and vote when there's a >75% chance they're not in a swing state? When it comes to national elections, the actual odds of your vote counting towards the final tally is actually pretty low.

Please note I am specifically talking about nationwide elections. I believe that although we need to reign in redistricting to be a non-partisan effort, that system at its core is foundational to local & state elections. You want people in a given district to be the ones voting in that district's representative.",jbrown0824,e9a8qt2,conservative
"Yeah, I can't figure out how judges who ascribe to sociological jurisprudence actually get anywhere professionally. Doesn't anyone care that these judges don't, you know, *follow the law*? Is the concept of fairness and rule of law really that diluted? Baffling.",erikthereddest,e99qaw1,conservative
If not for double standards then they wouldn't have any at all.,JoeWinchester99,e99vhm3,conservative
Must be true if Fox News told you to think it.,touch0ph,e99utr1,conservative
"There was also a WaPo article stating that since Dems got more votes last night and Republicans still gained seats it was a travesty and not representing the will of the people.

Guess even WaPo doesn't understand how our elections work, or even how a Republic works.",Sideswipe0009,e99q3gm,conservative
ezra klein IIRC,JMB_was_a_god,e99i8oq,conservative
"Popular vote doesn't even matter. Its like they don't know the house is a bunch of separate election and the ""popular vote"" only matters if it helps win seats in your state. People from Texas aren't going to decided what seats are filled in California. Not to mention the ridiculousness of the senate, which doesn't even hold all of its elections every 2 years. And the Democrats had so many seats up for grabs; of course they had more of a popular vote in the senate.",HighLatencyRaptor,e99yorz,conservative
Not to be a pain in the ass (and I agree with you) but there's one small quibble I have - the Senate membership is evenly distributed so all states have equal representation - not that smaller ones have more.,snoober075,e9a1nj1,conservative
"People don't follow laws they hate. They destroy and twist them for their own purposes. 

Documents like the constitution die the death of a 1,000,000 paper cuts. Even more so when it's ""perfectly fine"" to hate it. 

The ideology of a country must vigorously and regularly be defended or that ideology will cease to exist. Humans don't naturally trend towards American individual liberty. ",I_am_just_saying,e99g1td,conservative
"Or, the Constitution even contains within itself an explanation of how to change it if you don't like it. You just need to get a lot of people to agree with you. ",senatorpjt,e99o71v,conservative
You can NOT hold public office and hold those views or you are an Oath Faker. ,ozric101,e99jcv3,conservative
"> willing to follow the law

Except for the fact that they make laws that violate the Constitution. ",SinisterPaige,e99p7nr,conservative
What a stupid straw man fallacy. ,CherryCokeNixon,e9anc4j,conservative
"That’s a state issue, not an electoral college issue. California can (and should) choose to divvy up its votes by district like Maine and Nebraska do. ",CherryCokeNixon,e9an54r,conservative
"Leftists own the bar associations and the law schools, and thus the entire legal profession is under their thumb. Easy for Dem presidents to appoint activist judges. It’s actually harder to find and appoint originalists. ",djaeveloplyse,e99sujo,conservative
But that article is from the federalist? ,TheMongoose101,e9a0cnf,conservative
"The NPC fox news line is way overplayed... a self proclaimed ""centrist"" should be able to do better",I_am_just_saying,e99vmxe,conservative
Is this your only comeback? Fox News said it?,mattyice18,e9avdql,conservative
"No, I think it was Anand Giridharadas. They had him as a guest on MSNBC. I'm sure it was brought up a few times though.",Gene_Pool_Sartre,e99ilcb,conservative
"The Price of Freedom is Eternal Vigilance. A Popular saying among the founders. They believed the natural inclination of government was towards authoritarianism and corruption and that people should be ever ready to fight against it, either democratically or physically.",Zyrioun,e99h9i7,conservative
Exactly. there has never been a republic that didn't commit suicide.,JMB_was_a_god,e99i7al,conservative
"Yup. So if you wanna sit around and live with the Constitution as-is but complain about it all the time... You do you, man. ",GorathThorgath,e99sf0j,conservative
"That's certainly one way of interpreting ""support[ing] and defend[ing] the Constitution"". I take another view: that ours is a country founded by a bunch of people pissed off at having a bunch of other people telling them what to think and feel and do.

Now, if our founding fathers got so mad at being told what to do by some dudes a few thousand miles away, why should I be so upset at people today getting mad at being told what to do by some dudes two hundred plus years ago?

America is all about *individual* freedom. Including the freedom to express any opinion you want about the Constitution. ",GorathThorgath,e99kcqc,conservative
"Yes, well, that's a separate issue entirely",GorathThorgath,e99sdak,conservative
"Although having more representatives, and therefore more Electors, would probably be a good thing.",awksomepenguin,e9b2tpe,conservative
"It helps if you realize that what people believe is not based on truth or logic, unfortunately.

What people think is mostly based off of what they hear. You could be the smartest lawyer in America, but if what you've always heard is the ""living Constitution"" doctrine, you're likely to believe in it.

Realizing this fact will help us focus on getting our message out to as many people as possible. Yes, our arguments are better, and that makes a big difference. But we also have to reach Americans with our message just as often as the Left. Right now it's not even close. I'm amazed we win elections at all.",LibertyTerp,e9b2ir3,conservative
He's just a troll. Best to report them ignore him. ,ConsistentlyRight,e99x5s6,conservative
"must have. it doesn't even make sense.

Say a senator from KY gets 350k votes and wins by 40 points and a Senator from CA gets 10million votes and wins by 10 points. Yes, the democrat got more votes BUT THEY ARE ENTIRELY SEPARATE RACES! ONE HAS NO EFFECT ON THE OTHER!",JMB_was_a_god,e99kpq1,conservative
"That's a bit of a tautology though. All republics, by definition, are either currently existing (and thus yet to fall) or no longer existing (and thus have fallen).

Unless you meant specifically that the republics fell apart from the inside and not because of outside forces. If that's the case then a quick google suggests that the Republic of Venice fell because Napoleon rolled through and took over, which I'm not sure I would call ""suicide"" per se.

Though admittedly I don't really know anything about Venice so I don't know how strict of a definition of ""republic"" it meets.",h3half,e9aarfw,conservative
"The genius of the constitution is that it has a built-in mechanism to change so that if you don't like the constitution, you can *change* the constitution. The Democrats just decided it's too haaard. ",erikthereddest,e99qvsp,conservative
">That's certainly one way of interpreting ""support[ing] and defend[ing] the Constitution"". I take another view: that ours is a country founded by a bunch of people pissed off at having a bunch of other people telling them what to think and feel and do.

Yup, that must be it. They were just a bunch of contrarian shitheads, it's not like they developed their own vision of a society based on different principles that was extensively documented. Obviously your own personal, convinient interpretation of their intent trumps the text of the oath and it's meaning; you've got it all figured out.",Kryvakryz,e9a7v0z,conservative
"\> You could be the smartest lawyer in America, but if what you've always heard is the ""living Constitution"" doctrine, you're likely to believe in it.  


You're absolutely right. Even most highly intelligent people are NPCs.  


\> we also have to reach Americans with our message just as often as the Left.   


We have been doing that through the internet, which is why they are now trying to de-platform us.",djaeveloplyse,e9bsqp0,conservative
"yeah, the dolts who are saying the popular vote matters are the same dolts arguing that the popular vote matters for the presidential election.

If the popular vote was the end all, be all, we'd already be a completely socialist country by this point.",HighLatencyRaptor,e99y123,conservative
"It wasn’t terribly democratic, but really it had already fallen before Napoleon.  Their hubris led them to eventually antagonize all their neighbors at the same time, and so those neighbors ended their independence.  They were controlled by Austria when Napoleon ended “The Republic of Venice.”",GooseJaw,e9acvvo,conservative
"You're right about there being mechanisms to change it, yes. But you also don't HAVE to change it. You're free to sit around, twiddle your thumbs, and complain about it. You're not being very productive, but again... That's your choice, and your choice alone. ",GorathThorgath,e99scgb,conservative
"That's interesting, TIL. Good riddance, can't believe Venice would do my man Byzantium like that",h3half,e9ad33n,conservative
Any White Woman not on welfare is voting against their own best interest by voting Democrat.,SnickersReese,e9atpdy,conservative
"God, Democrats are going to really screw themselves once people realize that their quest for Diversity ™ is only as deep as Democratic party values. As soon as there is diversity of thought, boom, they go into label mode.",4KDoritos,e9asedy,conservative
How pompous are these people who get to decide what's in everyone else's interests?,mastaxn,e9b0l7e,conservative
Especially those who elected women to office Tuesday. Such sexist women.,justhere2havefun,e9arlps,conservative
"Is it so difficult to understand that many women don’t believe in killing their babies?! What the heck, people. SMH.",oraerdna541,e9b1t9w,conservative
"Michelle Ruiz is not the most intellectually daring of writers. She, like most of her colleagues at Vogue, are trapped in a bubble. If she earnestly attempted steel-manning her opponents’ arguments (something everyone should do) she might open her mind. 

[Steel Man](https://wiki.lesswrong.com/wiki/Steel_man)",bartonsmart,e9arvun,conservative
"If you continually act condescending and lie to people, don't be surprised when the targets tell you to get lost and stop listening to anything you say, and adjacent groups to the targets follow suit because we know you're full of it and we're next on the hit list.

Non-leftist women are tired of leftists telling us we have to do what they tell us because we're women and the shape of our genitals should determine everything that's important to us. Forget about the economy and border enforcement - if it's not about stopping reproduction, we're not supposed to care about it. That mindset is insulting on multiple levels. It implies motherhood is bad. It implies we're too stupid to figure out how to avoid it if we don't get free stuff. It implies that our ability to find work if we need/want it is less important than the ""right"" to kill small children. News flash: if job creation dries up and retracts, then *everybody* is going to have trouble finding work, and avoiding single motherhood through killing or through free birth control isn't going to help. You still end up broke when nobody is hiring.",ZarahCobalt,e9boe0a,conservative
"More like fired given that the first sentence of the letter says,  
""At your request, I am submitting my resignation.""",secret_porn_acct,e98vfu3,conservative
"Haha, the voting booths are still warm.

""We still have the senate? Good. Jeff, you're fired.""",DangerToDemocracy,e98vzpc,conservative
"He was a terrible AG.  Obsessed with weed and brought back asset forfeiture 

Also capitulated way too much to the dem minority",tja_1478,e98vpus,conservative
Dumb question - now that sessions is out do we go after legalization of marijuana. I think so thoughts ?,Derp2638,e98zwey,conservative
"https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2018/11/07/jeff-sessions-resigns-attorney-general-trump/512600001/

>names Matthew Whitaker as interim replacement

https://www.cnn.com/2017/08/06/opinions/rosenstein-should-curb-mueller-whittaker-opinion/index.html

>Mueller's investigation of Trump is going too far
By Matthew Whitaker

Article on prosecuting Hillary written by Whitaker: https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2016/07/05/reasonable-indict/86731608/
>I would indict Hillary Clinton: Opposing view by Matthew Whitaker

The next 2 years of [The New Red Scare](https://www.reddit.com/r/TheNewRedScare/) are going to make the last 2 years look pretty tame in comparison.",Gnome_Sane,e98yg2k,conservative
"I never would have expected that Jeff Sessions would have been such a massive disappointment. How many of you expected that he would ""sleep"" for almost 2 years.",sjwking,e98vxfq,conservative
Now lets get someone pro weed and watch the second landslide victory in 2020.,zeldaisaprude,e98xbfw,conservative
"Biggest disappointment out of all of Trump's cabinet picks. I was thrilled when he was announced as AG. I thought he'd be a perfect fit, but I was wrong. ",GuitarWizard90,e992969,conservative
"Wew lads here we go.

Lindsey Graham nominated to replace Sessions. Nikki Haley takes Graham's seat in SC.",lion27,e98vrce,conservative
Notice that the letter is undated.  Lol,threeoldbeigecamaros,e99bw65,conservative
Let's have some real talk. What are the pros and cons of him resigning?,Opienus,e991oac,conservative
"Holy cow. To be honest, I have mixed feelings. I know a lot of people here were advocating to replace him from the get-go, but I thought we needed to not use AG as an attack dog and separate ourselves from the Eric Holder image. But I also know so many people are happy for this, so I am open to your opinions.  ",8K12,e98wkp4,conservative
"Biggest blunder of the Trump administration. We got Doug Jones because of this and very little to show for it. Not going to say he did nothing good, but the good is far outweighed by the bad things and omissions.",aboardthegravyboat,e9910pj,conservative
"Sessions was such a disaster, so utterly incompetent, I really wondered at times if he was doing it on purpose. 


- lost alabama senate seat

- voluntarily recused himself from everything with a whiff of russian for basically no reason

- failed old school drug policy

- relatively absent in border policy front

- ""oversaw"" an FBI that has lost the trust of large portions of the population

- didn't get anything done regarding voter fraud

- failed to go after the unmasking of Trump aides during intelligence surveillance by Obama Admin. 

- no investigation of Comey's criminal conduct/leaks/perjury to congress. 

- let the Clinton obstruction of justice on the deleted 33,000 emails and secret offsite server die

Im sure there will be a flood of democrats that now only have nice things to say about the honorable and great Jeff Sessions despite their previous hatred for him, especially if Sessions comes out to say negative things about Trump, ala McCain. ",I_am_just_saying,e98wuok,conservative
Good riddance.,BirchSquid789,e99sh75,conservative
This was way overdue.  Great news!,NCSUGrad2012,e98vjn5,conservative
"He will be sorely missed for sure

/s",darksideguyz,e98wz4h,conservative
r/politics is in complete meltdown,Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e99k1qx,conservative
"Trump is an absolute idiot for getting rid of Sessions. He's been his staunch Ally on immigration which is literally Trump's biggest issue. Mueller is not going to turn up anything in his investigation so Sessions recusing himself is a moot point. Really bad move by Trump.

On top of that, if you look at this in a bigger picture, Alabama would have never had to lose a Republican senator if Sessions had stayed in the position. He took the job only to have Trump fire him two years afterwards. We literally could have avoided the entire  Roy Moore debacle if Sessions had just stayed and been an ally in the Senate as opposed to the attorney general. This makes so little sense it's mind-boggling.",TheEmeraldCrusader,e99dnyh,conservative
Long time coming ,Marko_Ramius1,e98we0c,conservative
Say goodbye to the War on Drugs gentlepeople :),Undercovergeek24,e99fyjq,conservative
Someone has been mining salt. [It is plentiful.](https://i.redd.it/855f655y9zw11.png),ngoni,e99bkbp,conservative
"I think this will be good in the long run. For one, it's better when Pres. Trump will no longer be hammering his own A.G.

Secondly, we'll get a new A.G. who will hopefully protect the trump administration from fruitless and endless dem. House investigations (assuming that everything remains a big nothing burger, and that trump and kind are really innocent as they appear to be). ",ripecookies1,e98vjxu,conservative
"How is this not stickied or upvoted in r/libertarian
???   One step closer to that legal bud.",abuigues,e994jlv,conservative
Democrats are parroting this as a sign that Mueller is going to indict Don Jr and Kushner.  And dems are going to get his tax returns and see magical Russian deposits on it.  LOL.,MigzMando,e991g3l,conservative
Liberals are losing their minds over this lol.  Front page is littered with protests.,Stoopid81,e9a08ts,conservative
Muh Saturday Night Massacare ,Enzo_SAWFT,e991i7p,conservative
"1: Nominate a democratic house member to replace him.  
2: Watch democrats shred the nominee to pieces and remember when he raped them.  
3: Watch them resign and free up a house seat.  
4: Repeat until majority.",DangerToDemocracy,e993dof,conservative
"Good riddance, he just wasn't willing to do the job.  The recusal itself was a fire-able offense, in my opinion, since he clearly should have told Trump that he would do it if appointed.

Zero work on deep-state antics
Zero work on draining the swamp
Too much work on drugs and asset forfeiture
Generally asleep at the wheel

Possibly Trump's worst appointment",BeachCruisin22,e997zu7,conservative
Biggest disappointment ever,notviolence,e99dd5y,conservative
[removed],,e99e8b9,conservative
"If Whitaker is as powerful as he looks, I hope he replaces Rosenstein",AMWarfield,e9a2wl0,conservative
And now we get to witness the calmer tone Democrats will have now that they control the House.,Lepew1,e9akq1o,conservative
The first act of the new AG is going to be to shut down Mueller and fire the Deputy AG.   ,ozric101,e98vs7v,conservative
"Question:

What if Trump appointed a democrat that just won the seat in a Republican Governor's state. Republican Governor appoints Republican senator or would there be a special election?

Hypothetically then fires the new AG would the seat go back to the original person, or would they be SOL.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9901gn,conservative
"This is good for the country. The DoJ has done nothing but let baseless investigations go unchallenged. I’m tired of all the talk. Trump either colluded or didn’t - if he didn’t - how this investigation was started has to be investigated. We need to have this resolved.

SOMEONE’s commited a crime and the past 2 years have been fucking exhausting.",BimboDickins,e99cdkj,conservative
Finally some good news.,zwiebelsaft,e9916w0,conservative
Good riddance. He was a terrible AG who sat on his hands while lawlessness has run rampant among democrats.,deathwheel,e98ykbs,conservative
Good. ,DrowningGods,e98xqql,conservative
It's about time! He was a deep state rat.,scrubking,e990cv5,conservative
Good Trump.,SuperFunMonkey,e9925lu,conservative
Here is my question for the libs who are popping rage boners over this. How does this effect your precious Russia investigation at all? ,AgrosLastRide,e99daql,conservative
Praise be.,DogBeersHadOne,e98w2a4,conservative
Trump is smart might as well do it now and people will forget once that illegal alien convoy arrives in a week.,Cuisinart_Killa,e99d08g,conservative
edit: Trump asked for his resignation.,Lepew1,e98wuxa,conservative
[deleted],,e98vopu,conservative
More like sleepy El Jefe,Hplayer18,e995y8m,conservative
yeah kind of a polite firing as it were.,aCreditGuru,e98xjq2,conservative
The gentleman’s pink slip,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9926wn,conservative
Trump did say he was going to start using a softer tone.,jxfreeman,e99dd37,conservative
"Firing implies that Trump wouldn't have loved to keep Sessions on with the provision that Sessions actually do his job.

Refusing to do your job is essentially a resignation.",Telineye,e99e42d,conservative
Maybe Doug Jones will give him his Senate seat back if he asks for it nicely.,Martbell,e98wqjn,conservative
"I truly think he waited to make sure Cruz won. If not, I think Trump would have tapped him for AG. ",QSector,e99cihv,conservative
"Trump: ""I am the Senate!""",super_ag,e99y4cj,conservative
"Agreed, can’t think of a single thing this guy accomplished.",rustyshakelford,e98vtna,conservative
" Sessions was actually the ultimate by the book law and order guy. That's just about exactly why Trump hired him and why it looked like a great role for him. He's talked the talk very hard on immigration and drugs, walked it to whatever extent he legally could. He's been admirably impartial. I don't like asset forfeiture or the war on drugs either but Sessions was simply going to uphold the law as written regardless of feelings. 

 Contrast him with Holder who was a total hack partisan.

 The flip side is that Sessions adherence to the idea of being an impartial AG put him at a huge disadvantage and clipped his own wings in a Justice Department overrun by liberal partisan hacks, the leftovers of Holder/Lynch. He should have figured out a way to respect his own principles and clean up the mess there at the same time.

 I think he just had zero fight in him. A lot of principal but no willingness to go to the wall for it.
",zroxx2,e994xxn,conservative
"> Obsessed with weed 

I always hear people say this, but never actually state *what he did* as AG that makes people so obsessed over the federal drug policy. ",Silicon_Avatar,e98xmd8,conservative
People who had a problem with his policies now love him.,AgrosLastRide,e99c9c1,conservative
Hope he brings someone more palatable to the public and isn’t obsessed with responsible adults throwing on the dank.,deepfeels96,e994e0y,conservative
THANK YOU! ,Skiiwalker,e99cyoi,conservative
"If we were smart, we would use marijuana as the one thing we could possibly work with the Democratic House with in January and try to get some sort of concession from them.

Or . . . we could go full blown Nixon prima nocta and legalize during the lame duck session just to deny the Dems their crack at that issue.  Dankest of timelines. ",TBSportsFan1254,e990rac,conservative
"I hope not, I don't think it should be legalized. I have seen it wreck too many lives.",d_42,e99sxxh,conservative
"Well, the Rapid Response drama queens are gonna have a conniption.  It's possible we'll see if their little planned protest was all text roleplay, or if they'll actually go out and LARP. 

edit: Well after much debating about whether or not this meets their trigger conditions, they seem to have decided: [They'e triggered.](https://www.trumpisnotabovethelaw.org/event/mueller-firing-rapid-response/search/) They're gonna dust off the pussy hats and hit the streets. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e991ip2,conservative
"nice
",JMB_was_a_god,e990ues,conservative
That’s the biggest thing of all.  Does he think these are normal times?  After the 2016 election cycle and alll that came out?!,Cinnadillo,e98wnvy,conservative
"He was a good senator. I was thrilled when Trump picked him, but man, he was a massive disappointment. Like others have said, I think he would've been a decent AG in normal times, but these aren't normal times. We need someone with balls of steel who won't cave and cower. ",GuitarWizard90,e99dcjh,conservative
"I did. 

I was opposed to his nomination from the start, and my post history proves it.

Horrible pick for AG.",SideTraKd,e99m4qp,conservative
He was a deep state plant from the beginning.  The first person in congress to endorse Trump?  I smell a rat.,Reven1911,e98x1n7,conservative
Republicans jumping on the weed train could be fucking huge.,deepfeels96,e995naa,conservative
"> Now lets get someone pro weed

Why? It's the legislature's job to change the laws, not the AG.",Silicon_Avatar,e98xr67,conservative
"I've never smoked weed, and have no intentions of ever doing so, but I think it would definitely be a wise political move for the Republicans to pursue legalization. ",GuitarWizard90,e99di1e,conservative
No more senators please.,Reven1911,e98x418,conservative
Graham is teed up for chair of the senate judiciary committee. I think he's comfortable where he's at. ,Chapped_Assets,e98xihu,conservative
I'd rather not replace Sessions with some swampy Senator or Governor.  I would rather him go the academic route kind of like Nixon did with Kissinger.  Get some sort of former judge or constitutional scholar that works for a think tank.  Someone who won't be obsessed with the politics of Mueller and just does the right thing based on the rule of law.  ,TBSportsFan1254,e990egq,conservative
"God please

EDIT: Graham is awful dovish on immigration, wouldn’t be a fan",mm1255,e98wdpq,conservative
Trey Gowdy perhaps?,Braxo,e990kej,conservative
Nikki could merely put her name on the ballot and win in SC so it would be a smooth transition if Lindsey was moved to AG. He has expressed interest in the position in the past. ,Valcgo,e997da3,conservative
I really hope Graham is not nominated for the position. Give us Kobach or something. Give is Giuliani.,GeneticsGuy,e98yi4y,conservative
"Anything that gets Nikki back in a position to make a difference is fine with me

I love that woman",b50willis,e9948wm,conservative
KOBACH FOR AG or DHS,JMB_was_a_god,e990l3v,conservative
*conservative boner* ,rAlexanderAcosta,e999ewr,conservative
The prospect of having Lindsey Graham 2.0 as the attorney general is awesome.,TheEmeraldCrusader,e99dpzg,conservative
He's useless. The pro is that Trump can replace him with someone who isn't useless. ,Rightquercusalba,e993q37,conservative
You also don't want a senile Chihuahua yapping ineffectually from underneath the couch and only coming out to nip at ankles if it smells weed. ,spartanburger91,e991hhv,conservative
"It's not about being an attack dog, it's about finding justice.",Reven1911,e98x60i,conservative
An AG should work to further a POTUS's agenda within the confines of the law.  It is a political appointment after all.  You think Trump should... ,ozric101,e98xgl8,conservative
"If only Trump could predict the future. No, this isn't a blunder. Sessions was a  early supporter with the clout and track record that made him a great choice especially considering Trump did not have many big name Republicans to fill the AG spot. He had Juliani, Christie and Sessions. And Sessions was openly supportive of Trump's immigration plan and he was a solid conservative that didn't have the baggage of Christie or Juliani. Trump needed a well respected conservative in his cabinet. How the hell was he supposed to know that Democrats would launch a Russian witch hunt and that Sessions would fail to inform the Senate that he had contact with Russians? ",Rightquercusalba,e998r1h,conservative
Lets not forget he never brought charges against mayors warning of ICE raids. ,NCSUGrad2012,e9907tv,conservative
"> lost alabama senate seat
> 
> 

This wasn't his fault to be fair, but yeah he was disgustingly ineffective. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e98xy5h,conservative
Ha!!! Protests tomorrow! Keep the salt flowing and the highlights rolling. 2020 should be a cake walk.,abuigues,e99ufzi,conservative
"He's smart for getting rid of him, you should look in the mirror before you insult other people. ",Rightquercusalba,e9b0ivi,conservative
">Mueller is not going to turn up anything in his investigation so Sessions recusing himself is a moot point. Really bad move by Trump.

No, really **good** move by Trump.  Trump knows Mueller won't find anything.  Sessions knows it.  Thing is, Mueller knows it, too.  But Mueller is choosing to ruin people's lives over it anyway.  That is immoral.  It's wrong.  It needs to be stopped.  Rosenstein lacks the integrity to do it.  Sessions lacks the fortitude. ",DevonWeeks,e99u7mc,conservative
Damn I hope so!,abuigues,e99ugpz,conservative
because that place is overrun by socialists,BeachCruisin22,e9974dl,conservative
Playing right into Trump's hands. I love it.,Rightquercusalba,e997wak,conservative
Lol... riiiiiiiiight,Rightquercusalba,e9azrey,conservative
That'd be political suicide.,SendixBunny,e98wbn1,conservative
"Really, really hope not.",deepfeels96,e995kuv,conservative
If he was going to do that waiting until after the midterms after losing control of the house would be the dumbest way he could possibly do it.,b50willis,e994bwh,conservative
"The left has been BEGGING Trump to fire Mueller, they can't wait to get out into the streets and protest. The Mueller probe will end with a whimper not a bang.",svengalus,e98z3wy,conservative
"It varies state by state.  In some states, the governor appoints a replacement to finish out the former senators term.  In some states, there is a special election to finish the term.  In some states there is a combination (appointment until the special election happens). ",TBSportsFan1254,e990xfy,conservative
"Oh well, they would claim that if Trump farted in the general direction of someone associated with the Mueller witch hunt. Bring it on. ",Rightquercusalba,e9990st,conservative
Only if Haley gets the replacement appointment ,yackippo,e98vtt6,conservative
No.  Why? That makes no sense.  He’s useful in the senate and the AG position is a step down. ,tja_1478,e98w1q9,conservative
"Given it's Trump, I highly doubt it was polite.",FelixFuckfurter,e98yqta,conservative
"Goddammit, if Sessions had just run as a write-in . . .",FelixFuckfurter,e98ysmw,conservative
"Took down a shitload of pedophiles, child pornographers,  and human traffickers. Pretty tough on immigration too. Recusing himself was idiotic and unforgettable though, and cost us two years of unnecessary stress though, so I am glad he's gone. ",Armageddon_It,e9916ma,conservative
Prosecuted a ton of corrupt elected officials on both sides of the aisle?,ripinpeppers,e9924rx,conservative
First casualty of politics appears to be those who fight fair.,Kwijiboe,e996ukn,conservative
"> The flip side is that Sessions adherence to the idea of being an impartial AG put him at a huge disadvantage and clipped his own wings in a Justice Department overrun by liberal partisan hacks, the leftovers of Holder/Lynch. He should have figured out a way to respect his own principles and clean up the mess there at the same time.

""The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing.""

It doesn't matter how good Sessions may have been if he wasn't willing to curtail the Mueller charade that is seeking to undermine our entire country.",Telineye,e99dd4o,conservative
"He sponsored the nomination of a federal prosecutor in my state that's been absolutely devastated by the opioid epidemic that drops gems like this:

>“We have a limited number of resources, a number of high-profile matters to deal with, but we do not view marijuana as any less important for prosecution than any opiate that’s on the street including heroin.”",rjohnson99,e98z1mr,conservative
"I don't like it either, but if he's enforcing laws on the books, then I can't fault it. AG job isnt to to selectively pick what laws he likes.

On the other hand, I'm not sure weed was the biggest thing on his plate to look at.  ",mysql101,e9917er,conservative
https://apnews.com/19f6bfec15a74733b40eaf0ff9162bfa,tja_1478,e98xuxq,conservative
Comey effect.  ,tja_1478,e99ccqd,conservative
"> If we were smart, we would use marijuana as the one thing we could possibly work with the Democratic House with in January and try to get some sort of concession from them.

And if they try to ""Resist"" it, it makes their base pissed off at them.

It adds tax revenue.

Takes money out of drug dealer cartel's pocket.

We could save money on prison and parole by decriminalizing it and expunging records.

And it is already there in like 35-40 states now.",Gnome_Sane,e995txe,conservative
Low key if the Republicans can say - WE ARE THE ONES WHO LEGALIZED MARIJUANA that might turn a lot of heads to vote for them.  Probably enough votes to swing key races and such. As someone who’s 19 a lot of people smoke pot my age and if the GOP got it legalized a lot of people would change their opinions on them and want to find out more about them. ,Derp2638,e9919zd,conservative
"> Or . . . we could go full blown Nixon prima nocta and legalize during the lame duck session just to deny the Dems their crack at that issue. Dankest of timelines.

This would definitely ruin No Nut November.",Publix_Deli,e997w4j,conservative
">If we were smart, we would use marijuana as the one thing we could possibly work with the Democratic House with in January and try to get some sort of concession from them.

See, now this is smart. Sounds like something Trump would do... pretend like we don't want it while getting something else for it in return.

I don't trust our senators to carry that ball, though.",aboardthegravyboat,e991i5n,conservative
"> Dankest of timelines

I see what you did there.",zwiebelsaft,e991yrb,conservative
"Dankest of timelines

",SonOfSite,e999akj,conservative
Now do alcohol ,HawkeyeFan321,e9acesp,conservative
People need to be responsible. I’ve seen it help a lot of people but I totally understand your opinion.  I think people need to realize if you sink or swim most of the time it has something to do with you. Same thing with smoking cigs or weed. ,Derp2638,e99uddw,conservative
Freedom is a good thing,accountingqqq,e99tlhf,conservative
"
[The 8 Stages of Democrat reactions to the 2018 elections](https://www.reddit.com/r/TheNewRedScare/comments/9v4i4x/the_8_stages_of_reactions_to_the_2018_elections/)",Gnome_Sane,e99gfov,conservative
"Bob Woodward was just on CNN doing his Ghost of Christmas Past bit, and Jeffrey Toobin is calling Whitaker a stooge.  They're throwing the word *crisis* enough to rob it of all meaning.

If they're panicking, that tells us something. ",LonelyMachines,e99iyua,conservative
"I get that he wanted to be ""above politics"" in his role, but the way to do that was not by giving into all Democrat demands",greeneyedunicorn2,e98xsfs,conservative
"Right! 

Under Obama, the IRS was used as a political weapon to target conservatives. 

That should have been a Constitutional crisis where the IRS faces historic amounts of scrutiny with many people being fired..

Instead, it got *practically* little to no coverage. 

We are in a war for the soul of this nation 


",Al_Gayda,e98xu5o,conservative
Seriously. Pro business and pro freedom.  It is the conservative stance.,accountingqqq,e99m49x,conservative
"I view it as literally a race against the Democrats to be ""the"" party that legalized weed. It's a matter of whether the Republicans want to get whacked with this for the next 50 years or NOT.",54367543457109943628,e99e2px,conservative
The Dems have been dangling that carrot in front of their voters forever. I'd like to see the GOP just put an end to it and score some points in the process- because we all know nationwide legalization is eventually gonna happen anyway.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99mp8z,conservative
But the Justice Department details how scheduled drug crimes (like marijuana) are prosecuted from a federal standpoint.,TBSportsFan1254,e990ksw,conservative
"from what I've read, the AG can declassify it, congress can overturn that, but he does have the power to. 

Edit: He can change the scheduling, but cannot declassify it now from what I'm reading.",IvankasFutureHusband,e990h4w,conservative
The AG (at least under sessions) decides whether or not to prosecute States defying the ban,nathanweisser,e998ezu,conservative
I agree with you.,aCreditGuru,e98xnql,conservative
Graham 1.0 was dovish. Do we know that the 2.0 software upgrade would be that way?,aCreditGuru,e98xmmy,conservative
"He said he's exiting politics and returning to the private sector. He didn't seek re-election yesterday.
",-Shank-,e99l9bq,conservative
"> Give is Giuliani.

Mr. Noun, verb, 911? Pass.",SonOfSite,e999yp0,conservative
Just promote from within.,SendixBunny,e9911al,conservative
So most references I see are about stopping the Russian investigation. Is this the biggest issue?,8K12,e98xo1c,conservative
"Of course it's a good move, only faux conservatives believe otherwise.  Well unless they are just ignorant.",Rightquercusalba,e9b0o5r,conservative
Maybe even the end Civil Asset Forfeiture. Seriously people on both the left and right should embrace this!,Undercovergeek24,e9alze8,conservative
"Hardly, it would be the best move he could make.",ozric101,e98wedv,conservative
"Nope, the best possible timing TBH...  Trump has just forced their hand, let the people see what kind of insanity they voted for....  
    
OH I would sell all my stock postions, the market hates impeachments and this is going to put the global economy in chaos.              ",ozric101,e994u4l,conservative
Let them....  I will not be intimidated by a mob of idiots.  The Democrats said they were going to Impeach Trump... let them try.  ,ozric101,e98zcc0,conservative
"so hypothetically, if he appointed a dem, in a state the governor appoints, then after said appointment, fires the AG, is that the ultimate move.  Or would the previous elector go back and finish the term.",IvankasFutureHusband,e99110z,conservative
YOU’RE FI-politely requested to leave this administration ,i_floop_the_pig,e9939v0,conservative
"Sessions did a fine job and returned the DoJ to its mission- enforcing the laws. 

Many Trump supporters dislike him because he wasn't a political hack, unlike Holder and Lynch. The AG isn't the President's ""fixer."" The AG is supposed to enforce the law. ",psstein,e99f5zh,conservative
He did? Who?,BimboDickins,e99ckox,conservative
"So.... he upheld the law?

If you want different laws, do it legally, not by selective enforcement. ",Silicon_Avatar,e9910dv,conservative
Idaho people were for the dem simply because she was open to the idea of weed. I'm younger and most of the people I know that are dems simply want weed legalized. ,inconspicuoujavert,e991ui0,conservative
There's this lingering fear from many people in the middle of the retrograde right that's going to come in and make homosexuality illegal and force women out of the workforce. It's dumb and incredibly short-sighted. But legalizing weed would definitely help break down that image. ,Glochidiate,e99ulqo,conservative
Wait until Dec 1. Problem solved.,unibuckeye,e99afrn,conservative
"Yeah, all the old people in the Senate would probably cock it up. ",TBSportsFan1254,e991nlw,conservative
No question we need to do it for the sustenance of the party. Draws in a younger crowd that we desperately need.,deepfeels96,e99f8lb,conservative
"> It's a matter of whether the Republicans want to get whacked with this for the next 50 years or NOT.

Don't worry, if history gets inconvenient for the Democrats they'll just claim another ""party switch"" and take credit for whatever they want.",oren0,e99mbdq,conservative
"Feel like the Dems won't do it. They want to keep it as an issue to run on, after that a lot of people would lose their reason to vote.",midareashi,e99xg3r,conservative
This is exactly why sessions sucked on this front. We are moving to a legalization of weed very soon and sessions continued to treat it at the same level as meth. Still have no idea what his deal is with weed when you have oxy going around rampant killing a crazy amount of Americans.,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e997bvy,conservative
"So the AG can reclassify it as a schedule IV narcotic, which essentially puts it on par with Xanax or schedule V, which would put it on par with OTC diarrhea drugs?",zwiebelsaft,e991oca,conservative
No we don’t.  Can’t take that risk though.,mm1255,e98xp9e,conservative
Graham was on CBS last night proposing a compromise of DACA for the wall. The votes hadn't even been tallied and he's already capitulating.,aboardthegravyboat,e9916mr,conservative
"Graham may be the one to set the herb free:
https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/59jqx3/which-senators-by-state-support-legal-weed",SonOfSite,e999wbb,conservative
You can have functional issues with the Russia investigation like how the scope of it has not been properly focused by AG and the charge for it does not list a crime... and still not make the argument that it should be stopped.,aCreditGuru,e98yphj,conservative
"Sessions recused himself from that, so no.  ",timbowen,e98yetn,conservative
Even the average person can see that firing the people investigating you is a pretty blatant conflict of interest,extraneouspanthers,e98wlc3,conservative
"Maybe to the base, and even that's a stretch. He would look extremely guilty doing so, and I think hes innocent. The Republicans would get wiped out in 2020 if they fire Mueller.",primetime124,e98wr4s,conservative
"Yeah and I guess they are going to run investigation after investigation and run impeachment hearings anyway.

He may as well fire him lol",b50willis,e994yzh,conservative
It's would be criminally stupid for Trump to fire Mueller. Every month the investigation becomes less popular.,svengalus,e98zr7w,conservative
">Or would the previous elector go back and finish the term.

This is getting very convoluted, but if I follow your questions correctly, I think the answer is no.  If you leave the Senate to go and serve in the cabinet and then get fired or resign, you don't automatically get your Senate seat back.

Practically speaking, this situation would probably never happen because the Democratic Senator who was appointed to the cabinet would probably just decline the appointment to keep the seat in the hands of the same party.  If there was ever a place it were to happen, it would be someone like Manchin or a McCain who always seem/seemed to do what they want.",TBSportsFan1254,e991b98,conservative
"well it is reported that the request for resignation was handled by Kelly, so maybe.",aCreditGuru,e999f79,conservative
"Stephen Stockman, Jamie Melo, Mitzi Bickers, Nicole Halliett, Eric Troy Snell, Le Wen Wu & Yat Kuen Chan, Low Taek Jho & Ng Chong Hwa

To name a few",ripinpeppers,e99nge9,conservative
Cuomo when?,kaltsone,e99e7dk,conservative
"Yeah, but it's an unpopular law, so he should do what Obama's hacks did and ignore it! 

",psstein,e99f8tc,conservative
"I want weed legalized and taxed. Use the funds for public schools/education or something that will help the country.  I don’t see too much downside to it from my experiences. Also, I’m not a smoker either.  ",Derp2638,e992zdo,conservative
Exactly. We need to define clearly what the new republican base is.  Not what the older base is.  Promote freedom and smaller government and show how we are different from pass iterations.  Show how we are the party that welcomes all races and creeds and pushes for a better America ,Derp2638,e99vltx,conservative
I believe so yes.  ,IvankasFutureHusband,e991yg0,conservative
I agree. I'd prefer someone who isn't in the Senate right now.,aCreditGuru,e98xxq7,conservative
I see,8K12,e98z2t4,conservative
"Which is part of the problem, right? If we get a new AG not tied to the investigation, I am guessing Trump would have a better advocate overseeing the investigation? ",8K12,e98z0tj,conservative
The average person could give a flying fuck... TBH.,ozric101,e98wp1b,conservative
LOL.... after 2 years of the Democrats running the house America will be begging for the GOP.  You seem too assume allot.   ,ozric101,e98x7x2,conservative
The exit polls in this election show more people distrust mueller and see it as a partisan hunt.,Reven1911,e98xm1f,conservative
"Ahahaha... uuhh.. no. Trump has seen the FISA warrant to spy on his campaign. He knows they targeted him based on a dossier filled with lies and tabloid gossip. They failed to disclose that to the FISA court. Trump has them by the short hairs. All he was waiting for was for a solid GOP senate so that he has the political clout and backing to shit all over Mueller's ""investigation."" ",Rightquercusalba,e999k1w,conservative
"> It's would be criminally stupid for Trump to fire Mueller.

agreed unless whats in the FISA app and related investigative material proves with documentary evidence that the entire Russian Investigation was based on a lie. He's not going to have to fire Mueller it will collapse under its own weight. The democrats are just pissed because they lost control of the investigation now that there is somebody isn't recused over Rosenstein. ",iwasthebeaver,e9957gx,conservative
"Nope, Let the Impeachment begin.   ",ozric101,e9901se,conservative
"yep you read it right. I assumed the democrat would say no, just curious if it would be a good try.  ",IvankasFutureHusband,e991mu8,conservative
"I’m in the exact same boat, I’ve literally had it once in my life, about a year ago on vacation in Alaska. Legalize, Regulate, and Tax the hell out of it. Frees up police resources and jails, and gets some sweet new tax revenue that basically no one sane will complain about.",Masterjason13,e996u9k,conservative
"Same here. I'm not saying I voted for dem, but that was a large portion of why my younger friends were voting for her. ",inconspicuoujavert,e99329c,conservative
">Show how we are the party that welcomes all ... creeds ...

Uuuh, no. I get what you're trying to say but no. Not all creeds are created equal. But I get the gist of what you're trying to say. 

I don't smoke weed at all and I'm all for legalization. It's a freedom issue.",Glochidiate,e99vy9q,conservative
"So why did it take an EO to allow Colorado to legalize it, rather than have Lynch or Holder simply reschedule marijuana?  Is there more to that that I'm missing or was Obama's administration seriously in love with political drama?",zwiebelsaft,e9925mt,conservative
"Yeah it looks like that is probably what is going to shake out.  They won't shut it down, but they won't give it a blank check either. ",timbowen,e990cgz,conservative
"Did you not watch what happened to the House? Firing Muller and Rosenstein will just fire up the Dem base even more, and turn off every Independent from the Republican Party.",SendixBunny,e98x99b,conservative
"The average person doesn't care about weird tax loopholes his dad used, whether some dude wants to put female on some form, or whether a journalist got killed and they can't point to SA on a map.

The average person WILL care about someone hampering an investigation of themselves. You probably should too tbh.",extraneouspanthers,e98ylxr,conservative
"He wont win reelection if he fires Mueller, sorry but that's the hard truth of the matter.",primetime124,e99c7oo,conservative
"Are you 12 years old?  Stop talking to this user, people.  I think they are on here to troll.",TBSportsFan1254,e99137a,conservative
I wouldn't hold your breath.,svengalus,e990cwk,conservative
"> and Tax the hell out of it

Can't we just tax it at a reasonable rate?",SonOfSite,e999dpu,conservative
It would kill 2 bird with one stone in my opinion. Help the country and have a highly popular opinion with people who seldom vote R ,Derp2638,e993tpw,conservative
Well you get what I meant and you’re also 100% correct not all creeds are equal. All I can say freedom is good. It lets people choose and make their own success and mistakes. ,Derp2638,e99wb2z,conservative
"[Best article I can find, sorry its wapo](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/fact-checker/wp/2015/02/26/can-eric-holder-change-the-federal-drug-classification-of-marijuana/?utm_term=.69342bc3ef44).  But it can actually be removed by the AG, with studies from HHS. 

Pretty much the sequence would go like this Petition or request from HHS > AG can declassify or change scheduling 

However there is a catch 22, as you have to have extensive research before AG can declassify.  Since it is schedule 1 you can't do research.  Anyways the article goes into it better than I can explain.

Edit: Another good article https://www.leafly.com/news/politics/a-guide-to-federal-drug-rescheduling-and-what-it-means-for-cannabis

 ",IvankasFutureHusband,e992rif,conservative
"And letting the lawless democrats run around with their above the law investigation?  
   
Sorry, but weakness is WHY the GOP lost and their willingness to kick the can down the road and do nothing.        
  
Sorry the entire Russia Hoax was and is nothing more than a hoax.    ",ozric101,e98yxo9,conservative
No they won't because Mueller doesn't have shit. ,Rightquercusalba,e999msx,conservative
No it's not. You are clueless. ,Rightquercusalba,e99h98m,conservative
"Of Couse they are..... but the table is set for the final tea party. 

Strap yourself in....  the next 2 years are going to be a bumpy ride.     ",ozric101,e991fpb,conservative
Trump going to force their hand and call their bluff. ,ozric101,e990mee,conservative
"We need to find a good market price with supply and demand with taxes added in. For instance marijuana fiend /u/chabanis sells ________ for ______ $   The state of mass sells it _________ for ____$ + tax. It needs to be competitive enough that people will go to a pot shop over a dealer but has enough tax so it’s worth it. Also, quality of the product matters as well",Derp2638,e99eegw,conservative
Tax it at tobacco levels.,unibuckeye,e99ae0a,conservative
"> All I can say freedom is good.

Never change libertarians. ",Glochidiate,e99wk7z,conservative
"Would the research, which tends to be conducted on a global scale, have to be conducted in the US before the US government could reschedule it, or could they look at Canadian or European research?",zwiebelsaft,e999zjw,conservative
The only way to prove it's a hoax to the American people is to let it run out of steam on it's own. Ending the investigation and mass firings is a needless admission of guilt.,SendixBunny,e990w2x,conservative
">Sorry, but weakness is WHY the GOP lost and their willingness to kick the can down the road and do nothing.

They lost because virtually every party loses the off-year election.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e99104i,conservative
He probably doesn't have anything on Trump but there's several guilty pleas already and they should bear the consequences,extraneouspanthers,e99fjgs,conservative
Okay. Enjoy President Warren.,primetime124,e99igzh,conservative
"That’s too much. 
Tobacco kills people. Marijuana has never killed anyone ever in the history of mankind. Sure, it’ll get you high, but it shouldn’t share the “sin tax” label. ",SonOfSite,e99axg9,conservative
Wrong... kiddo...  At some point you need to put the card on the table and man up. ,ozric101,e99152b,conservative
"They lost, but they could have still could have held on.",SendixBunny,e99x8jk,conservative
"That's what you get when you target people in search of crimes. What do they have to do with Trump and Russia?  Nothing. What do they have to do with Russia? Nothing.  We have some false statements to the FBI, Some Russian trolls and some financial crimes unrelated to Trump or Russian. It's a witch hunt. ",Rightquercusalba,e99h7xj,conservative
You would enjoy that. ,Rightquercusalba,e9ahq0o,conservative
Then why tax either?,unibuckeye,e99br36,conservative
"The Democrats WANT Trump to fire Mueller and Rosenstein. The longer the circus goes on, the more people wake up to it being complete BS. Ending their temper tantrum is like disciplining a child in public. Even if you're doing the right thing, everyone assumes you're an abusive parent.",SendixBunny,e991bnx,conservative
I mean. It's not nothing. But okay.,extraneouspanthers,e99icu0,conservative
"Hell no I wouldn't enjoy that, I actually want Republicans to win, but if they keep making dumb moves then they're going to fucking lose.",primetime124,e9ajvqg,conservative
"Spare the Rod spoil the Child....  

Seems to me a real Leader does the right thing no matter what the political cost. ",ozric101,e991k72,conservative
That's nonsense. Mueller can keep this  charade going for another two years if he isn't stopped. He is searching for crimes instead of investigating crimes. I would love to see what someone like Mueller could dig up on you or your friends and family. ,Rightquercusalba,e99ajw9,conservative
"I think most climate change aggressive folks fail to understand that nobody disagrees with the data that the Earth is warming. 

We disagree that mankind can do fuck all to stop it. 

Personally - I believe that the temperature will be in flux always, and we got comfortable where we were. Changes will have to be made in life styles to accommodate the changing climates, but Earth isn’t exploding tomorrow because you don’t drive an electric car. ",c_ward5,e9b5rkn,conservative
"Who really doesn't believe in climate change at this point? I thought everyone kinda accepted it as fact now, considering the evidence. We can all argue whether or not man caused it, but its not really relevant is it? Shits happening regardless of the why.",Nevaknosbest,e9b58xl,conservative
Doesn’t really change the outcome. We’re still all screwed,Altomckee,e9aofuc,conservative
"Or even simply disagree that government intervention is the answer, rather than the Free Market. It's pretty clear, for example, that government intervention against Nuclear Energy, for example in Germany, has increased C02 content.",jivatman,e9b7pv6,conservative
"I think Nuclear Energy is the best chance at curbing carbon emissions. Solar and Wind are just not available everywhere nor is it reliable enough to meet the constant demand of energy throughout the day and night. If the US (and the world) encouraged more Nuclear, Geothermal and Hydroelectric power plants, then fossil fuel could theoretically be reduced to just combustion engines. From there, with increased sources of power with Nuclear, you could meet the increased demand of electric vehicles and phase out combustion vehicles from personal/residential use. With the advancement of technology improving in electrical vehicles for commercial use, then that can be phased out eventually as well. That would leave airplanes and ships as the main demand for carbon-based fuels. This greatly reduces carbon emissions while at the same time, keeping and even increasing the supply of energy to the point that it won't hurt the poor (who are hurt the most by the reduction of energy) and will support the development of 3rd world countries. Right now, 3rd world countries' only chance at developing is through fossil fuels. There is no chance at development relying on renewables such as wind and solar.  


That's my personal opinion. Basically, if you want a serious chance at reducing carbon emissions and human impact on global warming, then allow the global expansion of nuclear, geothermal and hydroelectric to replace the supply and relative inexpensive cost (from a cost-to-energy ratio) that fossil fuel power plants provide.",-Kerosun-,e9bcvfi,conservative
This was bound to happen when we started going down this road. It’s only a matter of time before it’s used as a defense for pedophilia. ,CASunDevil24,e9bel70,conservative
I identify as an M4a3 75 mm Sherman. RESPECT MY LIFE DECISIONS YOU BIGOT ,Intimidator94,e9beuoc,conservative
Someone help me think of something dumb to be the first to do so I can make headlines and get book deals and go on TV shows. ,ard4,e9beglb,conservative
"Oh shit that’s fucking dark but good point. Damn, that just kind of hit me like a shower thought, that’s a scary thought and I’m surprised my inner cynic didn’t think of that",yaddibo,e9bfcvs,conservative
Identify as a Elf and change ya species bruh ,Intimidator94,e9betaw,conservative
"Not sure about Taylor, but....",R-M-Renfield,e9avjpw,conservative
"Fuck. 

That’s a lot of cheddar to spend on refugees. ",c_ward5,e9b64w9,conservative
Bbbbbbut  it’s ok when THEY do it!!,chriztee,e9ba8kn,conservative
"Remember when NBC doctored the 911 call of George Zimmerman to make him into a racist stalker?

",PrawnsAreOk,e9cax2x,conservative
If you can find any videos of any of these Outlets doctor in footage (condensed to less than 30 secs) please send it to me so I can compile in a video,ExpensiveMention,e9cvrh5,conservative
Good for him. Sadly admitting to being a Trump supporter is career suicide in showbiz.,FreedomFromIgnorance,e99sssr,conservative
He has been on the right for a while. I remember him begging Hannity for help years ago when California cut off irrigation canals because of a minnow.,cajungator3,e9a4lan,conservative
"I really do feel bad for the closeted Republicans in Hollywood and the culture they're forced to exist in. Want to circumvent the Bill of Rights? Maybe bash on working class Americans? Maybe you think UFC fans are all stupid? Oh well, come on down and get your award. But voted for Trump? It's a blackball",greatatdrinking,e9ahty0,conservative
"He came out of the closet on Trump, and now he will be harassed by the left.",Lepew1,e9alzj6,conservative
Just look at how Owen Benjamin has handled his life since leaving Hollywood. It's not as bad as you think.  Distancing your self from the Vampires of Hollywood is a good thing. ,NEWNHLISLAME,e9ajzl3,conservative
I care about what he thinks about politics about as much as I care about what Milano thinks about politics. ,yeroldpappy,e9bk9a2,conservative
Lol and in almost every other career to every person in the world,Siere,e9a3kvf,conservative
"A minnow that was ""endangered"" because it only existed in the first place due to human intervention, unless I'm recalling a different dumbass thing California did. ",CinnamonAndCloves,e9ad0m9,conservative
Maybe they thought it was the lost SS Minnow?,Sideswipe0009,e9aqswx,conservative
"Uh, nope. Plenty of places don't care or support Trump.",skarface6,e9am700,conservative
The Delta Smelt!,audioprod,e9ao8yg,conservative
"Yep. At my current job I’m very vocally a Trump supporter and so is nearly everyone I work with. I do consider myself lucky that that’s the case, though. ",FreedomFromIgnorance,e9ase0u,conservative
"Alrighty, on to SCOTUS then.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bfoqt,conservative
Such fucking bullshit. A president illegally grants rights to a population and because these people come to rely on it- the new president is not allowed to make it right.,scarmine34,e9bcp72,conservative
The 9th Circus Court strikes again. ,TheCtrlLeftisafterme,e9bfrc2,conservative
I hope the administration can put an end to judicial activism and get back to the constitution. ,DozerM,e9bd0mw,conservative
That’s my favorite part of this ruling. They decided that it’s not within the scope of the executive branch to undo a policy that was not within the scope of that same branch in the first place. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9bq4tw,conservative
There's no way SCOTUS let's this stand. ,Vrael22,e9bczq5,conservative
She Guevara,BrockLee76,e9botn7,conservative
She's promised to make the electoral college free for all Americans.*stolen semi shamelessly*,SickofInternetProgs,e9c3kfz,conservative
Mitt Romney will be a problem.  You watch.  Collins will still be Collins.  Murkowski will still be Murkowski.  ,Rogdaddy,e9a9buw,conservative
Need to keep the AZ seat,the-divine-comedy,e9alf5a,conservative
I’m watching you Murkowski.... Aaaaaaaaaalways watching ,poltergeist007,e9adqwo,conservative
yes.  We need that last seat to keep these three at bay.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9az4cc,conservative
"Could you imagine the explosion if someone from fox treated the “king” Obama like that?! 

Everyone would be on Obama’s side. But here people are gonna be like Trump’s trying to silence the press, free speech blah blah blah cry cry cry ",Chapka69,e99lv9e,conservative
"Hey Jim

On behalf of Americans who believe in civility and respect of office, 

good bye. This is long overdue.",searanger62,e99la0a,conservative
"Dear Diary...

> I’ve just been denied entrance to the WH. Secret Service just informed me I cannot enter the WH grounds for my 8pm hit
> 
> — Jim Acosta (@Acosta) November 8, 2018",MooMooCudChew,e99lah7,conservative
Good bye and good riddance!,BuckeyeDood,e99mv7i,conservative
"This is great. I loved Trumps exchange with him. 

He really is a terrible person. He won’t be missed.

My favorite exchange between them was in the UK I think. And Trump passed over him with questions and said CNN is fake news. And you hear him in the back round all upset and butt hurt “ we’re a creditable new network sir” ",Chapka69,e99kx44,conservative
This is the best day since trump got elected ,buffalo_chum,e99kvgh,conservative
He just grandstands. CNN should fill in his spot with an actual reporter.,MyCustomUsername,e99y9ls,conservative
Abilio James Acosta apparently thinks that the press pass lets him hog the mic and not let other reporters ask questions.,Lepew1,e9am2l8,conservative
"I believe this where we'd post that Ice Cube 'Bye Felicia"" gif.  But never ever lay hands on staff, if a Fox reporter did this during the Obama  administration, same thing would happen, and it would be deserved.",patb011,e99nxxg,conservative
One good day. Trump is a fighter.,stoffel_bristov,e99v3cs,conservative
It’s about time.  ,JMAN2015T,e99pvum,conservative
"1st amendment be damned, Acosta was being rude and disrespectful and needed to go.",JFK_NoScope,e9advpq,conservative
[removed],,e99rzvz,conservative
"It did and they did.

https://www.politico.com/blogs/politico44/2012/06/obama-interrupted-by-heckling-reporter-126301",ngoni,e99v2rz,conservative
"> Could you imagine the explosion if someone from fox treated the “king” Obama like that?!
> 
> 

I mean that kinda happened. James Rosen had his wires tapped when he was critical of the president. The public response was tepid at best. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e99mxyt,conservative
[removed],,e9a5b4o,conservative
I couldn't agree more.  This should have happened the day this brat started screaming at the Kim summit.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e99mpe5,conservative
This isn't his first parade so I couldn't agree more.,MinimumMonitor7,e99mg7n,conservative
[removed],,e99selw,conservative
"Is ""hit"" by itself even journalism slang? When I hear hit I think of hit piece. If that's the case, this would basically be Jim Acosta admitting he just goes into the White House to make up biased or misleading reports that are intentionally designed to damage Trump's image.

Seems about right",greatatdrinking,e9ac2ak,conservative
u/SpectorDeflector69,Chapka69,e99l8pq,conservative
"> CNN should fill in his spot with an actual reporter.

CNN has already called this a ""threat to democracy"" in a statement. Because of course.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9a00us,conservative
Tomorrow's Babylon Bee article: Don Lemon to replace Jim Acosta as Chief White House heckler for CNN,Jer_061,e9ajxl9,conservative
Does CNN have any real reporters?,stylecouncilor,e9ach6r,conservative
Dude doesnt have a right to come into the white house. If trump put him in jail or threatened to do so because of a story hat would be a 1a violation. He could bar cnn from the white house completely and it would be legal.,papatim,e9ahfm2,conservative
"https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/30/opinion/sunday/if-donald-trump-targets-journalists-thank-obama.html

Trump has a LONG way to go before he gets to where Obama took us.",ngoni,e99v7tq,conservative
"James Rosen was named as a criminal conspirator by holder in an indictment for doing his job. It was completely out of line so they could get a warrant and harass him.
",stoffel_bristov,e99v1lk,conservative
Very few people were upset about. He Definitely won’t be getting his wire tapped ,Chapka69,e9a7p4g,conservative
"Very interesting, I didn’t know about this one ",Chapka69,e9a7m50,conservative
"Why should he respect the press? They are a mouthpiece for the DNC. They call him the worst names and compare him to the worst dictators in history on a nightly basis. I know the left is used to Republicans laying down and playing dead when put under pressure but Donald isn’t that guy. 


As for your other question, he respects the office very well. The media don’t though as was displayed earlier today during that disgraceful press conference where they shouted over and clashed with the President. ",Knollsit,e99vkyz,conservative
"I don't think he respects the democrats and the press is functionally a wing of the Democrat party.

*CNN's Jake Tapper*

Before hosting Sunday's ""State of the Union"" and ""The Lead"" on weekdays, Tapper worked as a Campaign Press Secretary for a Democrat congresswoman. He also worked for a gun control advocacy group. Oh, and the Congresswoman Tapper worked for is no less than Chelsea Clinton's mother-in-law, which helps to explain a lot.

*NBC's Chuck Todd*

Before hosting Sunday's ""Meet the Press"" and ""Meet the Press Daily"" on weekdays, Todd worked for hard-left presidential candidate Tom Harkin. Todd is also married to a Democrat party strategist.

*ABC's George Stephanopoulos*

Before hosting Sunday's ""This Week"" and ""Good Morning America"" on weekdays, Stephanopoulos was a high-level operative for President Bill Clinton.

*CNN's Chief National Security Correspondent Jim Sciutto*

Former Obama appointee in foreign affairs, Sciutto is a former colleague of Susan Rice's. Without knowing all of the facts and using sources identified as ""people close to Rice,"" Sciutto has absolved her of all wrongdoing.

*ABC News Correspondent Gloria Riviera*

Married to former-Obama appointee Jim Sciutto.

*Former-ABC News Executive Producer (2008-2011) Ian Cameron*

Married Barry Obama's right-hand-woman and National Security Adviser Susan Rice in 1992.

*CBS President David Rhodes*

Brother of Obama Deputy National Security Adviser Ben Rhodes.

*ABC News Reporter Claire Shipman*

Wife of Obama's White House Press Secretary Jay Carney.

*Former-ABC News and Univision Reporter Matthew Jaffe*

Married to Obama's Deputy Press Secretary Katie Hogan.

*ABC President Ben Sherwood*

Brother of Obama Special Adviser Elizabeth Sherwood.

*CNN Vice President and Washington Deputy Bureau Chief Virginia Moseley*

Married to Hillary Clinton Deputy Secretary Tom Nides.

*CNN Anchor Chris Cuomo*

Brother of New York Governor Andrew Cuomo.

*NPR Reporter Ari Shapiro*

Married to Michael Gottlieb, attorney for the Obama White House.

*Washington Post reporter Sari Horowitz*

Married to William Schultz, general counsel for Obama's Department of Health and Human Services.

*NBC News Senior Political Editor Mark Murray*

Married to Sasha Johnson, Obama appointee at the FAA

*PBS's Bill Moyers*

Former White House Press Secretary for Lyndon Johnson.

*Former-Politico/Bloomberg Reporter Jonathan Allen*

Worked for Democrat Congresswoman and former-DNC head Debbie Wasserman-Schultz.
",ElbowWhisper,e9a6rvu,conservative
"When the press continually calls you things that are not true and use quotes taken out of context, and then tries to hold you to a higher ""standard"" because ""you hold a huge position of power"", and rags on you for literally anything you do calling you the equivalent of a real-life villain, I wouldn't respect the press either.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9a0spo,conservative
">Do you think Trump respects the office... 

Yes. Do you feel otherwise?

&nbsp;

>Or the press?

He probably doesn't. And neither do I.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99zwxi,conservative
Negative.,cavemanben,e9aiubh,conservative
I guess that’s more that separates Obama from Trump. I don’t think anyone will be harassing him or tapping his wires ,Chapka69,e9a7nzl,conservative
"Why didn't you include anyone from Fox? Weren't they campaigning with him? Isn't Fox News literally registered as entertainment, and they have said as much in court? 

Shouldn't he just answer the questions? 

Is there a news source you trust?",twingirlsdaddy,e9ai6af,conservative
"> A federal appeals court in San Francisco

I am unconcerned, keep going up the chain. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9b6p8m,conservative
"DACA was an EO? What is the issue,",Racheakt,e9brsla,conservative
Last Stop SCOTUS and I think we know how they MUST rule. ,ozric101,e9bc8ab,conservative
">By his unnecessary and silly recusal from all things Russian, Sessions had gelded himself and left supervision of the Justice Department’s most important investigative matters to Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein who, in turn, appointed Special Counsel Robert Mueller to conduct a thoroughly illegal counterintelligence investigation of the president. 

Pretty much",guanaco55,e9azrzp,conservative
They entire mess is political hit job that has fully backfired.  The US IC are just trying to save their own asses at this point.  ,ozric101,e9b1prp,conservative
Another glaring example of how the lying liberal media as the ministry of propaganda always is in control of the dnc and the leftist message.  They set the tone and the direction.  The dem politicians simply follow their lead.  Any democratic politician exposed to the same media scrutiny as republicans would never get elected.  So they avoid that media exposure by following the path the media lays out for them.  Walkaway means nothing unless you understand that it means walking away from both the dnc and the lying liberal media.,optionhome,e9abmvn,conservative
"Not only that but we also got a cap on our income tax, which is great!",NCSUGrad2012,e9841it,conservative
"I would like to see NC take the initiative along with this amendment to possibly reduce the cost for a basic NC ID, and truly make sure that it's accessible to everyone. 

Also, they (we) need to get the gerrymandering shit settled. ",blankstare100,e9869bq,conservative
I proudly voted for this. So glad it passed!,Mr_0pportunity,e982zy0,conservative
Democrat here- I voted for it.,bigfruitbasket,e98lzc0,conservative
I saw that passed im pretty excited,freedomhertz,e9817ro,conservative
"This is HUGE in what has become a purple state. 

No more dead voters. No more illegal alien voters. ",mikeygio,e981l5d,conservative
"As a legal immigrant under a college visa but not a us citizen, I’m glad. My fiancée got her ballot thru mail (Maryland) and I couldn’t believe how easy it seems to vote not being a citizen or permanent resident. All you need is your id (which I have) and an utility bill (which I also have).

Ninja edit: don’t get me wrong, I’d LOVE to vote, but I rather wait for my citizenship and not undermine Americans’ votes.",TheBizarrelyNormal,e98hij0,conservative
Gonna go ahead and mark that one off the potential swing states.,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e982rlz,conservative
Not requiring voter ID is seriously one of the most asinine things I have ever heard legit emails proposed. ,areallybigbird,e98lr9e,conservative
"The ""Bailey Act"" is Zero State Income tax on military or civil service retirees helped steer me here. Born in the Kannapolis, NC area, but lived most of my adult life in SC.",Eb73,e98kx0d,conservative
It truly frightens me that all I need to do to vote is give a name and sign a piece of paper.  How many people have taken advantage of this?  Seriously?  How hard is it to show the ID that you are legally responsible to cary at all times anyway?,jdizzle161,e987j6u,conservative
"I am a 20 year old who voted for this! So happy. Hopefully the other states follow our lead. At UNC its hard to express conservative ideas, but im glad the state as a whole voted for it. ",UsernameChecksNotIn,e988o3e,conservative
"Truthfully, I just don’t understand how this isn’t already an implemented mechanism to prevent fraud and increase accountability nationwide. Kudos. ",xavier_a,e99g01n,conservative
I hope the GOP make this a federal law. You know here in California I didnt need an ID. I could have voted 10 times if I was Democrat. Just need to register 10 times under different names in different locations and it would be that easy.,temporaldimension,e99uxqb,conservative
Huge achievement.  I voted for this and am overjoyed that it passed.,anytownusa11,e986aei,conservative
"Tarheel here. At the polls, several voters reached for their wallets, saying ""Do you need ID?"" The poll workers would say, ""No, but you can vote for that,"" nodding toward the voting booths.

OTOH cool, but on the other, a little disturbing that those citizens didn't know a) the law and b) on what they would be voting",RomeoMyHomeo,e98kv00,conservative
That’s one I definitely voted for. It just makes sense to have to prove you are who you are. ,Ruckus45,e98873l,conservative
"This one, the right to hunt, and income tax cap... my state's going in a good direction finally",erik2420,e98di9m,conservative
Seriously how hard is it to present an ID? It takes .2 seconds to do,All_In_The_Waiting,e98gjic,conservative
I hope Massachusetts takes this initiative (doubt it though). I was in line for another 10 minutes last night because this couple with foreign passports were trying to vote. Eventually they gave them a provisional ballot. Ridiculous. I think the federal government should issue a photo ID (that gets updated like every 2-5 years) to all legal citizens and have it have some official imprint (like driver licenses) so people can't use fakes. Why is that so hard to do? ,WannabeBadGalRiri,e988f7x,conservative
I couldn't fill in that oval quick enough.  So glad my vote counted!,Kythorne,e98afe8,conservative
"Those fascists! Soon they'll require ID to buy liquor, cigarettes and to cash checks! ",d-law,e98myk9,conservative
Good to hear. This will definitely make votes more legitimate!!,goldrotmgonly,e98bzky,conservative
Damn right we did.,Cuisinart_Killa,e98eor5,conservative
Hell yeah. I was a part of that!,Joemur96,e98etgo,conservative
"What was the argument against voter ID lol 

Can't believe this is even an issue on the ballot ",MoistStallion,e992j9l,conservative
Weird how states poll red after vetting their eligibility to vote.,CNNTouchesChildren,e989pwx,conservative
I’m glad we will now be able to stop the .0001% of voter fraud that occurs in the state. Every vote counts. ,NorwegianWood28,e98e4xd,conservative
"I am so envious. Here in MD, to vote you need to just give your name, street address, and date of birth. So I could just go to the [obituaries](https://www.legacy.com/obituaries/washingtonpost/browse) get a name and date of birth. Then go and put their name in [people search](https://www.instantcheckmate.com/people/) and look up their address in public records. Then I just show up and vote as the recently deceased, who most likely is still on the voter rolls.

An ID would stop that. But I suppose that disenfranchises dead voters.",Lepew1,e9ame5s,conservative
"qI wish we could follow here in Cali, could solve some issues. But  it won't happen.",Terra_green2,e98lbb7,conservative
Second time ever voting and I've ready helped make a difference. Feels good,zeldaisaprude,e98tgfq,conservative
"So racist.

\#endlessMAGA",TheComedianGLP,e99784j,conservative
The way you troll the pollsters in MD is to give them your driver's license and say nothing.,Lepew1,e98v5qe,conservative
I’m happy to see this; the only common reason people won’t have a national ID is if they’re not a citizen ,Haxonek,e98xl8u,conservative
I don’t see why democrats hate this. Like how does one not have an ID?,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e98zjol,conservative
I don't understand why this isn't a thing in every state.,0fxgvn,e9973h6,conservative
"Bunch of racists, obviously. /s",RiskMatrix,e986p19,conservative
"Hell yes, I voted for this.",monsieur_chevre,e98alp5,conservative
Racist!!! Reeeeeeeeeee,Gonzila077,e98fbkk,conservative
Good result. Common sense won for once.,WPWeasel,e98b5o3,conservative
"Jealous...

CA resident here...ugh. ",jamesmir89,e984a54,conservative
"We had a great day at the polls yesterday here in NC. Mark Harris snagged his seat, income tax ceiling, voter ID.

Makes the (inevitable frankly) loss of the House Majority sting a little bit less. Our state is doing fine",Im_Not_Kevin,e98etiz,conservative
"Yeah 4/6 not bad, especially getting the 2 most important ones. Go Pack!",AmericanYidGunner,e984h1l,conservative
"Arkansas raised the minimum wage, passed voter ID, and voted to allow casinos, all in the same ballot. Left, right, left. ha ha!",blsmothermon,e98g4iy,conservative
NJ just voted to give Community Colleges $500 Million in grants/scholarships.,nicksvr4,e9884tq,conservative
Jesus that’s like hitting the lottery!!! Good job.  Here in NJ we r giving it away with our taxes 👍🏻🇺🇸,Maiden64,e98c2wz,conservative
What!? A percentage cap or a flat dollar cap? ,kfb007570,e98cibf,conservative
A lower cap...,seawolf06,e98ei8d,conservative
That's awesome.  Meanwhile here in Missouri we got medical marijuana and a minimum wage hike to 12.80 or so over the course of a few years.  It's something like an 85 cent per year increase.,ponmbr,e98ayyb,conservative
"In Florida, we have an income tax cap at zero, which is why we weren't having anything to do with a Bernie Sanders style leftist as governor.",Faraday314,e98g4vn,conservative
"The cost of a basic ID is $13, which is already pretty cheap.  Rather than reduce costs just make it free.",PerceivedShift,e9870ur,conservative
[You can get a free voting ID in NC.](https://www.ncdot.gov/dmv/license-id/identification/Documents/Approved%20List%20of%20Acceptable%20Documents.pdf#search=voter%20id),space-ninja,e98p1x1,conservative
The dems will never support voter id laws. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9936dp,conservative
I think for some groups it is free,KM4WDK,e98aqqu,conservative
ID can be delivered for those that cannot get to a dmv location as well. ,seawolf06,e98ekj2,conservative
I voted for this and I am not technically conservative. I hate that everything just falls under one of two columns :( ,UniformFox_trotOscar,e98mp7j,conservative
As did I! So glad to see the income tax cap passed as well.,cons_NC,e987l0z,conservative
Also voted for this!,MrSelfDestruct57,e98z4ad,conservative
Measures like this usually pass pretty easily. It's activist judges that get in the way.,MillennialDan,e98kqmf,conservative
"Ditto, kiddo. Not everything falls under the same umbrella. ",UniformFox_trotOscar,e98mw7c,conservative
"To be fair (and I voted for this amendment as well), the 2016 vote audit in NC revealed just a handful of votes cast in the entire state for deceased voters.  ",Speedking2281,e985poj,conservative
"Is a NC ID not required already to vote? In CA we have to provide our govt ID to vote. Shouldn't a govt ID be enough? I just think requiring a separate ID specifically for voting is a bit redundant and unnecessary. Is this new ID going to be free?

 I really don't know how a separate voter ID solves any of these issues. All I see is a waste of resources for something that doesn't really seem to solve any problems and if anything just creates a slight nuisance for people that want to vote.",Double-O,e98z2pg,conservative
If only we did this in Texas,notsurewhatiam,e99up4d,conservative
"This violates the 24th amendment, it’ll be struck down in the courts.",swampthang_,e98cq7y,conservative
No more valid voter who don’t have IDs ,audiate,e98b45r,conservative
"Your respect for the law is greatly appreciated, my guy. I hope you are able to receive your citizenship soon as the US will be a better place when you do. ",Ledcookey,e98jbf8,conservative
What ID are you talking about that you think would allow you to vote without being a citizen?,IamTheBlade,e9au788,conservative
"It blows my mind how many liberals move here to escape the consequences of their voting in their home state then continue to vote that way here. 

Look, if you want lower taxes, lower housing costs, and more freedoms then stop voting for the left ",Ruckus45,e988bqh,conservative
I don’t know about that. Urban leftists are infecting us all. Look how close the races were in GA too and not just the governor. I fear it’s only a matter of time...,gt4674b,e987qtd,conservative
ID is required when you register.,IamTheBlade,e9au9yz,conservative
There is no law in NC that states you have to carry ID at all times.,MyOpus,e989csj,conservative
"At all times? I have one so that I can drive, not so that I can walk around town. ",Wallaby_Way_Sydney,e989v89,conservative
"There is no law requiring citizens to have an ID card on them, except if you are driving, boarding planes, attempting to purchase alcohol, etc. ",Whiskey_Dry,e98a56g,conservative
The government can't compel you to carry anything. It sure as hell can't compel your to carry an ID either.,HumbleInflation,e98f8oy,conservative
Basically every other country on earth (with elections) has some sort of voter ID if they can do it with no issues so can we,ImagineAllTheKarma,e99hsns,conservative
"Well they do keep a log of your signatures, I'm sure with computers nowadays it would be pretty easy to spot the forgeries. What I find silly though is that they printed out a sticker with my signature on it already, and then asked me to sign (not in NC)",rtomek,e99o8md,conservative
UNCG conservative checking in!,mustang336,e98gmmk,conservative
"Bc plenty of people (republicans) will do what they can to make sure people can’t vote, especially minorities. You can find plenty of different measures politicians have taken to prevent people from voting. MA won’t bite on that at all we’re one of the few states that are actually educated ",triplechin5155,e98yjjr,conservative
"It's not really weird, if you make everyone need an ID, and then shut down the dmv in liberal counties, it's the most logical result. ",CrookedShepherd,e98hpzd,conservative
So you admit that it occurs.  Nice to know.,nixfu,e98gd50,conservative
"Because we all know that liquor stores, the smoke shop, check cashing, pawn shops, renting an apartment, applying for government assistance, etc., etc. don't require you to have photo id either. Oh wait...you have photo ID for THOSE things, but not for voting? Right.",blsmothermon,e98gfxt,conservative
I would like to get prop 13 here though.   That’s nice. ,NCSUGrad2012,e984h2o,conservative
"Come over to Utah, we’re already getting an exodus of Cali morons coming here, might as well try to balance it out with some conservative Cali folks. We just passed MMJ if that’s your thing and we don’t try and fuck your rights every chance we get, it’s great over here.",Ohnoidontlikethat,e98vtre,conservative
"Sacramento here.  I woke up this morning and couldn't believe that 6 was shot down.  I had already said 'what can ya do?' with Gavin.  Every bond and spending bill passed.  Meanwhile, 100,000 more a year are leaving than coming into this state.  I don't know the economic breakdown of those leaving, but I sure would like to.  My guess is it is middle class and small business tax base who are just tired of it.  I am tired of our Assembly just flat out poorly spending what money they do have, I am against any more taxing and spending of the citizens money until you [the CA governenmt] can show me you are being responsible with the monies we *already* give you.",Javad0g,e98wmmz,conservative
Also jealous. Our income taxes are out of control here in Maine. ,TheLarryMullenBand,e98mbec,conservative
Amen,The_Mighty_Rex,e98mmc3,conservative
NY resident here. A day doesn't pass by in which i don't envy someone not living in my state.,Boof-Bubba-Dale,e98wa03,conservative
I still find it absolutely nuts that a blue state like Washington has no state income tax.,JazzHandsFan,e991v50,conservative
"I don't even feel bad for you.  Move out of that shit hole, it's not going to get any better.  Let the left destroy the state.

Edit: this was a general negative sentiment towards Cali politics.",Castaway77,e989eg2,conservative
"Yeah, I totally agree.  The two I cared about the most won (voter identification and income cap) and the two that lost deserved to lose.   Wolfpack!!!",NCSUGrad2012,e984jmm,conservative
"Doesn't sound too bad. Minimum wage being raised, eh, if it's done slowly then you won't notice a difference. Voter ID is good, and allowing casinos brings in more taxes to the state so that they won't raise it on the people. Hopefully.",Scozzar,e98om7q,conservative
"Oh, America: Equal misery, and baby steps in opposite directions, for all. ",accountno543210,e98l9bg,conservative
And re-elected a total crook. ,NCSUGrad2012,e99hw49,conservative
I believe that it’s capped at 7%,uncballer1729,e98hbof,conservative
Oooft. That minimum wage hike isn't gonna help your economy any. Unfortunate. :/,Mewster1818,e98gocj,conservative
"That is pretty high given the cost of living.

Expect rapid inflation, increasing inequality, and more homelessness.",highonstress,e98rucm,conservative
I wouldn’t say “wernt having anything to do” they guy almost won lol. He didn’t lose by like 10%,Zac1245,e98vtyp,conservative
Yeah that's my thought process as well. Every country that requires voter ID issues them at no cost. It would also remove most debates around voter ID.  ,blankstare100,e987rra,conservative
"If we’re requiring it for voter ID, then it should be free. I have homeless patients who get out of the hospital and go to the pharmacy and have to decline their necessary medications if they have any sort of copay because they don’t have one dollar to their name. Voter turnout helps all of us no matter who a person votes for. It helps ensure that corrupt politicians don’t stay in office for the tenure that they sometimes end up staying elected simply because no one shows up to vote them out. I don’t want those people to have another reason not to get out and vote.",Myheartisinrio,e98f87a,conservative
"The ""voter ID"" is free.",chief89,e98am1f,conservative
It has to be free or it violates the 24th amendment.,swampthang_,e98csiy,conservative
Aka paid for by taxpayers.   So *subsidized* is the correct word.   Not free.  ,BeerOnTap,e98is15,conservative
[deleted],,e987kjb,conservative
I think they will as long as the law does not require payment for the ID (a poll tax) and has a method of distribution available to all. If this were to happen on a national level it could also double as a national ID which could be used to phase out the SSN which is incredibly unsecure.,riseoftheorange,e99nc9r,conservative
"Yes, me too! ",Mr_0pportunity,e98a6bd,conservative
"Where I live in NJ, several local races were tied the last few years or decided by 1 vote. 

Every vote counts. ",mikeygio,e987z3x,conservative
Even 1 false vote is enough to cause me to worry.,MrSelfDestruct57,e98z3pk,conservative
I thought the bigger issue was immigrants. It might not be a big problem for NC but it’s a big problem in boarder states like CA that don’t require ID,Haxonek,e98xogw,conservative
">The citizens of North Carolina voted in favor of an amendment to their state constitution that would require photo ID before voting.

The piece doesn’t mention a separate “voter ID”. The title of the piece may be misleading?

What’s important is that this is now a permanent fixture in their Constitution and cannot be rescinded very easily by Democrats. Expect a lawsuit, however. ",mikeygio,e98zkdf,conservative
"You can get a [voting-only ID card for free](https://www.dmv.org/nc-north-carolina/id-cards.php) in North Carolina if you don't already have a license, so this does not violate the 24th Amendment because you're not levying anything that could constitute a ""tax"". ",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e98ii5e,conservative
"Not if you can get an ID for free, unless I'm reading the amendment wrong (or unless the word ""tax"" means more here than I realize)",h3half,e98dd5h,conservative
Many States have Voter ID laws.....  So NO. ,ozric101,e98dt8n,conservative
Nope the Supreme Court has upheld voter id many times,Going2MAGA,e9921ll,conservative
"Who, exactly?",Doctor_McKay,e98bpf6,conservative
"I always ask, but who are these theoretical people?

How do you get to voting age without a legal form of ID? You'd have to not have an apartment, not go to college, not drive, not have a cellphone, not have any bills, no job, not on welfare, no forms of insurance.",regollyek,e98mkpj,conservative
I fear this is where Texas is headed.,fifaislife206,e98au5n,conservative
"To be fair, people are moving to the R-D-CH Triangle because of the economic development. How much of that is attributable to state policies and how much is attributed to having Duke, NC State, and UNC right next door to each other is probably a more educated economist's guess than mine. ",the42up,e98gh18,conservative
"That is what i hate, why come ruined the state, when your shithole blue states are so high taxed and too much regulations. ",Kevin84333,e9c5oyk,conservative
"Hmm, two groups are driving growth in R-D-CH and Charlotte-Mecklenberg. Highly educated/skilled workers and Mexican immigrant families. Both groups tend to be left leaning. In particular, there is quite a bit of research that suggests that the more formally educated a person is, the more likely they are to be liberal. 

That said, R-D-CH has the highest per capita PhDs in the nation. You arnt going to having a booming bio and tech industry without that. And with all those PhDs comes a lot of liberal voters. Just the name of the game. ",the42up,e993npn,conservative
The whole country could really use more density decreasing urban planning laws.,sirbonce,e98bkyx,conservative
[deleted],,e989hx0,conservative
"Or an officer having probable cause to ask for an ID.  ""Stop and Identify"" law.",jdizzle161,e98bfp5,conservative
That guy said “it’s scary” you aren’t required to carry ID. Like wtf. If I don’t wanna carry ID and walk around town I shouldn’t be required too. ,Zac1245,e98ne7k,conservative
"You’re required to carry ID to purchase tobacco, alcohol, firearms, etc.

It most certainly does.",-bojangles,e99wzjz,conservative
🙌🏻🙌🏻,UsernameChecksNotIn,e98gxb6,conservative
I'm a minority though...And how would the government sending me an official ID make it harder for me to vote? ,WannabeBadGalRiri,e991vfk,conservative
Any evidence of this happening?,CNNTouchesChildren,e98hxo1,conservative
"My understanding is that one of the values conservatives want to push is limiting government intervention unless it’s absolutely necessary. If multiple nonpartisan, independent studies have found that the quantify of fraudulent votes is less than the margin of error for when the votes are counted, then why get the government involved? Politicians’ time is very valuable, why waste it trying to fix problems that don’t exist?

If the independent studies previously mentioned did discover that there was a significant rate of voting fraud, then sure, draft the legislation to stop it. ",NorwegianWood28,e9am9xc,conservative
Let's disenfranchised 10% of all voters to stop the .00001% of actually proven fraud! ,CrookedShepherd,e98hya7,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/9nohQh4.jpg,Hayes_for_days,e999vqp,conservative
But its racist because reasons,Gonzila077,e98gjuq,conservative
"They just reversed some of its protections though through saying no to Prop 5 and the gas tax repeal failed miserably. 

I am honestly looking for the first opportunity to leave the state. It's quickly becoming unlivable. ",jamesmir89,e984jxn,conservative
You realize how terrible prop 13 actually is right? They were worried about property tax getting to high so they capped it at a percentage of what you bought the place for which kicks the can down the road. Prop 13 is the reason people are paying 1 mill for a shed in California.,etibbs,e98ck9u,conservative
"Just left Park City not too long ago. I loved UT. Can't wait to go back, trying to sell my wife on the place too, tbh. ",jamesmir89,e98wex4,conservative
"I would love to live in Utah some day tbh. Never been to the state, but something about it has a pull on me, I don't know what though",asphaltcement123,e98yclq,conservative
"The California rulers were counting on bankrupting CA and getting a President Hillary cash bailout.

Your future now is quite bleak.

Your rulers' future is even more bleak.",TheComedianGLP,e997tzo,conservative
"This right here is exactly how I feel. Remember earlier in the year when they passed that water bill for 4 billion? They just tried to pass another prop for 4 billion MORE. AGAIN. And there was a surplus from the last bill they past a few years back, but they need more? 

It's getting out of hand. ",jamesmir89,e98wvlz,conservative
"Eh at least we rejected that rent control proposition, too bad they didn't vote to repeal the gas tax",asphaltcement123,e98yh88,conservative
"Prop 3 failed according to the SF Chronicle's site. And 2 was one of those annoying approve to allocate funds for a specific purpose that arguably should have been allowed anyways, but it's funded by a Prop so it has to go through the voters deals.

Edit: full disclosure- liberal who usually lurks.",Whole_Roll,e99bb66,conservative
"Prop 6 failed because the attorney general changed the wording to deceive voters. If it said ""Repeal Gas Tax"" instead of ""eliminate road repair funding"" we would have repealed it. Such a scumbag move. ",angethedude,e9aacwp,conservative
"I feel ya man, I've li ed within 40 miles of Sac my whole life and it's just getting worse and worse. Spending is stunningly high for a place where nothing actually gets done.",The_Mighty_Rex,e99644l,conservative
Already know that's what I'll be doing at the first available moment. ,jamesmir89,e989rof,conservative
That is really only a possibility if you have the financial means to do so. It's a viscous cycle. At least in my case. Cost of living etc means I have no money which means I can't afford to move which means I'm stuck losing all my money to taxes and the like.,The_Mighty_Rex,e98mql6,conservative
"If you really are a gay conservative I just want to ask, how do you approach your friends who aren’t conservative? I’m not gay myself but I imagine it’s got to be difficult sometimes.",ThePointMan117,e98ekgx,conservative
Go Pack!,MaterialWolf,e988cks,conservative
"I'm never a fan of the casinos. The surrounding area is always a dump, and West Memphis is no different.

And it's not like it's some sort of win for free market capitalism. They authorized exactly 4 casinos, 2 of which already exist, in 4 different counties. So, two more counties will have a single monopoly on the local casino, and their areas will go to crap, too. You can say it's about taxes and all that, but like the lottery, a disproportionate number of people paying this ""tax"" are the people who can't afford. You might as well just tax people for being poor.",aboardthegravyboat,e992cid,conservative
Still good. 8.5% in DC over 60k :(.,kfb007570,e98khh2,conservative
Yeah I don't get how we overwhelmingly elected Hawley and simultaneously passed this abomination.  ,ponmbr,e98h1ef,conservative
"> Every country that requires voter ID issues them at no cost. It would also remove most debates around voter ID.

While I agree that it should be free (honestly how much does it cost the government, not $13 that's for sure) that isn't a true statement. 

Edit Shouldn't to should

Maybe in western countries?   ",PerceivedShift,e98856f,conservative
"No, no, you dont understand because of your white privilege. Requiring any effort whatsoever out of a person to vote is racist.

Also, someway, somehow, the concept that people of color are less capable of things requiring effort not racist.

&#x200B;

/s",chii0628,e98b1f1,conservative
"It doesn't remove the debate, leftists claim that just having to go to the DMV is too hard for minorities.",cornshelltortilla,e98oocb,conservative
[Voting ID *is* free.](https://www.ncdot.gov/dmv/license-id/identification/Documents/Approved%20List%20of%20Acceptable%20Documents.pdf#search=voter%20id),space-ninja,e98p5wk,conservative
"> I have homeless patients who get out of the hospital and go to the pharmacy and have to decline their necessary medications if they have any sort of copay because they don’t have one dollar to their name. 

In NC at least, the subject of this thread, homeless can acquire an ID for free, there are other exceptions as well in NC.

The reality is voting is hardly ever totally free for anybody.  It may require taking time off work, paying for public transportation, and endless other things.  

The trouble is what cost imposed would be considered ""excessive"" for the government to charge?  $5, $10, $100?  This debate is very subjective and when talking about someone's right to vote it should argued that rights should *never be left up to subjectivity.*  Therefore I am all for making ID's free of charge by the government to ensure cost (Therefore rights) will never be abused as has been witnessed in other countries.  I would be on board with such a law.

To go a little off-topic I apply similar logic to someone's right to life concerning the subjectivity of when human life begins.  It can be argued 6 ways to Sunday, but the reality is every opinion is subjective, therefore better be safe and protect someone's right to life from conception.",PerceivedShift,e98gjoe,conservative
That's just not true,PUBG_Rico,e987x71,conservative
"Yea, silly not to have one, when I see the lower class walking around with iPhone X's the idea they can't afford an ID is ridiculous.  Back when I sold cell phones in 2005 in a low income neighborhood I'd see these people paying $250/mo on a cell phone plan!  I knew because they'd come in to pay their bill...and they'd buy these plans, I was always amazed.",PerceivedShift,e987y9o,conservative
I just cannot fathom a scerenio where someone can't go to the DMV and get an ID. Nor have I ever met anyone who didn't have an ID. ,VeganMcVeganface,e99olzk,conservative
I know of one of them. ,nicksvr4,e9888nw,conservative
Californian here. It’s definitely a problem because they just voted to use tax money to build houses for illegal immigrants.,Storm-Of-Aeons,e99gd2o,conservative
Well that makes sense then. So before this you can just show up and vote with no proof of identity?,Double-O,e9912ka,conservative
[Linking the actual NCDOT website since the link you provided is not the official government website.](https://www.ncdot.gov/dmv/license-id/identification/Documents/Approved%20List%20of%20Acceptable%20Documents.pdf#search=voter%20id),blankstare100,e98kwle,conservative
You mean you can get a voter ID card provided by the taxpayers. ,pedantic--asshole,e98ocm8,conservative
"As we saw with SCOTUS and Obamacare, ""tax"" means whatever you want it to mean!",makeitAJ,e98dyd7,conservative
And Virginia...,jedichric,e98czl7,conservative
"A little of column A and a little of column B. Young, educated workforce plus a standard of living they can afford makes sense for many companies looking to grow.  The fact you can live a good lifestyle in that area on $60k plus a year is also probably very appealing to out of state employees as well. 

Charlotte metro has also grown by leaps and bounds for the same reason.  ",Ruckus45,e98h5hy,conservative
"It's a combination of opportunity + low cost/freedom. There is no shortage of opportunity in Cali and NY, it just so happens that they are prohibitively expensive and rigid, due to overtaxation and overregulation.",MackMizzo,e98tqcg,conservative
"You are incorrect.  Not having a license is fairly common, and it is not illegal to not have one. 


If you meant you cannot drive without one, then yes, you could be ticketed. ",exdirrk,e989rol,conservative
"Yeah, sure about that:
https://wileynickel.com/raleigh-defense-lawyer-blog/2015/3/11/know-your-rights-when-do-i-have-to-give-a-police-officer-my-2.html

Only requirement for ID is if you're operating a motor vehicle, then you do of course.
",MyOpus,e989klg,conservative
"Two issues:

a) NC does not have a “Stop and Identify” law.

b) That’s not what a “Stop and Identify” law is; those laws require you to stop, identify and explain yourself to an officer verbally. They do not require you to carry photo ID or face arrest.",onlaserdisc,e99zykm,conservative
"Yes, you could chose to buy controlled substances, if you want to. You can chose to buy and operate a car, but the government can't force you. It can't force you to buy insurance either.",HumbleInflation,e9ad2qq,conservative
"Here is just a small example, without going into many of the ways politicians have tried and successfully or unsuccessfully disenfranchised people

https://www.aclu.org/other/oppose-voter-id-legislation-fact-sheet",triplechin5155,e9957kq,conservative
"[in 2014, Alabama began requiring voter ID.  In 2015, they closed every DMV in every county with greater than 75% black population.](https://www.rawstory.com/2015/10/alabama-to-stop-issuing-drivers-licenses-in-counties-with-75-black-registered-voters/)",starwolf256,e98o7fw,conservative
"If you think voter fraud only makes up "".00001%"" of votes then you are delusional. Might as well say the sky is green.",shivore,e99jcb2,conservative
You think 10% of your voter base can’t get an ID? How condescending.,quadrophenia515,e98s1of,conservative
"""Disenfranchise""

You guys absolutely eat the hell out of all the bullshit you're fed, huh. ",Ledcookey,e98jhao,conservative
"Because the process disprotionately effects people who didn't have access to a hospital ~50 years ago and therefore don't have a birth certificate (thanks Jim crow!), people whose names have changed (sorry ladies), people with more than 2 last names (like many Latin americans), people who live on reservations with no street address (the state ID given to natives isn't a form of valid ID?!), etc. 

In total up to 1 in 5 voters won't have a valid form of ID when these measures pass, and then the real fun begins as polling places and DMVs start shutting down, in some places one can't get a valid ID without traveling up to 50 miles. If this was about fraud then first we would need a coherent idea of how fraud occurs, and how's its done (which we don't have), and effective measures to make sure there were no de facto or de jure barriers to getting an ID (which no red state that passes these laws has done). All of this coupled with the fact that in every case the barriers are erected in ways that disproportionately effect the opposition party and its difficult to keep up any pretense that these laws are neutral. ",CrookedShepherd,e98l6xh,conservative
We aren’t a solid red state but we do have super cheap cost of living and a great job market.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e9854nn,conservative
We're leaving for NC in the next year. California's gonna become even worse to live in. I am always appalled at the propositions to waste yet more money which will never go to anything but lining pockets. And don't even bring up the gas tax repeal. Ugh.,neemarita,e98gpa9,conservative
"Yeah, just wait until we've had a couple of years of the insane CA legislature having power unchecked by Jerry Brown's vetoes. ",soxfan90,e9863i2,conservative
Texas welcomes Conservative refugees.  ,Mewster1818,e98fx76,conservative
"I think the gas tax repeal failed because of how it was written on the ballot.  Also now we've given CA our checkbook and signed them all for them to use without asking, which was part of it as well.

On the bright side (/s) we now also get to possibly pay for medical care for anyone in California regardless if they're a resident or not.  Live in the World and require medical care?  Set foot on CA soil and CA taxpayers will foot the bill!  That's the platform Gavin Newsom was  running on.",A1cntrler,e98imot,conservative
I want out so bad.  I'm surrounded by a voter block that consistently votes against its own (and therefore my) best interests. I feel like I live behind enemy lines. But I'm stuck here because all our family is here. ,d_grizzle,e98xgz2,conservative
I can't believe that gas tax repeal failed. I'll never understand people that willingly and excitedly reach into their pockets to toss their last nickel to Uncle Sam,mnslice,e995vzw,conservative
I wish they would have split the bill into two parts. Being able to vote on new taxes would have been awesome.,Vector-Zero,e98i5ff,conservative
How does that work?,lolol42,e98k3v9,conservative
It’s a paradise IMO. Please come over to help balance out the leftist droves moving here trying to ruin the state!,Ohnoidontlikethat,e990mul,conservative
"It’s beautiful, our taxes aren’t ridiculous, and we motherfuckin’ love the second amendment. So glad I was born here, I couldn’t picture myself living anywhere else. Come on over buddy, we need more conservatives to stem the parasitic spread of west coast leftists who fuck their states up then come here and try to do the same thing, it’s like they’re mindless lol.",Ohnoidontlikethat,e990j9m,conservative
We need some help to take these fuckers out of power!,Storm-Of-Aeons,e99fqsy,conservative
*cough* 'high' speed rail  *cough*,Javad0g,e98xetp,conservative
agreed.,Javad0g,e98yqrw,conservative
"That's rough, my comment was basically a general sentiment about Cali politics.",Castaway77,e99fwg6,conservative
"I assume it's like being a conservative black man,

except all your friends call you ""Uncle Fag"".",TheComedianGLP,e9981n3,conservative
I guess the same way that I approach anyone.  I’m not bringing up politics but I’m free to tell you my views if you want.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e99huli,conservative
Move to Virginia lol,Zac1245,e98m4y6,conservative
"Unfortunately, uninformed voters exist in both parties. I have friends and relatives that vote for their ""family"" party with no concept of what they're actually supporting.",Mewster1818,e98ps7z,conservative
">Maybe in western countries

Should've specified, but yes, that I've come across, anyways. I work in a field where I've come across various foreign voter IDs (for non-voting services) and have asked the process of obtaining them.

>While I agree that it shouldn't be free

Did you mean to say 'should'?",blankstare100,e989p5j,conservative
Probably costs more than $13. Never forget the government's ability to waste money.,Mewster1818,e98j8r8,conservative
"It's funny (not against you) but I'm Hispanic, which makes my conservative viewpoints that much more hard to accept by many within my culture.

&#x200B;

>Also, someway, somehow, the concept that people of color are less capable of things requiring effort not racist.

[While I generally agree with this sentiment, it would be dishonest to ignore or dismiss the shady/blatant efforts that NC (and currently some other states) have taken to discourage voting.](https://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2017/05/15/528457693/supreme-court-declines-republican-bid-to-revive-north-carolina-voter-id-law)

Edit: format",blankstare100,e98c6ey,conservative
[deleted],,e988lrb,conservative
It is True....  It is also againt the law in most places to not have any legal tender on your person. ,ozric101,e98dvxo,conservative
"The elderly? Disabled people? It’s much easier to just mail IDs to people along with the option to get it from the DMV. We also need automatic voter registration, and move Election Day to a national holiday, or expand voting over an extended period. ",riseoftheorange,e99p7uv,conservative
"Here is a report on how those challenges play out. 

http://www.brennancenter.org/publication/challenge-obtaining-voter-identification",mario_meowingham,e99wsk3,conservative
Yes. I’ve never had to provide ID to vote in NC. Just confirm name and address. ,rs_alli,e99f7vl,conservative
"Then this is legit. As long as the IDs are free and relatively easy to apply for, I'm all about this, and I lean pretty heavy left.",swampthang_,e98lfei,conservative
"The rest of the voting process is paid for by taxpayers. So, yeah. ",Tyrannosaurus_Rox_,e98p6a5,conservative
"Every November I'm more and more glad I left Virginia. 
My home county, which has always been solid red, voted for Kaine. ",BillionCub,e98eblt,conservative
[deleted],,e98a0dg,conservative
[deleted],,e989ow1,conservative
"So the conversation went from compel to force.... huh

",-bojangles,e9b4qgn,conservative
But I’m asking you why a government issued ID (for ex. When a SSN is issued) makes it more difficult to vote for minorities?,WannabeBadGalRiri,e997nj9,conservative
"SS cards are issued at birth, for free, and are a valid ID",-bojangles,e99x2aj,conservative
Bull. They closed *some* satellite locations in those counties. There are still regular DMV locations there.,onlaserdisc,e9a04uq,conservative
"And drivers licenses aren’t the only valid form of ID, so your conclusion doesn’t really hold.",quadrophenia515,e98s7ip,conservative
Do you have proof to the contrary?,CrookedShepherd,e99lf98,conservative
They can't if there's no DMV for 50 miles. ,CrookedShepherd,e98wi94,conservative
"https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/15/us/politics/voter-id-laws-supreme-court-north-carolina.html

The Supreme Court on Monday refused to revive a restrictive North Carolina voting law that a federal appeals court had struck down as an unconstitutional effort to “**target African-Americans with almost surgical precision**.” 

That is a direct quote from the court, buddy.",slingler,e98s4o6,conservative
Source on your 1 in 5? Do you really think there's that many people without a driver's license?,Hayes_for_days,e99a0vi,conservative
Stop before you make me pack my bags there bub... :) ,jamesmir89,e9856fr,conservative
East of 95 the job market isnt that great.  Quite a bit of industry moved out in the 80s and agribusinesses is now king of our financial landscape.  I wonder how long that will last.,CaLyPsy,e98mnf2,conservative
"what state? and i work as a slot technician at a major casino, what jobs are down there that transfer the skills i have?",Kotef,e989qe6,conservative
"And absolutely beautiful state. Drove from Nags Head to Mt. Mitchell this summer with the fam.

I will never go back to Nags Head. That shit is not kid friendly. Looked at that beach for 5 seconds and told my wife our two boys aren't going in the ocean. Saw wild horses though. 
 ",HendersonDaRainKing,e98l9pc,conservative
My dad works in Charlotte but lives in SC because it's cheaper...,CBScott7,e98huv8,conservative
"I feel you man. So many propositions that will be spent going to pet projects and illegal aliens. How do people expect to pay for all of this? MORE TAXES! 

This state is so fucking stupid. The gas tax repeal failed, the no-speed rail will continue to balloon into a 200 billion dollar project, yet nearly 4 in 10 Californians live near the poverty line. We can't afford to blow money on these wasteful projects when nearly half the state is living in squalor.

It's going to get worse with ""Gun-grabbin"" Gavin Newsom. Even more crime, higher taxes, more restrictions on firearms, and being even softer on crime.",Scozzar,e98oeh4,conservative
"Holy crap, great minds!",TheComedianGLP,e997fq7,conservative
"CA is the perfect Alinsky laboratory.

It will soon be completely destroyed, barring some sort of idiot-killing plauge or a MAGA awakening.",TheComedianGLP,e997jct,conservative
Don't forget free preschool. ,jamesmir89,e98ixh9,conservative
"As an Arizona Resident, I thank you in advance for your sacrifice. Jk but seriously, that sucks",davetn37,e98jbyv,conservative
There should be a subreddit for CA expats who've left for greener tax pastures. ,jamesmir89,e98xn21,conservative
"To hell with the family.

Get your ass to Texas.

Free iphones and FaceTime for everyone you leave behind.",TheComedianGLP,e997mjt,conservative
"How does what work?

edit: If you're asking how capping the property tax at a percentage of what you bought it at increases housing prices then the explanation is simple. The property value of those homes continues to increase meanwhile the tax is constant. This creates an easy investment for those who currently own the homes reducing the number of people willing to sell at any given time. This in turn creates a positive feedback loop since those looking to buy have fewer options creating a sellers market. Since prices become much higher for homes renting becomes the only option, however those renting houses can inflate the rent price since renters have no other options. During that time the people renting out their places have a set tax that will never increase making it very lucrative further driving up housing prices. You see the problem?",etibbs,e98nzto,conservative
"Haha, don't you love that? Wait, so you're telling me you left because prices were too high...but you're voting for the same thing somewhere else? ",jamesmir89,e990wqm,conservative
I suggest a genetically-engineered virus that only infects traitors.,TheComedianGLP,e99ho3a,conservative
...don't remind me. ,jamesmir89,e98xoix,conservative
I’d love to hear them!,ThePointMan117,e99idj4,conservative
Which won't matter if they work in DC...,chimpfunkz,e98pvl3,conservative
"> Did you mean to say 'should'?

Yup, fixed",PerceivedShift,e98bdha,conservative
"Im actually hispanic too lol. Its a double edged sword.  On one hand, I can advocate for actually enforcing immigration law and voter ID laws without being called racist by the starbucks drinking white suburbanites with a white savior complex.  On the other hand, ive also been called a race traitor and some wont even talk to me anymore, simply because I support legal immigration and dont give a pass to illegals.

"" [While I generally agree with this sentiment, it would be dishonest to ignore or dismiss the shady/blatant efforts that NC (and currently some other states) have taken to discourage voting.](https://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2017/05/15/528457693/supreme-court-declines-republican-bid-to-revive-north-carolina-voter-id-law) ""

Sure, that happens, but requiring people to identify themselves before performing one of the most important actions that an American can perform should require some form of ID.  I agree that theres a definite argument for free IDs, but the proposition for free IDs is usually met by the left that somehow even getting an free ID is somehow an undue burden. ",chii0628,e98cmdd,conservative
That's just not true and a simple Google search disproves it. NY has a stop and identify law but you can give your name at a minimum. NJ has no such law.,PUBG_Rico,e98cr96,conservative
"You gave 2 examples, which is not the same as ""most places."" Not saying it's not true, but 2 examples is anecdotal

Edit: I've seen your other responses where you've admitted there is no state that 'requires it by law,' so it would probably be best to not keep reiterating this point. ",blankstare100,e98cdrk,conservative
That's also not true. Vagrancy laws such as that have been unconstitutional since the 1960s. Show me an example of one such law.,PUBG_Rico,e98hb9r,conservative
We don't need a national holiday. People can just absentee ballot. ,VeganMcVeganface,e99pnam,conservative
The legislature needs to get in front of this opportunity to remind/promote the free voter ID and encourage the public to get one ahead of time. ,blankstare100,e98rpgs,conservative
"Right, and now it's more expensive. Things aren't free. ",pedantic--asshole,e98s9y6,conservative
Just moved here from a very red state and I'm honestly surprised at how non conservative this state is.,Dudite,e98te75,conservative
I’ve been here eight years. I’m glad to be leaving next year. Once the state legislature flips democrat. It’s all over. ,Zac1245,e98vy0h,conservative
A quick Google search didn't show anything up do you have a source on this?,exdirrk,e98aemx,conservative
You aren't required to carry ID in NJ..,secret_porn_acct,e98ea5c,conservative
"Actually, there is no law in any state that requires you to carry ID at all times:
https://www.quora.com/In-the-US-under-what-situations-are-you-legally-required-to-carry-identification

However, you're right, in some states, you could have a bad day if you don't ID yourself.",MyOpus,e989ueq,conservative
no,HumbleInflation,e9b7dzj,conservative
How do they get around then? ,Jagoff86,e98x6dv,conservative
NYT! Leftist drivel!,NorwegianWood28,e9altg3,conservative
"Alright, not sure what the hell North Carolina was thinking with that law, but Im confused as to how this law, which was seemingly meant to limit the types of acceptable IDs at the polls, points to voter suppression with general IDs proving US citizenship. 

Ill use the same argument Conservatives use all the time. There are about a million things in this country that people can't get or at the very least will have a hard time receiving without proper ID, yet everyone, including the groups you believe laws like this will disenfranchise, manage to get their hands on the necessary IDs to receive them anyway. So why the hell is voting so different? ",Ledcookey,e98tano,conservative
"The DoT estimates [1 in 7 people](https://www.fhwa.dot.gov/policyinformation/pubs/hf/pl11028/chapter4.cfm) of driving age lack a license, or approximately 70 million people. This doesn't include people with invalid ID like tribal licenses (or for a while military ID) , nor does it include people whose name on the voter rolls doesn't match their license. ",CrookedShepherd,e99ltj0,conservative
Do it!!!! Help us turn solid red lol,NCSUGrad2012,e985agu,conservative
"Still the state is growing at > 1% annually which is makes it one of the fastest growing in the nation.  The job markets in the Triad, Triangle and Metro Charlotte are red hot. ",Tyler-Durden825,e98wy73,conservative
Western NC has some Casinos ,BillionCub,e98dwn8,conservative
Harrahs Cherokee Casino & Resort is a huge employer here in Western N.C. ,Eb73,e98ks86,conservative
"Yeah, you want to go more south of Wilmington if you want kid friendly beaches.  ",NCSUGrad2012,e99if2b,conservative
"Yeah, a lot of people in the Charlotte area do that.  My parents still live in Charlotte though. ",NCSUGrad2012,e99icvo,conservative
"Texas is accepting conservative refugees from the Great Democrat Desolation areas.

Y'all get down here.",TheComedianGLP,e997eo9,conservative
“Free”,Tyler-Durden825,e98x0b7,conservative
"I suppose. Seems like taxes property are the issue, if they are incentivizing people to not sell. The only way raising property taxes would affect this would be that rent would rise to accommodate the costs of the increased tax, or forcing people to sell land they can't afford the tax on.

But tbf I think property tax is immoral, since it means that you don't actually own your own property and the government will take it from you if you don't pay. ",lolol42,e98rbis,conservative
"I have been in Northern Cali since the late 70s.  For the first time ever, just this last year I said to my wife ""maybe when the kids are out we should consider moving.""

I never thought I would have said that.  Ever.  But I can see us keeping a foothold in California but moving to somewhere like Texas, North Carolina or TN, in 10 years when the kids are up and out.",Javad0g,e98y341,conservative
"Yeah is does. Cause DC, VA, and MD have a compact where you pay income tax in the state you live in. 

https://tax.virginia.gov/reciprocity

Virginia Residents who:
Work in the District of Columbia, but do not establish residency in Washington, D.C are exempt from taxation there. These Virginia residents will pay income taxes to Virginia. This applies to individual income tax only, not to the District of Columbia Unincorporated Business Franchise Tax.

Don’t downvote me when you don’t know what you are talking about. ",Zac1245,e98qk4d,conservative
"Everyone (wishful thinking) needs to understand that resources are finite, and at the end of the day, the blatant reality is that each country needs to prioritize it's own citizens. There's already many groups of our own citizens (and legal immigrants) and issues not receiving adequate care and attention (e.g. mental health, veterans, etc.) that we cannot just provide endless and fiscally irresponsible aid to undocumented persons. It's not racist to hold this very realistic view, however, I tend to only discuss this viewpoint here or with other conservatives. 

>Sure, that happens, but requiring people to identify themselves before performing one of the most important actions that an American can perform should require some form of ID. I agree that there's a definite argument for free IDs, but the proposition for free IDs is usually met by the left that somehow even getting an free ID is somehow an undue burden.

And we'll all have to ignore those people since they'll complain no matter what. But the logical and constitutional argument (that I agree with) for free IDs is that, if you're going to make IDs mandatory for voting, then charging for them would constitute a poll tax. ",blankstare100,e98fkox,conservative
That is Fine.... you get a free ride to the cop shop to get finger printed.,ozric101,e98dz08,conservative
[deleted],,e98cfml,conservative
"Tell it to the Judge do not cry to me when you are setting in a jail cell waiting on bail.

You mistake the way things should be with the way things are....  

You sound like you have a chip on you shoulder against the police, trust me you are not going to win that fight.    ",ozric101,e98ldv6,conservative
"Many other countries have Election Day as either a national holiday. France has it on a Sunday. The best thing for a healthy democracy to flourish is an engaged people, and getting everyone to vote is the best way to do that.",riseoftheorange,e99r0p8,conservative
Standardization and regulation of the voting process is one of those critical things that are worth the expenditure.,MackMizzo,e98tiz5,conservative
Appropriate username.,BarneyBent,e98x9vr,conservative
[deleted],,e98becm,conservative
Why would anyone want to make that a law. If I wanna go walk around town I shouldn’t have to carry an ID. ,Zac1245,e98nb68,conservative
They can't,CrookedShepherd,e98zdvj,conservative
"probably because we are a democratic nation. Its one of our core principles as a nation. Just like the 2nd amendment. To be honest, I wish conservative state houses would drop the whole voter ID garbage. Research has consistently shown that it causes more harm than good. For every 1 person it might stop illegally voting, it prevents a thousand from voting. 

To me, voter ids laws from republican politicians are the SAME used by democratic politicians with gun control. 
",the42up,e9941ak,conservative
It is such a strange coincidence that all of the people they are trying to stop voting are also the people who would vote Democrat. Politics 101 is trying to make it to so that you have to convince as few of the electorate as possible. [This](https://youtu.be/rStL7niR7gs) video explains it well. Skip to 6:42 to get to the part I’m talking about ,NorwegianWood28,e9aly8h,conservative
"This is literally from the first paragraph of the link you posted:

> In 2009, 87 percent of the driving-age population (age 16 and over) have a license.

Thanks for proving our point.

Edit: I'm saving this post for data in future debates. I really can't thank you enough for doing the research for my own argument for me. I'm in medical school, so it doesn't leave me a lot of time to research these kind of data. You're the best! 👍",Hayes_for_days,e99o7ml,conservative
"Haha, love it. I was honestly considering a move to TN, but I have good friends who left CA to NC and love it there. As you said, affordable housing and decent jobs as well. The pictures they post are out of this world, too. ",jamesmir89,e985dcf,conservative
just some facts concerning property taxes. https://wallethub.com/edu/states-with-the-highest-and-lowest-property-taxes/11585/,octaviosergio2,e9a6k8g,conservative
"Im happy for yall!  Still, east of 95, we aren't asking for much.  Throw us a bone here and there.  We would also like a little bit of that economic growth and jobs to come our way.  The way I see it...if the whole state isnt doing well, we aren't hitting on 8 right cylinders.",CaLyPsy,e99xc03,conservative
ahh alright. I work at Foxwoods. It's great but i'm tired of CT. i'll look into that.,Kotef,e98m0xw,conservative
Those beaches at Nags Head are wicked. Stressed me out. ,HendersonDaRainKing,e99kvo2,conservative
I have family there. We discussed it but it’s too damned hot! I do like Texas.,neemarita,e99eify,conservative
"Working on it. Even with a degree in engineering, it's tough getting work in Texas because they accept local candidates far more. I understand why, but not having a job lined up and moving seems like a bad idea :/",Scozzar,e99daz1,conservative
Yea...,jamesmir89,e98x33z,conservative
"I'm barely starting. My daughter is two months old, but we have had serious conversations about leaving. UT looks like a possibility. ",jamesmir89,e98yaf9,conservative
"In 10 years, you won't be allowed to leave.

Pack up the kids and come to America.

Texas:  We Don't Take Kindly To Bullshit",TheComedianGLP,e997wvs,conservative
"I didn't downvote you. I also didn't know that, thanks.",chimpfunkz,e98qyz7,conservative
"I dont think that we disagree on much actually. As I said, I definitely see the argument for it...  I can also see the societal benefits for having a mandatory free identification card of some sort.   

I just dont think that these people (on the left) are for the most part, arguing in good faith.  I think think they bottom line is that they like flubbing votes with illegals and dead people, and will continue complain about attempts to validate votes no matter how reasonable.    WE might ignore them, but when the vast majority of educational institutions and media are controlled by one side, they just get more of an opportunity to repeat it. ",chii0628,e98gdc8,conservative
"I grew up in NJ and spent almost 20 years there. I've been stopped by cops without my ID on me. What you are saying is just not correct.  Now I have run across many bad cops in NJ that have given me problems for other reasons and it wouldn't surprise me if one did what you say, but I blame that on the state politics protecting the cop unions.  ",IronEngineer,e98f5lt,conservative
"> Basically, you are not required to have one, unless you are asked for one because of probable cause. So on the books, sure, you don't need one, but on the other had, you do need one. 

You're own comment.

> As of February 2011, there is no U.S. federal law requiring that an individual identify himself during a *Terry* stop, but *Hiibel* held that states may enact such laws, provided the law requires the officer to have reasonable and articulable suspicion of criminal involvement,[\[21\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-21) and 24 states have done so.[\[22\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-22) The opinion in *Hiibel* implied that persons detained by police in jurisdictions with constitutional[\[23\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-23) ""stop and identify"" laws listed are obligated to identify themselves,[\[24\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-24) and that persons detained in other jurisdictions are not. 

From your link, it keep mentioning that someone may be obligated to ""identify"" themselves, not provide Identification, which are two completely different things. Right under that section, it goes into detail about what identifying information may be, such as name, DOB, address, etc. So again, not really referring to actual identification. 

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",blankstare100,e98gbt1,conservative
"I never said it wasn't, it's just disingenuous to call it free. ",pedantic--asshole,e9911gr,conservative
"Identifying yourself in that scenario does not mean producing a license.  From the same wikipedia link:  


> As of February 2011, the Supreme Court has not addressed the validity of requirements that a detainee provide information other than his name, however some states such as Arizona have specifically codified that a detained person is not required to provide any information aside from their full name. 

&#x200B;

But some states do allow for more identifying information: (again same link)

&#x200B;

>Identifying information varies, but typically includes  
>  
>\* Name, address, and an explanation of the person's actions;  
>  
>\* In some cases it also includes the person's intended destination, the person's date of birth (Indiana and Ohio), or written identification if available (Colorado). Ohio does not require the person's intended destination. Ohio requires only name, address, or date of birth. Date of birth is NOT required if the age of the person is an element to the crime (such as underage drinking, curfew violation, etc...) that the person is reasonably suspected of.[\[26\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-26) Indiana requires either name, address, and date of birth, or driver's license, if on the person's possession, and only applies if the person was stopped for an infraction or ordinance violation.[\[27\]](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_and_identify_statutes#cite_note-27)  
>  
>\* Arizona law, apparently written specifically to codify the holding in *Hiibel*, requires a person's ""true full name"".  
>  
>\* Nevada law, which requires a person to ""identify himself or herself"", apparently requires only that the person state his or her name.  
>  
>\* Texas law requires a person to provide their name, residence address and date of birth if lawfully arrested and asked by police. (A detained person or witness of a crime is not required to provide any identifying information, however it is a crime for a detained person or witness to give a false name.)

&#x200B;",exdirrk,e98fe0u,conservative
Agreed. Requiring people to hold ID for no other reason than just being is literally gestapo tactics. ,secret_porn_acct,e98vc4m,conservative
"So they just live in the middle of nowhere and only stay there? You can't function in a rural area without a car, as there is no public transportation. You need some type of ID to do damn near anything these days, so I highly doubt there are that many people that are simply too poor and/or stupid to obtain an ID. 

That's a really weak argument against requiring ID. We should be verifying that the people casting ballots are actually eligible. If they are low income fine, subsidize their ID cost, and maybe even include a voucher for transportation in those rare cases. ",Jagoff86,e991mli,conservative
"It's 13% without a license, and then a not insignificant number of people whose license doesn't match their name on the voter rolls, forcing them to jump through hoops. I'm confused how even only 13% is somehow an acceptable number of people.

Edit: how is this helpful? More people lack a license then live in the combined population of over 25 states.

Edit 2: 

>I'm in medical school, so it doesn't leave me a lot of time to research these kind of data.

You do realize you just admitted you formed an opinion *before you even had any information*? Jesus, I hope you get good Med Mal insurance if you graduate. ",CrookedShepherd,e99pkv5,conservative
I like NC but what TN has that we don’t is no income tax.   That’s really nice.  The pictures I could show you from some of our lakes/beaches/mountains though are awesome.   ,NCSUGrad2012,e985xqn,conservative
If you have any questions about Tennessee let me know. I have lived here my whole life minus 9 months,iamnotsven,e98c0y2,conservative
https://www.google.com/amp/s/seekingalpha.com/amp/news/3397717-bb-and-t-build-new-whiteville-nc-facility-consolidate-area-offices,Tyler-Durden825,e9abu4p,conservative
"Oh I can find you a job and get an offer lined up before you get here.

What kind of engineering?",TheComedianGLP,e99djf3,conservative
"I promise you, as someone who has lived and worked in Texas for temporary periods (Houston), and we have friends and family in San Antonio;

We come armed and willing to assimilate into the Texan culture.  We will *not* bring California with us.

(how is that for a pre-qual for us?)",Javad0g,e99cfar,conservative
"> I just dont think that these people (on the left) are for the most part, arguing in good faith. 

I see this happening on both sides. I have gotten backlash from both conservatives (usually harder right-leaning) and very left-leaning liberals. 

> I think think they bottom line is that they like flubbing votes with illegals and dead people...

I've heard this a lot in this sub and other subs, but can you give me a source? I mean, Trump threw out the 'millions of illegal votes"" with no evidence to back it up (I know he tried to do the commission, but honestly, millions?). And I know that this has also happened with Republican voters that have cast or attempted to cast fraudulently. I guess my point is that, if there is widespread voter fraud happening going on from the left, is it being officially sanctioned by the DNC? (not liberal or democratic voting groups). I know that there was the #walkaway meme/posts on this sub, but as I had written in another comment, walking away from the Democratic platform wouldn't mean joining the Republican platform.

>... media are controlled by one side, they just get more of an opportunity to repeat it 

I'm kind of glad I haven't had cable in years. I tend to use Reddit for my news and compare different articles as well as the comments to get the most complete picture possible. 

&#x200B;

Either way, good to meet a fellow Hispanic conservative!

&#x200B;",blankstare100,e98i7o9,conservative
">I just dont think that these people (on the left) are for the most part, arguing in good faith.  I think think they bottom line is that they like flubbing votes with illegals and dead people, and will continue complain about attempts to validate votes no matter how reasonable.

I'm a leftish person and I have concerns over voter ID laws because I worry they might be used to disenfranchise people. As long as they are

* free
* available within \~30 km for pickup
* provided with less than 60 minute wait time

then I have no problem with voter ID. I don't see it as a huge priority because I don't think voter fraud is a huge thing. However, I think your state-based method of registration is not very effective. I think it might be better if you had a federal database and then had to pick to register within a state which could be done at the voting place on the day of.

I'm Canadian and they make it so easy to vote that it's almost hard to not be registered. They federally register you beforehand and you can register when you show up. They provide plenty of options to people out of the country or in the forces. Voting itself normally takes me about the time it takes to fill in a ballot.

I'm not sure what differences are leading to such a drastically different experience. I'd guess either the state-based method or voter suppression.",BlueFireAt,e995vus,conservative
Username checks out,Tyrannosaurus_Rox_,e991lfc,conservative
"They live there because they grew up there, like their parents before them and so on and so forth all the way back to a time when the only ""vocation"" was picking cotton. Are you saying rural people should just move somewhere else?

>If they are low income fine, subsidize their ID cost, and maybe even include a voucher for transportation in those rare cases.

If the real reason for these laws was to protect against fraud, why is it they also started closing DMVs in black counties, and cutting public transportation? You can argue that all of this was an accident, that Republicans made it selectively more difficult to vote *by accident*, but if that was truly the case why not rectify it? These laws started up almost 10 years ago, and yet there's been no action. Hell why weren't these issues studied and alleviated when the laws originally went into effect? ",CrookedShepherd,e99lzdc,conservative
"I'm confused on your moving goalposts. It started at 1 in 5, then it was 1 in 7, which is accurate if you only consider driver's licenses. Then you have to consider military IDs (I was actually in the military with people who didn't have driver's licenses), state IDs, passports, and other forms of identification. 

In addition, it's really not hard to get an ID if you want one. I've lived in several different states and several different settings ranging from rural to suburban to urban, and literally everyone I knew had some form of ID (we all bought booze at some point); granted this is anecdotal, but I find it incredible that IDs are difficult to obtain. In fact, some states allow you to get your ID [online](https://www.dmv.org/id-cards.php), which is available to just about everybody, because you can access the internet at a public library. Since you claim that it's so hard for some people to get an ID due to lack of availability of a DMV, can you show me with a source what the longest distance it is from any particular area to a government office that issues IDs in the US? Do these people not have bank accounts? Do they not buy alcohol or tobacco?

I didn't form an opinion based on what you said. I had some education on it, but I hadn't seen it in a while. I was moreso gloating about how you foiled your own argument. ",Hayes_for_days,e99qjo9,conservative
"Don't be lured by the no state tax item... I came to NC from TX, and while we didn't have state tax in TX, the property taxes were WAY higher than here in NC.  It all washes.  ",MyOpus,e9892ov,conservative
Aerospace Engineer here. Also a conservative California refugee hoping to move some day. Would appreciate job at NASA thank you.,Storm-Of-Aeons,e99f9om,conservative
"Electrical Engineering with an emphasis in Power Systems.

I should add I don't have much experience. 4 years of ABET college, and testing for the EIT in February. I'm definitely entry level.

EDIT: Have like 7 months of engineering experience working in a consulting firm.",Scozzar,e99dqf5,conservative
"You're in.

Grab your guns, gear, and fam and report for duty.

Beer and BBQ is at 1700 hours.

Don't make me come looking for you.",TheComedianGLP,e99cmki,conservative
">Are you saying rural people should just move somewhere else?

Not at all. I'm saying that in order to live in a rural area you must have transportation, unless of course you're a hermit and you never leave the house. There's no public transportation out there in most cases.

>If the real reason for these laws was to protect against fraud, why is it they also started closing DMVs in black counties, and cutting public transportation?

Go ask someone that runs the DMV. I have no clue why they close certain offices. 

Any responsible adult has some form of ID, and I don't think it's unreasonable that we require ID to vote, especially given that there are millions of illegals in the US who have no right to vote in our elections. ",Jagoff86,e9aubvf,conservative
">granted this is anecdotal, but I find it incredible that IDs are difficult to obtain.

It concerns me that I have to clarify this, but when it comes to matters of public policy anecdotal evidence is insufficient-- for the same reason the FDA doesn't approve drugs based upon a report which claimed without data that ""it worked on everybody"". 

>how you foiled your own argument.

I've made a claim (large number of people without ID), and youve asserted what? My point is only invalidated if you can actually demonstrate, *with evidence, not anecdotes*, that it's an insignificant number. How is 70 million insignificant? ",CrookedShepherd,e99rt0d,conservative
Unless you live under your means.,kfb007570,e98cn7g,conservative
TN has 9.5% sales tax in most places. But I'll take that over an income tax. ,BillionCub,e98dug2,conservative
"A dear friend of mine just retired from NASA.

I think you'd want something more challenging.

[https://www.indeed.com/q-Aerospace-Engineer-l-Texas-jobs.html](https://www.indeed.com/q-Aerospace-Engineer-l-Texas-jobs.html)

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e99hjn0,conservative
"I do a mean smoke on pork loin and brisket.

My wife prefers my tri-tip.

We promise to abandon all tofu and tofu-like products and to never speak of them once crossing into Freedom.",Javad0g,e99e6o8,conservative
"
Do you have a solution to the problem of getting a car when you can't reach a dmv to get a license? 


>there are millions of illegals in the US who have no right to vote in our elections. 

If that was happening wouldn't we have some proof of widespread fraud? ",CrookedShepherd,e9bhn41,conservative
"My admission of anecdotal evidence was an acknowledgement to the fact that it's not necessarily representative of actual data. I'm well aware of this. I guess you missed the point of that comment...

You've only substantiated a claim about those who have driver's licenses, but you've said nothing about other forms of ID, nor have you proven inaccessibility of driver's licenses or other forms of ID, yet I have.

Can you answer my questions?

Edit: it's not 70 million even by your own metirc. 325 million * 1/7 = 46 million ",Hayes_for_days,e99rysa,conservative
"Good point.
",MyOpus,e98d779,conservative
"Yeah, TX has 8.25 when I left 10 years ago and property taxes where four times higher than here in NC.  

it really does all wash",MyOpus,e98u0az,conservative
">Do you have a solution to the problem of getting a car when you can't reach a dmv to get a license? 

Yea, get a job.

>If that was happening wouldn't we have some proof of widespread fraud? 

It is happening. There are millions of illegals in our country, and if there are no voter ID laws there is nothing to stop them from voting. Most will also vote democrat because they always promise them more ""free stuff"". ",Jagoff86,e9bjg3o,conservative
">you've said nothing about other forms of ID,

You claim that people without a drivers license likely have other forms of identification, but have provided no data on how many people this applies to. Why would I need to disprove a fact that you haven't proven in the first place? ",CrookedShepherd,e99t1w3,conservative
">Yea, get a job

Full employment is economically unfeasible, and the most optimistic figures for targeted unemployment are about 4%. In other words, regardless of by of the size of one's bootstraps, 1 in 20 people *will* be unemployed at any one time. To not prepare for that is unsound.

>It is happening

How many people during the averahg election are arrested for voter fraud? In other words, if *milions* of people are voting illegally, wouldn't you expect that we would catch a few of them? ",CrookedShepherd,e9c11hw,conservative
"I did not claim that. I said that other forms of ID are available aside from driver's licenses, and I know people who have alternative forms of ID aside from driver's licenses. I asked you to substantiate your claim that some people have little access to IDs. You said that some people have to drive up to 50 miles to obtain an ID. I provided evidence that they do not in some states because of the internet. Answer the damn questions. You're tap-dancing around them and deflecting.",Hayes_for_days,e99tb89,conservative
As are you. Honestly I'm not sure what the point of trying to gather evidence is if you've already made up your mind. ,CrookedShepherd,e99u57y,conservative
"I didn't tap-dance around anything. I've directly rebutted your statements, and I've substantiated my own claims. You haven't asked me any questions that I haven't directly answered.

I guess that kind of proves my point. I find it funny that you accuse me of making up my mind prematurely, yet you deny everything I've said despite evidence supporting it. Am I supposed to just believe you and accept what you say without any supporting evidence?",Hayes_for_days,e99ukbt,conservative
">despite evidence supporting it.

That evidence would be what exactly? We've been dancing around this for a few hours, I believe a significant number of people don't have ID, you don't. I've presented evidence that millions of people don't have ID, you've latched onto the fact that it was less than original stated, but still significant. You've hypothesized that the *millions of people* that don't have a drivers license have some other form of ID, but have provided no evidence of this claim.


If you actually want to debate in good faith, then let's start with a few questions:

* How many people would it take for you to think there was a significant number of folks without an ID?

* What evidence would be necessary to prove or disprove this number?

* Having already stated that you have an opinion on the issue, what sources did you draw from to form your conclusion? ",CrookedShepherd,e99vh62,conservative
“I’m not a big fan of yours either”.   Lol,rossww2199,e98ne6l,conservative
Does Trump have to report Jim Acosta’s antics as an in-kind contribution to his 2020 campaign?,TheWhiteFalcon,e98rd3v,conservative
"LOOK AT ME, I'M JIM ACOSTA",Tea_is_unAmerican,e98u5wf,conservative
More like Acosta disrupted the press briefing with an attention whoring stunt. The hack wouldn’t sit down. ,Knollsit,e98l6ox,conservative
"Reading the tweets from msnbc framing it as a violation of freedom of speech is what pisses me off the most. Anyone who watches the full clip will realize that Trump already answered his question and Acosta overstepped his boundry. I don’t care if it was between a teacher and student or a reporter and a president... it was rude, selfish, and disrespectful of not only President Trump and the staffer but the other people waiting their turn to ask questions, but when it comes to Trump any of those social observations will be instantly spun into some form of tyrannical action. ",Jpfields,e98q759,conservative
"Anyone know why the white house doesn't just bar him or CNN from entry?

Edit: Washington times says acosta's press pass was taken from him by WH security.",ThruHiker,e98sl2c,conservative
"Acosta completely deserved it, watch the clip.",gster50,e98lpun,conservative
Acosta might be one of the least professional people I've ever seen. I'm by no means a Trump guy but holy shit. STFU Jim.,mnslice,e993ow9,conservative
"He is rude and incredibly unprofessional. I don't know if he's a terrible person but Acosta's grandstanding has really been something to behold over the past two years. Oh, you don't like Trump? Tough cookies. He's an elected official. Do your goddamn job you so-called journalist and stop interrupting pressers with dumbass stuff like demanding Trump call on a female reporter next.",greatatdrinking,e9962uf,conservative
Jim knows now that every time he does this CNN gets more views. It's getting to the point where they may have to take his press credentials away.,Madstork1981,e98sdw3,conservative
"""Dear diary, the President was mean to me again today. Now I know how Holocaust survivors feel.""",TangoFoxtr0t,e99hfqp,conservative
Did he just shove some lady who went to take the mic from him?,jihad_dildo,e98znn4,conservative
Good. Since when is disrespecting the POTUS all right?,VirginWizard69,e98ldu7,conservative
"So, it's a day ending in 'y'?",godsdragon79,e98lfiw,conservative
Today’s journalists don’t want to ask real questions; they just want to debate.,aaronholliday,e98lkoe,conservative
He's gonna win 2020 so much!,ReaganTroll,e98kp3h,conservative
My favorite part of the news day so far.,Arm-the-homeless,e98ob9k,conservative
That's offensive to rude and terrible people ,darksideguyz,e994hi6,conservative
Jim is rude. He will accost ya if you don't look out.,MisterMouser,e99cxth,conservative
He's not wrong..,bwatters,e98wfi3,conservative
I don’t approve of trumps behavior but there isn’t a more deserving recipient of the orng man bad wrath than Jimmy,duckfallasbdn,e996sg3,conservative
"Lmao, Acosta needed to be knocked down a few pegs. Good for Trump. ",Maswasnos,e98sb63,conservative
Acosta put the mic down real quick once Trump walked around the podium. “Don’t hurt me Mr. President!!!”,The_Yetay,e98tb67,conservative
"No one else finds it ironic that the guy who calls people by made up names, as if on a middle school playground, calls someone else rude?",nkn_19,e99ffw4,conservative
"""Berate""? Hardly. He just gave him the dad talk that he probably never got growing up. ",noiwontsharemyfries,e99tdag,conservative
Get ready for the left to claim 1A is dead/dying because they rightfully took away Acosta's credentials.,ethanrules3,e99uchs,conservative
"Holy heck is that CNN reporter pretentious. He's always at Trump rallies trying to get attention from people, it's super unprofessional 

He totally deserved to get yelled at by Trump like an old man scolding a young kid",top-perro,e99iiic,conservative
These are the situations in which Trump shines. Love it. ,TRKillShot,e996x0q,conservative
"That was beautiful. I was upset about a friend on Facebook saying despicable things about republicans and I tell you what, it’s a distant memory after watching that. ",girly187,e9972pz,conservative
Jim “Look at me I’m Jim Acosta” Acosta,BearFootR,e99bq0x,conservative
"Hey, remember when journalists refrained from inserting themselves into a story because it would bring their objectivity into question?

I do.  You could say it's indelible in the hippocampus. ",LonelyMachines,e99ezti,conservative
Why are we sharing Talking Points Memo on r/Conservative? It's a site for leftist Talking Points. That's its whole raison d'etre. ,ljmiller62,e9aodgf,conservative
"Chris Plante was going off on how Jim Acosta is hiding his given name, Abilio. If you go to his English Wiki, you see no mention of Abilio. But if you go to his [Spanish wiki](https://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jim_Acosta) his full name is revealed

>Abilio James ""Jim"" Acosta (nacido el 17 de abril de 1971) es un periodista estadounidense que actualmente trabaja para CNN como corresponsal de la Casa Blanca. Previamente Acosta trabajó para estaciones locales en varias ciudades estadounidenses y para CBS News, antes de convertirse en corresponsal político a nivel nacional para CNN.

Now all if this is rich, hiding his Cuban heritage, particularly since Abilio [got all misty eyed on his Obama visit to Cuba](https://www.cnn.com/2016/03/20/politics/obama-cuba-us-relations-journey/). Why does he hide his Cuban heritage as he does? Is he ashamed of it?",Lepew1,e98w667,conservative
Would have made my day if he ejected Acosta from the conference after repeatedly trying to speak over him. ,grdlock,e98z76k,conservative
can someone make this into a thug life meme? that was awesome!,osamanobama,e991oy9,conservative
Get em!,nomaslee,e997tv9,conservative
"Trump hAteS freeDom oF thE pReSsSss!!!  


[Yeah Trump should weaponize the government to spy on Jim Acosta](https://www.yahoo.com/news/blogs/ticket/obama-admin-spied-fox-news-reporter-james-rosen-134204299.html) now to rectify this right?  ",tiger81775149,e99a78z,conservative
"Acosta is such a whiny brat. Go away Jim, no one cares.",PigsAndCats,e99jhzd,conservative
https://twitter.com/PrisonPlanet/status/1060344775604363264?s=19,ripperman1969,e99mhho,conservative
"Jim Acosta is an awful scum, but Trump calling anyone rude, disrespectful, and a bad person is quite hypocritical.",TwoForOneEspecial,e997fit,conservative
"Mr. President you are the rude terrible person.. Look at all the affairs you had, all the shady business dealings.",MyNewAccount962,e99kzb9,conservative
[removed],,e9950os,conservative
"I really wish the president would refrain from doing stuff like this because while it’s hilarious I don’t think it plays well with a lot of moderates who might actually vote for his policy if e toned down stuff like this

But he’s damn right Jim Acosta is a skid mark on the country ",b50willis,e994nmz,conservative
Donald blew out Acosta’s ass kisser real fast lol. ,Knollsit,e98omsf,conservative
Had me rolling when he said that lol,bricox171,e993sss,conservative
"""I've traveled with him and he's a diligent reporter.""

I have to agree. Jim Accosta does a better job at reporting about Jim Accosta than any other journalist.",TangoFoxtr0t,e99hkou,conservative
I just spit my food out after hearing that ,silentapple4,e99azxh,conservative
"If he doesn't Acoata will decry it as fascist, or something. Maybe they'll come up with something new by then.",unibuckeye,e99aw1h,conservative
Get you someone who loves you like Jim Acosta loves some Jim Acosta,DirtyBirde32,e9905rr,conservative
"You get one question and that’s it. Move on, he knows the rules ",xPineappless,e98xmpx,conservative
"What a stupid hill to die on.

""Mr president, why did you call the caravan an invasion?""

""Because i believe it is an invasion""

""But why tho?""

*facepalm*",Pointy_Nipples,e9az9hc,conservative
He sees that as his job.,chabanais,e99ax44,conservative
">Reading the tweets from msnbc framing it as a violation of freedom of speech

Like the left believes in freedom of speech.",StraightNewt,e98qtxt,conservative
I hate that liberal news outlets claim their freedom of speech is being taken away because the POTUS doesn’t like them. They need to read up on countries that actually silence dissent instead of whining about “mean words.” ,8K12,e98wxey,conservative
"I don't like the way Trump frames some of his attacks on the press. The press also doesn't get a free pass.  Acosta has a political agenda, and he can't pretend he doesn't under the guise of being a journalist.  In fact, one step further, CNN is likely trying very hard to make themselves the news story in order to generate ratings.  

Of course the left will defend Acosta because it serves their political agenda.  They have as much responsibility, in this ongoing saga anyway, as anyone in the deterioration of the Press.  ",Roez,e98u24x,conservative
"It's pretty rich to call somebody rude and disrespectful when the president is consistently name calling, inciting ""lock her up"" chants, and generally being a boor. ",teamstepdad,e99exv2,conservative
He karate-chopped the arm of the staffer when she went to get the mic.,borga,e99bty5,conservative
They don’t because they like it.  Acosta’s preening makes the media look bad and fires up the GOP base.  Acosta is a great foil for Trump.,joozian_,e98yspy,conservative
"It's the same reason why Trump wants Nancy to be the Speaker of the House:  Acosta is unhinged and basically proves Trump's point that CNN is fake news.  In other words, you need a whipping boy.

Oh, and the other point, when you're trying to argue for free speech, you don't kick out the reporters you don't like even if they are the village idiot.",bigdaveyl,e991jtk,conservative
"Having Acosta as a foil plays right into Trump's hands. Acosta can't help himself, and Trump leads him right where he wants him to go. Calls him fake news and moves right on to slightly less fake news.",sans_laRegret,e993rqc,conservative
"A non ""4D chess"" answer: they can't.  CNN is too big and too influential to ban.",GoldenGonzo,e99i8cf,conservative
I believe he just got barred but for being a dick to the female trying to take the mic back. ,GOA_AMD65,e99m5u9,conservative
What I would have given to be a fly on the wall for that...,ZAGA_Manalishi,e9a0uge,conservative
"> Edit: Washington times says acosta's press pass was taken from him by WH security.

For assaulting a WH intern",BuyChristianSlaves,e99snce,conservative
"what others have said. 

Also IIRC if any reported gets barred from the WH i think the networks have agreed to all boycott.",JMB_was_a_god,e99bxze,conservative
He *wanted* it.  That's his whole M.O.,LonelyMachines,e98rmbx,conservative
He should have been stripped of white house access a years ago,ConsistentlyRight,e98wpi8,conservative
Yes. T_D has a good close up gif of it,girly187,e9976e0,conservative
Ben Shapiro better call Acosta out as a woman beater the same he did to Corey Lewandowski. ,greeneyedunicorn2,e99c7fx,conservative
Yeah they just revoked his press pass for that stunt. They may give it back later but this sends a good signal not to try a stunt like that again.,BuyChristianSlaves,e99spm4,conservative
"No I wouldnt say she was shoved. He did block her from taking the microphone,  that much is clear.",Nevaknosbest,e9atv1n,conservative
Yea he did. Fuck that piece of shit,ZardokAllen,e99c9m6,conservative
Just like trump!,noobzor99,e9a0ac4,conservative
because the orange man is bad,Manchurainprez,e98raez,conservative
"When Jon Stewart made it cool to absolutely *despise* Bush.

There has been plenty of disrespect in politics, but Stewart was really at the forefront of the internet generation where that level of hatred was able to spread like wildfire.

Take the height of political incivility, something like the level of hatred that brewed before the Burr/Hamilton pistol duel, and now have a funny, charismatic person imprint that bitterness and hatred on literally an entire generation of impressionable children four nights a week for eight years.

At least back then it was just Stewart and Colbert, though ironically Colbert was the less vitriolic of the two given how he acts today.  Right now, young people are being indoctrinated by:

1.  John Oliver
2.  Stephen Colbert
3.  Jimmy Kimmel
4.  Trevor Noah
5.  Samantha Bee
6.  Seth Meyers
7.  SNL
8.  Sacha Baron Cohen
9.  Jim Jeffries*
10.  Hasan Minhaj
11.  Michelle Wolf

*To be fair no one actually watches Jim's show.",Telineye,e99d483,conservative
\*disrespecting,GFZDW,e98ob1e,conservative
"Since forever really, except trump has had it pretty bad.",deepfeels96,e995q30,conservative
"Well, I couldn't care less who the president is, he is an elected official. I want to see my representative up there, sweating and stumbling over himself dealing with the harshest people, giving harsh, hard-hitting questions. No softballs for anyone, on either side, Trump included.",Nevaknosbest,e9atpgx,conservative
They don't want to debate. They want to tell you what your opinions are.,unibuckeye,e99azcz,conservative
"""I'm sorry, Daddy!""",unibuckeye,e99b0wo,conservative
Jim Acosta now is screaming Fake News about it it's hilarious,BuyChristianSlaves,e99swk8,conservative
"The more Trump calls these asshat ""journalists"" out, the more I like him, and I already like him a LOT!!!
",LVDave,e99jwvs,conservative
After Acosta acosted an intern they did indeed revoke his press pass,BuyChristianSlaves,e99sxnt,conservative
"People including Acosta have called Trump rude and disrespectful all the time.  So if Acosta likewise acts that way he also deserves to be called out on it.  In fact, moving forward Acosta cannot ever criticize Trump’s demeanor or behavior or it makes him a hypocrite also.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9ajy14,conservative
Pathetic.,paulbrook,e99sxn3,conservative
"The press never did that shit to Obama, that’s a fucking lie. Also the President does have people to do that and Acosta shoved the woman who was doing it. ",ZardokAllen,e99ccs0,conservative
"No he doesn't. And to compare the press today to what Obama dealt with is laughable. How many reporters actually spent every damn press conference asking loaded questions, making accusations and interrupting Obama? You are full of shit. ",Rightquercusalba,e99b1wi,conservative
"Textbook Shapiro, a losing strategy in the political world. Which is why I'm glad Trump doesn't listen to their suggestions.  ",Rightquercusalba,e99b5n6,conservative
"Trump is Bush with some fight. The media berated Bush incessantly much like they do Trump. Trump fights back and doesn't give them their ""due respect"" (even though they show him none). As a result, they have to berate him harder. Liberals never underatand that what they are doing is wrong, they just think they haven't done enough of it yet.",unibuckeye,e99b807,conservative
"Its about time we have a President who doesn't take shit from ANYBODY and throws that shit right back in their faces... Every President for quite some time has been a pushover. Last one I recall that had any guts was Reagan... ""Mr Gorbechev.. TEAR DOWN THIS WALL!!!"" for example...",LVDave,e99k590,conservative
Someone’s gotta report on the oft silenced Jim Acosta - the people must know! Funny that they shriek fascist after he’s been allowed to keep up his childish antics for how many months now?,xKommandant,e99mia5,conservative
And that man loves him some Jim Acosta. ,skarface6,e995tde,conservative
Came here for this,ConservativeBrit,e999obd,conservative
"Ben, is that you?",xKommandant,e99me0m,conservative
You often get one question and a follow-up.,farts_on_boobs,e9922kh,conservative
Revoke press pass,ExpensiveMention,e990j3g,conservative
They believe in their freedom of speech.,VirginWizard69,e98ri7l,conservative
Free speech literally kills people!!! /s,spongish,e990pfq,conservative
Exactly. College campuses are just great places to preach what you like ,Chapka69,e98su69,conservative
"It's so laughable, it's absurd. The people screaming about hate speech laws turn on a dime to tell me about how Trump being rude to someone is violation of freedom of the press. *Please*",Glochidiate,e99vtex,conservative
"Hell, they just have to go back a few years when Obama was spying and prosecuting journalists and kicking news channels out of the White House. Has Trump done any of that yet?",unibuckeye,e99aspr,conservative
"Conservatives were conserving absolutely nothing back when they pretended the mainstream media was legitimate and conferred credibility upon them by taking them seriously.

The most important legacy of Trump's term might end up being the delegitimization of the Pravda wing of the Democratic Party.",nited_states,e995har,conservative
"> I don't like the way Trump frames some of his attacks on the press. 

Only because Trump has the balls to get into the mud pit and play their game.  ",bigdaveyl,e9926ir,conservative
"> In fact, one step further, CNN is likely trying very hard to make themselves the news story in order to generate ratings. 

Seems to be directly from Hunter Thompson's ""gonzo"" journalism as pioneered in his *Rolling Stone* articles in the 70s, when the journalist becomes the main character in the news story.",remybob78,e995kio,conservative
"Read up on “false equivalency”

Also using your logic, you and reporters like Acosta don’t get to call Trump a “boor” while you are exhibiting boorish behavior yourselves which includes not allowing any of the dozens of other reporters in the room to have their rightful turn at the mic.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9aj8ix,conservative
Exactly. Trump doesn't necessarily play to his base. He plays to opposition media and lets the base/other conservatives/independents take it from there. ,the-G-Man,e993gbv,conservative
That is a great answer. ,UraniumGum,e9901hu,conservative
[deleted],,e99hl6j,conservative
you rock!,pappazeuss,e997t4j,conservative
"Not exactly true.  Obama barred an ENTIRE news agency (Fox) from a press conference which is a huge difference from barring a single asshole reporter who can’t follow rules and pushes away interns trying to do their jobs.  CNN will very likely be able to place another reporter, assuming they can follow the rules.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9ajiqf,conservative
Yep. He had a smile on his face* shortly after that exchange. ,Knollsit,e98sn68,conservative
what a fucking grade A prick. No wonder people despise him everywhere,jihad_dildo,e9991l1,conservative
I like Ben but we both know this isn't going to happen.,HonorMyBeetus,e9aicqh,conservative
"> *To be fair no one actually watches Jim's show.

To be fair I wouldn't consider the viewers of the other shows ""people"" either",BuyChristianSlaves,e99styi,conservative
Thanks,VirginWizard69,e98ot9g,conservative
"I agree, but Jim Acosta crossed the line. ",VirginWizard69,e9atrwe,conservative
They want to be the story ,marvin_nash,e99f2yg,conservative
"'Don't tase me, bro!'",borga,e99byl1,conservative
"What part of “Acosta is an awful scum” did you not understand lol. I get that. I’m simply saying it’s funny hearing it from a man who has cheated on every wife he’s had, a man who, whether you agree with his politics or not, is the epitome of rude and disrespectful. Trump is funny at times, I like a lot of the things he does and says, but there’s no doubt he’s rude, disrespectful, and can be a pretty terrible person.",TwoForOneEspecial,e9amm9c,conservative
?,MyNewAccount962,e99uze9,conservative
"I missed the shove, they should be focusing on that nonstop for the next three days.  These people are asinine to believe that they can be physically hostile.  I am very conflicted about revoking press credentials though.",Falkamper,e99hi3n,conservative
"I'm saying that what he needs is good optics, not that it's okay for him to be accosted by the press.  He's the President of the United States and deserves respect for his office.  Right now its important for him to appear above all of that especially with the loss of Hannity as a viable news source given recent events.  He is being scrutinized on every single detail, and he SHOULD have someone to remove this person, he shouldn't be doing it himself is my argument, it's terrible optics.",Falkamper,e99ha9a,conservative
*the execrable Jim Acosta?,Call_Me_Clark,e99vdry,conservative
No but He did Klavan's Jim Acosta line so I had to do Ben's,DirtyBirde32,e99pag2,conservative
If I recall Acosta went from migrant invaders to russia investigation. Clearly a follow up question. ,Kwijiboe,e994pim,conservative
He asked about four,MikePenceVP,e994kh1,conservative
Your wish has been granted,krepogregg,e9a4ib9,conservative
They believe in the freedom of their speech,KilKidd,e999y34,conservative
"I'm not doubting you, I'm just curious because I don't remember.  What news company did he kick out?",GoldenGonzo,e99iat8,conservative
"Trump just needs to inject a more facts into his rebuffing.  Yeah, tell Acosta to sit down and shut up, but have a little nugget about a recent article he wrote and why it was fake news to cap it off.",Telineye,e99chbi,conservative
"Yeah, his base is usually very distrustful, and many voted for him because they were tired of being pandered and lied to.  So the idea that he would actually play for the opposition, making alt leftists and corporate media types look like idiots, helps him far more than any other tactic. ",Lobo0084,e99bbnq,conservative
Yeah. He’s a tool. ,keepitreal51,e99rfzj,conservative
"Why, because they have a different opinion than yours? We're all still Americans.",Nevaknosbest,e9atsb0,conservative
*Fanks ,rAlexanderAcosta,e99btix,conservative
"May I ask how so? No love for either man, just seems like he was doing what he's paid to do. Ask hard questions about current events to elicit a response from our representative.",Nevaknosbest,e9au39z,conservative
"I wouldn’t take it away from CNN, I’d take it from that motherfucker though. Give it to someone that can act like a human being, I’m sure they can find someone at CNN that can do it (maybe) ",ZardokAllen,e99hkgs,conservative
"You don't understand how this works. The rules have changed, any Republican that ignores this will do so at their own peril. Screw their optics. ",Rightquercusalba,e9ahupl,conservative
Totally related topics! /s,remybob78,e995e0q,conservative
"and any attempt to tell them to shut up is ""fascist"" ",aburks41,e99abm4,conservative
"There was a time in 2009... 

> In 2009, as a feud between Fox News and the Obama administration over Fox’s coverage boiled over – the White House labeled the conservative channel “not a news network” – the administration excluded Fox News from interviewing “pay czar” Kenneth Feinberg, who was handling distribution of TARP funds during the financial crisis. The other television news networks showed solidarity by staging a “revolt” and boycotting their scheduled interviews.

https://www.mediamatters.org/blog/2017/01/12/dc-press-took-collective-action-protest-obama-white-house-restrictions-why-not-trump/214993 



the bulk of his bannings though were more broadly applied rather than restricted to a select company. 

https://www.nytimes.com/2013/11/22/us/politics/photographers-protest-white-house-restrictions.html

https://www.businessinsider.com/white-house-ban-photographers-2013-12

https://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/11/21/white-house-photographers-protest-restrictions_n_4317284.html

https://variety.com/2018/politics/news/trump-press-war-obama-administration-reporters-1202782264/ 

",I_am_just_saying,e99jnx9,conservative
"Not to pick on you, but people ""not remembering"" is a serious problem in this country.

Let's see oh here is the New York Times:

>WASHINGTON — Federal investigators secretly seized two months of phone records for reporters and editors of The Associated Press in what the news organization said Monday was a “serious interference with A.P.’s constitutional rights to gather and report the news.”

>The A.P. said that the Justice Department informed it on Friday that law enforcement officials had obtained the records for more than 20 telephone lines of its offices and journalists, including their home phones and cellphones. It said the records were seized without notice sometime this year.

https://www.nytimes.com/2013/05/14/us/phone-records-of-journalists-of-the-associated-press-seized-by-us.html?module=inline

About which the NY Times later wrote:

>The Obama administration, which has a chilling zeal for investigating leaks and prosecuting leakers, has failed to offer a credible justification for secretly combing through the phone records of reporters and editors at The Associated Press in what looks like a fishing expedition for sources and an effort to frighten off whistle-blowers.

https://www.nytimes.com/2013/05/15/opinion/spying-on-the-associated-press.html

Or the time the Obama Justice Department seized the records of at least five phone lines connected to Fox News. The federal law enforcement agency even seized the phone records of Rosen’s parents. The FBI also got a warrant to search Rosen's emails from 2010.

>(CBS News) Court documents released this week show the Obama administration secretly monitored a Washington journalist. In seeking a search warrant, the FBI called Fox News' James Rosen a ""criminal co-conspirator,"" even though he isn't charged with any crime.

>These revelations have set off a firestorm of criticism from the left and right, CBS News' Jan Crawford reports. For the first time ever, a presidential administration is treating news reporting like a crime, and a reporter like a criminal suspect.

https://www.cbsnews.com/news/fox-news-reporter-secretly-monitored-by-obama-administration-court-documents/",sonofsmog,e9ax1qt,conservative
I think you're asking a lot of a guy that can barely form coherent sentences.,teamstepdad,e99ezt1,conservative
Jim just had his press pass revoked,ExpensiveMention,e99kx1j,conservative
If you're Americans then why do you hate America?,BuyChristianSlaves,e9au388,conservative
"The moment the woman was tasked to take the microphone, his turn was over. ",VirginWizard69,e9au6g0,conservative
"I rewatched it, I'm so torn on this.  The press needs to be able to hassle any public figure about anything , that's essential to democracy, however he was out of line.  What's the precedent here?",Falkamper,e99it0l,conservative
"Help me understand then, what times have changed for the president",Falkamper,e9awtzr,conservative
"Maybe, just maybe, he was going to ask about Russian bots that are migrating to US in a caravan. A soft maybe.",borga,e99brgl,conservative
Gross. You just reminded me Obama had Czars. ,ProngleReady2Mongle,e9a2crq,conservative
You're insane if you don't see Trump's act for what it is and if you think he literally cannot form a coherent sentence.,Telineye,e99f5di,conservative
"CNN will have someone else in his stead, and Jim will be all the louder. Meanwhile Trump doesn't appear weak.

It works on many levels. ",Lobo0084,e99m7x4,conservative
I never said I hated my country. ,Nevaknosbest,e9auren,conservative
"Is there not a fine line between decorum and asserting your right to ask your elected official a question? When Bill O'Reilly tore into Obama I thought to myself, good. I want to see the same thing happen to my current President. No one is my king, they are my representative.  Period. Maybe Acosta is a huge doucheflute. I don't care. I want the questions asked. I want the questioned answered. I want Trump to stand up there and sweat, same as anyone that runs and wins the Presidency. ",Nevaknosbest,e9av8sy,conservative
"The press is entitled to ask questions if they respect the decorum and decency of the event. CNN is not the end all be all of the press. There are other press outlets out there, other people that deserve to ask questions and a sense of order and professionalism does need to be maintained. You don’t get to just shove people and shout over everyone constantly like you’re the only person in the room. It’s absurd that we’ve gotten to this point and this never would have been the case if it was any other president. Since trump is bombastic and crude on twitter sometimes everyone seems to think that they’re above the office and sense of propriety that’s afforded the White House. Fuck that. It needs to end. 

E: he can easily lose his press pass. He doesn’t have any “right” to it. The press closes ranks though, when Obama took it from Fox, CNN and others stood behind them. Acosta is and seriously has been abusing that protection for a long time. What he is doing is not journalism and everyone is very aware of it, he’s trying to instigate the president so he can scream about attacks on the press. He doesn’t care about information, or facts or answers. He’s a heckler and that’s it. ",ZardokAllen,e99jyym,conservative
"They don't want civil debate or discussion. No matter what he says they will attack him, so you fight back. They are projecting when they call him a bully, he's the person fighting back against the bully. Where have you been the last two years? ",Rightquercusalba,e9bvd87,conservative
[deleted],,e9awioc,conservative
He asked his question. His time was over. How hard is this to understand?,VirginWizard69,e9aw9g3,conservative
"I agree, he should lose his press pass over this.  Get a new anchor and CNN should censure him like fox censured Hannity. ",Falkamper,e99x2qf,conservative
"I've been slowly getting more and more horrified at the polarization and lack of civil discourse or compromise.  Neither side is willing lose on something so nobody gains anything.  Trump needs to shut up about fake news, he is a politician and has no business publicly excoriating any news network or private business.  The news media in general have abandoned decorum in favor of spewing odious opinions on both sides.  

You know what? Republicans blocked Garland from the SC, and then they want the Democrats to play nice.  Democrats rammed a terrible healthcare system down the throats of a nation that, quite frankly, wants universal healthcare, and then expected Republicans to play ball.  

Both sides need to abandon the extreme bases they have accrued over the past 8 years or so because it's getting us as a country nowhere and it makes me sick to my stomach.",Falkamper,e9bwg9j,conservative
"I choose 3. America never stopped being great. We have problems, but we'll get through them like Americans do.",Nevaknosbest,e9awquo,conservative
"Typical proceedings dictate he is allowed one question and one follow-up. He asked his question, and then asserted his followup question while the President attempted to move on. That's all I saw. Guy did his job. I don't know what the big deal is to begin with. Trump should've just answered both and moved on, best way to handle it. ",Nevaknosbest,e9awlzr,conservative
">I've been slowly getting more and more horrified at the polarization and lack of civil discourse or compromise.  Neither side is willing lose on something so nobody gains anything.  Trump needs to shut up about fake news, he is a politician and has no business publicly excoriating any news network or private business.  The news media in general have abandoned decorum in favor of spewing odious opinions on both sides.  

Of course he does, opinion pieces and speculation pretending to be news should be called out. 

>You know what? Republicans blocked Garland from the SC, and then they want the Democrats to play nice. 

They had control of the senate. Democrats have never played nice.

>Democrats rammed a terrible healthcare system down the throats of a nation that, quite frankly, wants universal healthcare, and then expected Republicans to play ball.  

Democrats want universal health care. So no, the country doesn't want it. And Obama knew that the only way to get it was to destroy the private health care system and get premiums and deductibles to skyrocket.

>Both sides need to abandon the extreme bases they have accrued over the past 8 years or so because it's getting us as a country nowhere and it makes me sick to my stomach.

People like you make me sick to my stomach. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9bx7a5,conservative
Perhaps you should go back to /r/politics with your liberal agitprop. ,VirginWizard69,e9awzfy,conservative
"The reality is that there is a measurable majority that want universal Healthcare. There are other countries that spend less is their GDP to attain this. I see it as a moral and fiscal obligation to help sick Americans and reduce government spending. 

Mitch didn't even hold a vote on Garland, come now, let's at least step up to the table and admit our own wrongdoings. ",Falkamper,e9ctm58,conservative
">The reality is that there is a measurable majority that want universal Healthcare. There are other countries that spend less is their GDP to attain this. I see it as a moral and fiscal obligation to help sick Americans and reduce government spending. 

Government spending isn't reduced with universal health care. You are confusing overall spending per capita and as a percentage of GDP with less government spending. The majority want the government to provide health care for all Americans, but they don't uderstand where the money comes from and how it fundamentally changes the quality of their care. Americans spend more on health care because we are wealthier. We already have universal health care for seniors, it's horrible. That's why older people are working longer and retiring later, they need the private insurance. Our health care system is a quasi government funded mess as it is. Single payer would require scrapping Medicare and it would reduce the number of health care options for the majority of Americans until they buy their own supplemental private insurance to cover the gaps left by universal care. If you think that a Universal system in the US will work like it does elsewhere you are sorely mistaken. And so are most Americans that support universal health care without knowing how it will be paid for and what it will do to our overall health care system.

>Mitch didn't even hold a vote on Garland, come now, let's at least step up to the table and admit our own wrongdoings. 

No shit, he had control of the Senate. Your comparison is garbage.
",Rightquercusalba,e9cvk5h,conservative
"Given the rampant opioid addiction in this country, and the debate over healthcare, I thought this might be a relevant article to post. ",oceanplum,e9acxet,conservative
"I think it's interesting that truth.com has shifted to this instead of smoking. I've never been crazy about the feds running those kinds of PSAs, but it seems like a better use of them",aboardthegravyboat,e9aed84,conservative
Also dropping epipen but that’s probally more cost cutting,Enzo_SAWFT,e9agfk5,conservative
Now they should fill the gap with THC.,Castaway77,e9bg7jz,conservative
"Can we not keep making posts about waiting for someone to die? We're better than liberals.

This lady has survived cancer and like 5 falls now. Breaking bones at an old age tends to have horrible effects on life expectancy. It goes downhill fast. Politically I wish she would retire, but I hope she can still recover and live the rest of her life happily.",doobsftw,e9b0vx1,conservative
I'm still kickin' like this lady! hope at 85 I,JFGFNY,e9bsqs4,conservative
Trump Curse strikes again ,SnickersReese,e9aukn7,conservative
It's [Amy](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Amy_Coney_Barrett) time!,guanaco55,e9aukrb,conservative
Only the Good Die Young... as they say... ,ozric101,e9b1s9c,conservative
Trump blessing?,ozric101,e9b735t,conservative
Can't wait for her to o be nominated. It's coming,Devinrupp,e9axqqu,conservative
"In the first paragraph, the author states that gerrymandered districts are likely to support the reason it’s gerrymandered? Thrilling, tell me more.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9b5vr8,conservative
"A quote from a guy on r/politics


>It is still amazing to me that so many GOP dopes won, including those who were indicted like Hunter.

Can you really claim the moral high ground when Menendez won and Gillum almost won? Probably some other bad seeds in there as well.

The cognitive dissonance is real.",Sideswipe0009,e98u50p,conservative
"Jeeez. Liberals in this climate literally do not think for themselves. They are told who and what to like and vote for and they accept it. 
Can you imagine if any of the elected republicans had misconduct allegations??? The media would make sure EVERYONE was aware, and to NOT vote for them. 

But since they are Democrats, it gets swept under the rug. ",samsterrrrr,e989vze,conservative
**#believesomewomen**,Moonthrower,e98t09b,conservative
"[Choke it down, and vote for Menendez ](https://www.nj.com/opinion/index.ssf/2018/10/choke_it_down_and_vote_for_menendez.html) - Star Ledger knows he is bad, yet endorses him anyway.",Lepew1,e98vclt,conservative
"This stuff just doesn't matter when you have a D after your name and really, really doesn't matter when you are the right shade of brown as well.",mayargo7,e98nsm3,conservative
"They tried like hell to get Gillum elected in Florida as well, and he looks to be as crooked as they come.",mlmack,e98dbrr,conservative
"""...is selectively tapping into the #MeToo movement.""

Um, yes. Misconduct allegations are exceptionally important when they can be used to persuade voters that a candidate is not a person of high integrity. It APPEARS that some voters feel character is important, and some do not. I suspect the divide amongst them is also reflected in their tendency to vote R or D...",Romarion,e98w4ge,conservative
"Once again, the low standards and IQ of the Democrat voter.",BrigGenMordecaiGist,e98jxsd,conservative
Why would they use their own weapon against themselves ?,teddyrooseveltsfist,e994fbs,conservative
"Incredible.

Thanks for the link. I sent this to my sister, who is fairly moderate but voted D this election.",Colorsinthevoid45,e98be6z,conservative
"Don't give them grief over this. You shouldn't criticize people for waiting until the allegations are proven. 

Just file this away and save it for the next time they accuse us of being innocence presumers.",DangerToDemocracy,e98wauz,conservative
"That's cause when it's Dems it's glossed over by the media, written off as 'boys will be boys', rationalized  or hidden. Dems have some massive pull - can you imagine a Republican getting away with having an unsecure server or shunting classified info on to an employee's husband's laptop?",JFGFNY,e99ghdk,conservative
"#BelieveAllWomen*

*Unless they are accusing Democrats ",LumpyWumpus,e99808k,conservative
Perversity is their strength.,kcaio,e994mmk,conservative
Well no shit.  Leftists use that stuff as a tool against their enemies and that's it.  The sooner we come to terms with that and just start tuning it out and not letting it depress our turnout when it's aimed at our candidates the better off we'll be.,anuser999,e98xm7m,conservative
"Of course not, everything is simply about political gain for the Democrats. Nothing *actually* matters, just power. Which is amazing because the MSM pukes out this opposite narrative, and in turn their voters eat it up. It's honestly kind of gross.",mnslice,e993ebn,conservative
Well who cares haha,Just_a_Drunk_Gambler,e99fhoi,conservative
"I mean, to be fair, that's what happens with polarization. We are, by and large, past the days when personal qualities or morality have any effect on a candidate's perceived legitimacy. The fact is, I would vote Conservative in my own riding (Canadian equivalent of district) even if the candidate was a bad person. (Fortunately, my own riding has been represented by an outstanding human being for several years now, so I have yet to make that choice.) There's probably a line somewhere, but ""allegations"" are not it. Then again, the conservatives aren't the ones spouting ""allegation = truth"" anyways.",mask_and_knife,e991obk,conservative
The #MeToo movement is only for Republicans don’t you know?,Jabronies96,e99aj02,conservative
It's not about justice. Just sound bytes and headlines.,postonrddt,e99h6qf,conservative
"If you want something done about it, take to the streets. Demand the same level of accountability that they demand from their republican counterparts. ",giobbistar21,e99p2fa,conservative
"I hate r/politics

I use it like the guest bathroom:

Do a big number 2 in the morning and never go back.",TheComedianGLP,e99acvx,conservative
"One of the lefty newspapers literally had a headline that said. ""Choke it down and vote Mendez"". WTF.",The_Mighty_Rex,e98mz23,conservative
"Liberals do not actually care about morals. As I recall, prior to 2016 they were bragging about being more intellectual because they swore more and they hoisted Hillary up despite her use of a serial rapist in her campaign. They just assumed Conservatives cared so Liberals tried to make everything about morality. ",8K12,e98bfut,conservative
"actually had a coworker tell me ""don't forget to vote for the crook"" yesterday. Sorry, no. I'll vote R until the D's can get better candidates. I'm not going to reward corruption with a stable job & benefits. ",madonna-boy,e98la7q,conservative
"I think you’re right on the money. I live in a very liberal town, I’m registered Democrat. Buhhh- hold on wait a minute, why would I vote for someone amid campaign scandal? I didn’t vote for Hilllary and I didn’t vote our dem governor last night. I pride myself on free thinking and tons of research, so when I saw the party candidate had a track record of miss-using public funds I couldn’t do it. Plus I just thought as I did with the president the republican was the stronger candidate. Telling any of this to most people here would set off a bomb. Mention facts or details or talking points and most people won’t listen to you. It’s all media and perception and who needs those pithy little facts anyway. I don’t think it’s that Dems don’t care, I think there’s good and bad in both sides but the media makes it almost impossible to be anything but an uniformed willful participant. ",Tekshow,e98n6uw,conservative
Kavanaugh?,rubntizzug,e99l4gc,conservative
a bit hypocritical don't you think?,cmiller1225,e98alac,conservative
They don’t care as it’s all to hate on Trump.,redmancsxt,e997j7m,conservative
Raul Menendez. ,AuraXVI,e99ah8f,conservative
"It's telling one of the jurors from the Menendez criminal trail was at his victory party last night. 

Menendez would have been found guilty if the standard wasn't beyond a reasonable doubt, but something akin to more likely than not.  Tons of evidence he paid for underage prostitutes and took bribes.
",Roez,e992u7n,conservative
They want the D.,Gellister,e991wg8,conservative
He is a very far left candidate as well.,Ilikeminewelldone,e98enfj,conservative
But they have all the college education!!! ,Ledcookey,e98xo30,conservative
"> Don't give them grief over this. You shouldn't criticize people for waiting until the allegations are proven.
> 
> Just file this away and save it for the next time they accuse us of being innocence presumers.

Been there, done that. Doesn't work. Hammer them relentlessly for their hypocrisy. Hold them to their own standards. We must hold to our standards, but they must be held to their own standards.

New Rules.",jackbootedcyborg,e99e03y,conservative
"Meanwhile, dudes are getting fired because they may have had a date get upset at a goodnight kiss 14 years ago. ",Hopsingthecook,e98xgf2,conservative
Don't forget to swallow. Wtf leftists... ,cornshelltortilla,e98ovwx,conservative
"> They just assumed Conservatives cared so Liberals tried to make everything about morality.

Rather like how they suddenly start spouting scripture if they think they've found a wedge issue that will split off Christians. ",jd_porter,e98kqo4,conservative
"Gavin “alcoholic and adulterer” Newsom won the CA governorship in a landslide last night. 

And Bob Menendez won handily in NJ. 

Of course they don’t care about morals. ",kroatone,e98or2u,conservative
"Polls have always found that conservatives are more informed

anyway they don't care about those things. To use the me-too movement as a weapon but they don't actually care about it. It's only important if it's against a Republican",ExpensiveMention,e98f67g,conservative
[deleted],,e9925eh,conservative
"People who voted in these men show me either they did no prior candidate research and voted for who CNN /celebrities told them to vote for, OR, they did look into who they were voting for, found the allegations, but gave them a pass since they’re democratic. Both scenarios is equally disgusting and dangerous

I’ve posted a screenshot of the article on my IG story followed by “My whole point is - in the #metoo climate, and the huge uproar and disapproval of Justice Kavanaugh, how can all of these people/women vote for men who have the same allegations??? Oh yeah, because they’re told to, while the truth of these men are swept under the rug. 
What is the difference between Kavanaugh and these 4 people who just got elected? Not their allegations - those are the same, just their political parties. It’s disgusting to me how much scrutiny Justice Kavanaugh received yet these people -who were outright elected by their state- get nothing. 
What about all of those women who made the allegations? Do we choose to #BelieveAllWomen - but only the ones who have claims against republicans? 
Imagine being a survivor, making these allegations, but no one caring because it’s not part of “the agenda” or doesn’t matter” 
My point about the #believeallwomen thing has actually struck a lot of my liberal followers and they’ve replied agreeing with my point.. but they’re just measly agreeing. There’s no outrage, or distraught, they understand it’s wrong, but since they’re told not to care, or they see that the media/celebrities don’t care, then they don’t either. 
Fuck that!!!! ",samsterrrrr,e98nzls,conservative
Definition of it,Ilikeminewelldone,e98em2n,conservative
Oh 100% ,samsterrrrr,e98ambz,conservative
Are you proposing lowering the bar to something below “beyond a reasonable doubt” for at least some criminal cases and investigations? ,scaradin,e99lxbc,conservative
"Womyn's Gender Transition Studies and Afro-Centric Victimhood At The Hands of White Interlopers.

Double PhD (Pussy hates Dudes)",TheComedianGLP,e99a8wu,conservative
https://i.redd.it/u5axm5zpmn411.jpg,Dyeredit,e98x7fr,conservative
And usually quote it out of context.,unibuckeye,e99bdtu,conservative
"> Polls have always found that conservatives are more informed

Source for this? It would be a good weapon to use against liberals who suggest conservatives are brainwashed idiots",asphaltcement123,e98neud,conservative
"Aw, you're so brave ",mnslice,e993jm2,conservative
"It’s not equitable at all! It’s clearly a political tactic. We need to stop all this US vs. THEM and start praising any and call critical, objective, and free thinking people or we’re headed somewhere tragic real fast! Kavanaugh has been all but exonerated on every count and people I mentioned it to are just like “I’m so over that right now... moving on!” Since when is justice unimportant? Thanks for the response, I was happy with our state for the most part, aligned with about 80% of the results. ",Tekshow,e98q90k,conservative
"I'm highlighting evidence was substantial, even though he didn't get convicted. It's more likely than not he did all those things.  This is an election.  If there were any belief behind #metoo in a solid D state, and people acted what they preach, he wouldn't have won.  Much less win by about 10%.  


",Roez,e99ozs1,conservative
"The ""judge not lest ye be judfed"" is one of the worst offenders. Literally the next verse points out you'll be judged by the same measure you use to judge other people. Those verses can be condensed into ""don't be a hypocrite"" ",RAZRBCK08,e9a5ae3,conservative
"Liberals cover it up

http://cfif.org/v/index.php/commentary/54-state-of-affairs/2339-republicans-more-informed-than-democrats-according-to-pew-research",ExpensiveMention,e98r3zv,conservative
"But, that isn’t enough. If the evidence isn’t able to reach “beyond a reasonable doubt” then no conviction should take place. Politics never needed that bar, look at the investigations into candidates this go around, Republicans and Democrats alike. I would go so far to say a lot of voters are willing to put candidates under investigation for a host of crimes. Clinton won the popular vote and was within 3 specific counties in 3 specific states states and around 70,000 votes in those locations from the presidency. 

I’m all for putting barriers in front of candidates who break our laws. But, as long as Republicans won’t hold themselves accountable and Democrats won’t hold themselves accountable, it is up to voters to do that. That and as investigations start find illegal activities, charges should be brought forward, and the courts do their part. 

If the evidence can’t clear the bar, legally it needs to be let go. Politically, it is just up to voters and candidates, primary challenges, or (where available) recalls need to happen.",scaradin,e99qpc6,conservative
"I thought this was interesting and wanted to see if it still held up. It looks like the most recent survey indicates the gap is much closer than it was in 2012 (5.7 correct answers for Republicans compared to 5.5 for Democrats).

http://www.people-press.org/2017/07/25/from-brexit-to-zika-what-do-americans-know/

> There is little difference in news knowledge across partisan groups, with Republicans and Republican-leaning independents and Democrats and Democratic leaners answering about the same number of questions correctly on average (5.7 questions vs. 5.5 questions, respectively). 
Republicans are somewhat more likely than Democrats to correctly identify Paul Ryan as the speaker of the House (69% vs. 61%). There are only modest partisan differences on other questions in the survey.",Gamblor14,e98vvve,conservative
"I'm talking about the voters and politics.  I'm saying it's hard to level the hypocrisy of supporting #MeToo and not wanting to confirm Kavanaugh, with electing a guy who slept with underage girls, took bribes.  Those aren't just accusations.  They are very credible.  ",Roez,e99r2n7,conservative
I bet a surbey with different wuestion would have different results,ExpensiveMention,e98yfoe,conservative
"Accusations not proven  in the court of law are not credible. Without proof there is no there, there. ",PureGoldX58,e99s9zt,conservative
"Apologies for the confusion. It looks Cárdenas’s accuser able to amend her suit in September. Pelosi called for a House investigation back in May, but it doesn’t look like it’s concluded anything. I would hope Republicans in charge took this seriously but either decided to wait for the courts to work through or didn’t find it credible without the court’s conclusion. 

His case is still working through the courts, yes? ",scaradin,e99sy7s,conservative
That’s a Terrible pick. ,mods_blow_goats,e9ary3p,conservative
Mmmmmmmmk. No,lax714,e9asjk4,conservative
No no no no no. ,latotokyo123,e9as3fj,conservative
Gross. Why? This dude is a liberal sympathizer and even THEY hate his guts. This would be an all around awful pick.,mnslice,e9at2mn,conservative
The list needs to be longer.,R-M-Renfield,e9atcuu,conservative
Lol. That would be a pretty trumpy thing to do. Both sides would explode in anger. ,hipsterdufus84,e9atgk3,conservative
"how bout no
",JMB_was_a_god,e9awciu,conservative
Chris Christie? Are you fucking kidding me? Even Conservatives hate that dude.,DeadHeadLibertarian,e9b2j75,conservative
"Well, not sure if Spartacus or Menendez are on the committee that would be conducting his hearing, but I would pay to see Christie take it to the both of them. 

Nobody can matchup effectively with Christie in a “hand-to-hand combat” debate.  He’s quick on his feet (figuratively speaking). He’s articulate. He takes no shit. He pulls no punches—all the skills needed to deal with today’s media. 

Christie had high marks as a US Attorney. 

I’m not sure Bridgegate translates effectively to those outside NJ/NY/Philly area. Do people in Idaho or Oklahoma care about his alleged involvement in that scandal?

Now, he prosecuted Kushner’s father and put him in prison. That’s not a good dynamic to have in your inner circle of your Trump. 

Christie has an enormous ego. So does Trump. I understand part of being successful in politics at this level is having an ego, but these two are huge. 

I still can’t get over Christie prancing around on the beach with Obama a month before the 12 election. As tough as he is, sometimes he’s all too willing to bend, and the last thing we need is another wishy washy Republican in a prominent position in this country. 

Edit: not sure where I stand on Christie as you can see. There’s pros and cons. 

Edit again: Living in NJ, I lived through 8 years of him. ",mikeygio,e9atgxd,conservative
"Why? Same reason Sessions got the gig: they endorsed Trump in the primaries. Yes, yes, ""illegal"" to offer a job when campaigning. But that is undoubtedly what happened.",justhere2havefun,e9b31cs,conservative
Trump could build the wall out of the sheer number of bricks that would be shit.,jd_porter,e9azd7x,conservative
I’d like to see Trey Gowdy. ,mods_blow_goats,e9auh2q,conservative
"Gowdy talks a GREAT game. I like the guy. 

Unfortunately, Gowdy has been all talk and little action. ",mikeygio,e9aupe5,conservative
Well he is scared shitless of podesta and killary. They got to him and chaffetz. That said if he leaves them alone he could do a great job in the rest of it. ,mods_blow_goats,e9auwjj,conservative
Gowdy smells of controlled opposition.,StraightNewt,e9aw2ah,conservative
"Good, investigate everything. All sides.",Luke_Flyswatter,e98v29x,conservative
The FBI will just tell the House to pound sand like they always do. ,ozric101,e98sm9y,conservative
When do the Kavanaugh Fraud hearings begin for Feinstein & Co.?,mlmack,e98tb30,conservative
I’m so not used to Repubs fighting back.,the-divine-comedy,e98orx7,conservative
"R/politics had people saying, “Donald jr is going to jail and I bet ANYTHING Trump will disown his own son to save his own hide.” Aaaand now that there’s going to be a light on all their party members, they can start eating that crow.",poltergeist007,e999588,conservative
Imagine how Jeb Bush would have handled this.  Lmao.  I think these next 2 years will be fun to watch.  Trump will embarrass these mental midgets,BrockLee76,e98om6r,conservative
"Sadly, they do need to be reminded.  It never occurs to them that these strategies can be used against tehm without a traditional Republican.",wiseracer,e99qrg9,conservative
"I'm dying laughing. ""Two can play that game!"" Absolute classic 😂😂",DeadHeadLibertarian,e98scws,conservative
Tick-Tock -- let's get started tomorrow!,JFGFNY,e99gkb3,conservative
For once I agree with something he's posted on Twitter. I dare 'em.,neemarita,e99kdnx,conservative
Gonna be a fun 2 years,Emperor_Aurelian,e99lyn2,conservative
"Mr President, do investigate, regardless of the actions of the Dems.",boobsbr,e9a569i,conservative
[deleted],,e98tikw,conservative
He's got this!,RomeoMyHomeo,e98nn5n,conservative
"Scott Adams saw this coming months ago.  President Trump has *tons* of dirt on the Obama admin, as well as British and Australian officials.  He's holding a royal flush; he knows it, and they know it.  Rather than playing those cards outright, he will hold onto them for leverage and protection.

I heard Dem/MSM commentators this morning salivating over the thought of House committees investigating his finances and past business dealings.  Yeah... not gonna happen.",doireallywannadothis,e99n2ag,conservative
Isn't government accountability grand?,chaotic_zx,e99w6x8,conservative
Hell yeah! Drain the damn swamp!,ordonuts,e99dcsf,conservative
"I'm also very interested in Beto's campaign money.  Where it came from, where it went.",Telineye,e99f1j2,conservative
[removed],,e99dgcq,conservative
Every other Republican in DC would have withdrawn the Kavanaugh nomination.  I hope they are learning something,BrockLee76,e98po0u,conservative
"Rush has been saying this for quite some time.  When people get upset at Trump for saying mean things the simple answer is:

""This is what fighting back looks like.""",WIlf_Brim,e99fcbn,conservative
Not since Reagan,Ilikeminewelldone,e991xu6,conservative
"If they had started fighting back earlier, we wouldn't be in neo-Marxist progressive mess we're in today. Better late than never though.",andrew861,e9a1kxa,conservative
Desperate times call for desperate measures,ATR2004,e99ci1e,conservative
it's so damn good,richardguy,e99bc6g,conservative
[removed],,e99ht59,conservative
That's hilarious. Although I've heard that Trump's son is the most vulnerable for some process crime or something,politidos,e99df7x,conservative
After today I fully believe he has 100% mastered the [art of the shitpost](https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/1060162807960870913).,diehardgiraffe,e98p752,conservative
*6 years,1wjl1,e99f1hr,conservative
The 'excitement' is at a Republican actually fighting back against the democrats' tactics.,ngoni,e993jzz,conservative
"Didn't Trump say he wanted to ""drain the swamp"" while he was running? Maybe he will unintentionally do it now.",mustang23200,e99y3an,conservative
"It went to yard signs and illegal immigrants, apparently ",bartoksic,e99ik2x,conservative
"It came from California.  No clue where it went.  If you were to ask where Claire McCaskill's money went, it went to the 6+ mailings I and others got on a daily basis.",mlmack,e99m9oh,conservative
Where it went?  Down the toilet!,SickofInternetProgs,e99p42v,conservative
"You don't have to love Putin to hate corrupt politicians right here on our own soil.

There can be corrupt types against Putin and 'good guys' working with him.  It's not the movies where the bad guy is so easily defined. ",Lobo0084,e99dl02,conservative
We aren't idiots who believe that Trump colluded with Russia. ,Rightquercusalba,e99hjg3,conservative
"Yes, don't cower to the media. The screaming has always been a vocal, feckless minority.",MackMizzo,e98tynn,conservative
Joe McCarthy did nothing wrong except underestimate the amount of commies. ,ElbowWhisper,e9a76xp,conservative
"Sure, I guess that's why they're still pushing the conspiracy theory that Trump is a Russian agent while completely ignoring Obama's actual collusion with the Russians caught on mic.",MarioFanaticXV,e99j0o2,conservative
"I loved that tweet, now they will fight over supporting a speaker endorsed by Trump.  ",BrockLee76,e98pg8b,conservative
Dude the shitposting is making me so happy. I actually can’t even.  God tier shitpost. ,Derp2638,e991tb3,conservative
"Top tweet: ""In all fairness the Democrats will decide who is the Speaker of the House without any interference from the president.""

That's the lamest comeback in the history of comebacks.",zwiebelsaft,e99d7ev,conservative
At least that's a proper use of funds unlike allegedly funding the passage of illegal alien invaders.,RAZRBCK08,e9a6ug5,conservative
[removed],,e99k37g,conservative
"And if Pelosi gets it, she'll make a wonderful punching bag for Trump over the next 2 years. Also, I can't imagine hearing her talk all the time will help the Democrats lol.",diehardgiraffe,e98prp3,conservative
"It's been two years of non-stop investigations- and they've yet to turn up anything linking Trump to Russia. Ironically, the way they're going about this is actually very reminiscent of the Soviet Union- ""you show me the man, I'll show you the crime"" may as well be Mueller's motto.

As for Obama, it's not a conspiracy. It was caught on mic. [Even far-left Snopes was forced to admit this.](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/obama-more-flexibility-russia/)",MarioFanaticXV,e99kluq,conservative
Evidence that he may have at least possibly broken a law?,mlmack,e99mt8t,conservative
[removed],,e99mrtt,conservative
"Now you're moving the goal posts... You've gone from Donald Trump being a Russian agent to some people he was involved with were found guilty of some stuff completely unrelated to the original charge... These aren't even in the same field.

Meanwhile, we have Obama saying he was willing to weaken our missile defenses to give Russia stronger control of the region, but that's perfectly fine to leftists apparently...",MarioFanaticXV,e99o7y6,conservative
"No matter what you say, the Senate was created so that states with smaller populations would still have the same power in the federal government.",Mc2trinity,e99uvih,conservative
"Yeah, this is just dumb. Of course they “won the popular vote”. The most populous state in the nation had a Senate race with two candidates who were both Democrats. ",soxfan90,e99w7om,conservative
The Senate and House 'popular votes' aren't things - no matter how much Leftists want them to be. ,lastbastion,e99uro9,conservative
"They seem to think that each time a party wins a majority of the popular vote (counted across all states), that means they should win more seats than they had before, *regardless of how many seats they had before*. Logically, this means that if a party keeps winning a slight majority of the popular vote election after election, eventually they should win 100% of seats with 51% of the vote.

As long as the party with 51% is the Democrats, presumably.",PubliusVA,e9ai604,conservative
So much stupid.,_Gardien,e99w1gm,conservative
"If the popular vote was important, we wouldn't bother with representatives in the first place.",LewaLew,e99whqa,conservative
Ocasio-cortez is pissed because someone stole her line.,willyruffian,e99y4lk,conservative
"Despite the US being a Republic, if the Dems had their way, they'd control all three branches of the government because what they really want is either a dictatorship or a totalitarian regime despite claiming to be against such concepts.

Look at how they conduct themselves and the ideals they push:

1) Only one party (way of thinking) is acceptable. If you disagree your career and personal life can be ruined.

2) The government knows best. You will not be allowed to buy sugared soda larger than X. Older than 12? You may not Trick or Treat. You may vote, drive and serve in the military at age 18, but you may not buy cigarettes or alcohol until age 21. Rules, Rules and more rules centered on our deciding what you may do. (Note that if you're a member of the party elites, the rules don't apply to you or your family/friends)

3) The government will provide your healthcare and dictate when and if you may seek care. They will decide if you are worthy of treatment for any life threatening conditions. (You've got lung cancer but never smoked - prove it! You need a knee replacement but your BMI is over 24 - sorry, you're fat so no surgery for you!)

4) If we don't like you for whatever reason, we are free to accuse you of anything and you are guilty until proven otherwise - but even if you are innocent, consider your life over.

5) If you don't want what we're pushing, we will threaten and harass you. We will riot, burn and loot stores, assault anyone who gets in our way.

6) Guns are dangerous so for your own good, we'll take them away. Added plus, you can't defend yourself when we decide to burn and loot your store or one of our illegal voters breaks into your home.

I'll vote Conservative until the day I die!",JFGFNY,e9apfwc,conservative
"This is stupidity on an exponential scale. Amanda Marcotte has always been bush league, but this is tripling down on ignorance and wearing it like a medal. It's flat-earther logic. It's even dumber than Obama claiming he held ""the office of the President-elect"", then refusing to admit his ignorance and making a seal with the slogan ""Vero Possumus"" for this fictional position.",elvisjulep,e9aqvdl,conservative
The party of mob rule is upset mob rule lost even though the rules for how the senate is elected is freely available information. Shocking I tell you,FallingPinkElephant,e9ara0p,conservative
Here's something that feels unfair - Cuomo only won 15 counties in NYS - Molinaro won 47 counties and we're stuck with a corrupt creep biding his time til 2020.,JFGFNY,e9b9xom,conservative
Pshh that’s not taught in schools anymore. They need a worksheet to do busywork while the teacher does some facebooking.,Enzo_SAWFT,e99vvjz,conservative
And the fact that more of the Senate seats that were up for re-election this year were in deep blue states with incumbent Democrats.,mastaxn,e99xkk8,conservative
I think Gen Z is tired of this bullshit. I go to a fairly liberal university and the amount of republican ads is more than I would expect.,Mc2trinity,e99yvq8,conservative
"I graduated in 2012 and this was taught, I had an excellent AP Gov teacher though.",euphoricsun,e9aox9z,conservative
"Good. Sadly, many are now wanting to try and impeach Kavanaugh after a ""real investigation."" And they're calling for endless investigations into Trump and every Republican.

So they're basically more concerned with investigations than getting anything meaningful done.",Sideswipe0009,e98uozp,conservative
"Looks like Tester is going to narrowly survive, which is a shame.",sendintheshermans,e98o41y,conservative
"The MSMs endless outrage, celebrities endless lectures, social media's endless bans and censorship, etc etc etc surmounted to nothing.... in fact worse for the Democrat Party

History said the Democrat Party was supposed to have a House by a solid margin at least. In addition, there was supposed to be a BLUE WAVE that not only solidified this, but had additional house seats and then a potential senate seat flip and if its a real wave then both Senate and House to Democrats...

They under-performed not the wave... they under-performed what is generally expected from history",Death_AllHisFriends,e98i5ar,conservative
"I hope the whole turdcake of the Kavanaugh confirmation taught Democrats some hard lessons on how to carry themselves and what they shouldn’t do. Because it wasn’t just embarrassing on their part, it was manipulative and opportunistic for them to take a woman who wanted privacy about her accusations and forced her into the spotlight to try to take down Kavanaugh.",CouchRadish,e98i8qc,conservative
Was anyone on the committee for kavanaugh on the ballot Thant lost?,abuigues,e98lp66,conservative
"Also, never Trumpers and people who would attack the nationalist wing of the GOP like Curbelo, and Mia Love, and Yoder, as well as the traitors who wasted #MAGA like McCain, Flake, and Paul Ryan are dead and gone.

We lost a House majority that passed no meaningful laws and Speaker and Senators that would have us trying to negotiate an ever narrower window of 'respectable conservatism' as the left steamrolls the country into its vision, and have gained a more nationalist GOP, a more nativist GOP, and a clear mission for 2020.
",lost_snake,e98ifot,conservative
Did you forget Montana? Looks like he’s going to survive.,the-divine-comedy,e98ixr3,conservative
"Incorrect, Jon Tester voted against Kavanaugh and retained his seat. ",goldybear,e99fulr,conservative
"Rep your constituents poorly, lose your job",theinfamousjosh,e98iei7,conservative
That...is super good news.,Bejeweled_Bird,e98r8fd,conservative
Tester in Montana won as well?,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e99xvuy,conservative
"What's considered a ""battle ground state"". Because we still have Any Klobachar... Fuck",HyperKiwi,e99zxom,conservative
[deleted],,e98fwea,conservative
"And in 2020 the Right can campaign on a do nothing Democratic Party who wasted 2 years on pointless investigations.   A party who thinks that not being a Democrat is a crime.   

Had the Right kept the House Trump would have had a hard time in 2020.  Now he has a Democrat majority House that he can point to and blame for not getting any done.   And if they only seek to impeach without even the evidence of a crime,  if they try to unseat a judge because of an accusation that was withdrawn because the accuser made it up,  the voters who aren't Democrat voting zombies,  are going to give the House back to the Republicans and possibly a super majority in the Senate as well as securing Trump's reelection.   
",GreatJanitor,e9993ck,conservative
"Of course they are.

They need to keep attention off their criminal selves and criminal histories.

Fret not.

The Boss has a noose all tied and ready to be filled with treasonous necks, now that Jeff the Sessionless has been put out to elf pasture.",TheComedianGLP,e99b26z,conservative
"That one really sucks because it would have been such an upset.

But Tester really had to sweat it out.  It should never have been that close for a popular incumbent.
",nited_states,e98tzjl,conservative
"Yeah, and his margin of victory was well below the vote total of the libertarian candidate that endorsed Rosendale.",joozian_,e99hnto,conservative
"I think we can start calling it ""the blue ripple"".",peeves91,e98kdld,conservative
"Yeah. Look how the house has swung in these off year elections since 2006, opposition party has always won back 30+ seats, with Obama they won back 60. This isn't a blue wave, this is pretty average ",Jusuf_Nurkic,e98x72d,conservative
"> a woman who wanted privacy about her accusations

I don't buy that.  She had to know that for her spurious accusation to have any sort of impact, she'd have to come forward.  The whole ""I wanted privacy"" act was just a ploy for sympathy and kid gloved treatment.",FelixFuckfurter,e98l2ew,conservative
"> I hope the whole turdcake of the Kavanaugh confirmation taught Democrats some hard lessons on how to carry themselves and what they shouldn’t do.

They've learned that they need to go even harder against the right and target weak sisters like Flake and Sasse better than they did.
",lost_snake,e98jmr5,conservative
"Honestly, I would hope that is the case. But I just think that things aren't going to get any better. I think the continued strategy will be to fling as much shit as humanly possible and see what sticks.",Rogue_Elemental,e98urdd,conservative
"No, they put most of their hard-left, safe-from-losing wackos on that committee.
",nited_states,e98tw9c,conservative
Don't forget Corker gone too.,ChopSuey2,e98t362,conservative
"Your flair says “Conservative”, but you don’t speak like one. Interesting...",FarsideSC,e98iyao,conservative
Still a bunch of precincts yet to finish reporting. Could still go either way,rf-engineer,e98jxma,conservative
Smurf Shart,Mawaukey,e98oixj,conservative
"> Look how the house has swung in these off year elections since 2006

Since 2006?  [In **every midterm election since the Civil War,** the president's party has lost, on average, 32 seats in the House and two in the Senate.](https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/elections/everything-you-need-know-about-2018-midterm-elections-n832226) .  The ""Blue Wave"" wasn't even average, it was below.  ",Jizzlobber42,e99djlo,conservative
"If I were her, I'd be suing both the Democrats and anyone else that mishandled the case.",Sanctus3x,e98qphd,conservative
"Yes, I didn't buy it either.  She was just as complicit and it was planned from day 1.  There was nothing she said that had an inkling of credibility, the left saw an opportunity found her through some already established friendships and had this planned to oust Kavanaugh.",CulpeppperInaMinute,e99ewv8,conservative
"Bingo was his nameO. I go a step further and say she fabricated the entire incident from a consensual, yet maybe regrettable encounter she had with a guy that maybe resembled Kavanaugh, which if worse came to worse she could fall back on a mistaken identity excuse. The whole sexual impropriety metoo movement has emboldened women with a nearly invincible shield, and it is not a stretch of the imagination to see that there’d be an accuser out there, one who thinks Trump is “literally Hitler,” that has a political axe to grind and is not afraid to use it.",JackFucington,e99n0xp,conservative
I don't think that will work.  The Kavanaugh debacle basically turned Lindsay Graham into The Hulk.,FelixFuckfurter,e98lchc,conservative
Flakes gone.,Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e98lz7k,conservative
Doesn't matter nearly as much now with the 2 seat pickup.,alSeen,e99boot,conservative
">you don’t speak like one

Things I want: 

1) strong free speech protections for the individual

2) strong (and expanded) gun rights for the individual 

3) low taxes for the income earning individual 

4) hesitancy to be entangled in foreign affairs 

5) significantly un-bloated/diet-planned redistribution systems 

6) strict immigration enforcement and pre-emption of future illegal immigration and greatly encouraged assimilation to America's language, culture, and heritage 


None of these are possible unless we adopt a **nationalist** stance and we'll conserve *nothing* of America while the left boxes us in on every issue by flooding the country with foreigners to shore up their vote banks and bully everyone into submission with neo-Puritanical progressive moralism.


___________________


Conservatism is not meekly bending over for the left and asking them not to call you a racist, sexist, islamophobic, xenophobic 'deplorable'.


 ",lost_snake,e98jdeh,conservative
Nationalism has long been a trait of conservatives.  It's the only trait we have in common with fascism and thus why everything we do makes us literally Hitler according to the Left.  How could wanting increased emphasis on nationalism make lost_snake non-conservative?  ,PlasmaBurnz,e98kreq,conservative
It was called for Tester,the-divine-comedy,e98p3py,conservative
\#winning,TheComedianGLP,e99afee,conservative
"In 2002 Bush actually gained so I just cut it off there, but you're right keep going back and it's the same +30 or more swing for the opposition",Jusuf_Nurkic,e99pdt3,conservative
Won't happen.  She saw first hand what the Democrats are willing to do to a man who *didn't* commit sexual assault.  She knows what they will do to a woman who *did* lie repeatedly under oath.,FelixFuckfurter,e98r5pp,conservative
"Sue them for what,  making her a GoFundMe millionaire?

A hero at her shitpile university?

The center of her beach-friend circle?",TheComedianGLP,e99aien,conservative
"Only if she was telling the truth about wanting anonymity and believing it was her civil duty. 
",JdPat04,e99b1bz,conservative
"Senator Graham

pelted by Democrats

turns into the Hulk

Ain't it amazeballs",TheComedianGLP,e99amiy,conservative
"oh so flake ""flaked out""???? YAY!!!
",LVDave,e99kbz7,conservative
"All of those things have no relation to nativism nor nationalism. Those could be boiled down to American Patriotism. Calling John McCain a traitor, someone who literally fought and bled for those things you’re talking about, is gross and disgusting. Again, you’re talking like a MAGA troll, not a conservative.",FarsideSC,e98nvqc,conservative
"Even the Bolshevists were nationalists. Any great political movement for its own people has to be nationalist.

Andew Jackson loved America and America first, Mussolini loved Italy and Italy first, Gandhi loved India and India first, Stalin loved Russia and Russia first, etc.


I will never apologize for being an American Nationalist.
",lost_snake,e98l4qn,conservative
Dang it. I was hoping Jon would have more free time to spend at his farm.,rf-engineer,e98swce,conservative
"> All of those things have no relation to nativism nor nationalism. Those could be boiled down to American Patriotism. 


You're just inventing a phrase so as to specifically not say ""nationalism""

But let's play this game.

Go look up how much of the country is descended from the foreign born, and what polling says about those people's views on gun rights.


>Calling John McCain a traitor, someone who literally fought and bled for those things you’re talking about

https://www.univision.com/univision-news/immigration/john-mccains-last-battle-for-the-undocumented

I suppose you think giving amnesty to 'undocumented' people secures the future of gun rights.


>you’re talking like a MAGA troll, not a conservative.

I dunno if you know this, but the GOPs base picked Trump, not Kasich, and neocons like Bill Kristol and Ben Shapiro didn't get their way, he won the presidency, and is massively popular with the base - - why don't you go see if David French is accepting donations for a third party run?


",lost_snake,e98qrqz,conservative
"John McCain was a stain on the party and the senate. He was a warmonger who wanted to fund terrorists the world over. 

I'll never have respect for that man. ",JMB_was_a_god,e98qeff,conservative
"Your flair says “Conservative”, but you don’t speak like one. Interesting...",Silicon_Avatar,e98saau,conservative
Neither will I.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e98qrss,conservative
"I invented the phrase [American Patriotism](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_patriotism)?

> Go look up how much of the country is descended from the foreign born, and what polling says about those people's views on gun rights.

That’s not how this works. [You’re sounding like a liberal.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZN-YDnJgDDo) Instead, you’re supposed to present me with facts and data to sway my way of thinking. Telling me to Google something is about as useful as Portland police at an Antifa protest.

As for the rest of your attack against me, it’s worthless. You’re making points nobody is arguing. I said attacking McCain as a traitor is disgusting, regardless of his politics. There are a lot of Republicans that have floated some form of amnesty, even Trump.

What’s the point of attacking Shapiro, French, or the rest? No one is bringing them up. You’re being inflammatory when no one is calling for it. Stick to the topic at hand. Again, I can’t tell if you’re coming from /r/politics or /r/conservative. You reply just like the libs do.
",FarsideSC,e98uq48,conservative
"Uh, let's not forget he was a gawdamned traitor to America.

Trump knew it too, hence his ""I respect people who weren't shot down"" comment, which he almost ended with ""...and colluded with the Viet Cong"".",TheComedianGLP,e99axqb,conservative
"> I invented the phrase American Patriotism?

In specific contrast to nativism or nationalism in the context of this conversation, yeah.


> You’re sounding like a liberal.

lol

>You reply just like the libs do.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Naturalization_Act_of_1790

https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Franklin/01-04-02-0080

Do you have illegals in your family or something? 

",lost_snake,e98x2mf,conservative
people are touchy about the military so i left that out.,JMB_was_a_god,e99b16z,conservative
I’ll ignore your continued inflammatory responses if you can provide me the data I asked for in my previous reply.,FarsideSC,e993sh6,conservative
"lmao no 
",lost_snake,e99p2np,conservative
"Can we just start calling these guys Fa? They've done nothing to warrant ""Anti"".",MarioFanaticXV,e9a47y7,conservative
"Just go back to your parents’ basements already, Antifa. It is past your bedtime. ",soxfan90,e99winw,conservative
"Slightly better link, with video-

https://dailycaller.com/2018/11/07/protesters-tucker-carlson-house/",PrawnsAreOk,e99m9dw,conservative
"They're picking on people who would do them no harm.  


Imagine doing this to someone who knows people as Carlson but without the decency and principle.    


How easy would it have been to pay a contractor to fix the problem.",markcocjin,e9aex64,conservative
"Individually, they're ""fa"", but as a group they form a mighty fa-ggot.",soylent_absinthe,e9afxdl,conservative
It’s sad that people actually support the rude and awful behavior that our media displays and supports now. ,guildarts15,e9aoed5,conservative
Remember when they smeared this guy back in 2012?,MyCustomUsername,e993htf,conservative
This guy is ridiculously wealthy yet he's driving what looks to be an old ass Chevy Truck. ,Blake-bottles,e993d3c,conservative
"I don't know, though.  Orrin Hatch really stepped his humor game up by the end.",nited_states,e98v6yy,conservative
I sincerely like him as a person.  ,Charlie8005,e9981j5,conservative
Binders full of cities.,Clatsop,e99js0q,conservative
I really hope he drops the NeverTrump act and doesn’t become the new Flake.,joozian_,e98zer5,conservative
"Okay, we need Karaoke Night at the Senate. Put it on the ballot. I want to see every senator awkwardly sing, and Whitehouse to absolutely nail the stuttering of The Who’s *My Generation*",OMGorilla,e994f93,conservative
He needs Ted Cruz's social media team,Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e996jc3,conservative
"Despite his NeverTrump tendencies, I always liked ole Mittens. It was a damn shame what they did to him in 2012. ",Daghi,e99kz9h,conservative
So wholesome,TravisKrooks,e98yol8,conservative
"I got to know him, not well, but through family friends who worked on his campaign which I later joined as my first big girl political job... He's a good man, great sense of humor, which didn't come across at all. Would have been a fine President. Maybe even a great one.",neemarita,e99kjrj,conservative
He should roll down the window so his dog can hear him sing.,RooRyChambers,e99n0di,conservative
He is also a good singer!,Gnome_Sane,e993qww,conservative
I met him when he came to USU in Logan UT. He’s such a nice guy! I’m glad to have voted for him and I support him whole heartedly!,CroutonusFibrosis,e99j0fk,conservative
YESSS,theophilusnorth,e9912jj,conservative
That's pretty funny,cmiller1225,e98tsry,conservative
He’s certainly got Cash’s register.,KommetinBethlehem,e990uag,conservative
I wish him all the best!,CulpeppperInaMinute,e99h95y,conservative
Long as his dog isn't strapped to his roof ,right_mind_mechanic,e99p5e9,conservative
Hes annoying already ,eeeinator,e99vqhi,conservative
Mitt Tardney.,chabanais,e99f6qx,conservative
"My heart is dead to this guy. He's about as trustworthy as McCain,  i.e. not at all.",ChunkyArsenio,e998lfx,conservative
"He was......ok.  Not the best, kinda reminds me if Dubya, Probley would have been a better candidate in 2008 than McCain.",SuperFunMonkey,e99o4mv,conservative
Love me some Romney.,crashohno,e999whs,conservative
Meh,AnemoneTulips,e99sod9,conservative
"Just goes to show that Dems have zero principles. Romney is left of Manchin and an altogether decent human being, and they cast him as an evil right-winger. I don't much care for his Never-Trump attitude, but what the left did to him was wrong.

I just hope that Orrin Hatch continues to troll the left on Twitter.",Tu-ne-cede,e99cvpi,conservative
"Imo thats what lead to trump.

The reps ran the most plain, whitebread, boring candidate they could find and the media STILL fucking spun him as a racist, woman hating, horrible person.

At that point reps just threw their hands up and said fuck it, and stopped caring about the shit the media threw at their candidate. Thus Trump being so politically ""bulletproof""",GeoStarRunner,e99ndqm,conservative
"Bill Maher donated a million dollars in effort to keep Romney from winning the presidency, and now he says he would give a million for him to be president.  The left cries wolf about everything.  ",curly_spork,e99kpfh,conservative
Just wait till CNN reports that there's a dog strapped to the roof. ,Trisagion-und-Isolde,e99dl1y,conservative
The left created Trump more than anyone else did,5937539859582754,e9a4dj3,conservative
"Most millionaires don't buy things they don't need, that practical spending is part of how they got to be millionaires.",cavemanben,e99712i,conservative
"He randomly offered Rick Perry a bet during the debates for 10,000, probably more than the value of this truck.",jivatman,e993ovy,conservative
"My economics class in college (for engineering) showed studies where most millionaires did not buy new cars. The reason being is the value of a car is lost at the fastest rate within the first 2 years of its purchase (depending on make). So typically as a good financial decision they would buy a used car at around 2 years old and then sell it at around 5 years (when major mechanical issues start to pop up).

Millionaires treat every purchase as an investment, so luxury items that depreciate in value rapidly are often avoided.",ultimis,e99nom5,conservative
We can only hope that he devotes himself full time to twitter trolling.,Tu-ne-cede,e99cwq4,conservative
He will be missed.,ReaganTroll,e98wdja,conservative
"I’ve heard him speak a few times and he did a great job, it is just too bad he is a RINO. Hopefully he can put aside his differences with Trump and back him on important needed issues. ",RKfan,e99m21r,conservative
"I lost my respect for him when he trashed Trump during the election when I saw a video of him in 2012 praising Trump from top to bottom. He's too wishy-washy for me, and I'm LDS.",sunder_and_flame,e99unqt,conservative
https://youtu.be/kq134j41ay0,Cuisinart_Killa,e99vduc,conservative
"I hope he drops the Romney act, admits he's actually Bruce Campbell, chooses Sam Raimi as his running mate, and runs on an anti-deadite platform in 2024.",LonelyMachines,e99geaz,conservative
I hope so too but he is absolutely the next flake.,Palmettojcm,e999w45,conservative
"I don't see why he would, Trump was a major dick to him 2 years ago to rub in him winning.  He made Romney come grovel for secretary of state when he had no intention of giving it to him as punishment for comments made during the election.",Roshy76,e99t0qs,conservative
Utah Mitt is the best Mitt. It's a good thing he got out of Mass.,PubliusVA,e99flp4,conservative
oh Jesus dude,richardguy,e99xjka,conservative
"I respectfully disagree with that one, tbh.  Have an upvote anyway.",zwiebelsaft,e99docy,conservative
Aggies All The Way! I got to hear him speak at the Silicon Slopes Tech Summit last year. ,RKfan,e99m4hi,conservative
lol,Clatsop,e99juim,conservative
"Mitt Romney's!

Testicles!

Haaaaail Satan!",sunder_and_flame,e99upqz,conservative
Yeah not sure what’s going on here. People are quickly forgetting just how he was acting not too long ago.,JdPat04,e99f45b,conservative
"They're still smearing him as an evil right-winger.  Personally, I can live with him even if he can be a bit of a rich snob sometimes.",zwiebelsaft,e99djum,conservative
Romney spent 12 million renovating his mansion a few years ago. Plenty of millionaires spend big.,Red_of_Head,e9a6wvl,conservative
Unless you're Trump,Blake-bottles,e997ivg,conservative
I had 5 guys at my house a few weeks ago to play D&D. They all own decent sized tech companies and most are millionaires many times over since this is their second or third startup (they get them going and sell the business). The newest car in my driveway was a 2010 Honda Accord. I found it hysterical. ,Earthling03,e9adkur,conservative
"He already positioned himself as a never-Trumper, which is strange because no Republican can challenge Trump. He propably just hates him.",TheYoungSpergs,e9a0696,conservative
Underrated comment,Dudehitscar,e99iday,conservative
Man I really must be getting old if I can't get this one,richardguy,e99xfzv,conservative
"“Somebody more successful than me was a big meanie, so I’m gonna fuck over the people that elected me. Meeeeh.”

I sincerely hope Romney isn’t that petty.",Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e99vxq6,conservative
Just the chorus part? Not the entire list - which still wasn't completely horrific - but the actual chorus? I think he nails it.,Gnome_Sane,e99drpt,conservative
[Best Mittens ever!](https://external-preview.redd.it/9k5y-_6Td4SeDC87KPQXlKcRYlNY0l05aQ6Qo2uIfYk.jpg?width=768&auto=webp&s=d993400adb31a0e266a250ed1b426b45401d825d),chabanais,e99nhgp,conservative
They'll remember soon enough when he joins Democrats in some media created and fueled ultimatum of some sort.  This guy is a snake and Utah let him in.,Random57473838,e99irr0,conservative
"Dollar store cheetah print, yo",zwiebelsaft,e99dkxb,conservative
Difference between billionaire and millionaire I suppose,GeneticsGuy,e9a086b,conservative
It's part of his business though; projecting success.  ,TheYoungSpergs,e9a01mq,conservative
Or unless you are anyone else who is extremely wealthy and enjoys new things. ,Rightquercusalba,e99bvf1,conservative
\> Implying Melania doesn’t deserve to not poop on a solid gold toilet,Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e99vmb7,conservative
I mean McBrain was..,richardguy,e99xgoq,conservative
"I don't think he is petty, I just think he doesn't like Trump.",Roshy76,e99xfio,conservative
Oh yes- that has potential but it's rough.,zwiebelsaft,e99epp2,conservative
I don't think you go to enough karaoke open mic nights to fully appreciate his talent.,Gnome_Sane,e99evfn,conservative
"The sad part is, I actually agree. 😭😭😭",zwiebelsaft,e99f7v9,conservative
Having worked at a few bars in LA... where every no-talent comes anyway... I speak with authority.,Gnome_Sane,e99fb8g,conservative
Yeeeeech RIP your ears,zwiebelsaft,e99foab,conservative
"Isn't Acosta's job to report the news via asking intelligent and meaningful questions? Instead he acts like he's a prosecuting attorney grilling a defendant. This painting the caravan as a spontanous group of good people seeking asylum is ridiculous. When you knock down barricades and flat out state you are going to force your way into a country regardless, that is an invasion. 

No doubt if I decided to force my way into Jim Acosta's house, he'd be calling the police to report a home invasion!",JFGFNY,e9bbeng,conservative
">I'm sure there are other posts getting into the data behind the election and what all of that means for the next two years. 

Honestly I don't think it means much. Dems will take the house and use it to justify their blue wave comments, Reps will take the Senate and use it to say there wasn't a blue wave. And the country will keep going with everyone in Washington fighting with each other.",mbarnar,e984yso,conservative
"To be fair, though, this election was very different than 2016's. The left was firmly pushed out of all branches of government in 2016- we only got pushed out of one half of one branch this year, and we made gains in the other half of that same branch. It's difficult to say that either side actually ""won"" this election. 

Even if the right were inclined to riot this isn't really a good motivator for that. 



",Maswasnos,e983gc0,conservative
"I’ll confess, it’s easier because first, this election, although it is important, is significantly less important than 2016 (Two SCOTUS seats, the presidency). And second, we still had a pretty damn good night in the Senate and a better than expected one in governor’s races.",1wjl1,e988k56,conservative
"I honestly think the election went really well all things considered.  If the dems pulled out victories like the republicans did in 2010 I would be very worried, but the republicans were able to hold up some vulnerable seats and fight off a lot of big money campaigns from the democrats. There is some strategizing that needs to be done in the state legislatures though, thats the backdoor tyranny plan that the democrats have concocted. ",iwasthebeaver,e984vub,conservative
"We are adults. When we need to take our lumps, we take them like adults. We don't go screaming at the sky when we don't get our way. 

We lost the house, but that's ok. Its what normally happens. We kept the Senate, we actually pick up seats in the Senate. Which means we are just in for 2 years of non stop gridlock, and maybe a scotus pick. And that's perfectly fine. ",LumpyWumpus,e9849fw,conservative
"Honestly, the house being lost is just a trend that’s been happening in the modern political theatre. It’s a night where Conservatism got plenty of victories. The Blue Wave never happened, which is hilarious. ",BayernMunich22,e9839jn,conservative
Not sure why the sub r/politics is even named that still. Just reading most of the top articles shows how bias and one sided that sub is. It's a completely salty circle jerk still claiming that an political figure they disagree with needs investigated or throw into prison right away. The subs a disgusting cesspool of delusional children who's so detached from reality they believe their own hype. That sub should just be combined with r/democrat and be done with it.,Raqriz,e986ntk,conservative
"Agreed, but it's a little apples and oranges. In 2016 if Hillary won, you would've seen a lot more hysteria from the right. No doubt about it.

And last night was more of a split decision victory for the Democrats, as you mentioned, instead of the complete Buster Douglas surprise upset victory Trump achieved in 2016. Many people were primed to believe that Trump couldn't win, and had a psychological freak out when the worst possible outcome to them happened.",Trunkington,e9896l3,conservative
"Notice how instead of whining about the House we are remaining optimistic and strategizing how to get things done? No social media rants, no screaming, no skipping work. It’s very telling.",DHARMAFREAK12,e984fyo,conservative
"Generally speaking, it was a pretty okay night for Republicans, which I think is why we're all pretty pleasant today. Like, yes, Republicans lost the House and that's objectively a bad thing, but this wasn't a wave election.

Tellingly, none of my liberal friends seemed to be gloating either via text or even on Facebook. Considering how many of them would drop in with some bad news about Trump throughout the cycle, that means that they didn't really get the victory they were hoping for.

And it's easy to see why. Republicans will have a pretty hefty majority in the Senate, to the extent that it might even be out of the Democrats' reach in 2020 now. If they do beat Trump and don't win the Senate, you're theoretically talking about a Democratic President that could get no major legislation passed or any judges confirmed.

In the House, Democrats are going to have about 30 seats, but even that is slightly less than history suggests. Despite all the big talk about how Trump was losing key constituencies and how Republicans were imploding, this election was basically just a normal ebb and flow of power in our political system. The big takeaways from last night are: Trump isn't toxic, and Republicans are still electable. That alone is a huge victory.",olt327,e995dkb,conservative
People decided they are fine with just shitload of judges under stable economy.,ReaganTroll,e9838d4,conservative
- #NotMyHouse?,pk3maross,e985eqv,conservative
"The leftists are still freaking out about people voting for Republicans even after they won the House. I don't understand how anyone can talk about how great this ""Blue Wave"" was but still find it necessary to belittle anyone who didn't vote their way.",Vandrin,e986d3i,conservative
"I thoroughly enjoyed watching the election and it feels good knowing my vote in Florida means something. 

We were expected to lose the house so it’s whatever. Not realistic to hold the majority of branches forever. Back to the drawing boards guys.",icecreamdude97,e98bsg1,conservative
You call this a loss? That was a pretty great turnout for you guys. ,Gunstray,e98z9ka,conservative
"Damn White people and their *shuffles deck, picks card* handling losses!",OldSchoolVinny,e990j0h,conservative
We have jobs to do,AnarkeIncarnate,e996y2x,conservative
"There are some bright sides to our loss, but we handled things very well overall mainly because we understand the government isn't supposed to control our lives so if we lose an election, it's not a life or death scenario ",Dillionmesh,e98819l,conservative
"Can someone ELI5.. does it even matter that we lost the house?  If the Democrats “investigate” trump.. can’t he claim executive privilege?  If they move to impeach, can’t the senate block it?  If they try to pass anything retarded.. can’t the senate block it?",MigzMando,e986l8h,conservative
"To be fair, we would probably be pretty upset if the Dems took all three branches in 2020. 

While conservatives would be devestated, I don’t think we would unleash pure vitriol on the left in the same way that they did in response to Trump. After 16, it felt like Dems hated *all* Republicans for that election. I think we only hate the far left. ",Colorsinthevoid45,e98bm5d,conservative
"I’m from Michigan and it was a tough loss for us. John James put up a good fight against Debbie Stabenow. However, the Michigan GOP in my opinion made a big mistake by choosing Bill Schutte. And although I’m pro-marijuana it didn’t help that it was on our ballot because Schutte has thrown so many people in jail in this state for marijuana related offenses. It’s no surprise to me that he didn’t win. I just hope the GOP here gets there shit together and get a stronger candidate for the next election. Our governor elect is going to raise our taxes and our lieutenant governor elect is a known Hamas sympathizer. These next 4 years in the mitten are going to be nerve racking.",NightFreak87,e98c2dc,conservative
People don't get upset because they lose. They get upset when their expectations are not met. Everyone on the right already knew the house would flip. Almost nobody on the left thought Trump would win.,Unstoppable316,e9915id,conservative
"My hubby checked the polls last night. He was bummed that we were going to lose the House. I’m very disappointed as well. But, like you said, I’m glad it wasn’t a total Blue Wave. 

I found out this morning that my county went Dem. We’re the largest county in a Red state. If we go completely Blue, we could change the state. It’s a terrifying thought. 

I just try and hold my head high knowing I did my part.",PurpleAngel23,e98dm77,conservative
"My state elected ANOTHER Democrat governor, after having Democrat, where said previous governor had one of the worst approval ratings of any governor in American history. Am I mad? Little bit. But the republican majority for senate means that Chuck Schumer still isn't majority leader, which is a pretty good win.",GizmoRazaar,e98aj4s,conservative
Also to be fair to the left you have to account for the fact that they lost everything in 2016 even though it had all been promised to them.,MuricanStephen,e987g4b,conservative
"Well, we want small government. 

On a fundamental level we don't think government should be involved in telling us what is morally good. 

&#x200B;

Today's Democrats treat government almost as if it's a religion, and the head of state its prophet, so you can see how upset they might be if they think that their source of morality doesn't match their morality.",Astraeus9195,e988whg,conservative
We aren't descendant's of Sybil ,cmiller1225,e9845ax,conservative
"So wait, are we not gonna molotov limousines? I've got this here molotov cocktail and I've already lit the wick, I thought we were gonna go wild. I thought that was the done thing, now. 

Guys, the wick is burning down, should I put it out? Guys, what do?",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e98e8tm,conservative
"Well, we would like to flip cars and demonstrate, but we got work to clock into at 6 am. Makes it a tad difficult to spend all our time being triggered.",wittyusernamefailed,e98ituo,conservative
"I was here on reddit in 2008 when Obama won (on a different account, IIRC). Yeah, it sucked, but then I went to work and life went on. ",skarface6,e995zio,conservative
"For how much the left pushed for young people to vote, we did well ",SussyPiff,e99fxsy,conservative
We're not psychopaths.,blizzardice,e98ebh4,conservative
"Massachusetts Conservative here... I just want to know where I put my hashtag?  #NotMySenator
Is it like just my car windows and garage doors, or do I get hats and socks made?  I'm not really sure how this is supposed to go - I'm not a Democrat.",parkowork,e98f7lp,conservative
"Conservatism didn't lose the house.

I wonder what would have happened if the House had passed a real budget, a real ACA repeal/reform, real immigration reform. I wonder what would have happened if they had fought back on all this Mueller business.

I'm not saying that they would have won over Democrats. But you've got to think that there's a lack of energy among conservatives when the House has barely giving them anything to root for.

And it's not a referendum on Trump. While Trump could use the bully pulpit more for conservatism, he hasn't turned down any conservative actions either. 

Last night, I listened to Shapiro, Knowles, and Klavan argue over tariffs and the value of ""globalism"" or ""free trade"". Knowles rightly points out that all of Trump's ball swinging on tariffs simply pushed China into lowering there, which the free traders should see as a win. We need to make it damned clear that these arguments are simply the right disagreeing over the best way to be right. I can understand a fair amount of ""concern"" over Trump's actions, but you can't deny that even those actions fall neatly and squarely into the swath of conservatism.

When Conservatism is what's on the ballot and still loses, yeah, I'll be a lot more upset over the election. But right now I'm just upset that the Republicans still can't figure out how to win after being shown how.",aboardthegravyboat,e98gpxk,conservative
"The losses were not only expected, but actually *less* then average.

[ In every midterm election since the Civil War, the president's party has lost, on average, 32 seats in the House and two in the Senate.](https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/elections/everything-you-need-know-about-2018-midterm-elections-n832226)

Seriously, the only thing the Ctrl-Left gained power over was my sides; they hurt so bad from laughing right now",Jizzlobber42,e9931bp,conservative
"What a bunch of bullshit, Trump literally retweeted a tweet which praised himself for gaining seats in the senate and criticised the democrats for winning the house. While at the same time I have seen SEVERAL republican supporters criticising the race, gender, ethnicity & sexuality of democratic candidates who turned seats blue while also continuously making up false information...",RemyH,e98j8mr,conservative
"> we're not...rioting with obscene hats in Washington, D.C....

how quickly the imagery of shrieking folks with teabags hanging off their heads has faded from memory",My2centsIsOverpriced,e98f5q9,conservative
"Most first term midterms I've seen in the past have resulted in a total flip of power. It happened to Obama, and made him a lame duck president for the next 6 years.

Losing the house isn't great but it's not the end of the world. Trump accomplished so much the first two years, as long as the democrats can't pass new legislation, we should be fine.

With them in control of the house they can't simply play obstructionist anymore. They will need to put up or shut up, if they have any actual fucking ideas re: stuff like immigration reform, they will need to be proactive about it and try to reach across the aisle.

Something tells me that ain't gonna happen, and they're gonna act like babies for 2 more years, we're gonna keep hearing about Russia and tax returns and muh emolument clause or whatever. So when 2020 comes around they will probably lose the house again so long as the economy remains strong.",gargoyle_mayonnaise,e98cjcy,conservative
Because we’re fucking adults. Same happened when Obama won. We weren’t thrilled but everything was going to be fine. ,HonorMyBeetus,e98au8w,conservative
Visit my states subreddit r/Ohio. It’s embarrassing.,Atton2,e988nfg,conservative
"Most conservatives I know believe in democracy and the democratic process.  We win, great.  We lose, okay, but everyone had their say.  Most Dems I know think that 50% of the country and illiterate racists who shouldn’t be allowed to vote.  That’s why there is a difference in responses.",volcanicpale,e98a2nd,conservative
"I'm sorry, but what is the point of this post? Why are you further trying to divide America? Come on, guys, we can do better than this. What's the point in comparing the two when you can just twist it to suit your own agenda? :/",GobtheAlmighty,e98ihmn,conservative
"I think a lot of the protests were focusing more on human rights/ woman's rights than just losing a presidency.


People rarely protest because their candidate lost, they're protesting because of the actions of the opposition.


Democrats are much less controversial than Republicans.",Mida_Multi_Tool,e98jq4s,conservative
"Let’s get real here. Last night was a victory for Trump.

A lot of the retiring RINOs/Never Trumpers, most frustrated healthcare reform, and were in favor of amnesty got replaced with Dems. They were basically Dems but they were red. In terms of passing legislation, we didn’t lose anything by most of those seats flip to Dem. 

Sure, the speaker and some committee hats will change. But Ryan did nothing anyway. Look at what is going to be amplified. Obama’s influence didn’t help anyone he campaigned for. Trump really did help his candidates. The national Dem message is corrosive as fuck in many battlegrounds. In many of them Blue dog Dems, who are progun, moderate on abortion and immigration were elected. Many even said they wouldn’t vote for Pelosi as speaker. Many are going either spend 2 years breaking promises and losing voters, or spend 2 years doing a Joe Manchin, where they know they need to remain beholden to constituents. 

The number of flipped seats isn’t final yet, but, it really is not that bad taken in context.

So with Dems now in a position to actually shoot themselves in the foot, I expect them to help Trumps re-election bid in 2020.",RightWingFreak,e9892e0,conservative
Democrats are the party of victims. They **always** blame someone else for their troubles. They **never** take responsibility for their own actions. That's the difference.,,e989mug,conservative
"I agree. I think we are great in the sense that we act calm, collected, and try to be as fair as possible. ",goldrotmgonly,e98c4kc,conservative
"Because while the midterms were technically a loss, it was a loss we all expected to happen. The House will reliably flip to the opposing political party for almost every first midterm of a new president’s term. I can’t remember any conservative pundits going on the mic and saying anything but “Republicans will lose seats in the House.”

But we gained seats in the Senate, which is a LOT less likely to happen. And even more so, we gained seats of formerly Democratic Senators who voted against Kavanaugh so it could be argued this was the final response from conservatives in regards to the confirmation of Justice Kavanaugh.",CouchRadish,e98ilf0,conservative
haaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa......,bonkersmcgee,e98ius5,conservative
We knew the house was gone months ago. Big difference.,kevinlord190,e98kr8y,conservative
"What gets me is that last night was a great night for Republicans, many elections people thought would swing to the Democrats we won. Jake Tapper even said there is no Blue Wave.

Despite all of that you go to r/politics and after going through the first 2 pages I've yet to see an article that's not Pro-Democrat from last night. ",jwt155,e98kriv,conservative
"I worried about leftist violence if they lost the House. At least we gained seats in the Senate and, God willing, Nancy Pelosi",RomeoMyHomeo,e98l7ve,conservative
All this lost proves is how social media can corner you into a bubble where you don't actually see what is going on,BentheBruiser,e98qc4k,conservative
"”Compare the 'reactions' from two sets of subreddits, from two different elections.""

The definition of objectivity, lol.",Lisdonvarna,e98r0zm,conservative
I'm really hoping fiscal conservatism can take hold now that congress is divided!,wejami,e98ra6f,conservative
"Look...not all Republicans are the adults in the room, and to be fair:  not all Dems are babies. BUT, it seems a lot more likely that the Left melts when they don't get their way, rather than the Right.",okwhynot64,e98riu3,conservative
"Yeah, for local politics of a red state like r/Oklahoma - just don’t even bother going there. It’ll make your head explode. Every other post is “I’m so ashamed of this stupid state” or “I can’t wait to leave this god-forsaken state and live with other rational people who don’t vote against their own interests.”

",Kreetle,e98s2ll,conservative
I believe last night is setting the Republicans up for success in 2020. ,Ruberis,e98vvbk,conservative
In Florida we did good so no ones goin crazy on our side down here,Haggy27,e98xl9s,conservative
"I consider it a huge victory. The President’s party almost always loses Congress, and almost always in a worse manner. To not only keep the Senate, but add seats, and only lose 35 house seats? Having paid attention to the media the last two years, if you had offered me that earlier in the year when Democrats were polling in the mid teens in the generic ballot, all I heard was “resist resist resist!,” millions of people were showing up to marches, etc., I would have taken these results in a heartbeat.  These results look like normal results with a well liked president, not a vilified one like Trump.  That we were able to maneuver through all of the negative media, which I recall seeing a stat that ~90% of the political articles were anti-Trump, and achieve these results? Wow. Enjoy the investigations Democrats. The Senate won’t  be able to vote for conviction of impeachment though. They will be too busy confirming federal judges, and who knows, possibly RBG’s replacement.",r777m,e9901o1,conservative
"A lot of them aren't even handling their losses last night well either. Besides, I don't think anyone feels like they ""won"" overall, right or left; it was more of a tie and Congress is a bit of a stalemate... not to mention the expectations vs the mind-blowing outcome.",APyritesApatite,e99cdbr,conservative
The Democrats are still planning protests and riots. ,Stained-Glass-Window,e99i9ee,conservative
"To be fair, the losses in the House were anticipated and no surprise. Hillary's loss was a complete sucker punch and total shocker to people. It's like how someone handles the death of a relative who has been dying of cancer for the past 2 years or the death of that same relative in a vehicle accident. 

I'm not justifying the petulant way the Left handled Hillary's loss, but it did come as more of a shock to them than the GOP losses last night.",super_ag,e99ng7a,conservative
Wow... People still post on /r/hillaryclinton,reticentnova,e99nurp,conservative
"They're reacting badly to 2018 as well, developing",BeachCruisin22,e99o73d,conservative
"This is hopefully just giving them enough rope to hang themselves before 2020. If they're just going to throw a tantrum for two years with no power other than obstruction, they'll be gone again in a couple years. ",senatorpjt,e99s7ek,conservative
"Part of it is the House Republicans were such a pathetic letdown the past two years, we don't really care if they're gone ",SickofInternetProgs,e9a2qjk,conservative
"Are we prepared to admit how exaggerated this election was for both sides? There was no Blue or Red wave. This was just a normal mid-term election just like all the others. 

I think it would do us all some good to get out of our political bubbles - our echo chambers - and return to normal life and reconnect with the average American. ",BruceCampbell123,e98fklv,conservative
"I don't know, I've seen some people taking it hard. Some kid I know of FB said he was going to riot, skip work, ask for his test to be cancelled, and go get counselling services... Then he said oh wait, I don't do that, I'm not a Democrat.",RKfan,e989zsk,conservative
What happened to the liberals crying about election fraud? ,VeganMcVeganface,e9899s7,conservative
"[Pat Sajak](https://twitter.com/patsajak/status/1059991905990148096?s=21) 

Here’s a nice poll ",Kspresent,e989iei,conservative
"Woke up, shit, showered, brushed my teeth, and went to work like a responsible person this morning. I voted, my district held by a butthole-clenchingly tight margin, so I did my part. I've got nothing to be upset over.",bigkr88,e989ncb,conservative
"Difference is, we act like adults, process our disappointment and then get on with our lives. In my case I rattled off a few choice expletives last night, said another few this morning, shook my head and then dropped my kids off to school and started work.

The people spoke, results must be respected and we all need to get on with it. Disappointing, but you can't win them all.",WPWeasel,e98advx,conservative
I see you've already forgotten about how the tea party acted.,expansiveEdumacation,e98s0ss,conservative
Are you suggesting people shouldn't protest against things they don't believe in? ,geneschzsthatplzs,e98s2ad,conservative
"Well I wouldn't even consider it a loss, the repubs now know which states to prioritize, gained 4 seats in the senate, even though they lost the house it could be a good opportunity for Maxine waters and her buddies to make absolute fools of themselves though I suspect the media will cover for them. 

But again even though the house is lost they didn't gain 32 seats they got at least 23 so this is good, historically the midterms don't favor the sitting president and his party. But this surprised me. I'd say that the republicans came out winners on this, the blue wave was stemmed and more voters were picked up. 

What the repubs need to do now is lead the democrats on and let Maxine waters and Nancy pelosi make fools of themselves, but honestly I can't believe warren won again in Massachusetts that's pretty depressing. ",Clownshow21,e98uq6p,conservative
Umm. Remember the birth certificate thing in 2008 and 2012? ,cranesarealiens,e98ir80,conservative
"mostly cause it barely seems like a loss. yeah, sucks not to have the house, but we made gains in the senate and kept the governor's houses for the most part. plus, lots of good things happening on ballots across the nation apart from representatives. protecting unborn human life, voter ID laws, looks like washington state is going to at least not enact an insane carbon tax. there are things to celebrate, and let's be honest, Trump wasn't going to try and pass laws anyway in the next two years, at least having an opposition party in the house gives a target for trump to vent to and blame",sylect,e988sey,conservative
"Youd be much more upset and want to start riots too if the Dems wanted to deport you, lock your children up, get rid of civil rights people have fought for years for, and start trade wars with your allies. You dont have to complain because either way you're unaffected.",IAmTriscuit,e98qly6,conservative
"Or even the right's reaction when they lose.

But funny, the left wouldn't have pointed out the rights stupidity last election if they weren't claiming things like millions of people spring up at the inauguration.

Pick at least a semi-intelligent leader next time and they'll stop poking fun at you.",sciron64,e98e4vc,conservative
"Well yeah, we arent petulant children",blkarcher77,e98bwpm,conservative
"In 2016 it wasnt about loosing an election or loosing control of the house and senate. Life usually goes on without much difference. 2016 was about the election of Trump, a man who mocked veterans, mentally challenged, who talked about moving on a bitch, who said he could shoot someone in the face and get away with it, etc. How could a racist idiot possibly win the election? Then there was a lot of latent frustration from McConnels obstructionism and party over country. Also Hillary won the popular vote. ",flyguysd,e98jx6c,conservative
"I'm curious what everyone thinks about 2020.  I was thinking that Trump had reelection in the bag, but now I'm not so sure.  I could see Florida and Pennsylvania switching after last night, which would make 270 very difficult, assuming he kept Michigan and others.",JoshClarkMads,e98eypd,conservative
"GOP did far better than Clinton or Obama did in their first midterm election.  Can't win everything all the time, life goes on.",BeachCruisin22,e98ivmg,conservative
"I'm sure there are hoardes of disappointed Lefists that were all ready to riot and commit terrorist acts if things didnt go their way. ""Now we need a NEW reason to act like animanls.""",Troy85909,e98kmh1,conservative
"I noticed this too. It seems like a much higher percentage of dramatic, crazy people are on the Left.",LibertyTerp,e98qmcj,conservative
It's simple; we're objectivity better people than leftists. ,ConsistentlyRight,e98vnq2,conservative
"Well, we didn't lose much. Just gonna have 2 years of deadlock as usual. Everything will right itself in 2020. The House will push unconstitutional bullshit. The Senate or Trump will shoot it down.",M6D_Magnum,e99dzk1,conservative
"Yes, because everyone knows reddit.com is an accurate reflection reality.",snarky-yet-sage,e98eq9m,conservative
"So you Republicans gerrymandered the fuck out of the country, did your damndest to suppress voters, and sent Senators to Russia *on the 4th of July* to beg Putin to rig the election again and you *still* lost! Your party is a hate group, a terrorist organization, a criminal enterprise, a Russian asset, and an enemy of the human race. You can't win without cheating. There are more of us than there are of you. We are the majority, and *don't you fucking forget it!!!*

Your little Fourth Reich is not going to happen. That orange Russian sperm dumpster you worship is as good as impeached. The next Republican president hasn't been born yet. Once Mueller is done with your party, it'll be reduced to a regional cult operating out of a compound in rural Idaho. You lost the Civil War, you lost WWII, you lost to a black man twice, you lost the popular vote to Hillary, you lost tonight, and you will lose in 2020, 2022, 2024, and beyond. GET. OVER. IT!!!",politicalthrow99,e9960lb,conservative
I mean if you look at the numbers from previous presidents it’s objectively not the blue wave they were hoping for. At all. How they spin it in the media is one thing but the DNC knows what it is and hopefully it motivates them to change course away from the insanity. ,ZardokAllen,e988y1q,conservative
"> Honestly I don't think it means much.


I actually think this means a lot because I think a liberal house, a conservative senate, and an executive that is essentially an independent and a former CEO is a great model for the country. The house is the one that comes up with innovative policy, the senate is the one that fact checks it and shoots down the bad ones, and the President is the final check.


This model makes perfect sense to me in theory.",PM_ME_LIBERTARIANISM,e99nq7w,conservative
"I understand that I have built myself into a position of privilege (systematic and earned), but I really do believe deep down that none of this matters nearly as much as the apps on my phone screen want me to believe. I firmly believe that our community matters so much more to us than whatever Washington does. We are responsible for each other. That’s what I believe. 

Whether that belief is justified or not, I’m not sure. Like I said, I realize I am in a comfy position to say that. ",Yung_Money_Yung,e99fe79,conservative
"Another difference is expectations. In 2016, 99.9999% of people expected Hillary to win that election. They were told for months that Trump didn’t have a chance. Even on election night, that day started with Hillary being given a 98% chance of winning, and ended with DJT as pres. They were given a guy punch that almost none of them expected.    
  
In this election, polling had been pretty spot on for a long time now. We knew for months that the Dems would probably take the House and Repubs would probably keep the Senate. On Election Day, there were no surprises, no swift punch to the gut. We had months to prepare, and exactly what we prepared for happened. In fact, things actually went better than expected. Dems went 0/3 on Beto, Abrams, and Gillum, which is a win all day every day imo. Why would we riot?",CatoTheBarner,e988cew,conservative
"Exactly, I feel like both sides are feeling neutral, both sides lost and gained, so we’re just kinda like “hummmm, yeah, cool”. ",NiftWatch,e98zx2n,conservative
Bill Whittle said he sees these election results as a tie.,NocturnalPatrol,e996yyk,conservative
I think we could’ve barely held the house if Paul Ryan had actually done something in recent months.,MyCustomUsername,e98bzd4,conservative
"The problem is that GOP lost the House. Yeah it would be tough not to lose it and the ""Blue wave"" was not so big after all. But why did GOP lose? Was it bad strategy? Was it lack of funding to races that could have been won? Was it because of too much trumpism or too little trumpism?",sjwking,e98ecu4,conservative
">I honestly think the election went really well all things considered.

This is what both sides are saying.  The Republicans lost a house (the House) and Democrats did not have the ""blue wave"" they expected.  I would say neither party got what they were expecting, or least not what the media was saying would happen.  I would argue both parties lost.  Next 2 years will be interesting. Hopefully the politicians can do what they get paid to do, compromise/negotiate to get legislation/policy/appointments passed.  But I have some reservations that they can do that.",5_yr_lurker,e98fxtl,conservative
"> and maybe a SCOTUS pick

The real winning is right there.",bipartisanscreeching,e98826c,conservative
"The thing about getting into gridlock is that the democrats are going to blame it entirely on us, when frankly neither party ceases.",GizmoRazaar,e98asr2,conservative
"2 years of gridlock and endless ""investigations"". I can deal with the normalcy of losing the House 
 and the expected gridlock but the leftists will not allow this to be normal. ",FuriousChef,e98a48s,conservative
Not gonna lie.  I swore a couple times last night and this morning.  Losing Scott Walker is tough.,Lustan,e98kdbc,conservative
And a lot of other court appointments.,Colorsinthevoid45,e98bv7x,conservative
The blue wave was always an attempt at crappy marketing based on numbers that were always gonna happen regardless. ,fluffstravels,e9876zw,conservative
The blue wave was just a meme. The polls never even showed it happening. ,stanleythemanley44,e986yi8,conservative
"The annoying thing is that I saw in an NPR article today, where they stated, ""They stand to pick up between 24 and 32 seats when all the races that are too close to call are finally decided. Democrats needed a net gain of 23 seats to take control of the House. Make no mistake: That is a wave."" That's not a wave, let alone the ""tsunami-esque"" wave that was being advertised. The 'Blue Wave' that was being advertised would in my mind be more of a 300:135 split. Link for reference:
https://www.npr.org/2018/11/07/665103929/7-takeaways-from-election-2018 ",berkarov,e98hv72,conservative
"Aside from senate, the left did make some major gains in the House (+26) and governors (+7). And even in the senate, they only lost a few seats (while even flipping one themselves). If I were the Democrats, I'd feel pretty good about the results, they took us to task and put a beating on us last night.",uniquecannon,e985yrn,conservative
Go Dortmund!!! 🐝🐝🐝,yackippo,e98w2hw,conservative
">Not sure why the sub r/politics is even named that still.

So reddit can feature it during elections for uninformed and naive people to flock to it and so in google searches, it can put on the veil of being unbiased for those who don't know any better.

",Duotronic93,e98b8ny,conservative
"Hysteria on the right is us bitching amongst ourselves about the disappointment. Hysteria on the left are mobs, property damage, and and violence. ",Tmblackflag,e98jqno,conservative
Except president's social media rant ,thatother1acc,e992f2h,conservative
"Liken it to a football analogy...

The Democrats were widely expected to run the length of the field easily, and score a touchdown.

Instead, they struggled to move the ball, and only managed to get a field goal.

I'd call this a big conservative victory in defense during the midterms.",SideTraKd,e98txc9,conservative
"The dems were skipping work? 

Can't skip work if you don't have a job!

*finger guns*",peeves91,e98azlz,conservative
"I was not offered a safe space **or** counseling at work today. I am still livid over this. Ironically, there were a number of people who called in sick today and they are all unabashed liberals. ",ZAGA_Manalishi,e9a17od,conservative
Our House! In the middle of the street. The White House! That's where Hillary cant be.,for_the_meme_watch,e988o0c,conservative
Not my House!,Tony_Cappuccino,e98sgba,conservative
Wait. So orange man no peach mints?,fifaislife206,e98bznc,conservative
">ge?  If they move to impeach, can’t the senate block it?  If they try to pass anyth

Yes we have the best kind of government for the next two years, the one that can't do anything.",topshelfer131,e987clv,conservative
Well any hope of passing conservative legislation (e.g. the wall) went out the window.,joozian_,e987wym,conservative
">can’t he claim executive privilege?

Only on certain and few things. Executive Privilidge at its heart is on those communications and advice that the President Recieves from subordinates. The president must be able to get that advice without fear of it becoming subject to investigation generally. Or the advice will be tainted with an eye towards avoiding being the subject of an investigation.

The Congress still has broad powers of oversight that are not easily swatted down. 

For example the tax returns will be requested, and given by the IRS to the House. Trump can't stop that. 
",memberCP,e989g7z,conservative
"In the long run, no. Some of the defeats of governors/state legislators may pose a problem down the road, though. 

I suspect the WH will claim executive privilege a fair bit over the next two years. ",psstein,e98c6sg,conservative
"Correct, they really only gained the ability to gridlock, not pass more oppressive laws.  Freedom still has three lines of defense for the next two years.  What this does mean is serious tax and spending reductions will be put on hold for two years.  Trump may have prepared for this outcome, as welfare cuts and reform will not be popular among moderates and he won't make those cuts until after 2020.",PerceivedShift,e987ln6,conservative
"I don't think I can agree. I think much of the right (which has been really co-opted by the far right) has extreme distaste for the broader left, much the way the feeling has been reciprocated. I'm a moderate with plenty of friends and family of widely varying political leanings - I think that vitriol goes both ways, but it's a matter of who is responding to the party in power as the ""vocal minority"".",JaffinatorDOTTE,e98w9s5,conservative
"Luckily with the gains in the senate last night, the chances of them taking the senate in 2020 went way down.  Only 2 blue states with republicans up for reelection, Colorado and Maine.  Plus Doug Jones is up in Alabama, thats almost an automatic gain.",DS552014,e98i23x,conservative
"Were you around in 2008 and 2012? Because it felt like Republicans hates all Dems after that election 

Granted 2012 was worst than 2008, but I have seen people online and in real life unfortunately onwards who state their Republicans and they hate all Dems.

It’s almost as if both parties are using similar strategies. Its almost as if we’re the same type of people.

FYI, most Dems I know in real life only hate the far right as well? But what does the far left and far right actually mean these days?

Edit: don’t you love generalizing? Seems everyone on Reddit, including OP sure do.",CubaHorus91,e98kdx2,conservative
Conservatives think progressives are misguided. Progressives think conservatives are evil.,1wjl1,e99cz0q,conservative
"I think Obama lost some 60 seats in his first midterm, we lost about half of that, so even with all of the supposed opposition to Trump we still did better than the dems. At this point I think they should retire the term blue wave. It was nonexistent in 2016 and it came out a bare trickle on 2018.",brubeck5,e990aco,conservative
What state are yall in ,SussyPiff,e99g5q7,conservative
"Looney Toons has taught me that blowing on it really fast should do ""something"".",wittyusernamefailed,e98j4wt,conservative
"Yeah and if we want to play the whole numbers game, we should stick to since when the House got locked in at 435 members",CherryCokeNixon,e99bo0c,conservative
But muh blue wave! ,Stained-Glass-Window,e99ijwi,conservative
Wha?,JobieWanKenobi,e99jjnk,conservative
"Eh, Obama fucked our country pretty hard. He's probably the third worst president since 1900, after LBJ and FDR. We were able to reverse some of his most egregious errors but there are absolutely things he screwed up badly with.",1wjl1,e99d6o8,conservative
New Jersey is worse. How someone wants to vote in Bob Menendez a corrupt P.O.S that has consistently used his power for personal gain is disgusting. Makes me ashamed of my state. ,_mooch,e98c2qk,conservative
That's only true because the MSM is the Democratic propaganda machine.,1wjl1,e99cwtu,conservative
That kid's name? Albert Einstein,Templar_Gus,e98eens,conservative
"The Tea Party held rallies in public parks, never blocked traffic, never vandalized property, never threw bottles at cops, never did all the anarchistic bullshit the Left does at every one of their protests.  The Tea Party even cleaned up after its rallies.  The Resistance and Antifa leave every protest site looking like a shithole.",CherryCokeNixon,e99bv1f,conservative
"Of course not.  Tea Party protests in 2009-2010 was American dissent at its finest.

But American conservatives protest in a much more respectable way than the #Resistance clown show or the Antifa traitors (who should be prosecuted for anarchy)",CherryCokeNixon,e99bs11,conservative
Again that came out of Clinton's Camp ,game46312,e98wk1z,conservative
I feel genuinely sad for you.  Have a good day.,jreed11,e9962wt,conservative
"Top NPC post of the day. 9/10. I would have given 10 out of 10 but NPC failed to directly invoke Hitler and the word ""fascist."" It's damn near perfect just needs a little spit and polish. ",tiger81775149,e999gtf,conservative
Trump is your president.,mastaxn,e9adrp2,conservative
"Orange man bad, right?

Go away, NPC.

By the way, Republicans won the Civil War and your party has been making us pay for it ever since.  Also your comment about World War II is even more unhinged than the rest of the diarrhea you squirted out.  ",CherryCokeNixon,e99bcr6,conservative
">hopefully it motivates them to change course away from the insanity

Man, you're optimistic. If there's any sign of it possibly working, the DNC will double down. Remember that the Roy Moore debacle was a precursor to Kavanaugh.",Juxen,e98fl67,conservative
"> Some of that is due to gerrymeandering. Dems won the house popular vote by a greater margin than the GOP did in 2010, but gained about half as many seats. This is worth recognizing.

Where are you drawing the expectations from? 

Now that it's over I keep seeing people claim it was a red wall and a blue puddle but I can't really point or find any quantifying claims from before the election that nailed down what they were expecting beyond ""we will take the house, in a very unlikely scenario we somehow keep our red state dem senators and flip some red ones""

Now that it's over all I'm seeing is how 300 state legislative seats were flipped, 7 governorship's flipped, and 7 legislative chambers flipped.

I'm trying to be realist here and it just seems like everything went 'normally' and everyone is spinning a rather pedestrian result to be a red or blue win.",_Zatara_,e9973dj,conservative
Yes. All of this. ,Themusician67,e98ebim,conservative
 username definitely checks out on that one haha. I feel you though.,mbarnar,e99vyui,conservative
"independent? hmmm didnt know independents campaigned for only republicans, demonized democrats, and calls themselves a republican....hmm thats a new one to me...independent huh?

&#x200B;

former ceo mindset....we all know trumps sucked at business, literally his most popular and money making time is now when hes 70+ and just uses his office to make money , he took 100 million dollars, lost it twice, and 40 years later hes worth like 100 million dollars, 

&#x200B;

hahahahahaa i love that trump is ""ceo"" mindset, all he did was cut taxes for the rich, hes going to ""bankrupt"" this country down the line like he does with his own companies... 

&#x200B;

if he put 10 % in the bank at that time with inflation, he would of been a real billionaire by now",brucebanner34,e9akbae,conservative
Still surprised Arizona was so close with  Kyrsten Sinema after all of the scandal her campaign had gone through.,OKResident93,e98lx5y,conservative
Very true. I remember waking up the day after the 2016 election and being pleasantly surprised that DJT won; I don't think anyone is that surprised about the results of this election unless they haven't paid any attention to the polls. ,Maswasnos,e988sxn,conservative
Very true. I did not expect Donald to get even close. I remember being in disbelief as the polls closed and numbers got released. ,Raze321,e98o86v,conservative
"I admit that I didn't pay as close attention to some of the races this year, but polling in some areas was still really off.  Quinnipiac polls on Monday night showed Gillum ahead by 7 in Florida. It's still not officially called, but DeSantis is projected to win with 99% reporting. ",sotiredmomofmany,e98bxt1,conservative
The prediction markets were more like 80% for Hillary.,No12Judge,e98r2ka,conservative
"You keep forgetting that Bill Nelson is gone now.

That is HUGE. He was a career left wing Senator that was going down a dark rabbit hole of crazy. ",c_ward5,e98ip94,conservative
That's a very good description of it.,zwiebelsaft,e99arce,conservative
"If we believe the polling, which in fairness was fairly accurate with some exceptions like Florida, then we know there was a BIG late shift back to the D's the week after the idiot Florida bomber grabbed so much attention.  

Without the nut job stomping on the momentum, the D's might have lost several of House seats they picked up last night by those slim 1-2% margins.  ",Roez,e98i28y,conservative
Paul Ryan is just waiting to start his paid contributor gig on CNN or MSNBC once he's out of office. ,iwasthebeaver,e98ciyb,conservative
Fortunately he's no longer a problem *and* his seat stays in our hands.  As far as that seat's concerned it's a best possible outcome.,anuser999,e98w1a8,conservative
"If the GOP held the house it would have been historic. Right now its looking like the dems are going to flip around 25-30 seats. That will give them a +5-+10 or so edge in the house with a lot of those flipped seats going to democrats who said they wouldn't support a speaker Pelosi and promised to compromise. Every progressive candidate the Dems financed lost. The situation isn't nearly as dire as it could have been if there was a 2010 type wave in favor of the democrats. I'm actually optimistic, it gives Trump the opportunity to show if he can work in a bipartisan matter heading into 2020. I'm optimistic tbh. ",iwasthebeaver,e98f0nu,conservative
"To answer your question, its 3 fold. First, there were some unfortunate and untimely retirement announcements from GOP representatives in some democratic leaning districts. Secondly, redistricting in several states have favored Dems. Third, this is the trend in the first midterm after a new president is elected. I think the last time it didn't happen was in 2002 during Bush's first term and right after 9/11. ",Kemaro,e98ggof,conservative
">Was it bad strategy? Was it lack of funding to races that could have been won? Was it because of too much trumpism or too little trumpism?

None of it.  The correct answer is it due to the design of our government.  The House is voted on every 2 years to give voters their knee jerk reaction which just about always goes against the party in power.  The House is most susceptible to voter passions due to the district by district nature of the vote.",TBSportsFan1254,e98n4cp,conservative
"> I would say neither party got what they were expecting,

nope, I was fully expecting to lose the house. I actually thought we would lose more seats so my expectations have been exceeded. And if the republicans get to a 55 seat majority in the Senate that's exactly what we need to get the constitutionalist judicial nominations through to cut off the progressive legislate through the courts strategy. 

>I would argue both parties lost

Nope, the democrats are going to have a divided caucus and a leadership fight for speaker and other positions. The democrats only ending up +10 or so is not the victory they needed, it was actually on the low side of historical house flips. 

I also want to say I don't mind having a democrat controlled house as long as they don't go down the crazy route with Pelosi Resisting Donald Bush at every turn and turning everything into a media circus. I'm going to watch that leadership fight in the Dem caucus very closely. ",iwasthebeaver,e98gq83,conservative
Exactly. Imagine if rgb retired and we get to put Amy Barrett on the supreme Court. It would make the supreme Court a constitutional court for a generation. ,LumpyWumpus,e988er2,conservative
"RBG  changes to ACB, please.",sylect,e988w4q,conservative
"Exactly. If we can protect the constitution, I will be very happy. ",peeves91,e98atuu,conservative
"These last minute results so far have been decisively pro-Dem. When I went to bed at 2 AM the only competitive races left were AZ, NV, and MT in the Senate and WI and CT in the governor's races. I woke up to see us go 1-4, and McSally's not even a certainty.",1wjl1,e99c7z9,conservative
You know the outcome. You pretend to predict the outcome. When the known outcome happens you act like “see? We told you! Yes! Victory!!”,Hopsingthecook,e98dbhp,conservative
"What's driving me nuts is over at r/wisconsin some are calling Walker's loss a ""blue wave"", I don't think a 1% difference is a ""blue wave"". 

Well time to look forward to tax hikes, especially gas price increase. /s",TheGeek100,e98n0hq,conservative
"That's just not true. 

The blue wave was definitely a thing, and in any other midterms, it would have swept away with massive gains for them in the House of Representatives, instead of them just barely gaining control of it, and resulted in them gaining control of the Senate, too.

But the Democrats did so many heinous things in the months leading up to the elections that it was a call to arms for conservative voters, who rose up to break the wave, mitigating the damage with possibly the highest turnout for a midterm election in history. ",SideTraKd,e98p4yk,conservative
Can I ask about the meaning of your flair? Google didn’t yield any results. ,OstentatiousSock,e98jn2z,conservative
"Tied for lowest amount of seats lost in a first term midterm since 1946. As unpopular as they claim Trump is, the voters sure didn't show that last night. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e987c0f,conservative
"I keep feeling like people have never followed elections before. Nothing happened that wasn't super standard, and on top of that we traded out losers like Corker and Flake for solid votes in the senate (assuming we eek it out in Arizona). 

They're going to be embalming Ginsburg trying to prop her up like a puppet and pretend she's alive for 2 years 😂 Guaranteed shitshow. ",AmericanYidGunner,e987duj,conservative
I think both parties can be at least reasonably happy with how the midterms went,_TeamCobra_,e986rsl,conservative
"The Dems lost millions of votes compared to 2012. Check out the results in New Jersey, Florida, New York. The Dems only really gained votes in Texas (but without winning the seat) after the most expensive Senate campaign in *history*.

Yet again terrible strategy on their part. 2016 was the real key to the Senate in that nearly all the marginal states went red.

",Leandover,e98a69f,conservative
Larry Hogan got re-elected in MD! As blue a state as you will ever see but they love Republican governors. ,ripinpeppers,e98f7yc,conservative
"They didn’t take anybody to task. The MSM failed in the last 2 years. Every single bullshit story they put out to divide only provided them with these “victories?” The “gains” in the house have been happening in the political cycle for DECADES now. IMHO, the senate wins for the republicans speaks volumes of how the “resist” moniker is simply Twitter excrement.",Phillipinsocal,e987cku,conservative
"That’s a really low number and the fact that we gained in the senate says a lot. Obama lost 63 in the house for a reference. It’s definitely not the strong referendum on Trump they were hoping for by any stretch. I kinda hope it calms Democrats down enough to actually work together some in the house, we’ll see though. ",ZardokAllen,e988rvf,conservative
"I really don't feel like conservatives took a beating.  Compared to what normally happens historically in a first mid-term, it seems like conservatives did quite well.",jchill127,e988hdc,conservative
"Based on most projections, the Democrats did not do as well as expected. The House was all but a guarantee to flip their way, yet at one point last night it looked like it might not happen. Obviously it did, but it was closer than expected. Also, we gained more Senate seats than expected. All-in-all I’d say it was a good night for us, and a strong indication that Trump has a great shot to win again in two years.",TwoForOneEspecial,e98tbis,conservative
"They barely picked up any house seats, definitely not enough to constitute a wave. They lost in key swing states and in some traditionally blue states. This is not a blue wave, it’s a gigantic fail for democrats. Not to mention we could pick up 4-5 senate seats ",phantomcut3,e98cm0o,conservative
"I went to their discussion thread and after about five minutes quit because there was so much projection and calls for violence. One person got downvoted for saying they wanted their particular senator to die, but a response to his comment got hundreds of up ones for saying *they wanted every Republican congressman to die*. Essentially, the first crazy got downvoted because he wasn't crazy enough! It's insane that this was officially sponsored by Reddit and plastered on every page of every user and visitor.",dicaparly,e98x5u9,conservative
"Which was fine? He congratulated Pelosi, gave himself credit (deserved credit) for some Senate pickups, warned Dems not to get to aggressive with investigations.",1wjl1,e99cu1j,conservative
">the one that can't do anything

Here here!!!",MrFizzardsWizard,e98aolf,conservative
"Somewhere, a single manly tear falls down Ron Swanson's cheek.",wittyusernamefailed,e98j0vg,conservative
"Honestly, it could still end badly. If the legislature is deadlocked over every tiny thing, it just paves the way for Trump to follow the footsteps of the past several administrations and govern by EO. Which, in my opinion, is a practice that needs to stop. He's already issued a handful of EOs that were controversial and borderline breaking the boundaries of his office (which also happened under the previous admins, but nobody cared back then).",dicaparly,e98xfmn,conservative
"I was thinking that was the case, but as usual liberal nitwits were making all kinds of claims.  Glad to see their previous blue wave was essentially useless.  I hope they waste all their time on partisan bullshit so voters see the stupidity in 2020 and come out strong for conservatives.",MigzMando,e987mp9,conservative
"I don’t see why he cares about the tax returns, tbh.  Democrats have been harping over this nonsense for so long.  Let them look. Lmao",MigzMando,e98cssp,conservative
Don’t the republicans still have a majority as far as governors go?,MigzMando,e98ctmv,conservative
Im still hoping the lame duck congress passes wefare reform and builds the wall..  Lol,,e98g19r,conservative
"Think about the 2012 election. Romney said Obama was misguided and wrong about economic policy. 

Obama portrayed Romney as an evil women hating bigot/racist and ruthless capitalist. The GOP only could stand that for so many elections until they went reactionary mode/full Trump. So yeah, I think what you’re saying is increasingly true, but I think think it’s been a more recent development for the right.",Colorsinthevoid45,e99v40v,conservative
"To add to that, I doubt Susan Collins is in any real trouble. She won in a landslide in 2014. She’s pretty well-liked in Maine.",al_davis_dad,e98m4ra,conservative
"This isn't completely correct.  Obama and the democrats in congress had a honeymoon period that lasted nearly a year following the 2008 election during which Obama enjoyed high approval numbers.  This goodwill was eventually by a series of unpopular actions such as mismanaging the stimulus bill, Obamacare, and, eventually, the double dip recession.",xOxOqTbByGrLxOxO,e98mvvh,conservative
"It’s hard to openly say you’re a conservative on a college campus or in a workplace with a lot of liberals. This really doesn’t go both ways. 

There is some truth to what you’re saying, but I don’t think it’s completely equal. Ben Shapiro has cited some polls showing Republicans had a positive view of America as a whole during both the Obama and Trump years. Democrats has a positive view of America during Obama’s presidency, but not Trumps. 

I think this says a lot about how they feel about their fellow Americans.",Colorsinthevoid45,e99vc62,conservative
Agreed.,PurpleAngel23,e99b4za,conservative
"> But muh blue wave!

Wait wait wait.... *THAT* was the ""Blue Wave""????  HAHAHAHAHAHAHAH.....^my ^sides!  With all the hype I expected something....well.....*something*, not below average results.  Wow",Jizzlobber42,e99jjf0,conservative
Yea I just continue to have faith in the American people. I don’t wanna get so bitter that there is NEVER any hope ,ZardokAllen,e98gp2o,conservative
"I'm convinced that Arizona isn't very good at this ""Senate"" thing. Their last two Senators were Flake and McCain, and they *almost* blew it this time with Sinema.",GameShowWerewolf,e99bq6c,conservative
"Surprised? No. 

Disappointed? Sure. ",peeves91,e98awxi,conservative
"Gillum conceded last night. The rest of the count is immaterial, he officially lost.",Vratix,e98e5pv,conservative
"They were reporting the Missouri Senate race as dead even. Hawley won by 6%.

Polling institutions need to figure their shit out because whatever they’re doing now ain’t working.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e98isfs,conservative
"If the media reported on actual left-wing terrorism as much as they do supposed ""right wing"" terrorism, we'd be having landslides for years.

We have an actual organized domestic terrorist organization constantly rioting, beating people, denying people their Constitutional rights, all in the name of *actual left-wing ideologies* (Socialism, Communism, Anarchy), and the media only reports on insane people with no actual political motives.

""Hating Jews"" isn't a left/right political motive.  Antisemitism isn't anywhere on the political spectrum.  Let me know when someone commits a terrorist act because they want lower taxes.  *That* would *actually* be right-wing terrorism.",Telineye,e99eyp4,conservative
That and the confirmation hearing bullshit they pulled. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e99645a,conservative
I'd argue he's a lingering problem since we now have a Democratic House for the next two years.,MyCustomUsername,e98whne,conservative
How is the Wisconsin governor seat looking?,TheFatMan2200,e99dmo7,conservative
"I believe the number of House seats the Dems flipped is on the low end for an opposition party in midterms, which makes this even better.",1wjl1,e98fcls,conservative
"I don't think I would call all those simultaneous retirements ""untimely."" I think they all thought they would lose based on their exploratory committee findings and bowed out in hopes of giving a different candidate a chance. Or to save face. Or both. I agree on your other two points, though. A lot of this fell in line with historical precedence and gerrymandering advantages.",erikthereddest,e99u5w8,conservative
Someone needs to create a comic of a red wave and a blue wave crashing into eachother and turning into a big purple puddle.,erikthereddest,e99u93i,conservative
"Retires?  Not trying to be morbid, but I can’t imagine she lives 6 more years. Gaining in the house is one big step. Have to re-elect trump and there are pretty damn good odds that the SCOTUS will remain safe for decades. 

That’s the long game. ",Ruckus45,e988xzj,conservative
"RGB and Breyer are 85 and 80 respectively, Thomas is 70 but might be willing to retire during trump’s second term with a republican senate to preserve the direction of the court. Everyone else is in their 60s except Gorsuch, kagan, and Kavanaugh who are all in their 50s. It is very Kiley that 2 more will need to be replaced within the next 6 years and hopefully at least one in the next two years.",rwwman50,e98azok,conservative
"And it would cause the Left to cry another river of tears.

That's the real win.",Bigbluebuttonman,e99adqb,conservative
"I can’t go to that sub anymore, all it is is liberal bullshit.",Masterjason13,e98q7zk,conservative
Now I’m curious too. Did he pm you?,SovietUrsa,e98uf4c,conservative
"Transliteration of the Hebrew for ""Steadfast Zionist"".",berkarov,e98z1tc,conservative
"Some of that is due to gerrymeandering. Dems won the house popular vote by a greater margin than the GOP did in 2010, but gained about half as many seats. This is worth recognizing.

Still, the vote differential is pretty close to 2010. And Obama did win in 2012...which is good news for Trump.

I think he can win.",Colorsinthevoid45,e98chni,conservative
The only time the incumbent party didn’t lose a chamber of Congress was during the Great Depression and the year after 9/11.,tim_tebow_right_knee,e98ixnm,conservative
"Yeah, I get all that. When you get down to it, both sides really walked away with wins last night. We get our SC power bolstered by gaining senate seats, and they get to ensure the next 2 years of Trump's term is non-productive with regards to new laws. Although Executive Order will ironically  become a 4 letter word for the party that applauded Obama for his excessive use of E.O.s.",uniquecannon,e98wqv4,conservative
Oh man the amount of fodder we are gonna get from them not voting for a single thing trump does is going to be crazy. ,peeves91,e98b2h3,conservative
May not be as rich as claimed. I doubt there is anything in there as the IRS would already know. ,memberCP,e98kqrn,conservative
"Yes, but it's generally helpful to have unified control due to concerns about redistricting. ",psstein,e98d879,conservative
"Yes yes, and I went to a school where you had teachers pounding idolatry to conservative ideals and students were encouraged to volunteer in conservative campaigns.

And I can cite you a few polls from Rachel Maddow or some other commentator showing you that Republicans were unhappy under Obama and happy under Trump.

Also, “what they think of their fellow Americans?” What is this identity politics, tribalism NPC bull speak? 

",CubaHorus91,e99yhy8,conservative
"Haha.

I make waves larger in my toilet than what the dems did this election ",Stained-Glass-Window,e99lg7f,conservative
Disappointed that millions of Americans identify as socialists or openly communist? Devastatingly so. ,kavanaugh1,e98gvun,conservative
"Dang, I didn't know we got him in by *that* much. Restores a little faith in my state.

As regards polling, I imagine it's the same problem as literally the whole of statistics: it's a ""best"" guess. Given how polling operates, they usually don't use their best either. Data can be easily manipulated and the clustered nature of gerrymandered districts doesn't help that a bit.

For example, St. Louis City and Kansas City lean pretty consistently left while the rest of the state leans pretty consistently right. I'm betting that most of those polling places are visiting those high population density areas instead of little hodunk towns like St. James, Lebanon, or Arcadia. (Love all three of those towns btw.)",danjvelker,e9916xi,conservative
"In Ohio, Cordray (D-Governor) was ahead 3pts on the RealClearPolitics ***average among all polls.***

DeWine won by 4%.",mrstickball,e99g7uc,conservative
"That's a really interesting point. The media likes to say ""right wing extremists"" when they point to racists and crazy antisemitic terrorists, but these ideas aren't anyone's idea of serious political discourse in the mainstream right. We don't have deep-browed academics ensconced in conservative thinktanks arguing back and forth about how we really ought to give enslavement of the inferior races another go. But the left's got Maoists and eugenics apologists among the ranks of their intellectual elite.",erikthereddest,e99svi4,conservative
"Walker conceded today. There was talk of requesting a recount last night but they must of seen something they couldn't overcome.

https://www.jsonline.com/story/news/politics/elections/2018/11/07/wisconsin-elections-gov-scott-walker-concedes-democrat-tony-evers/1921045002/",MooMooCudChew,e99guo7,conservative
"yep, and the fact he gained seats in the Senate is a huge deal. ",iwasthebeaver,e98fjhg,conservative
"Yes BUT the country has almost unprecedented low unemployment levels. The stock market is high. It usually is the economy stupid. Yeah I know that the fake news media would never  ever paint the current situation in a bright light, but what the fuck do people want? Another Obama and lose their fucking jobs to either illegal immigrants or the jobs go straight to China?",sjwking,e98jhw7,conservative
Just over half of what Obama lost in his first midterm and right in line with the average.,anuser999,e98w44v,conservative
It's not morbid. My opinion has been that she clearly intends to die in her position. She's to old to go do anything else anyway. She may as well try and be a thorn in the side of a president she doesn't like.,FreeSpeechRocks,e98ch65,conservative
Semi morbid but yes RBG or Breyer could just suddenly drop dead any day just like Scalia did.  Even with access to the best doctors in the world it's just something that happens when you're 80+ years old. ,,e98qt3w,conservative
"IMO Thomas should consider retiring in 2019. Love that man, but having GOP WH and Senate isn’t something you can always bank on.",Colorsinthevoid45,e98c260,conservative
Republicans also don't even pretend to try for deep Democrats areas in big cities. ,PhaetonsFolly,e98d5yi,conservative
"It isn’t so much gerrymandering as much as Democrats have naturally clustered themselves geographically. If you had a nonpartisan commission draw district lines, the GOP would have a large advantage, albeit slightly less of one.",kcmiz24,e9958dp,conservative
"Also that he might owe money to foreign powers like Russia due to his decades of business dealings.  That isn't illegal, but will just turn into another fence-painter talking point about how he is bought.",TBSportsFan1254,e98nc4l,conservative
">Yes yes, and I went to a school where you had teachers pounding idolatry to conservative ideals and students were encouraged to volunteer in conservative campaigns.

You know this anecdote is not representative of the average college in America now. The vast majority of colleges, particularly in their humanities departments,  have an overwhelmingly liberal bias and you know this.

>And I can cite you a few polls from Rachel Maddow or some other commentator showing you that Republicans were unhappy under Obama and happy under Trump.

Sure, you can show me polls saying Republicans were unhappy with the direction of the country, but they still actually like their country even when things aren’t going their way politically. I would love for you to show me these “polls”. It has nothing to do with identity politics, it actually shows the opposite.

",Colorsinthevoid45,e9aggxg,conservative
"Openly communist? Isn’t that basically the same as when we, the left, call you guys racist or nazi’s. Both are extreme overexagerations. Yes the worst in both our sides are exactly what we accuse the other side of being fundamentally made of. The truth is more difficult to swollow. That some of us think that having hundreds of insurance companies all complicating the billing process to their, benefit benefits no one. The government already is in the insurance game, and they do a decent job of it, hence Medicare. That program can be expanded to include everyone. Then you have massive battening power against drug prices. Hence Medicare for all. Not communist but if we are already paying 20-30% of our income for jack shit insurance that is escalating up to 25% per year, it does not take a rocket scientist to realize we should try something els. Other countries have much more successful models of healthcare for a lot cheaper. Can we learn from them or do we have to keep going doing this tax breaks for rich, rising insurance prices, pittance for the middle class thing? Most of the left is just like me. The rest is just like your undesirables. ",Neglected_Martian,e99tb30,conservative
dissapointed in a lot of things today,peeves91,e98hqxk,conservative
Feel free to move to Switzerland. ,ClicksAndASmell,e98iu7u,conservative
"No, disappointed how many people voted blindly. 

It appears a lot of close races that went democrat were pushed over the edge from such blind voting. 

I'd be willing to bet Walker lost in part by that. 
",DRKMSTR,e98wqzs,conservative
"Bradley effect is also a big factor. People in the middle are reluctant to voice support for conservative candidates for fears they're be tarred with the ""racist"" brush. So they claim they're undecided, or even that they'll vote for the Democrat, then vote Republican once they're in the safety of the ballot box.

It also wouldn't surprise me if some conservatives are actively trolling the pollsters now, intentionally throwing off the numbers so that we can claim how wrong they are after the fact. I can definitely see a lot of the younger conservatives gaming the system that way.",GameShowWerewolf,e99c03w,conservative
"I want Trump to go after the employers of Illegal Immigrants. Be hard at the border, but if you are found hiring an illegal immigrant, you get fined into bankruptcy or jail. Make an example of these employers and take away illegal immigrants opportunity to work. I can tell you right now if they republicans did that they would be winning over a good bit of independents. ",TheFatMan2200,e99e1wi,conservative
"The economic policies under Obama are directly responsible for at least the 2017 economy. Presidents just can't alter the exonony as a whole that fast... not least because the budget isn't set for almost a year into their presidency. Likewise Obama gets not credit or blame for 2008-2009.

I can't find anything on how much longer it takes but it's very possible that the economy today is just barely affected by Trump. To really judge his effects we have to look at how the economy looks next year or so.",No12Judge,e98rxkw,conservative
"I think she was planning to step down under Clinton. But now, she’s stuck. Honestly, I pity her. She should be spending her final years with family instead of holding on to a stressful position out of hate for the president.",HylianINTJ,e98hnrh,conservative
She may hang on for 7 more years if she plans on dying there. ,Hopsingthecook,e98d5fi,conservative
Well she did just drop last night. Broke three ribs. I take no responsibility. ,Ruckus45,e9bakav,conservative
"I’d say it depends, if Breyer or RGB go first he should stay",rwwman50,e98c3k6,conservative
There was only one uncontested seat in my state (GA).  Deep Democrat area: no way any R was every going to even make it marginally close.,WIlf_Brim,e98md3v,conservative
"If a state wanted to, couldn't they decide their congressional delegation with a proportional voting system?  IIRC, there was an amendment for Senators to be democratically elected, but I believe that both members of the house and the electors of the electoral college are up to the individual states to decide how to choose them.

Right now here in British Columbia, we're having a referendum to choose between 3 potential systems or to stick with First Past The Post with all of the alternatives maintaining some degree of local representation.

I was listening to a podcast talking about how the nonpartisan commission in one state had their hands tied by the mandate to have minority majority districts in order for them to not be marginalized, but in so doing they end up gerrymandering the state with a district that is very safely Democrat.  Catch 22.",Chicken2nite,e99v679,conservative
[deleted],,e9a1nfj,conservative
"This is not really true. The day after Trump was elected the stock market surged, and surged and surged and didn't stop until last month. So from 2 months before he took office until recently business leaders, small business owners, etc have cued their activity based on Trump and not Clinton being president.",scJazz,e98vp91,conservative
"This boom wasn't Obama's policies finally bearing fruit in some kind of delayed-reaction explosion to save the economy. He just stopped getting in the way of the Republicans in the house and senate enacting *their* economic policy goals in his last two years. If Obama had stopped enacting gigantic, growth-hobbling social spending and confiscatory tax policy earlier in his tenure, he might actually have still been in office to take credit (like Bill Clinton did).",erikthereddest,e99tsbu,conservative
"That's how I feel. She should be ennoying the lasr few years of her life. Instead, she will probably die in that position without at least seeing her replacement. I pity her.",unibuckeye,e98j5th,conservative
I know a few actual Nazis. But the few do not make the many. ,Neglected_Martian,e9ag2dd,conservative
"Short-term movements in the stock market are just speculation. No fundamentals are affected that quickly. However I'll concede that stock prices are due to the beliefs of professionals who must have believed Trump was good for the economy or at least good for stock prices.

Business leaders/owners themselves, big and small, have effectively no effect on stock prices in the short term. From what I gather though, they mostly were happy about his election.",No12Judge,e9d0b4x,conservative
"But the Republicans couldn't do anything fast enough to take credit for 2017. I'm pretty confident about this. But for 2018 I don't know and I can't find anyone who actually studies this. The MSM has no depth and serious economists seem to only talk about specific policies and their effects rather than how quickly a bureaucracy can cause widespread effects. Yet all news bits about ""the economy"" are either neutrally talking about how well it's doing or blaming the existing administration if they like them or the previous administration if they dislike them.

But if we knew more then we could make informed choices... but I am stuck concluding that if anyone *does* know then they're keeping quiet about it.",No12Judge,e9czoan,conservative
"If he was outing them by name, rebuking him might be in order. But for reporting statistics with no faces or names? This is bad. They are trying to keep the truth from emerging by rebuking him. There is no moral justification for that. By trying to cover it up rather than resolve it, you make it even worse.",Lepew1,e98umtn,conservative
"This ""right to exist"" and ""denying my existence"" sort of rhetoric is the dumbest NPC language I've ever heard and it's so prevalent now.

Literally nobody has ever said that these people don't  exist or don't deserve to exist.   Nobody. Ever.  Where is this coming from?  It must have been added to NPCs in the last patch





",podestaspassword,e99dj9r,conservative
"Sadly, truth is not a core value for many in our society today. ",Romarion,e98w6y2,conservative
">17. Get control of the schools. Use them as transmission belts for socialism and current Communist propaganda. Soften the curriculum. Get control of teachers' associations. Put the party line in textbooks. 

https://rense.com/general32/americ.htm",cons_NC,e98u2ot,conservative
I can't wait for the day these cry baby bullies just fade away.,Spysix,e98nns4,conservative
"There's almost no one there to provide checks and balances, or to call out and counter terrible subjective ideas before they are main stream.  

There's a lot of troubling stuff coming out of universities.  It's not just the replication crisis or the bias.  A couple weeks ago there was a report out where 25% of statisticians who work crunching numbers for university professors say they have been asked to flat out make-up data. 

There are some pretty big problems and all subsidized by guaranteed student loans.  ",Roez,e98oyhv,conservative
"It’s time for America to wake up and smell the coffee. Universities have become hubs for anti-American anti-western value disinformation agents to brainwash the youth. 


I go to a top tier elite private college. Lots of international money flows through this institution. They take money from these wealthy upper class families and spit their kids out of the degree factory with no practical skills in regards to higher education and academia and a completely insufferable attitude. Useless for the workforce. ",largepaycheckaddict,e993swd,conservative
Oh no! Someone has politely requested equitable discourse! CRUCIFY HIM.,erikthereddest,e99w81m,conservative
"I had an argument with a colleague about academic truth vs academic justice. It seemed like a very surreal argument to have with an academic colleague. I believe that, as an academic, our goal should be providing as accurate of evidence as possible, regardless of how hard that evidence might be to swallow. 

I am not so sure on the ratio of liberals to conservatives though. In my estimation the vast majority of academics dont really care about politics and just focus on their research/work (kind of like most americans). ",the42up,e995yy2,conservative
Professors as a caste will one day need to answer for their indoctrination and hate. They have severely damaged our civilization at this point. Most people leave 2018 universities in a worse state than when they first enrolled. It truly is despicable how bad their god complexes have become.,FiveHits,e99emk4,conservative
"For the first time I see value in the concept of tenure, at least since the McCarthy era.",paulbrook,e99w4nc,conservative
The student said they would be unsafe on campus if called bisexual amd nonbinary but then goes out and tells the world.,Falcon1625,e9ad97x,conservative
"So how do we fix colleges?  Who hires administrators at public universities?  Do we need ideological tests and affirmative action?  Is there a more elegant solution?  How do we maintain academic rigor and avoid selection bias?  This isn't just the administrators, they've been doing this long enough that the pipeline is devoid of any sane people.",PlasmaBurnz,e9afhk9,conservative
"That's control of information, Fascism anyone?",The_Ai,e9am5u8,conservative
They know that if the public knew what they were up to they'd face a revolt.,anuser999,e994kvh,conservative
"If Democrats are good at anything, it's making things worse.",TheComedianGLP,e99f1kx,conservative
"They're touchy about the existence thing, because, you know, NPCs.",TheComedianGLP,e99fdoa,conservative
"Your flair says ""Shapiro 2024"" but you link an article claiming that the communist agenda is also a Zionist one to overthrow America. I'm confused.",dicaparly,e99dga6,conservative
They never do.  Be warned.  They just swap sides to whomever holds power. ,Lobo0084,e993qo8,conservative
"That is acceptable because it is all done in order to thwart those evil homophobic, sexist, misogynist, islamophobic, transphobic, xenophobic, racist Republicans.

And it pains me greatly to have to add this, but /s.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e98poog,conservative
"I am very, very concerned about guiding my grandchildren to a good college. I just found a Facebook group that discusses the political leanings. I'm not paying for propaganda or brainwashing. It's enough to navigate leaving home and the stresses of a courseload without having to wade through b.s. I'm happy to help pay for college, I'm supportive of them choosing their own path, I just don't want them in a place that is slanted either way. 

I don't know. I've already had to discuss this so hopefully they'll be armed with good critical thinking skills. I thought I'd stroke out when I was at their future high school and saw a mural that said ""The Future Is Female"". I can be supportive of woman's rights and *still* think this is not a healthy thing for my grandchildren to pass by every day for FOUR years. Do my grandsons settle for less because it's some girls turn? Does my granddaughter get a free ride because she is female? I hate everything about that, it's the opposite of empowering. We stood right there and broke down everything wrong with it. 

Shoot, sorry. I get so mad about liberal bias in schools, ",GladysCravesRitz,e990j1g,conservative
"A Marxist professor is not constrained by ethics, math, or science.

Only the revolution matters.",TheComedianGLP,e99f5ft,conservative
FACT.,TheComedianGLP,e99fay0,conservative
">  In my estimation the vast majority of academics dont really care about politics and just focus on their research/work

I wish. There is a huge push for ""social justice"" in academia. I'm not just speaking of the liberal arts, but also STEM. If I recall correctly, universities in California are requiring new PhD candidates to swear an oath that states they will accommodate all types of diverse students, and they need to create a plan to do it. It was the department of mathematics that instituted this. I saw a few threads on /r/math from people asking how they are to do this, as they are mathematicians not kindergarten teachers who need to be accommodate for everything. They don't care about the backgrounds of the students, only whether or not a proof is correct. It's pretty mind blowing, if I'm being honest.",--____--____--____,e99h00d,conservative
Maybe you should just ask Ben what he thinks about that?,cons_NC,e99dknm,conservative
"I understand this. I remember I had a required class at university over 10 years ago called ""Race, Class and Gender."" The point of the class basically boiled down that white, straight men deserved nothing and should be pushed to the side for various forms of affirmative action throughout all aspects of life. I remember sitting there, going, ""Wait, I thought it *didn't* matter what color you were or what gender, that everyone should be equal and merit based."" Except when I brought that up, I was told ""Society"" gave preferential treatment to certain people in the past and present, and therefore special action had to be taken to level the playing field. 

As a woman, it's never sat well with me. I wanted to get by on my own merit, not because I'm a woman. And let's face it - affirmative action also ""conveniently"" leaves out the Asian population and sometimes the Indian as well. Why are we saying some races are bad and some are good?!?! It's 2018 ffs.",Aiyakiu,e999ye4,conservative
"Just today I was talking with my teacher from Computer Science, who's pretty Liberal. We were talking about Trump for a moment and how he's gloating over the results, and just kind of off-hand, she said ""the 45% who support him is what's concerning because it means they're secretly racist and sexist,"" just like that. I objected and said it wasn't because of that, but she had to go, and she doesn't like talking politics because she doesn't want to be fired.

It wasn't said in front of the whole classroom (it was only me in there when she finally left), but I was just kind of surprised she thought that, and that she apparently couldn't come up with any other characterization for half the country that wasn't ""damn deplorables.""

I then read a Lefty article saying we needed to combat the ""Right-Wing propaganda institutions"" like ""Turning Point USA,"" because it's ""indoctrinating the young"" into some sort of radical ideology.

IDK about those guys, but even 25% of professors in uni thinking half the country is racist and sexist sounds like a bigger indoctrination arm than ""turning point USA.""

I don't hate her, I don't think she's a bad person (she's funny and loves interacting with the students), but it just kind of surprised me to hear her say that...",Bigbluebuttonman,e99ds4c,conservative
Hillsdale or bust.,TheComedianGLP,e99f6mf,conservative
"If your kids stick with math or science related fields, all will be well. Once you get into social sciences, humanities, etc., forget it. ",VeggieHatr,e99zngo,conservative
"For large universities that are academically rigorous, your best bets for your grand kids are SMU in Dallas and TCU in Fort Worth. Still generally liberal, but not bar shit liberal. ",FuckTimBeck,e9a9mux,conservative
"Sadly, it’s spreading even in STEM fields. As a bio major, I really hope I won’t have to deal with this crap.",derrima,e99tlzq,conservative
"Seeing as he’s pro-Israel, I’m not sure what you’d expect him to say.",derrima,e99ti22,conservative
"It's very frustrating, I refuse to enable it. When I was young and in college I had an entire room full of men tell me I belonged at home. That was not good, but  this is not either. ",GladysCravesRitz,e99cwt7,conservative
"It gets ingrained in people's heads who cannot hear the other side for what it is. She might not be a bad person, but if she's lived her whole life believing stupid things about conservatives and what the Media has told her, it would be hard to even change her mind at all. ",HighLatencyRaptor,e99ycrd,conservative
I love the mandatory constitution course. ,GladysCravesRitz,e99g1x6,conservative
"Yes, while young they are all very strong at this. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9ad4jp,conservative
"Thank you, I'll add these to my notes.",GladysCravesRitz,e9ad53z,conservative
"You can't be a commie if you are taught original intent, Federalist Papers, and the Constitution. 

It's just not possible.",TheComedianGLP,e99hmhp,conservative
"Also, some people don’t want to consider BYU because of the Mormon connection, but it’s an excellent school, enforces a code of conduct that is very conservative, and their professors are anything but liberal. 


Vanderbilt is another that’s relatively conservative (I stress “relatively”) as is Texas A&M. 

Hillsdale in Michigan is a bit smaller, but it’s a great place to get a head start if your grandkids want to be in politics. They are the only university that requires freshman to take a course in the constitution, and they refuse federal aid so they can teach curriculum how they want to. 


University of Dallas is a very strong university, it’s run by the Cistercian Order of Monks. They also have a great high school associated with the university as well. If you are of means and want a very strong foundation for your grandkids, it may be worth considering sending them their for boarding school. 


There’s a university run by Franciscans in Ohio that’s also really good but I can’t remember it’s name. 


There’s also Pepperdine. 

Generally speaking, there are actually quite a few academically rigorous Catholic Universities. 

Texas A&M is going to be the only public school that leans conservative that I know of. 


Then you have a few private that generally lean conservative like SMU, TCU, Pepperdine, Vanderbilt. 


Then BYU. I probably wouldn’t send my kid to BYU, because Mormonism just, I can’t, basically the book of Abraham is a huge red flag that the whole thing is bunk to me. 


Anyway, I’m lucky, live near Dallas (Richardson) so I have 3 really good options close by, plus in state tuition at Texas A&M. I’m gonna try to get my kid ready to get entrance to Cistercian for school once he’s around 10ish I think. I really got to know the school through facing them in Academic Decathlon and Quiz Bowl growing up, very serious about quality education and a grounding in Western Civ. 


I would stay away from the “newer” evangelical universities like Liberty, etc. yes they are conservative but not really academically rigorous like others I have listed above and also it’s kind of Rah Rah RINO conservative if you know what I mean, and I lean libertarian/fan of western civ, philosophy and “classical liberalism” (aka personal freedoms not modern “liberalism” which is a yoke hidden as entitlements.) 

Anyway, I hope this helps you out. ",FuckTimBeck,e9aen6q,conservative
"It does, thank you.",GladysCravesRitz,e9agkli,conservative
"Transgender ""woman"" wants other women to touch her penis. 

Alex I'll take things I never thought I'd type for $800 please.",chaotic_zx,e99whi9,conservative
"Of course. And most the public would side with the real women here, so this won't get widely reported",MaddSim,e99m5tb,conservative
Just another mentally unstable leftist trying to get attention and ruin the lives of normal people in an effort to make themselves feel less shitty about being mentally unstable and confused about their own gender (as well as getting wealthy at the expense of hardworking single mothers who refused to touch his genitals),VoinaYMir,e99ss5q,conservative
So he's suing them because they refused to be sexually harassed?,Terra_green2,e9a1124,conservative
"I think this is more about money than equality - According to the lawyer, JY said he was willing to withdraw his complaint against Poyer for $2,500. ""If JY is demanding similar sums from the other 14 women, he stands to receive as much as $35,000 for dropping his human rights complaints,"" ",AD_1172,e9afb8h,conservative
"""""""woman""""""",Sea_Safe,e9blpxd,conservative
The waxer could accuse him of sexual harassment.,Stunner900,e9apwyv,conservative
"Yeah, the cowardice of the lawyers and law firms these women have reached out to is really disappointing. Way to stand up for women.",noiwontsharemyfries,e99sy5q,conservative
"Why do they even have these meetings, it seems like it's always just been a grandstanding platform.",Dyeredit,e99abmi,conservative
Trump just needs to stop answering the badgering follow up questions. He should just stand there silent until either Acosta gives up the mike or someone else asks a question. ,el_jay_sea,e99fe9h,conservative
Does the president have to speak with the press?  Just issue a press release every few days.,R0binSage,e99m8y3,conservative
Find someone who loves you like Jim Acosta loves him some Jim Acosta,killiburnbrae98,e9a5909,conservative
"CNN actually defending Acosta of course. Even though he was disrespectful to the President AND the female. Imagine if any Republican or some Fox News host did that to a female aide for a Democrat....  The ""outrage"" from every democrat and fake news media would be like a nuclear blast.  The left are such fucking hypocrites",MaddSim,e98um61,conservative
They should have thrown him out and used his head to open the door.,mikecx79,e993n5w,conservative
"I’m not a big fan of watching most media, but honestly he is not wrong CNN is by far the worst news network out there. ",Beandog0829,e99xd1h,conservative
"Why does Trump continue to allow this dude into the WH? Can he not just ban the mother fucker? 

If I had treated people the way he does as a child my mother would have whooped my ass... and I would have deserved it. ",IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e99cff8,conservative
Damn at one point I thought that Trump was going to just murder him...,Nikolay_Milenkov,e9a3673,conservative
I have supported and will continue to support this president. Fake news is the enemy of the people. CNN is the enemy of the people.,J0kerr,e9affbc,conservative
"I wish Trump followed thru on his urge, and went down there and took it from him.

He should do it next time.",Gnome_Sane,e99ezd5,conservative
Brilliant President!,rook2pawn,e99hchu,conservative
"God, I love that man.",McCrackle-Jack,e9a1jwz,conservative
I love MY President! ♥️,heartless_13,e9a3bf7,conservative
But that would be far less entertaining ,MikePenceVP,e99kgiv,conservative
"I think the point of these engagements is to make clear to the audience that the press is hostile in a manner we haven't seen before, unhinged even. A necessity to counter 90% negative reporting from these corporate/Dem propaganda outlets. Generally speaking I'd trust Trump's judgement in this area.",TheYoungSpergs,e9abp69,conservative
"I mean then the people in the left would stay stuff like ""Oh, he never talks to the press he just tweets."" ",The_Fyrd,e99rtlw,conservative
Part of being transparent i guess,Davidk921921,e99w17m,conservative
I'm a liberal and I thought he was clearly being too forceful. If the aid is trying to take the mic just give it to them. the guy was being an ass,deadlyseal,e99uuey,conservative
How was he disrespectful to the lady?,Cedric182,e98w106,conservative
Well they didn't use the door but his press creds have been revoked following this.,etibbs,e99tchy,conservative
His pass has been revoked ,molon-labe7,e99khld,conservative
"Because he ises it to get his point across. CNN can't resist playing footage of Trump 'attacking their reporter' so they show Jim 'Look At Me, I'm Jim Acosta' Acosta acting like an ass as well. They can't show Trump without Jim.",unibuckeye,e99d99r,conservative
*He has people..*,RidleyBourne,e9a377d,conservative
A good strongarm to American values.,The_Fyrd,e99ruok,conservative
"True, but to be fair he does need to slow down on the tweets imo ",preston_garvey4,e9a8vc4,conservative
I’ve watch this clip 5 times now. I’m completely lost. When does the women try to take the mic from him?,Cray_J_Music,e9a1kiq,conservative
"Shes in charge of passing around the mic, and he swatted her hand down.",imaliberal1980,e996ebv,conservative
"She tried to get the mic from him, and he put his hands on her arm. Watch the clip. Fox news reporter that would do that, would be destroyed by the media",MaddSim,e98z25v,conservative
I saw that. Good deal. Dude shouldn’t be near the White House. ,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e99lk4m,conservative
His name is Jim “find someone that loves you like Jim Acosta loves Jim Acosta” Acosta. ,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e99eooq,conservative
They are good for conveying the president's opinion rather than being filtered but yeah I agree.,The_Fyrd,e9aauxg,conservative
It’s not in this specific clip. ,RidleyBourne,e9a31d1,conservative
He didn’t swat her ,Cedric182,e998unf,conservative
[deleted],,e98zfnz,conservative
"Yeah I like that he’s sincere don’t get me wrong, but quality over quantity.",preston_garvey4,e9aboiy,conservative
"He clearly did, Cedric",imaliberal1980,e999sb3,conservative
It was more of a karate chop ,i_floop_the_pig,e9990dk,conservative
Are you blind? It's clear as day in the video.,bartoksic,e999cin,conservative
You can’t have it both ways Cedric. ,RutCry,e9904ah,conservative
"You know damn well if a fox guy didn't that to a female Democrat aide, the media would've went ape shit. ",MaddSim,e99m46m,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/uCwPwdI.gifv,Cedric182,e9arpgn,conservative
Thank you,Cedric182,e99axr9,conservative
This made me laugh,Siere,e99ggvq,conservative
Why are you thanking him ,fourdebt,e99fhyw,conservative
I wonder if the folks who are pushing for a democracy rather than a republic are just as excited about defending this example of democracy? The people have spoken...,Romarion,e98vv85,conservative
Awesome. I'd love to see some jurisprudence on this- it may well be the legal battle of the century. ,Maswasnos,e981t3i,conservative
"I just moved to Huntsville, AL two weeks ago from California and I couldn’t be more happy with my decision, especially after swing the results this morning.  It’s nice to live somewhere I don’t have to hide my views and that respects life.  They also have water!",acada,e9860xh,conservative
"Awesome. 

Meanwhile in ~~Oregon~~ the Republik of Portland we voted 60+ to keep state funded abortions; my tax dollars continue to fund the murder of children ",Vrael22,e984ouy,conservative
"I can't believe I ever thought abortion was OK. That was when I was a young, dumb, liberal in college. Thought I was so virtuous. Now I'm disgusted that I thought that killing the unborn was OK and not only that, but encouraged... I'm ashamed. But now I want to help protect more of the unborn. ",LEGALinSCCCA,e985pkt,conservative
Good. ,Wiseguy2013,e981n79,conservative
Was glad to vote for this amendment. Hopefully we can end Roe soon as well,Gunsofglory,e99gmz6,conservative
I remember voting on this! :D,BlazeTheGryphon7x7,e989hxg,conservative
Very proud of Alabama on this. I think this is a more legally sound approach than West Virginia's (although I'm glad of theirs as well). Alabama's cuts straight to the heart of the issue - affirming personhood of the unborn and thus equal protection under the law.,Aviator07,e98n3ra,conservative
Excellent news. ,DontMakeMeDownvote,e989lde,conservative
Fantastic. ,Doctor-Squishy,e98b7j6,conservative
"Yeah, and while we're at it, let's ban condoms, because you're preventing possible life there too...",Mattprather2112,e995ysb,conservative
"Stay classy, Alabama. I'd rather the SC focus on smacking down unconstitutional gun control for a few years rather than dealing with something as controversial as this.",M6D_Magnum,e99mpw9,conservative
Dow voters are rampant today! Go back to r/politics!,AnIntellectualPerson,e9ap6kl,conservative
Well good thing I don’t live in Alabama.,OpticGandee,e996gm8,conservative
It's good that there are politicians that value every life. Shame Democrats don't share those views but that's the same party that wants to end incivility so.,PapaGeorgio23,e98hpkb,conservative
"I think the founding fathers didn't go with a direct democracy because they feared the uneducated masses couldn't make informed decisions on policy and law.  So just because the people have spoken, doesn't mean what the people said is correct. Not saying anything about unborn rights, just that we vote for leaders not for laws.",mustang23200,e99yb4b,conservative
"The big battle will be over Personhood. Get the personhood of Unborn Children recognized, the 14th amendment kicks in nationwide and homicide laws will apply to abortion. I guarantee you there are big time constitutional lawyers and think-tank law firms with abortion cases lined up to be taken to the supreme court *when* they're confident there's enough judges to support personhood. They won't pull the trigger until they're certain however. .

Thankfully, with our gains in the senate, the odds are getting really high that we'll get enough pro-personhood judges.",Zyrioun,e98lsj9,conservative
Huntsville is great. You should check out the Nook if you like beer. ,stanleythemanley44,e987idq,conservative
Good to hear you're liking Alabama. Nice thing about the state is you can voice your opinion and not be totally shot down.,Jmac460,e987j8x,conservative
Welcome to Huntsville!,BurZaxbys,e98o3wy,conservative
">They also have water!

It's such a weird thing for a Californian to experience, real flowing water. -",DrowningGods,e98mim0,conservative
Welcome to Alabama! Roll Tide!,fifaislife206,e98aw21,conservative
Hey man at least it was on the ballot this year. We didn't get enough signatures for the longest time. One of these years we'll get em,vorcazm,e998yp9,conservative
So glad I moved out of there. But came back to Washington and it’s not much better. ,jimmyrhall,e98dox1,conservative
"Ugh, this state. The election in this state was a complete unmitigated disaster. We lost literally everything. Governorship, Ballot measures, everything.  We kept walden but that doesn't really help on a state level.",Zyrioun,e98ebyj,conservative
I'm curious - what changed your mind?,stanleythemanley44,e987j2w,conservative
I used to be a Bernie supporter...I feel the same way. Its embarrassing.,fluffyfluffyheadd,e98ufzd,conservative
"I think it’s really easy for today’s youth to be sucked into cold secular ideas like abortion, just as you and I were. For me I just saw it as a cold truth of the world, that sorry it’s better that innocent people are killed than have them be unwanted and alive. However, you shouldn’t stop one tragedy with an even greater and more evil tragedy.",ReformedBlackPerson,e98ffg2,conservative
"Killing the unborn...

Exactly. ",Cedric182,e98kzei,conservative
I voted on this one too. I believe all 4 of the proposed statewide constitutional amendments passed ,FlankingZen,e98d8bq,conservative
"Add birth control in that list
/s",ordonuts,e99d0uo,conservative
"This is such a slippery slope, though.  Miscarriages happen.  Are there now going to be murder investigations when a miscarriage happens?",seadondo,e98s78z,conservative
I agree that place is great. ,Kspresent,e989vt3,conservative
"I'm in washington state, we have conservative bunkers here",sylect,e98ctao,conservative
"Not just that, but’s it’s rained 3 days this week.  The other night it sounded like the rain was punching my window, I’ve never heard that before",acada,e98nj77,conservative
#RTR,dragonbornrito,e98pdzm,conservative
Go to the south. Leave,Cedric182,e98l17r,conservative
"Same. I just moved away from PDX, partly to get away from all of the bigots, and now I’m in Georgia and I’m loving it. ",LeaderOfTheBeavers,e98gfb2,conservative
When one city runs the state it basically makes it unlivable. ,Vrael22,e98h408,conservative
Different person but I used to be the same way. For me it was trying to nail down exactly when it would be ok. Like late term was obviously not cool to me or partial birth etc so you have to put a line somewhere. That kinda led me to thinking that if one day it’s no big deal at all and the next it’s literally killing a fuckin baby...you really don’t want to get that wrong. I could never really figure anything out I was comfortable enough with to risk murdering a baby so I won’t advocate or defend it anymore. Im not hardcore about it but it unsettled me enough to stay away from the issue. ,ZardokAllen,e988h60,conservative
"Not OP, but I changed my mind in college.   
  
I had a required theology course with a professor that I respected the Hell out of. He told us we were going to ""tackle abortion,"" which I thought meant that he was going to teach us why *according to scripture* it's wrong. I had lost my faith a few years prior and still had a chip on my shoulder toward religion in general, so I didnt expect much.  
  
He handed us an essay argument that was a secular case against the morality of abortion. The writer made a point to basically say, ""surely you think I will argue [common anti abortion argument], but I won't. That isn't valid because of X Y and Z""  
  
For half of the paper, common arguments against abortion are dismantled. Once he took care of them he gave his final argument.  
  
Basically what it boiled down to was an inquiry as to why death is something we consider to be bad. I cant fo it justice here, but the thoroughly-backed conclusion was akin to, ""it's bad because we consider it to be robbing the individual of their future.""  
  
I put that paper down and knew I'd been wrong. It was the first moment I can remember that really humbled me and allowed me to open up my other assistive views for analysis.  
  
I'll try to find the paper and edit my comment with a link. It's an incredibly well written argument that doesn't require a religious mindset to acknowledge as *at least* a reasonable position.",OrwellianLiberty,e98pj7a,conservative
Getting out of California is what it took. That and doing my own research. ,LEGALinSCCCA,e98a4rj,conservative
"Not OP but my guess, either having a child or science lol",mcbosco25,e988dqt,conservative
"Devil's advocate here:

Someone's robbing you, or invading your house, and you know their only intent is to steal, is it okay to use lethal force?  Is both stealing and killing on the same moral plane? 

I don't think that argument can be stretched to abortion, but I'll try: surely a person could say a baby is violating the mother's personal space. Surely it's within her rights to remove that person from her body? If someone was inside of you, is it your right to get them outside of you, or does the 14th amendment still apply? ",mackilicious,e98oz1r,conservative
"Sure, birth control too. Let's get rid of all our rights",Mattprather2112,e99k0t4,conservative
"Non-sequitur. Are there murder investigations into most natural deaths? No. Police only begin an investigation when they have suspicion of a crime, like a nurse snitching on a doctor, or other evidence being brought forward.

Most enforcement efforts would work like vice squads, embedded police working to find underground abortion clinics or rogue doctors, not stalking every pregnant woman like some pro-abortionists seem to think.",Zyrioun,e98sn5b,conservative
"It is largely viewed as a symbolic Amendment. The politicians pushing it were saying that it is to put Alabama's position out front in case Roe vs Wade ever came up for debate again. My personal view was that it was a way to ensure Republican Alabama voters got out to the polls. They did and Republicans won almost every race 60% to 40%. 

I voted for it because I despise abortion. I have no idea if it can actually be enforced or not. I really don't care. It will give liberals something to focus on. ",chaotic_zx,e99o26b,conservative
"I am in the Central Coast area of California and I want to retire to Oregon Coast near one of their major rivers. That state is a political disaster but is insanely beautiful during spring/summer. I also love the rain, and they get tons up there. ",DrowningGods,e98o3mc,conservative
"I'm in college right now. I don't support late term abortion, but I think there's a time before baby's consciousness when it's allowed. What do you think?",goldrotmgonly,e98c2hp,conservative
"Thanks for your input. 

1. I like the fact that it was non-scripture based and I hate the meme that all pro-life people are religious crazies. I think it's totally possible (as I and you have) to come to the conclusion that abortion is wrong based on reason alone. 

2. I like the ""future potential"" argument because it doesn't actually rely on the person-hood of the unborn baby/fetus. I haven't thought about that much. I could foresee logical holes in it, but it's something I'll ponder. ",stanleythemanley44,e98qasz,conservative
"These are really good points, and abortion is one of those things that I still have a hard time grappling with. In the end, I think i'm never going to be anything other than pro-choice. A baby requires wealth, dedication, and time. Not everyone has that, or wants that. I also don't think it will ever be my place (or anyone other than the individual) to decide if a woman goes through 9 months of carrying a baby they don't want. Shit happens and sex is fun. Doesn't mean you should be sentenced to a life long term of being a parent (even if you give the baby up for adoption, you will forever be a parent). But should we simultaneously be preaching that abortion should be the absolute last resort and that there are ways to prevent pregnancy? Fuck yes we should.",DJFreeMe,e991ypf,conservative
"It sounds like you were indoctrinated. If this story was reversed and about how abortion was right, I think people in this sub would be crying foul.",Trill-I-Am,e98punp,conservative
"Gonna start by saying I am not wholly Republican or Democrat, and that I fall in the middle somewhere depending on the issue. Abortion is a tough issue and there's no two ways about it. 

>""it's bad because we consider it to be robbing the individual of their future."" 

I've seen this argument before but what happens when you take this thought to the extreme? If we don't want to ""rob individuals of their future"", why aren't we all encouraged/forced to have as many babies as possible? Everyday plenty of hypothetical children are robbed of their future because they are not conceived. Why is an unborn baby given more rights then a not-yet-conceived baby? Conception is a very clear, biological event that we can point to and say that's when a baby is a baby. Others say that their biological event that they can point to is once a baby is conscious. We're all just drawing lines in the sand and we all think our line is better than ""theirs"".

I don't really believe in abortion, but couples should be able to prevent pregnancies if they don't want to get pregnant. I think we need better sex ed to prevent abortions in the first place and couples should be allowed to get fixed without all the stigma attached to it. In the grand scheme of things, the options for people who don't want children are to prevent pregnancies either before or after they happen. If it's difficult to do it before hand (other than just not having sex), the only option is to do it afterwards. If both courses of action are taken away from people, what do they do? If the government bans alcohol, what did people do? If someone doesn't want a child, they will do what they have to do to not have that child. ",Plazma7,e992ega,conservative
Yeah I think most people don't actually think about it or don't actually read about it and just see it as a surface issue (women's rights/killing babies). ,stanleythemanley44,e98at2s,conservative
What do you mean by science? I do not think science plays a role in it. People may choose to advocate their point with science/medicine but science/medicine itself does not and should not have a stance.,5_yr_lurker,e98b9ff,conservative
"> If someone was inside of you, is it your right to get them outside of you, or does the 14th amendment still apply?

Except the person wanting the baby removed is the person who put it there. 

inb4 ""What about rape?"" This is a infinitesimal amount of pregnancies and abortions, and should not even be considered as an argument for killing a baby.",SWTORBattlefrontNerd,e99094j,conservative
"But in 99% of cases the mother opened the door to the ""thief"" knowing they might come in and stay a while. One might call that a guest, regardless of how much the woman likes them it makes no sense for her to ""shoot them"" considering she changed her mind after agreeing that they could come in and stay.

Might read awkwardly but I was trying you keep with your story.",Mewster1818,e98z80o,conservative
"Also question for you- in the /#MeToo era, what is going to stop a potential increase in rape accusations in order for women to gain access to an abortion should the government place restrictions on access?",zwiebelsaft,e99cx68,conservative
"Suspicion of drug use, alcohol use, failure to immunize properly, failure to practice safe sexual practices while pregnant, etc.

Easily dismissed in conversation, not nearly as easily disregarded when the murder of an unborn child is officially recognized as law.

A mother whose child dies in the crib or from neglect is still prosecuted for child endangerment.  A mother who failed to properly immunize and refrain from strenuous lifting and stress as recommended by most doctors would very likely also be considered for child endangerment and manslaughter.

And who would initiate these accusations?  Mother in laws, ex husband's, coworkers, ex lovers, etc. ",Lobo0084,e99cr02,conservative
I was considering Oregon but the Cost of Living to salary ratio wasn’t quite what I wanted.  They are a political disaster but they aren’t any worse than California,acada,e98on2j,conservative
When is that time exactly?  What is the boundary?  How is something not a person one millisecond and the next millisecond a person with legal rights?  What happens precisely at that boundary?  These questions must be answered to be an intellectually honest supporter of abortion. ,LaLongueCarabine,e98og4o,conservative
"Theoretically I’m in the same boat. That said when exactly does that happen? I don’t think we have any exact time that we know that and babies develop differently and again the implications of getting that wrong is scary. When you make laws they have to be uniform and specific. I don’t really have a problem with Plan B or some shit but it also starts looking like a little tiny baby pretty damn early on. I just don’t know 

E: if you’re not ok with late term abortions then you’re acknowledging that at some point you are murdering a baby. Track that back and figure out the moment that you are 100% sure that you aren’t doing that, I know that I can’t pin it down. ",ZardokAllen,e98cmgl,conservative
"How do you determine consciousness?   
  
We're not conscious while we're sleeping, but that doesn't make murdering a sleeping person more moral than murdering one who is awake.  
  
It's bad to murder a sleeping person because you're removing their future conscious self without their consent. Isnt that similar to a fetus or a baby? They may not be fully conscious, but as long as you dont kill them, they *will* be.  
  
",OrwellianLiberty,e98pttc,conservative
"It was a Theology professor, not an English Lit professor calling republicans evil. What are you on about?",ichosethisasmyname,e9adky6,conservative
"That's a pretty foolish claim to make.  
  
I'm perfectly capable of thinking for myself. There was plenty that I had to read in that class that I believed to be hogwash with no credibility to their claims.  
  
Reading a secular argument against abortion, finding it difficult to poke holes in, and adjusting your views accordingly is not indoctrination. It's literally the most objective way to form an opinion.  
  
I've been on the lookout for a position that contradicts this paper since I read it 6 years ago. I've thought it through over and over, looked for every position I could, and have yet to find anything as convincing as this paper.  
  
I was challenged, for sure. Indoctrinated? Absolutely not.",OrwellianLiberty,e99s2ky,conservative
"> Everyday plenty of hypothetical children are robbed of their future because they are not conceived

There's a big difference. Once a child is conceived it exists and develops towards being born. To end this life is to directly end that future. 

By comparison, with a hypothetical child that hasn't been conceived and doesn't actually exist *in any form*, there is no future to even be taken away.",_Hospitaller_,e99kcn5,conservative
">why aren't we all encouraged/forced to have as many babies as possible? Everyday plenty of hypothetical children are robbed of their future because they are not conceived. Why is an unborn baby given more rights then a not-yet-conceived baby?  
  
An unborn baby *is* a baby. It exists with its own unique set of DNA.  
  
An baby that has yet to be conceived *isn't* a baby. There's no individual there. It doesn't exist.  
  
I agree wholeheartedly that people should be able to prevent pregnancies. Sex-ed is a fantastic way to prevent the need for abortions.  
  
The last bit of your reply is what I struggle with the most. I'm pretty libertarian and would argue that banning guns and drugs doesn't work. I go back and forth between applying that same principle to abortion.  
  
One one hand, you're right. Illegal abortions would skyrocket. People would still try to get them. But at the same time, if I'm arguing in favor of an unborn child's personhood, wouldn't it be just as fair to argue that murder should be legalized?  
  
It's something that's been unclear to me for years. I know that I believe abortions are inherently immoral. I don't know what to do about the legality of it. It's fucking tough, man. ",OrwellianLiberty,e99rpj1,conservative
"Yes exactly. The biggest problem is propaganda from liberals/leftists, that presents abortions as simple easy and liberating. Then you make it a joke, like how they joke about abortions. Which is one of the most disturbing things to joke about, especially when it's about killing the unborn. I can't think of a more evil and satanic thing than killing the unborn because you can't keep your legs closed. ",LEGALinSCCCA,e98azhq,conservative
"What I mean is often times when people learn about how early children (a) are reactive to stimulus or (b) can survive outside the womb. 

This idea that science should not have a stance is iffy, to say the least. Firstly, science's purpose is to make as close to objective determinations as humanly possible. The scientific community determined what they defined life as, and it absolutely would contain any form of conceived embryo, fetus or child. Furthermore, if we didn't think fetus's had value, we wouldn't have prenatal care at any capacity except abortions basically. The notion of doing anything to save an unborn baby that isn't a valid and important human life would be a categorical waste of resources

You might be saying that science doesn't have a moral stance on the issue, and that's valid. But the scientific facts point to a pro-life ethical and moral stance, and many people who are uninformed and pro-choice, become informed and pro-life. That's what I'm trying to say. We might be in mostly agreement on science's role and I may have misread your point. But I figured I'd elaborate for the sake of clarification.  ",mcbosco25,e98ccqe,conservative
"Edge cases should be thought about but law should follow the majority. I wasn't trying to bait the rape argument, I heard that today irl too, and it's frustrating.  At most I think rape abortions should have a separate law. ",mackilicious,e994qte,conservative
"If the personhood of the unborn is recognized, you will  not be allowed to abort because of rape. The unborn child didn't rape the woman, and doesn't deserve to have its constitutional right to life violated because of a crime someone else committed. Either it's life and it's murder in all situations (minus Triage situations), or it's not and it doesn't matter.

The US Doesn't have constitutional exceptions where ""Your natural rights no longer apply if your existence is a burden because of a crime someone else committed"".",Zyrioun,e99ekct,conservative
"If you know anything about law enforcement, you know accusations like those get dismissed on a daily basis (maybe an interview before dismissing) when there's no evidence.

I don't know why pro-aborts think evidentiary standards disappear if abortion is illegal. Regardless, this is not reason to deny someones right to life because it may or may not be inconvenient. This is way beyond the point.",Zyrioun,e99er5x,conservative
">but they aren’t any worse than California

Yep, so true. ",DrowningGods,e98ozyn,conservative
That point is so subjective and blurred for many people. Thank you for sharing your perspective with me!,goldrotmgonly,e9b8w12,conservative
"Legality of Murder shouldn't be based on the current level of consciousness, otherwise there's a lot of different adults you could murder at different points. Even under anesthesia, come to think of it. That's a legally arbitrary distinction and gives massive power to the government to dictate when life is worthy of protection.

Constitutionally, if a Fetus is human life (which scientifically it is), it should be protected under the 14th amendment from murder regardless of its current status.",Zyrioun,e98eoha,conservative
"Personally, I go by the Pianist Argument. A fetus is a person once it can survive outside of the body of the mother. Right now I think that's at 6 months, though it will probably be earlier as medicine improves.",BlueFireAt,e993uq7,conservative
"> That said when exactly does that happen? I don’t think we have any exact time that we know that and babies develop differently and again the implications of getting that wrong is scary. 

Agreed. Which is why free contraception and realistic sex ed for everyone makes all the sense in the world -- the only real way to stop abortions is to keep people from getting pregnant in the first place. No law is going to keep people from having sex, and no law is going to keep people from trying to abort pregnancies they don't want. If the goal is to not even take a chance with human life -- and that makes sense -- the obvious conclusion is free contraception and realistic sex ed.",Bruce_G,e99278p,conservative
So many others think the same way as us. I think that point is very blurred and unknown. I feel the same way. Thank you for sharing your perspective.,goldrotmgonly,e9b8yjq,conservative
This is such a valid point. Thank you for sharing your perspective.,goldrotmgonly,e9b8u87,conservative
"Exactly! But that's because we define ""exists"" as when the baby is conceived (sperm + egg together), but others do not. The two halves of a lot of babies ""exist"" right now just not together. Some people believe that two cells being together isn't enough for something to exist. They believe that a baby is more than just sperm + egg. For them it's sperm + egg + consciousness. 

It's really weird but like I said, we're all just drawing irrelevant lines in sand. We believe what we believe and they believe what they believe. Regardless of who is ""right"", there is really only two options. We either need to prevent people from getting pregnant if they don't want to, or let them undo it after the fact. I morally don't like option 2 so we need to better handle option 1 (and we can't just pretend people are going to do the right thing and not get pregnant because that's not how humans work).",Plazma7,e99lrhg,conservative
"Thanks. I agree with most of what you said.  

>scientific facts point to a pro-life ethical and moral stance 

This not so much. But to each his/her own.",5_yr_lurker,e98ff7e,conservative
"I'm not pro abortion because I think it's right.  I'm pro abortion because I know it cannot be stopped and leads to a lot of legal headaches.

And I find it convenient how easily many anti-abortion arguments end up with fingers in ears yelling 'no its not, your wrong, I'm not listening'.

I do agree that abortion is wrong.  I don't agree it can be effectively legislated against.  We can stop federally funding it, sure.  We can make sure it's taught against, agreed.

But I wish to God we would spend all this effort and energy properly taking care of all the kids we already have that parents didn't want before we stuck even more of them into this world.

Speaking as an almost aborted and heavily abused child who was actually LUCKY I didn't end up in the foster child system or a kids home. Sure, I gre up fine, but many of the kids around me didn't.

Being against abortion is great, but let's make it about the kids having great lives and solid raisings, and less about punishing already idiotic parents who are just going to make worse decisions raising a child they didn't want. ",Lobo0084,e99fj4z,conservative
yea. I think there’s an argument to be made about something that has *never* been conscious and something that is unconscious,ZardokAllen,e98ge9n,conservative
This guy laws ^,sweetdollaT,e98g77c,conservative
Yea I definitely don’t agree. That baby is definitely there and alive before then. ,ZardokAllen,e999pym,conservative
Maybe but it’s not my responsibility to pay for your contraception either ,ZardokAllen,e999s17,conservative
"Let's break down what you said - It's ok  to murder people if we can't stop all murder and a lot of them would *potentially* have bad lives anyway. Are you advocating Eugenics? It has the exact same justification. 

It really comes down to this  - If you believe that Unborn Children are human lives, with intrinsic  value and natural rights, then your justification for their termination is evil. If they're  not, you don't need a justification.

This isn't even getting into the horribly unconstitutional metric you're trying to use as to whom is allowed their natural right to life and who isn't - i.e. can we reliably stop their murder in all cases and will they be a burden to society. That doesn't fly constitutionally and is a horrible argument.",Zyrioun,e99ge0d,conservative
That would imply that murdering a conscious person is bad because they *were* conscious before. Isnt the problem with murder the fact that you're robbing them of their future consciousness and experiences?  ,OrwellianLiberty,e98pxwr,conservative
"Legally, what possible argument could you make that is not arbitrary? What's the scientific distinction? At some point, both will be conscious. Both are human life. 

Scientifically, under certain anesthesia and in certain vegetative or coma states you are as conscious as an unborn child. Why should it matter at all that you were conscious before? Will you be conscious in the future is the only thing taken into consideration when it comes to life support and legal protection.",Zyrioun,e98h3gt,conservative
"Why? What makes it a baby? What is your cutoff? I'm guessing not at the sperm and egg level, so conception? If conception then why be ok with plan B? If not conception, then what other time is there?",BlueFireAt,e99ckd9,conservative
"It will keep you from paying for their child's care, which will cost a lot more.",ordonuts,e99cxd4,conservative
"You pay for police that keep other people from getting murdered, right? ",Bruce_G,e99cb5z,conservative
"It's very interesting that our constitution (as of mid 1800s, at least) recognizes birth, not conception, as the moment of citizenship.

But that's fine. Judges since have interpreted what they wanted from that document, going both ways.

And if we feel that taking of a human life is evil (I do not, as most religions and legal systems have many reasons why taking life is accepted), including an unborn child in this is pretty straightforward.

I do think the hypocrisy of many who want the child to be born, no matter if they suffer and are tortured, is altruistic but naive.

The right thing for the wrong reasons and no real intention of following through during that child's life.

I'm glad my parents didn't abort me.  For better and worst.  But there was a lot of very bad.",Lobo0084,e99hj3l,conservative
No it would imply that you’re killing a person and a it’s a person because they’ve had the consciousness to be a person. Lots of things have never been conscious. ,ZardokAllen,e98r31q,conservative
[removed],,e98hroz,conservative
I’m not sure if you’ve read my comments or not...,ZardokAllen,e99dr9e,conservative
Police provide me a service. Unless I’m fucking your wife I don’t need to pay for her birth control ,ZardokAllen,e99dtew,conservative
"Parts of the constitution, especially the 14th amendment, specifically apply to human ""persons"", *NOT* citizens. This is why laws equally apply to illegal immigrants as american citizens.

Furthermore, the constitution is  explicitly written based on the concept that all humans have intrinsic rights, not *given* them by the government. This is why the focus of legal argument for both Slavery and Abortion is over recognizing the *personhood* of certain groups, i.e. blacks and the unborn. You'll  notice the specific argument of *personhood* and not *citizenship*. You cannot enslave a person who is not a citizen.

Also, the idea that you can deny an innocent person their natural rights and *life* for economic reasons is evil, anti-conservative, and unconstitutional. Even in Roe v Wade, the majority opinion specifically states that they made their decision on the basis that they did not believe the unborn were human life. Even the pro-abortion doctors who worked on the case disagree'd with the ruling based on that criteria, even if they liked the outcome.

I'm assuming you're not conservative though and don't care about constitutionality, equal protection under the law, or natural rights, or intrinsic human value. Also, no human, not you nor anyone else, has the right to decide whether someone elses life will be worth living, and judge an innocent their right to live. That is pure fucking evil.",Zyrioun,e99hts9,conservative
"I'm not downvoting you, you're shooting an innocent bystander on that one.

Also, sperm isn't human life. it only carries half of a DNA set. A human fetus is human life, that is growing and developing. It has it's own DNA, by the time most people know it's there, it has it's own central nervous system and a beating heart.

Objectively there's no conscious difference between a 4 week old and someone on Propofol or in a deep coma with 0 electroencephalogram activity. Why should it matter whether you had a consciousness before your current state? You're ending a human life, a living human organism, that *WILL* have consciousness in the future, in both cases. Legally, that is all that should matter for equal application of the law. ",Zyrioun,e98icy6,conservative
"Well yeah, I'm asking you that same question.",BlueFireAt,e99fwyz,conservative
"If abortion is murder, who cares whether you're directly receiving a service? The government should be preventing murder whether you directly benefit or not. 

In any event (unless the police have intervened to keep you from being murdered), you aren't directly receiving a service from them, either. They provide *society* a benefit (making it harder to murder people) and you benefit only indirectly. Same thing with free contraception -- society benefits (fewer unwanted pregnancies) and you benefit indirectly (you get fewer problems that unwanted kids cause, and you get to enjoy a society where pre-natal murder doesn't happen nearly as often). ",Bruce_G,e99k4le,conservative
"I very much care about the power of the constitution.  And I've said, I'm not for abortion, I'm for resolving the existing problems we have not fixed surrounding awful, abusive parents or the many without caught in the awful foster care and orphanage system.

Millions of lives already affected.  Let us fix this, let us prove that we can provide these young children with a life worth living, before we decide to bring them into a half life without even the slightest promise that their potential will ever be available.

Force these kids into the world in abject poverty and under abusive parents, and they will blame the government, not their dumb parents.

And I promise, these children won't be conservatives.  They will be the very reason abortions become legal again. The very reason we lose our country.  Cause in our quest to be right, we didn't think it all the way through and actually do it the right way.

We aren't planning long term, just solving the current break in our heart.  And if you've got to label me as evil for pointing out how shortsighted this is, so be it. ",Lobo0084,e99iwad,conservative
"The 14th amendment was meant for blacks, not illegal immigrants. It was meant to emphasize the fact that blacks were Americans too, not to give citizenship to anyone who drops a baby over the border.",noiwontsharemyfries,e99jtjf,conservative
"I mean, maybe you should look at my original comments. There’s a reason I’m not pro abortion. 

E: and sorry, fuck whoever’s doing it then ",ZardokAllen,e98jeq4,conservative
Ok,ZardokAllen,e99g16m,conservative
Yea i guess if I have to pay for your pregnancy too. ,ZardokAllen,e99kdlc,conservative
"This isn't about the ""break in our heart"", not if you *actually* think the unborn are human life. This is about a constitutional travesty and the fact that mass murder occurs every year in the country. It's morally and constitutionally wrong. Trying to justify their extermination because of who they might vote for or their economic impact is, in fact, evil. Literally by definition. Do you think the poor, elderly, sick, infirm, and mentally ill should be legal game for extermination by communities, states, cities, etc? Do you know how much better off we would be financially? We could solve half the health care problems right on the spot with just a few chambers, if constitutional protections and morality don't matter to you.

You keep playing this old leftist tactic of deflection."" Sure, abortions evil, but what of this problem over there?"" There are causes, organizations, and groups dedicated to dealing with poor families and abusive homes. That those  situations exists is in no way shape or form a justification for continuing to allow mass murder because *you* judge their lives unworthy.",Zyrioun,e99jn76,conservative
"The 14th amendment was multi-faceted, i'm not talking about birthright citizenship. The portions of the amendment which specific equal application of the law do apply to *everyone*.",Zyrioun,e99k2ah,conservative
"I did, i was simply addressing your point of when the cutoff point should be by pointing out that, on a legal and scientific standpoint, there's a very good and clear argument that there should be no abortion period(with the exception of a rare medical emergency, where triage policies apply) and that any *cutoff* would be arbitrary and actually empower the government in a dangerous and unconstitutional way. 

Wasn't trying to attack you or anything. Just adding to the discussion.",Zyrioun,e98kaou,conservative
"You do. If I get hit by a bus and can't support my wife, who pays for the delivery? You, the taxpayer. Who pays for the public school my kid attends? You the taxpayer. Who pays for jail if my kid fucks up and gets arrested? You the taxpayer.

You're paying either way. ",Bruce_G,e99l227,conservative
"Good luck then.  As every country that outlaws abortions has demonstrated, it won't work out as well as it should.

But at least you will feel good inside, amiright? ",Lobo0084,e99jzgn,conservative
So Plan B is out? ,ZardokAllen,e98koay,conservative
"Oh ok, well in the event that you get hit by a bus I’ll take care of your wife. 

I mean do you really think these are the situations we’re actually paying for? ",ZardokAllen,e99lwde,conservative
"So you believe economic stability is more important than human life and can only be maintained with a certain level of population control, and that it's important we maintain a  level of mass murder to maintain stability and order?

I dunno, for some reason i feel like someone else had that idea too. Can't quite put my finger on it..",Zyrioun,e99k61a,conservative
"Probably no but that's actually tricky as it primarily prevents the Egg from being fertilized, acting as an emergency contraceptive (like a last minute birth control pill) but it *can* prevent a fertilized egg from being implanted, though i think that's a low chance. Each state would likely need to decide whether taking that chance is willful endangerment or whether it's  simply a health risk of an emergency contraceptive, since its purpose isn't to terminate, but act as a contraceptive.

Abortion pills would all become illegal though. Just like with Murder of adults and children though, it won't fully stop people. Doesn't mean it should be legal though.",Zyrioun,e98lbxr,conservative
"...these are exactly the situations taxpayers are on the hook for when people who don't want kids (often because they can't afford to raise them, or recognize that they aren't ready to be a good parent) have kids anyways. ",Bruce_G,e9b86a6,conservative
"And you wouldn't be the first person to help destroy everything they hold dear for all the right reasons.

The only difference between us is being right NOW, no matter the consequences, is your highest priority.

My God built a world where life and death were normal and mankind has added special rules that don't in any way affect the real rules God made.

I try to live in a society thats doing its best to be good, do the right thing, and leave this world better off then when we got here, but we are surrounded by so many selfish people who care only for themselves. ",Lobo0084,e99kzo0,conservative
I mean that’s fair. What I don’t like or agree with is imposing some kind of feigned moral indignation that’s really only based on a technicality. If you *really* feel like it’s murder then by all means but if you deep down feel like it isn’t and it’s just a legal technicality then I’d expect some wiggle room for potential changes. ,ZardokAllen,e98mpjb,conservative
"I'm pretty sure a certain someone in Germany was saying the exact same thing you just said to justify their mass slaughter and genocide.  

Unlike the collectivist nazi's, however, the US is an individualist nation. The rights of the individual trump the rights of the  collective. Everything about the american enlightenment and the  US constitution is based  on that  one fundamental  value.

But you go forth, young fuhrer, purge the weak, the poor, the mentally ill, the vulnerable. Create a better world for tomorrow by destroying those who leech off the strong and those who contribute.",Zyrioun,e99n065,conservative
"I obviously believe abortion murder, not for religious reasons either(though i am religious). From a  moral, constitutional, and scientific standpoint i believe it's Murder. Also, constitutional consistency is extremely important, don't downplay that. Having arbitrary precedent's in constitutional law can fundamentally affect many other, unreleated laws.

For instance, it would be very bad for this country if the government determined what human life has value or what constitutes murder based on what a majority of people *feel*. There needs to be a non-arbitrary standard based on the intrinsic value of human life in order for the constitution to function as intended.",Zyrioun,e98myek,conservative
"Literally comparing me to Hitler?

What's that old rule?  When you break down to comparing your opponent to Hitler, you've lost the debate? ",Lobo0084,e99ph8n,conservative
Has that happened? Is that a real concern? ,ZardokAllen,e98o96g,conservative
"There's  another saying: if the shoe fits.

It isn't a fallacy when it contextually fits the argument i.e. when you're justifying the murder of tens of millions with an economic and/or stability justification, you can be compared to someone else who did the same thing without it being a fallacy.",Zyrioun,e99pyio,conservative
"Be careful with this.  Tasnim News is Iranian.  


Never jump into a tribal war you're never really interested in finishing.  There's so much nuance in this that you won't come out clean when you pick any side thinking you've figured out the good guys.  ",markcocjin,e9afjgy,conservative
Absolutely despicable,ConservativeBrit,e9ab54d,conservative
"And they won't get a twitter ban either I'm sure. Imagine if a bunch of white supremacists camped out outside of Obama's home and chanted for him to leave town, chanting we know where you sleep at night? Spasms of apoplexy on the left, I'm sure. ",xJownage,e99yfts,conservative
"Insane, this group of people.",Creativesupply,e99xasw,conservative
ever get in a situation where you get second hand embarrassment for someone? That's me with Acosta. i can barely watch these exchanges without massive cringe.,JMB_was_a_god,e994h74,conservative
"his white house credentials should be pulled. Let CNN send someone else, but do NOT allow Acosta back into the white house
 ",moxjet66,e99dnmo,conservative
It has become personal for Jim Acosta.,DBG1998,e993nqo,conservative
"Sheesh. I couldn't make it through the whole 2:38.  Too much cringing.  Regardless of your political affiliation, interrupting and trying to talk over the President like that is wrong.      ",KennethGrahame,e99lj35,conservative
Insult Accosta in public.,lax714,e997w0j,conservative
He does it for a living,JacksonNiel12,e99bjp0,conservative
"And, just like so many, he has no idea what he is doing wrong. ",Dmfconrad,e99m4yr,conservative
"Apparently some people are operating under the delusion that ""free press"" means the press is free to say or do whatever the hell they want, truth be damned.",mlmack,e99o5m5,conservative
To be embarrassed one has to have character. I don't believe Jim Acosta has that. ,chaotic_zx,e99wcvk,conservative
Like when the intern girl tries to take the mic away and he tugs it away like a child. ,Zac1245,e994ntz,conservative
"I get that feeling very easily. I'm incapable of watching The Office because of it. I've tried 3 or 4 times and I always have to turn it off after a few minutes because that vicarious embarrassment feeling is overwhelming. 
",ConsistentlyRight,e99vtt7,conservative
https://twitter.com/PressSec/status/1060335251682222085?s=09,rustyshakelford,e99jl6p,conservative
"I’m guessing you didn’t see the news, but the WH just did that.",MyCustomUsername,e99zx02,conservative
Whats sad is he wasn't the only one to talk over Trump disrespectfully. ,PerceivedShift,e9awj6z,conservative
And smacks her arm down,greeneyedunicorn2,e99iat4,conservative
"I wanna see a video of that.  You got a link?

",mikeitclassy,e996b3g,conservative
Scott’s Tots,MyCustomUsername,e99zux5,conservative
"God, the outright sexist and offensive tweets at her is outrageous.",unibuckeye,e99km1t,conservative
"Its in the article I linked, you can watch the whole exchange. ",Zac1245,e997vu4,conservative
Yeah it’s always fun seeing the nasty face on liberals and morons. ,DPistola,e9abv92,conservative
"I made the mistake of opening that, holy shit...Twitter is sickening",PerceivedShift,e9awfwc,conservative
Yet *we're* the sexists........,unibuckeye,e9ax7i3,conservative
"He should have had his press pass pulled after his stunt with North Korea

https://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2018/06/wow-jim-acosta-on-hot-mic-if-theyre-not-going-to-let-me-in-the-fcking-meeting-thats-what-happens-video/",lastbastion,e99uvlt,conservative
"Because he's very rude to other media members. After having his question answered, he refused to give up the mic and yanked it away from the staffer proceeding to hijack the press conference...

This isn't type of behavior that gets you sent to the Principals office in elementary school",Death_AllHisFriends,e99skid,conservative
"Jim Acosta... destabilizing international relations between two hostile nuclear powers because he wasn’t let into a meeting. Good job, CNN.",hello_japan,e9as51v,conservative
"Man, fucking white people.",WhollyUnrelated,e99uynn,conservative
"They need some reeducation.


",SinisterPaige,e99vrit,conservative
They did enough damage in the House I thought for Progressives to be mildly pleased. ,Intimidator94,e9a1e6s,conservative
"Choice is only for women making the right ones.  You'd think those June Cleaver rubes in Buttfuck, Arkansas would have learned that by now.",I_am_really_shocked,e9a7mwe,conservative
Not the bee?,aboardthegravyboat,e9aek91,conservative
Sounds like a good way to make sure they vote Trump in 2020. ,soxfan90,e9aj112,conservative
Rilly,RomeoMyHomeo,e9a8lmz,conservative
\*reprogramming you mean,Terra_green2,e9a0idq,conservative
"In camps, if necessary",RomeoMyHomeo,e9a8l8b,conservative
"No, that just encourages to attack them more.  It should increase their votes for the dems.",StraightNewt,e9a2i9v,conservative
"Are you kidding? They hardly made a dent. The out of power party is supposed to do very well in a President's first Midterm. They were predicting a wave and but instead saw ""Progressive"" candidates rejected all over the Midwest and South. They saw *four* Democrat incumbent Senators lose their seats and several others coming close to losing theirs. They could have just as easily lost WV, MT, and MI in addition to the seats they did lose. Their one bright spot in the Senate was the loss of a Republican who is not supportive of Pres. Trump. 

Over in the House of Representatives, they picked up 28 seats and it looks like they might get two more out of the ""too close to call"" races. This does not approach the 1994 or 2010 levels. It is closer to the losses that President Reagan suffered in 1982. 

An honest, intelligent Democrat would have to be terrified by these results and this might explain why they are now putting these nonsensical talking points about ""House Popular Vote"" and even ""Senate Popular Vote"" out through ""Progressive"" media channels. ",BudrickBundy,e9aiwvq,conservative
"> the losses President Reagan took in 1982


You mean 2 years before he came 1,000 votes away from literally sweeping all 50 states in a landslide the likes of which we may never see again?",soxfan90,e9aj4np,conservative
218+ for Democrats in this country is damaging for all time to come. No moderates left and all are going to elect Pelosi Speaker. Then we will see a very dark two years in this country. Frankly I want no part of it. ,Intimidator94,e9amr1w,conservative
"By the modern Democrat party's standards, a lot of the people who were elected *are* ""moderates"". Bernie-style candidates lost in areas outside of the Democrat party's strongholds. There's going to be a crackup. People who have any semblance of morality will flee the Democrat party in droves at some point. I don't think it'll be too soon. Many are more in solidarity based on racial lines, many are poorly informed and/or don't understand basic Civics, many simply believe the media's lies about the GOP being nothing but a bunch of bigots. Despite all of this, there is a reckoning coming. This militantly secular, ~~communist~~ Democrat Socialist, far-left fringe is mostly white. They're taking control of the Democrat party and are destroying their own coalition. I don't like identity politics but this stuff is why it's important to elect folks like [John James](https://johnjamesforsenate.com/) who do not fall into the neat little category that the Democrat party has put them into. I hope he runs for another seat in 2 years and wins. 

This is going to get uglier before it gets any better. Buckle up, kids! ",BudrickBundy,e9an92l,conservative
54% said it is politically motivated on CNN EXIT POLLS. It's gotta be higher than that on other polls.,Scozzar,e99k7vv,conservative
So they elect Democrats to the house to spur more witch hunts?,ultimis,e9a1gfh,conservative
That is such a strong fucking play.,masternarf,e9862zh,conservative
Pelosi stuttering crazy leftist SF nonsense on the news for two years is great for Trump in 2020.,spookyghoststuff,e98am13,conservative
"This is awesome.  

The leaders of the democrat resistance for the next two years will be Pelosi (going senile), Adam Schiff, Maxine Waters, and Elijah Cummings.  How will that group of people come across to the American people?  ",stoffel_bristov,e98f9o8,conservative
“Keep your swamp close and your swamp creatures closer.”,Otto-Carpenter,e98ct10,conservative
That would be spectacularly ironic.,Colonize_The_Moon,e985vnd,conservative
5D chess?,GFZDW,e988pgg,conservative
"Progressive guy here..  trump is being really smart here..  he knows Pelosi is a toxic albatross around the neck of the dem party and giving her more spotlight time will help him in 2020 while he also takes the high ground of being 'gracious and bipartisan'

And the dems will step right into his trap.  Lolz.  ",Dudehitscar,e98k3j2,conservative
Trolling at a very high level!!!   Fucking classic.,GlenGanges,e98nixf,conservative
"Pelosi, the gift that keeps on giving.",SilverHerfer,e98ebuw,conservative
I love how everyone is making this about genius tactics and I get that. However what about the fact he’s promoting a sense of unity among parties? For someone supposedly so “divisive” this is a great message to send. ,Tekshow,e98msv3,conservative
"This is more than Toxic Nancy Pelosi. Many of this fresh House as part of their platforms promised not to vote for Nancy as speaker. There is a crisis in leadership here. Will Nancy be able to force them to vote for her? Probably, she is good at that. But it will be a really bitter pill for them to swallow, breaking that promise on the very first vote they take.

Dems have the same toxic leadership they always have, and now they have power...Pelosi, Waters, Schiff are a fountain of idiocy and tend to add negatives to the party as a whole. Now they are in positions to overstep, and create greater than normal backlash.

Trump's generous gesture of support really sticks it to the left and makes them swallow their promises, and it is business as usual for the DNC",Lepew1,e98ucvr,conservative
i love it.,sylect,e98cgnc,conservative
The old bait and switch lol,squirreltoot,e98ljn7,conservative
Why the hell is Trump endorsing Pelosi?  What am I missing?,ShenandoahValley,e98uwpx,conservative
"Trump, so divisive !!!!11!!! /s",PerceivedShift,e98fbmp,conservative
[2017 Speaker Results](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Speaker_of_the_United_States_House_of_Representatives#Most_recent_election_for_speaker_(2017)),ReaganTroll,e98d9sq,conservative
I love this president's style.,Dogfacedgod88,e98vmm1,conservative
wtf i love trump.,realtsuke,e98wgh4,conservative
"Trump has a rapport with pelosi now that they have worked together. He likes her, y'all overthinking this.",luvasugirls,e98hepe,conservative
She's been given the kiss of death. As if the Democrats are going to pick anyone that Trump thinks should be Speaker. ,johnmrson,e99cnel,conservative
I do not want Pelosi as Speaker.  Get some new blood in there.  I thought he was against the Swamp?,5_yr_lurker,e98aqzx,conservative
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U7liS-WlT6g,Roadsguy,e99fi9d,conservative
Pelosi will keep up the Democrats in the hog pen.,StephenScherer1,e99h52v,conservative
"IF TRUMP SWINGS LEFT, he swings by himself. I would be out. ",chaotic_zx,e99ospa,conservative
"The title of the article and what he actually said don't match. But what the title says is probably the truth though.  I'm a dem, but all the conservatives I know fucking hate her with a passion.  If she's the next speaker it will help Republicans next election.

Edit: the Reddit title matches what he said, but the actual article when you click on it doesn't match what he said.",Roshy76,e99sr9t,conservative
"This takes the Napoleon quote, ""Never interrupt your enemy when he is making a mistake,"" to another level. Not only is Trump not interrupting them but he's helping them out in making that mistake.
",PhilosoGuido,e98bydg,conservative
"He really does know the art of weaponizing pettiness against the pettiest people in America, lol. ",etherealsmog,e9878jw,conservative
"Mark my words, Trump is going to make the democrats look horrible over the next 2 years by making moves like this. They will continue to be petty especially with House control and he will spin it to make them look like idiots the entire way. ",TheEsophagus,e98mvbu,conservative
[deleted],,e98cdl7,conservative
"The old one-two, said aloud it is a cordial conciliatory tone of bi-partisanship, in reality it rallying cry for the far left to lose it shit. ",Racheakt,e98sm37,conservative
POTUS is indeed The Man.,RomeoMyHomeo,e98k2gx,conservative
You think these guys are really going to get to see why we love him over the next 2 years or what? ,AmericanYidGunner,e98cwah,conservative
The Boss always plays Full Contact Tackle 3D Chess.,TheComedianGLP,e99bbrn,conservative
Plus the fact that she's losing it.  She called Trump Bush a half a dozen times after he was elected.,tehForce,e98f2fk,conservative
"Get her on camera calling him ""President Bush"" enough times and maybe they can order a psyche eval on her in order to keep her seat. ",FiveHits,e99fg8g,conservative
"Enough to get Kamala Harris into the White House, in my opinion. The recession will hit prior to 2020 as well.",mkgandkembafan,e98rwrb,conservative
"Especially since Democrats don't believe the ""Hastert Rule""",game46312,e98b2b7,conservative
7D underwater basket weaving,FeelThePorn,e98aduw,conservative
"That's funny, everyone in the media and hollywood keeps telling me how stupid he is...",Reven1911,e98ngb7,conservative
Ain’t that the truth!,Falcon10301,e995enj,conservative
"Yeah, that's fine.

It sells to the feebs I guess.

Nobody who knows what the Democrats are wants unity with them.

I want them to be a scary story we tell our grandchildren.",TheComedianGLP,e99ce44,conservative
Because she is terrible and will lead the Democratic Party to further ruin. ,Ruberis,e98vgoe,conservative
"\+1 for this.  


Just listen to how to talks about her and of her in the news conference this morning. There is no pause, lower volume, stutter or deviation. Thats how you know he's tuned in and genuine.",network_person_zippy,e98mk1l,conservative
"Nobody wants Pelosi as speaker, she's incredibly unlikeable and pure poison for the Democratic Party. Trump wants her to continue to be the face of the Party to strengthen his own hand",Trillamanjaroh,e98aykf,conservative
This is basically throwing a grenade into the middle of the House Democrat Caucus.,DogBeersHadOne,e98bjpj,conservative
Pelosi is a good punching bag and good for Republicans to run against.,ultimis,e98b7l2,conservative
She is great for us dude ,cornshelltortilla,e98hn5b,conservative
"Then stop voting Democrat, which you did according to your post history.",Batterytron,e98blpk,conservative
He's for having this dottering stuttering fool be the face of the democrats for two years.  It isn't hard to understand.,LaLongueCarabine,e98ngzd,conservative
"> I thought he was against the Swamp?

Best way to do that may be to put a spotlight on the slimiest Swamp Monster of them all, Crypt Keeper Pelosi ",Jizzlobber42,e98ca1n,conservative
"In 2008, Republicans had the Tea Party movement sweep into Congress and the division was among them and the ""old guard"" RINO's or simply the neo-Cons. We can see today what the Republican party voter wants, Tea Party minded politicians and those aligned with the President's agenda. 



In 2018, The Democrats didn't have nearly the success of the Tea Party but there is significant division - will be interesting to see how it plays out. Classical liberal and Blue Dog Democrats vs. the DSA and ""progressive"" agenda. ",kavanaugh1,e98glps,conservative
"It is meant to divide the Caucus of democrats even more. There is already a lot of democrats that were voted in going on record that they would not support Pelosi as a speaker, and I think this will irk them even more seeing as Trump is supporting Pelosi. Trump is very clearly pushing the democrat house caucus towards ""civil war""",masternarf,e98cl1a,conservative
All members of the House get to vote on their leader. Members of the majority can even vote for a minority party candidate for majority leader.,SilverHerfer,e98ea7t,conservative
"Yes, but it's normally decided within their caucus before a floor vote. ""Hasket rule"" iirc",fuckthisnewfeature,e98ey4o,conservative
"Just listen to the current press conference, he is on fucking fire.",masternarf,e98k6fe,conservative
"I have a lot of liberal friends, actually most of them are. They're not like reddit libs, we have a laugh at Trump all the time, both at him and with him. 

And at this point they've basically acknowledged that there's no way he's just some dummy who keeps bumbling his way into success. There is SOME method to his madness at least.",gargoyle_mayonnaise,e98lljh,conservative
To he fair she was recycling the talking points,ExpensiveMention,e98hgxs,conservative
"She's showing signs of Alzheimer's and dementia. She's doing a lot of the same things my late grandma did when she had Alzheimer's. Constantly moving or twitching, constantly licking her lips and moving her tongue in her mouth. And to top it off she's been getting more and more senile.",Scozzar,e98neke,conservative
What recession?,unibuckeye,e99c1y0,conservative
"Harris will get the nomination, but I don't see any path to her victory.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e993a7e,conservative
14 dimensional Mongolian horseback riding,JuliusEvolasGhost,e98bocz,conservative
He is dumb..  but obviously the dems are dumber.,Dudehitscar,e98nmk9,conservative
Bingo. Even democrats hate Pelosi.,pseudoghost,e98y6p4,conservative
"The spider, telling soothing bed time stories to the fly.",TheComedianGLP,e99ciaa,conservative
"Each party holds a private vote in caucus to see who they put out to nominate and vote on.  I""m not sure R's would get a chance to pick between candidates.  

Trump's trolling pretty hard here regardless.  The D's are going to have chances to fire back with all their committee investigations.  It's going to be a fun two years.   ",Roez,e98bfz9,conservative
"no one raises money like pelosi, so while she's a hated figure, she's what the DNC needs to raise money for 2020
",sylect,e98cldv,conservative
[removed],,e98eg3n,conservative
Every time man. Shills begone.,shatter321,e98fqk5,conservative
[removed],,e98el6r,conservative
"I hope he shines light on Maxine Waters and Elijah Cummings too. The Dems are rotting so badly, you can't take a step without falling through.",machinerer,e98d0fx,conservative
Most of the classical liberals are Republicans now. The Democrats are infighting between the Clintonites and the European-style Leftists.,sirbonce,e98ia3l,conservative
"In his defense, he doesn't have to push too hard. Dems are happy right now because they have a Win, but soon their in-fighting and party fragmentation is going to start showing. ",LurkerNan,e98zxe1,conservative
Mfw paul ryan is democrat majority speaker,ExpensiveMention,e98hba9,conservative
To add to this the Speaker does not even need to be an elected member of Congress. They could nominate Obama if they wanted.,xKommandant,e98kdm4,conservative
"This is incorrect.  The election of party leaders (majority leader, minority leader, party whips) is handled behind closed doors by the Democratic Caucus and Republican Conference.  

The floor vote comes for the election of Speaker which is a roll call vote on the House floor.  So if Pelosi is elected by the Democratic Caucus as majority leader, she could still lose a floor vote to become Speaker if there is some sort of stalking horse/alternative option presented by the Democrats. ",TBSportsFan1254,e98o07t,conservative
"He just butt-raped that Acosta jackass with a coconut in front of Earth's entire population.

It was gorgeous.",TheComedianGLP,e99brai,conservative
"As a former never trumper (but lifelong conservative) I was forced to admit this maybe 2 months into his presidency. Kind of scary how much the media coverage of POTUS influenced my thinking vs. his actual behavior and statements. 

He’s doing a great job, and even if you don’t think it’s great—he is for sure making things happen. 

Couldn’t believe my eyes, but even The Economist recently admitted Trumps foreign policy has been effective. 

Maybe they’ll continue to wise up if he keeps performing in the face of a hostile House? ",runnernotagunner,e98p3wy,conservative
"If there's one thing I've learned in the last couple years it's that liberals on the internet and liberals in person are two very, very different types of people ",mnslice,e9978yb,conservative
"Some NPC's didn't get the update.  

str.Replace('Bush', 'Trump');",StraightNewt,e98ppuq,conservative
True,asphaltcement123,e98keq8,conservative
"Sh'es getting up there at 78, but let's not underestimate her.

She's fairly brilliant and extremely effective at what she does. She's not someone to be taken lightly.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9937im,conservative
Earth's yellow sun is hard on her people.,TheComedianGLP,e99bzyi,conservative
Someone just needs to turn her off and on again.,non-deterministic,e9a1ivz,conservative
28 Dimensional SpaceTime scrabble ,Guffumbo,e98ki7e,conservative
"If he is dumb and a billionaire, what does that say about you?",r-magnificient,e98v2qa,conservative
"Story of American politics. 

It's good being a libertarian.",mkgandkembafan,e98rreq,conservative
"In my mind, two years of contrived scandals and media hysteria is a small price to pay for two years of continuous, uninterrupted, judicial and cabinet appointments. I'm extremely happy with last nights results ",Trillamanjaroh,e98bln7,conservative
"Like how Democrats tried to destroy a man by labeling him a sex offender for no other reason than the fact that they didn't have the votes to stop his appointment? 

No.  There's pain that needs to be inflicted. ",DevonWeeks,e98fr1c,conservative
Making democrats look like who they really are DOES help the American people.,LordButtscratch,e98fo2r,conservative
"Dekocrats are racist fearmongering fascists who have admitted to hating america

There policies are designed to help the rich wjile screwing the poor",ExpensiveMention,e98i0m9,conservative
"The US left is moving towards European leftwing economics and the European left is moving towards US leftwing identity politics.             

 ",tau_decay,e98ur9v,conservative
"It's big government socialists vs. Maoist Communists thristy for purge blood.

Godzilla vs Rodan. 

May they wipe each other out with 100% casualties on both sides.",TheComedianGLP,e99bgas,conservative
I think the gop losing the house is better for the gop than the left. Left has to actually follow through with promises. 2020 looks much better this way.,KitsapDad,e992wdd,conservative
Yakety sax starts playing.,rf-engineer,e98jn4d,conservative
"Lmao I would laugh so hard, just because of the ""are you fucking kidding me, I just want to go home"" reaction that Ryan would have",mnslice,e996rzu,conservative
I mean his utter failure to do anything particularly useful makes that statement more true than we might like.,anuser999,e98q2mv,conservative
>tfw we wake up tomorrow to newly elected Speaker of the House Steve Bannon,JuliusEvolasGhost,e992ml5,conservative
That's an interesting thought.,Reven1911,e98n9ak,conservative
So they could technically nominate me.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e992pnq,conservative
"I think what he's saying is that if Pelosi goes to the floor and looks like she's going to lose as speaker, then Republicans could theoretically put her over the top.

Which wouldn't happen in practice since, as you said, Dems would confer among themselves first and wouldn't nominate someone who couldn't get enough Dems on board to carry the floor vote themselves.",RoundSimbacca,e99jq3d,conservative
"Trump is brilliant, but not in the traditional sense.

In a way he reminds me of a shark. He doesn't overthink things, he just goes on sheer instinct. And it works.

Sharks don't think about eating that license plate floating in the water- the just fucking do it.

They also didn't plan for surviving 400 million years and being one of the greatest predators in this planet's existence- they just fucking did it.

You can try and play Scrabble with a shark, and you would most likely win. You would think you've outsmarted the shark. 

But then the shark eats you.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e992xzh,conservative
"do {

blurt();

wait(5);

} while (camera == ON);

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e99byh4,conservative
"I agree that we shouldn't underestimate her, but you have to admit that her mental health doesn't look so good.",RoundSimbacca,e99jw9a,conservative
Rock Paper Scissors Lizard Spock,Dmfconrad,e98l9ge,conservative
46 Dimensional sumo wrestling. ,Themusician67,e98lcdz,conservative
64D Kerbal Space Program,right_mind_mechanic,e99osor,conservative
Geez.. lighten up.,Dudehitscar,e98vby8,conservative
"I don’t agree that he’s dumb, but money is an incredibly bad measurement of intelligence. ",_manoftheyear_,e9ai5yr,conservative
"Sure, as long as you're happy making absolutely no difference to anything, ever.",TheComedianGLP,e99c9q0,conservative
We still get the judicial and cabinet appts too!,unibuckeye,e99c9d5,conservative
"Did not agree with that (I thought they should have confirmed him).  It was a sad political circus. Also did not agree when senate republicans prevented a President's nomination from seeing the light of day (especially one previously endorsed by Senator Hatch).  Either way, there is no need to be petty like a teenager.  Again, this is what is wrong with America, instead of helping each other, we would rather hurt each other.  I thought this frame of mind was reserved for r/politics but I guess r/conservative has the same mentality.  ",5_yr_lurker,e98gth4,conservative
How?,5_yr_lurker,e98gts7,conservative
So basically Economic and Cultural Marxism.,sirbonce,e98utoj,conservative
And we're all moving towards war. ,ConsistentlyRight,e98zvks,conservative
"Sadly this is true. Democrats increasingly have more respect for the European system than the American system -- one of the many reasons I soundly refuse to vote for Democrats unless absolutely necessary.

We are Americans, not Europeans.",asphaltcement123,e98xsoi,conservative
Fact.,TheComedianGLP,e99bl9k,conservative
**Jump cut to fast forwarded CNET cameras**,Galax-e,e98ocev,conservative
I disagree- he actually kept the House GOP under tighter control and didn't allow the caucus to split as much as it did under Boehner. ,RoundSimbacca,e99jllx,conservative
You will be more effective too,Isredditreal2009,e993rbu,conservative
"And they should, you big lib. ^^^^^/s",skarface6,e995e0o,conservative
[deleted],,e99tqyj,conservative
2112 Overture.,RoyTheReaper91,e98ngm0,conservative
1 dimensional snake wrangling ,Zac1245,e992hpz,conservative
"I agree with you there. I disagree with you that he is dumb. Won’t proclaim him a genius. I just think he knows exactly what he is doing most of the time and doesn’t care too much what everybody else thinks. It’s worked for him all his life and he’s the president of The US. So apparently he can’t be too dumb... 

That’s just my thought process but I don’t think you should’ve been replied to like that. ",JdPat04,e99bsd3,conservative
"It's a fair question.

We're all sick and tired of sub-normal IQ nobodies assuring us that the most successful man alive is a moron, all from the comfort of their 11 year old Audis with Starbucks cups covering the floor on their way to trauma counciling for their idiot kid who burst into tears when they ran out of participation trophies.",TheComedianGLP,e99c893,conservative
"It's not ""petty like a teenager"" for punishing people who tried to destroy a man's life and ruin his family.  Republicans had **the votes** to prevent Obama's nominee from coming to the floor.  That's how our government works.  They didn't slander the man or drag his family through hell.  Democrats did that, and they deserve to be punished.  Brutally.  

If you equate not voting for or debating on a nominee with falsely labeling a man a pedophile, you need to get the fuck out ",DevonWeeks,e98hhu0,conservative
"This is a rational thought, I can appreciate that.  I think the problem lies in that we are completely divided as a nation in ideology.  If the democrats all willing to work with us to pass infrastructure, cut social programs or at least reform them, then maybe we can have an open and honest discussion.  But right now, one party wants socialized medicine, the other would like to let the free market dictate the costs.  So how do you negotiate health care when one side thinks it is a right and the other doesn't.",IvankasFutureHusband,e98hjhy,conservative
Because their policies are bad...? ,latotokyo123,e98hg5b,conservative
Dark times mate. ,spongish,e990t93,conservative
"God I hate talking to people online anymore because they constantly spout stupid BS about how shit our country is compared to Europe. If any of it was remotely true it'd be one thing but it's always a pack of lies. Like how waitstaff supposedly make more in the EU making minimum wage when waitstaff in the US actually make far more with tips (but tips are bad, how dare we not pay these people a living wage????). ",DraconianDebate,e991285,conservative
"From just today, judge throws out a Democrat gerrymandering plan: https://www.politico.com/story/2018/11/07/federal-judges-toss-maryland-congressional-map-for-partisan-gerrymandering-973245      

What are the odds - but along with jerrymandering, the Dems also have IDless illegal alien voting and general voter fraud, because they tend to own the cities.                  ",tau_decay,e99bsqr,conservative
"Yeah but people were saying that about Trump three and a half years ago. At this point, after this much time, we can safely say that's just the way he is.

And honestly while his transcripts are hilarious, it really does sound much better out loud.",LargeishAntelope,e99v2zd,conservative
0 dimensional connect 4 ,Themusician67,e996f9l,conservative
"Thanks.  Yeah for the most part anyone who hits the Senate and presidency is a high functioning individual in general and Trump is no exception.  But make enough decisions that are counterproductive to your own goals and you get to wear the dumb title in casual friendly conversation on reddit from me..    but it's in good fun.  



",Dudehitscar,e99dfhh,conservative
That is an oddly specific caricature... but hilarious.  Have an upvote.,Dudehitscar,e99ezeq,conservative
">right now, one party wants socialized medicine, the other would like to let the free market dictate the costs. So how do you negotiate health care when one side thinks it is a right and the other doesn't.

This is a good question and not sure one I have an answer for.  I should disclose (to a disappointment around here) that I am a huge proponent of socialized healthcare. No I do not have the answer on how to implement it, but I believe it is a basic right for everybody.

&nbsp;

That aside, I think democrats should negotiate on immigration.  What is wrong with immigrants coming to this country legally? Seems like the wrong battle to pick.  Another area to avoid id the 2nd amendment (hear about it a lot if Florida). I do not think the democrats should try to limit gun rights.  There is no way Americans are going to part with there guns, nor should they.",5_yr_lurker,e98jd67,conservative
Because they’re bad,rwwman50,e98i0jl,conservative
"So if Pelosi sounds the same in two years, regardless of how nuts she sounds , she is good?",Neglected_Martian,e99vac8,conservative
Cricket,johnsonman1,e999kkh,conservative
"Ditto.

And sorry about dragging your kid into it.

;)",TheComedianGLP,e99h263,conservative
"Appreciate the answer, not sure why the hostility towards you, you seem reasonable.  The biggest problem with socialized medicine (i am on the opposite spectrum) is that I don't believe any service can be deemed a right.  You do not have the right to force a doctor to provide care for you.  

However I do think doctors should practice more of the oath they take (if they take one), this would be in providing charitable work to those that can't afford it.  I think this would be a better way to circumvent socialized medicine.",IvankasFutureHusband,e98kb25,conservative
"Saying you have a right to someone else's labor is tantamount to slavery, though.  You have a right to speak, but no one is required to do anything for you to exercise that right.  They simply let you speak and speak in response.  No one loses any of their liberties because of your right.  

You have right to bear arms.  Doing so lawfully doesn't deprive anyone else of their liberties. 

You have a right to vote.  You voting deprived no one of their liberties... unless of course you're voting on a platform which does in fact intend to deprive people of their liberties. 

To say you have a right to healthcare is to say all medical professionals are slaves.  You declare ownership of their labor.  They lose a degree of liberty.  And that is in and of itself immoral.  

That said, yes, healthcare is an issue that needs to be addressed in this country.  But socialism is an immoral, lazy, inefficient, thoughtless, destructive way to go about it.  ",DevonWeeks,e998uuq,conservative
"You seem reasonable and to have an open mind so I'm going to take a crack at it:

You can't have a ""right"" to something that must be provided for you. You do have a right to not be aggressor against or to not be stolen from. But how can you possibly have a right to someone else's services? That implies slavery. Not only that, not sure where exactly the money for it is going to come from. Governments 20 trillion dollars in debt should not be doubling the deficit. ",mkgandkembafan,e98sf9k,conservative
"In terms of something medically being wrong with her? Yeah, I'm not a doctor obviously but I'd say she's probably good.",LargeishAntelope,e99vfoo,conservative
Lol!   That was my fav part!,Dudehitscar,e99hb0l,conservative
"> doctors should practice more of the oath they take (if they take one), this would be in providing charitable work to those that can't afford it

Physicians only amount to approximately [20% of healthcare cost](https://www.cms.gov/Research-Statistics-Data-and-Systems/Statistics-Trends-and-Reports/NationalHealthExpendData/downloads/highlights.pdf) so not sure how these patients would be able to afford the other 80% of their bill. But reducing physician pay could be a way to potentially help lower cost.",5_yr_lurker,e98kyr2,conservative
"I'm curious as to why the other 80% is so bloated. It's no secret that hospitals overcharge the bill to the insurance companies because the insurance companies negotiate it down. 

It's not the doctors that are not practicing their oath, it's that the people that charge the other 80% of the medical bill do not have one and maybe that should change instead. Then healthcare might be fair and cheap.",thepeoplesgreek,e98nmwh,conservative
It's due to Obama Care  and all the other regulations that push up the price. ,mkgandkembafan,e98s93u,conservative
"Um, weren't they just preaching civility last week?! ",MaddSim,e99n5du,conservative
"Are they actually going to try some kind of civil disobedience uprising nonsense? 

This will only get people hurt,killed, and otherwise in jail",Manchurainprez,e99m876,conservative
"Civility out the window, and apparently the president can't exercise any powers if a republican.",BeachCruisin22,e99nrv6,conservative
This is also where the “she persisted” meme came from. It was chief Liz who stood on the senate floor and basically called Sessions a racist. ,justhere2havefun,e99sah0,conservative
When does this stop being news and starts being an incitement to violence?,Terra_green2,e9a13jf,conservative
So the media is now calling for riots.Okay then,Enzo_SAWFT,e99pjn9,conservative
"So long as ONLY LEFTISTS come to harm in THEIR JIHAD it's a win for all of us..... they can claim their victimhood with paroxysms of joy and WE can be rid of them for a period of time.

No sympathy for these protesters, paid NPC's without a clue ",MarvinsBoy,e99pcq7,conservative
"Resigned ""at the request of President Trump."" He was fired. ",jkruisb2,e98uy6p,conservative
How can anyone watch the new season of House of Cards when reality is so much more dramatic,art36,e98uwob,conservative
"Two Sessions gone within 24 hours.

RIP Pete and Jeff Sessions

Now make marijuana legal nationwide.",zThief,e98ux91,conservative
Good. Let's get someone competent in there,ecfreeman,e98un8z,conservative
SEE YA!,MaddSim,e98uqcv,conservative
[deleted],,e99l0oe,conservative
r/politics is in meltdown. again.,Madstork1981,e98v3k7,conservative
And now the fun begins ,Refresher,e98uma7,conservative
I can’t believe it actually happened,art36,e98uxpt,conservative
About fucking time.  He literally did nothing the entire time he held that position lmao,Mormonster,e98ws0r,conservative
Time to legalize the Weed Nation wide?,ozric101,e98uvcb,conservative
Hopefully we can get someone a little less strict on drugs as a replacement. ,BFunPhoto,e98uy1f,conservative
What’s the over/under on him trying to reclaim his senate seat?,Rabidraccoon76,e98uygi,conservative
"Sessions was so bad as AG, I am not sure that I want him to go back to Alabama and lay a whippin on Doug Jones in their next scheduled senate race.  ",stoffel_bristov,e993zza,conservative
Who would be a good replacement?,AyyyGreens,e98uvya,conservative
"My money’s on Pam Bondi. Trump likes her, she looks like a Trump pick, and she’ll be looking for a job. ",YankeeBlues21,e98v5yf,conservative
Good maybe we can get sanity to asset forfeiture and medical marijuana.,Zanios74,e990vtr,conservative
"Okay.  First post here.  (I've lurk posted in some of the other right wing subs, but there are too many lunatics shifting around as Reddit keeps censoring things).

Finally.  This guy was not good, and he was the single biggest mistake Trump made. I don't know how this will all end up, but I feel way better now than I did this morning.",SickofInternetProgs,e99o2t4,conservative
"Man seems like only yesterday we were discussing the midterms. 

Next Cycle!",memberCP,e98v8fx,conservative
"We were pissed when Eric Holder was Obama’s wing man, but now the Trump wing of the party is upset Sessions *wasnt* Trump’s wing man? Give me a break, stop being hypocrites. 

You know Sessions did a great job as AG because Dems and Reps are both upset he refused to be a partisan hack. Sessions brought dignity back to the position, and apparently my fellow Conservatives have lost sight of that fact. ",weeaboo_swordsman,e996c81,conservative
"Remember when Dems drug him through the mud during the confirmation process despite being friends with him in the Senate beforehand?  Remember how disgusting it was at the time?

I'm guessing they will only be worse with his replacement judging by the embarrassment of the Kavanaugh proceedings ",Mormonster,e98yg4g,conservative
"Honestly, Jeff Sessions was just about the only thing that gave Trump legitimacy in his presidential primaries.  Despite the frothing Trump fans who disliked Sessions because Trump said so, I'm sad to see him go.  I've always really liked him. ",Speedking2281,e98ve0r,conservative
I am a-ok with this.,workaccount35,e98v1ak,conservative
Please Trey Gowdy,stoffel_bristov,e993wvh,conservative
The real question is “Why now?”,art36,e98w7on,conservative
"They ruined that show by killing Spacey. 


I know what he did and it really really sucks that it seems like the best actors are shit people. 


They should have ended the show with his death. ",Themusician67,e991jgq,conservative
Legalizing marijuana nationwide under Trump’s watch would be his “Bin Laden-Obama” moment and pretty much guarantee his re-election,art36,e98v3r0,conservative
"Don’t think they’ll legalize it, but atleast decriminalize it and let the states decide. ",JdPat04,e99cf8o,conservative
"And maybe somebody a little less enthusiastic for the most unconstitutional law on the books today: civil forfeiture.

Whenever I hear civil forfeiture described, it's like something out of 14th century, monarchical France.",nited_states,e98vp31,conservative
"What, that spot wasn't vacant for 2 years?  Weird, it sure seemed like it was.",flippy76,e99bqqj,conservative
"What a disaster as AG.  Recused himself from the most damaging witch hunt the bureaucracy has attempted in quite some time, then cost us a safe Senate seat to top it off.
",nited_states,e98vdyv,conservative
"No. Sessions was useless, this means we get one who can actually do his job.",HonorMyBeetus,e9aqn01,conservative
"God I wish I could post in there more than once every ten minutes. But, you know, censorship and echo chambers and safe spaces and all that.",mnslice,e98xczs,conservative
"Again?  It's like Chernobyl in there 24/7.  The only thing missing is virtual ""The World Is Going To End"" sandwich boards.",mlmack,e98zzsn,conservative
And the law enforcement also begins. ,NCSUGrad2012,e98vi23,conservative
He did less than nothing. He allowed all the Obama holdovers and entrenched leftist bureaucrats run the place while he cowered in his office. The guy was a total coward who was completely out of his league.,PhilosoGuido,e99d0gb,conservative
"YES!

That is exactly the kind of thing this administration should be doing. It's an easy bi-partisain issue, and at least medicinal is in more than 1/2 the states and recreational is in a dozen or so now.

Embrace the libertarians a bit. It also takes money out of the cartel's pocket and puts it in our tax coffers.",Gnome_Sane,e993nqc,conservative
If the US legalized weed it would hit the South American drug cartels pretty hard. ,ozric101,e98vjcu,conservative
"I hope he does.  Would do much more good for the nation there.
",nited_states,e98vwd3,conservative
"After his abysmal performance, I doubt he could get elected there again. Maybe people will forget in a few years. I would like to see Mo Brooks in there.",PhilosoGuido,e99d4qt,conservative
"He already said he's interested in it.  He'd win easy.  But really, any Republican with half a reputation and a political pulse will win that seat back.",SickofInternetProgs,e99ozh6,conservative
Jason Chaffetz or Trey Gowdy?,ilyellow,e98vtxo,conservative
"Somebody with the balls to go after the shadow third political party, the American intelligence community. 
",nited_states,e98vuga,conservative
Lindsey Graham for AG and the Nikki Haley for SC Senator is my dream,ImagineAllTheKarma,e98v03c,conservative
Adam Laxalt is a possibility now that he's out of a job,Marko_Ramius1,e98wp9y,conservative
"Is she pro-marijuana legalization, or at least kicking it back to the states?",sanjoseboardgamer,e997pqq,conservative
"The AG doesn't need to be the President's hitman, but when he is so utterly paralyzed and incompetent that he allows the DOJ to continue functioning as the **previous** President's hit squad, that's a huge problem.

> You know Sessions did a great job as AG because Dems and Reps are both upset  

Democrats were not upset at Sessions. They opposed his confirmation, but once they saw what a feckless coward he was that they could bully around, they loved him.",PhilosoGuido,e99dpig,conservative
His launching the Mueller investigation and then recusing oversight to a political hack is unforgivable.,alivmo,e998n17,conservative
"I like him, too, but I think he might have been a good example of the [Peter Principle](https://www.investopedia.com/terms/p/peter-principle.asp)

 ",nited_states,e98wgmd,conservative
He literally did nothing the entire time he was AG lmao,Mormonster,e98x6tp,conservative
"AG is picked after the election, and sessions was nominated by Trump in November 2016.

So idk what you mean.

",gster50,e98vpho,conservative
Because he has the Senate seats to get anyone he wants to be confirmed as AG,ilyellow,e98wf40,conservative
Probably because he wants an AG who will actually do his job since the Dems are going to be doing all sorts of BS investigations,Mormonster,e98wuec,conservative
"Because if the Dems won both houses and Trump fires Sessions they’d immediately use it as an excuse to impeach him.

Granted, they would have tried anyway, but firing Sessions would have actually given them some real ammo",HuluForCthulhu,e9alosh,conservative
"No electoral repercussions. The General is two years away. Mueller is finally getting a leash. People are going to prison right and left, and nobody can quite figure out *why*. He's just ruining lives to get any little thing he can to remove Trump, but the election just made it way harder to impeach and/or stop Trump from killing the investigation (which I'm perfectly fine with).",SickofInternetProgs,e99ofjb,conservative
His public demise was a perfectly poetic foil to his character of Frank Underwood. ,art36,e991m80,conservative
So in 2020?,Rabidraccoon76,e98yd57,conservative
"He should in no way legalize it nationwide, the fed doesn't have that authority.  What should be done is officially recognizing states rights to legalize it, and have no federal interference.",alivmo,e998j4b,conservative
"If we still had an activist Supreme Court, they would just declare that smoking marijuanna as a constitutional right protected by the founders (jefferson was a smoker after all, right). 

Think this is absurd?  Well abortion has about as much constitutional basis as smoking marijuanna (none).   ",stoffel_bristov,e994aqf,conservative
"Also maybe someone not so eager to die on the marijuana hill.  
  
Edit: forgot to make the statement negative",diehardgiraffe,e98xj26,conservative
"It seems like abolishing civil asset forfeiture is something both parties could get behind.
In reality, since it helps line the pockets of government officials, it something both party officials love.",Rabidraccoon76,e98y9od,conservative
"On the plus side, Trump should now easily replace him with nearly anyone he wants since we have a stronger Senate now. ",MaddSim,e98vun7,conservative
"Do you think Dems will support a bipartisan bill or stick with resist?

Edit: hello Chinese bots ",i_floop_the_pig,e993z59,conservative
Most of their income comes from human trafficking and slavery these days.,JMB_was_a_god,e992jx9,conservative
"Or they'd just double down on opioids, which are among the most addictive substances on earth.  Or human trafficking.

Regardless of one's stance on weed (I don't care about it one way or the other), I've always found that claims about the benefits of its legalization are typically too optimistic.  Ending alcohol prohibition didn't kill the mafia, either.

These people are sociopathic monsters from lawless lands.  They will find a way to thrive.
",nited_states,e98w5lg,conservative
"It will not be Trey, he was far to wishy washy on the entire Russia Scam. ",ozric101,e98wcv2,conservative
"Lindsey 2.0 could be an act, we could have an Alabama repeat and senators maybe atrophy their executive skills and can't run a huge organization which mostly loathes them.                              ",tau_decay,e98wstj,conservative
"When she was first elected in 2010, she was anti-marijuana entirely. By 2014, she’d come around to supporting it for medicinal purposes. Personally, I don’t think she cares either way. 

The state is clearly trending toward legalizing. Last night, the closest executive branch race in the state was for Agriculture Secretary, which is still in recounts. The Republican, Matt Caldwell, will almost certainly finish off the GOP sweep, but it’s telling that the most successful member of the Dem ticket wasnt Andrew Gillum, but Nikki Fried, whose primary assets were basically being attractive and *very* pro-legal weed. 

I’d expect Bondi, should she be the pick, to avoid pursuing states that have legalized it mostly out of apathy and political savvy (just like her position evolved earlier). ",YankeeBlues21,e998kqo,conservative
">but when he is so utterly paralyzed and incompetent that he allows the DOJ to continue functioning as the previous President's hit squad, that's a huge problem.

That literally hasn't happened and you're making that up. The DOJ has acted *impartial* which is a far cry from the DOJ abuses of the Obama Administration. But now, since it's Trump, the Trump Wing of the Republican party wanted Sessions to be the President's hatchet man. That's unacceptable.

>They opposed his confirmation, but once they saw what a feckless coward he was that they could bully around, they loved him.

You missed the point. The Trump Wing is upset because Sessions wasn't Trump's hatchet man, Dems are upset because Sessions didn't ""resist"" Trump like they wanted. When both sides are upset, that's generally a good thing; but unfortunately Sessions is now gone, so perhaps Trump will get the hatchet man that his base wants.",weeaboo_swordsman,e9agzot,conservative
">His launching the Mueller investigation

Sessions did not get Trump into this mess, *Trump did*. Never forget that fact, because it's a common theme in this presidency. It was Trump idiotically running to social media to warn Comey that he better not have ""tapes"" of their conversations that this whole shit show started. The Mueller investigation was a necessity due to the Trump Administration's ties with Russian assets.

Before you start freaking out about ""fake news"", keep in mind that I believe Trump is *innocent of the collusion charges*; but it's something that -- regardless -- has to be investigated. The Obama Administration had multiple scandals of people who *should have been investigated* by the DOJ but weren't. So now you're telling me you want Trump to get the Obama treatment? To direct his DOJ not to pursue investigations out of political motivation?

Stop being a hypocrite. On /r/Conservative we have *principles* and Trump hackery is similarly unforgivable.",weeaboo_swordsman,e9ahb5e,conservative
Sessions was the first Senator to endorse Trump.,mnslice,e98xgl9,conservative
"Oh sorry, I was speaking about Sessions' endorsement during the primaries.  ",Speedking2281,e98xnng,conservative
I’m also inclined to think he wants someone who will push back against the House Democrats ,art36,e98wx0c,conservative
He was waiting til after midterms,ExpensiveMention,e990mlr,conservative
"Deserving for a scum character and a scum person as far as Im concerned. 


His wife just doesn't do it for me. Their dynamic was perfect. ",Themusician67,e996b5m,conservative
Well. Obviously the feds can’t legalize it nationwide. But they can absolutely change the federal status. ,KhabibHeelTurn,e998zrp,conservative
"Clarence Thomas:

>""Respondents Diane Monson and Angel Raich use marijuana that has never  been bought or sold, that has never crossed state lines, and that has  had no demonstrable effect on the national market for marijuana. If  Congress can regulate this under the Commerce Clause, then it can  regulate virtually anything—and the Federal Government is no longer one  of limited and enumerated powers.""

You don't need to be an activist judge to see that the wholesale Federal criminalization of marijuana is unconstitutional.",Tu-ne-cede,e99cmb7,conservative
"It’s the devil’s lettuce!!!

/s",Rabidraccoon76,e98yaz6,conservative
Maybe someone willing to look at all the different drug laws and categorizations since the past policies have worked *so well*.,sanjoseboardgamer,e997lpb,conservative
"For real. The writing is on the wall. 

Cmon Feds. This is silly. Make it so it’s not a Scheduke 1 first of all and ramp down the crimes to cover manufacturing and possession of mass quantities only. ",KhabibHeelTurn,e998x70,conservative
"With weed, it would actually work because they have the ""We support weed"" cred with their voter base (Even though they don't any more than republicans)... and they wouldn't be able to say no without backlash in their own constituency... Another great reason for a YES!

And in general, I've blacked out on booze, gotten in fights on booze, definately hooked up with ugly people on booze... obviously puked my brains out on booze... and never had that happen with weed - unless I mixed it with booze!

It's just time, and the GOP may as well lead the way instead of following the Democrats on it.",Gnome_Sane,e994cfp,conservative
"This.  Legalizing weed never brought the anti-crime benefits to the states where it was introduced. I'm okay with legalization to reduce costs, but users are generally.... *under-performers*. My cousin died of a heroin overdose.  Heroin only became big because they legalized it under a different form. People don't ""try"" heroin.  It takes over their lives, and is extremely dangerous.",SickofInternetProgs,e99orkf,conservative
"Marijuana should at least be legal medically, at the very least. It is proven to help with seizures, among many other things.",zThief,e98wbw4,conservative
Yes but if pot is legal less people would do the harder stuff... ,Sinsilenc,e99903s,conservative
"Agreed. Gowdy is all talk, no action. Find a ruthless pitbull state AG",PhilosoGuido,e99dehx,conservative
"Actually, that's exactly what happened. You are too biased to see it as evidenced by your absurd rant here completely devoid of substantiation, along with plenty other comments in your post history. The DOJ has not acted impartially in the least. The Mueller investigation has been a partisan leftist shitshow, from the loading of his staff with obviously biased Democrats, to Mueller's conflict of interest relationship with Comey, to Rosenstein's utter lack of oversight, to his broad sweeping mandate that violates the Appointments clause of the Constitution, to Rosenstein's obstruction and slow rolling of Congressional oversight, to his own conflicts of interest in recommending Comey's firing yet supervising the investigation of that same firing, to his veiled threats against Congressional investigators, to his signing a FISA warrant on an American citizen based on a known phony Clinton campaign dossier. Sell your concern trolling somewhere else. 

> You missed the point. The Trump Wing is upset because Sessions wasn't Trump's hatchet man

Bullshit. They are upset about the examples above and many more. The DOJ is still acting as Obama's hit squad. Either you're too blind or you like it because you don't like Trump.

> Dems are upset because Sessions didn't ""resist"" Trump like they wanted.

Another absurd fantasy. Once they saw they could get Sessions to recuse himself on the most specious grounds and cower in his office while Rosenstein ran the show, they were plenty happy. You rarely heard a ill word about him from the left after his confirmation. ",PhilosoGuido,e9b0vop,conservative
"Oh I know Trumps mouth was the start.  But ultimately it was Sessions that bent over, then recused himself while putting a bunch of anti-Trump political hacks in charge.  The investigation should have been a bipartisan commission, not a witch hunt.",alivmo,e9b2esp,conservative
"I lost interest when her character became Secretary of State (right?). It was completely out-of-character for how they had built her up earlier in the series, completely jeopardizing everything for her own personal gain.",art36,e996xzi,conservative
"you are right.  The 10th amendment has been rendered meaningless by the courts.  It is something that needs to change.  Unfortunately, Kavanaugh for one is not one for limiting the federal government and actually enforcing the 10th amendment.  He wasn't my first choice for a supreme court justice.  ",stoffel_bristov,e99d34f,conservative
"https://www.denverpost.com/2018/04/04/colorado-drug-overdoses-opioid-deaths-hit-high/

I understand the logic behind what you're saying, but reality hasn't seemed to bear it out yet.

My gut sense is that the people using weed (and alcohol) are probably totally different than those abusing hard drugs and narcotics.  This is why legalizing weed doesn't really do much to get hard drugs abuse under control.

EDIT: Here is another source of the worsening opioid epidemic  from Canada, where weed was only recently legalized.  However, it has been very loosely prosecuted for the past couple years as the latest government signalled  it would be legalizing as part of their election platform.  https://www.canada.ca/en/health-canada/services/substance-use/problematic-prescription-drug-use/opioids/apparent-opioid-related-deaths.html",nited_states,e99a25z,conservative
"Stack the courts.  There are still so many vacant seats on the circuit courts.  No obstruction will stop them now.

53-54 Senate seats (depending on Arizona) plus no Flake, Corker, or McCain means no chance of flip-floppers killing us.

Murkowski and Collins are neutralized even if they defect.  Squishy Romney should play ball on judges.",nited_states,e98uaod,conservative
"Best political nickname out there IMO. Judges will be his legacy, and he knows it. ",the-G-Man,e994mpa,conservative
I've only recently started paying attention to politics - are there more Supreme Court positions opening or is it for lower courts?,soidontseedumbstuff,e99e2b5,conservative
This could be the one thing that saves the country long term. Dems can pass all the bullshit laws they want and they'll get struck down in the courts for at least 30 more years.,Leg0z,e99h879,conservative
I love that we're still calling him Cocaine Mitch. 🐢,soxfan90,e99fmhw,conservative
"What a legend. Go get 'em, Mitch!",Maswasnos,e98rjmo,conservative
Lisa Murkowski--- We don't need your fucking vote anymore.  Fuck off and become a dem already.  ,stoffel_bristov,e98ve9f,conservative
"He's come to chew bubblegum and confirm judges, and he's all out of bubblegum.",DH5650,e99l84b,conservative
My man.,R-M-Renfield,e98txx9,conservative
[deleted],,e99r4nv,conservative
"Sounds good to me. Depopulate the Federalist Society lists by nominating them all for those seats. 
",skarface6,e9944zv,conservative
"Please dear god, start filling the 9th up to balance it out...that or break up the 9th.",RampantAndroid,e9cj8a5,conservative
Just lower courts. But SCOTUS openings can happen at any time.,1wjl1,e99f405,conservative
"I could say the same to Susan Collins, but I'm just glad Flake is out.",superdude411,e99j1te,conservative
Gonna need a second Federalist Society then...,RoundSimbacca,e99hv1b,conservative
"RBG can't last forever. Thomas isn't going to be there forever either. If I were in a position to do so, I would strongly urge Thomas to step down next year, and have Trump appoint another young(er) originalist to the court.",unibuckeye,e99haem,conservative
That was a nice seat we picked up.,blunt_person,e9b3sv4,conservative
Subscribe ,skarface6,e99k0nn,conservative
"It's a gamble to be sure. Thomas is only 70, if Trump loses re-election but we retake the chamber in 2028 for instance he would be 80 and it would be a great time to retire. I don't want to set a precedent that every judge decides to retire as soon as an ideologically similar president takes office.",1wjl1,e99hhhg,conservative
"It would hardly be a precedent. Kennedy stepped down when he did because he wanted to retire under a Republican President, as it was a Republican who nominated him in the first place. 80 though is high, and depends on a *lot* of variables that cannot be guaranteed. The GOP has the White House and the Senate until early 2021, it is high time they started acting like they know what they are doing.",unibuckeye,e99jj7j,conservative
"Thomas is a 70 year old African American.  Life expectancy stats are not on his side.  

If he was thinking in the best interests of the conservative movement he would step down immediately.",Vulgrr_Display,e99tvbq,conservative
"It's not uncommon at all.

Sometimes Justices will take politics into account when they step down. Other times, they want to hang in there on to the bitter end.",RoundSimbacca,e99k75l,conservative
Need more butter sauce. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e99ejwq,conservative
Hahahahaha this made my day,TravisKrooks,e998plu,conservative
Yes 🅱️et🅾️ is gone,JimmyElectron9114,e99c91g,conservative
"Damn how high are you, man? 

See, this is why we needed Jeff Sessions - to stave off the reefer madness",GorathThorgath,e99lm6z,conservative
"Good, Betophiles are disgusting deviants.",Vulgrr_Display,e99uaq3,conservative
"DREAMS with Radon Randell...
r/politics thinks he can run against trump in 2020",googleitup,e99806j,conservative
LMAO I love this ,littlebit90_,e9adxf1,conservative
"Maybe he should have used a stronger Mexican name than Beto.  


Like Lucha Libre.",markcocjin,e9af5sa,conservative
Next 👏 Meme 👏,TruthfulTrolling,e9aun7w,conservative
"""and is a trainer in neurolinguistic programming."" raises some flags.https://vigilantcitizen.com/vigilantreport/nxivm-powerful-cult-turns-rich-women-mind-controlled-slaves/

He also referred to himself as a ""young god"". He's some sort of narcissistic creep it sounds like.",MisterMouser,e9c2zeq,conservative
TLDR: Nobody won,Delta_25,e99rksh,conservative
They’re not done counting votes ,Unstoppable316,e99ye0q,conservative
It was just so average. Kinda feels weird,i_floop_the_pig,e9acqu0,conservative
"In the guesses, several people had the senate makeup as R 54, D 44, and 2 Independents (sanders and King) **which is exactly what the results will be**. Can't understand how you say that no one got the senate.   ",stoffel_bristov,e9b0zcs,conservative
In that case I think that I should be declared the winner for [being the funniest.](https://www.reddit.com/r/conservative/comments/9boa8v/_/e54ts3e),-rabid-,e99utrv,conservative
"r/Conservative won... just think of all the money we saved not having to create and distribute special flair!

Now we can take all that money and finally get that shag carpet installed in our secret underground Russian bunker server room!",chabanais,e99rvb7,conservative
If anything changes we'll let you know.,chabanais,e99yn7b,conservative
Wanna feel weird?  Take 4 fiber pills. ,chabanais,e9aheno,conservative
I looked on CNN maybe that's my problem.  I'll look at it again later.,chabanais,e9b3yng,conservative
Be careful what you wish for...,chabanais,e99wxm8,conservative
Shag carpet I thought we were going for tile.,Delta_25,e99vbt2,conservative
"How do I add a flair
",JustVoicingMyOpinion,e99sgsv,conservative
"Carpet in a sever room is a horrible idea. You want to keep the whole room as dust free as possible. Tile or wood floors if you want to be fancy, is better, as they're easier to clean. Carpet attracts dust like crazy!",Cr8er,e9aees2,conservative
lol you changed it you madman ,Delta_25,e99xs5c,conservative
The carpet is stain resistant. ,chabanais,e99vnpv,conservative
"Message the mods and tell them what you want.  Remember the flair you request is like going on a date with Nancy Pelosi... the shorter it is, the sweeter it is.",chabanais,e99wrjg,conservative
"Rovercomputers tough enough for dust, Comrade!",chabanais,e9ahhph,conservative
I felt the need to make-up.,chabanais,e99xzem,conservative
This is a very wholesome conversation,TheRealRaptor_BYOND,e99ylfd,conservative
But does it tie the room together as well as the tile?,callthereaper64,e9ar1lr,conservative
The marmoset likes it.  We even named him u/Jibrish though he's not as hairy and smells better.,chabanais,e9ar86i,conservative
"This site is so spicy, I do not know whether I should laugh or cry most of the time. ",ozric101,e98v3xh,conservative
again bee this isnt satire.. ,Delta_25,e991f69,conservative
This headline would have been more daring in 1860/61.,Martbell,e98wl7f,conservative
Satire is hard these days. ,Earthling03,e99cr7e,conservative
"MY FRONT PAGE WTF!?

[1 hour old, 27 gold, 27 silver and 6 platinum. ](https://imgur.com/pyP3WhQ)

No, there is no coordination to promote liberal agenda on reddit. move along. ",DaveThe_blank_,e99o8uy,conservative
"NPC protests tomorrow, as soon as they get their software update.",BrighamYoung,e99lp41,conservative
What are they protesting?,mlmack,e99pc9k,conservative
Reeeeeee!,DozerM,e99koxo,conservative
"Protesting a man lawfully resigning his position for which he has been seen as not doing a good job? Because they cannot see Trump as anything but evil, they must assign his motives as treasonous and nothing else. ",justhere2havefun,e99sfk8,conservative
"We should protest their protests.

Oh wait... we actually have jobs.",GFZDW,e9ardii,conservative
"It is what they are being paid to do, sooooo.......",TimOrb88,e99iw50,conservative
talking points are old school. Conditioning ignorant masses to protest things they don't even understand is the new. ,DaveThe_blank_,e99orbz,conservative
"Law and order, per usual.",Silicon_Avatar,e99r8km,conservative
exactly!,peterboykin,e9b9r29,conservative
"Some of you may not be old enough to remember this, but there was a mayor of DC, his name is Marion Barry, he got caught smoking crack on camera and was reelected. Nothing surprises me in politics.",Quazimodal,e9at393,conservative
"Just before the Civil War there was a southern Congressman who took his cane and beat a Republican Senator nearly to death on the floor of the Senate. He won re-election from jail.

More recently, Jesse Jackson Jr. won reelection in 2012 despite having been awol from Congress for months in a mental institution. Shortly thereafter he resigned and went to jail, pleading guilty to a long list of corruption charges.",Martbell,e9au50m,conservative
Houston and the surrounding area is a mess.,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e9azgn4,conservative
I believe they recently built him a statue too.,XMAGA_1776X,e9atdx0,conservative
"Bob Menendez raped underage girls in the Dominican Republic and still won reelection.

Noticing a pattern here?",ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e9azdji,conservative
I got to see this. LOL!,Quazimodal,e9athk7,conservative
"> Marion Barry

[Statue honoring former Mayor Marion Barry revealed in D.C.
The new “Mayor for Life” statue is one of three full-body statues in the city of African Americans](https://dc.curbed.com/2018/3/5/17080338/marion-barry-statue-mayor)

But don't you see? He's black, therefore better in every way, and morally superior to us non-crack-smoking white people.",PrawnsAreOk,e9auxmr,conservative
"She should have retired under Obama. This could have been prevented.

I don’t think she’s mentally fit for office anymore either, like come on your job is the constitution and yet you forget an amendment.

Sad shame, I disagree with everything she’s for, but I hope she recovers and realizes she can no longer serve as a justice.

Not a good situation",kotov9syndrome,e9augo7,conservative
Her health issues could force her premature retirement.  And if that happens we will see a replay of the Kavanaugh character assassination.  That is why these people who lied about him and their lawyers should be prosecuted immediately.  It is the only way to stop this bullshit when Ginsberg does indeed retire.  I want to see our new acting AG going wild with grand juries and getting these slimes indicted now.,optionhome,e9asg8i,conservative
Oh Fuck! Democrats will be blowing up buildings and committing more mob violence if she steps down. Especially since they never got their “Blue Wave”.,SnickersReese,e9atiwn,conservative
"How can it be a ""premature"" retirement when she can't even stay awake for a photo shoot?",SliverSerfer,e9awih5,conservative
And didn't win the senate. ,molon-labe7,e9av845,conservative
Let them...  We have Private Prisons to fill up with socialists. ,ozric101,e9az02b,conservative
"Exactly retirement age is 65-70 in general, she is well pasted that date. ",ozric101,e9ayxla,conservative
Yeah it’s going to be practically impossible for them to win the Senate in 2020 now.,SnickersReese,e9avgsa,conservative
""" Aragorn was also able to win over substantial support among the Army of the Dead, typically a strong Democratic voting bloc.""

There are days in which I laugh silently. But that is not this day. This day I laughed a true belly laugh.",TakarBismark,e99f5qt,conservative
He has my bow. ,justhere2havefun,e998xto,conservative
And my axe!,GrendelDerp,e999m58,conservative
" ""If by my life or death I can protect you, I will,"" he said as the  crowd bowed to him. ""Sons of Gondor, of Rohan, of America, my brothers! A  day may come when the nation fails, but it is not this day. An hour of  darkness and despair, when the age of the great nation of America comes  crashing down! But it is not this day! This day we fight!"" 

&#x200B;

LULZ!! Thank you for this.",KennethGrahame,e99pjqu,conservative
God save the King!,Stunner900,e99w1im,conservative
He was strong on illegal immigration. ,Kite23,e9acflb,conservative
That was *fantastic*.,AM_Kylearan,e9affoj,conservative
And my sword!,smokejaguar,e99906l,conservative
And my shield!,aivan021,e99aq8i,conservative
And my banjo! ,LonelyMachines,e99go1q,conservative
"Ironic that the democrats spent millions on Hollywood heart-throb Jon Osssof, only for him to lose, but in the end, the republican lost to some no-name democrat.  

Just goes to show that Hollywood endorsements are counter-productive ",XMAGA_1776X,e9amlms,conservative
Notice that the feminist movement didn’t congratulate her?,BayernMunich22,e98164f,conservative
Let's not start playing identity politics. Let's just hope she does a great job regardless of her gender. ,ripecookies1,e988710,conservative
"Same here in Iowa, first elected anyways.",SWTORBattlefrontNerd,e988egd,conservative
Silly internalized misogynist,BlueJeansBlackShirt,e98epm5,conservative
"I live in SD.

I'm glad Noem won, but it didn't really matter either way.  Sutton wouldn't have been able to do anything anyway.  The GOP has a veto proof majority in both houses.",alSeen,e98oi5z,conservative
Sutton was probably the best Dem running though.,scolbert08,e98gwq0,conservative
You go girl!,Russilito,e98jfry,conservative
"Well, it's always a good thing to increase female representation all over politics/media, even if I don't agree with her ideology personally.

Kudos to her.",Azul19,e98t8nv,conservative
"Of course right-wing feminist groups like Maggie’s List have congratulated her.  You wouldn’t expect a left-wing feminist group to congratulate her; feminist groups (mostly) don’t, and shouldn’t, support women just for being women. ",farts_on_boobs,e98hvnw,conservative
"Well of course not, the feminist movement has much more to do with ideology than gender. If you don’t kowtow to their ideology of women being oppressed by patriarchy (and the need for massive government intervention to solve the “problem”), you are worth nothing in their eyes, even if you are a woman.

As Thomas Sowell points out in his book *Dismantling America*, Karl Marx once said that “The working class is revolutionary or it is nothing”. While Marx was speaking of the working class and not of women, that general worldview fits in perfectly with the feminist movement — unless women are “revolutionary” and fighting back against their husbands, fathers, brothers, sons, male colleagues, etc, they are worth “nothing”.",asphaltcement123,e98o4v3,conservative
"I saw something on FB this morning that had an album of every 1st minority & female victory last night. All of them were Dem except one, the very last one, and it had some quip about how the person couldn’t agree with a single thing she believed in but had to begrudgingly congratulate her",i_floop_the_pig,e98qtef,conservative
"It also shows that the GOP isn't the party of ""rich, old white men"". Granted the argument now is we conservative women are just too stupid to vote ""in our own best interests,"" and do what our husbands tell us...",neemarita,e98gwfi,conservative
I think the point is that the left doesn’t care if you are a ‘first’ unless you are a Democrat. We are pointing out their hypocrisy.,Ilikeminewelldone,e988eo8,conservative
"It'd be a good thing though.

I mean, women are under represented in politics, don't you believe that electing female politicians might contribute to closing that gap?",Azul19,e98svh3,conservative
"Yea from talking with some SD friends, he sounds like the only sane Democrat left.",rustyshakelford,e98k65g,conservative
"That can't be right, we had a first female victory in AL, IA, and SD.",1wjl1,e99j0e1,conservative
"I'm a guy. If I were a South Dakota resident, would she not represent me in politics? Or as a female south Dakotan governor, does she only represent the female south dakotans? Do I have to wait for the next male governor to be represented in South Dakota?

This is the problem with identity politics. It says that only people who look like you or have the same genitals or skin tone as you represent you in politics. She is the same governor for men and women. She represents them all. She answers to them all. She works for them all. ",ripecookies1,e98z5et,conservative
Sutton would be a Republican in any other state.  He is a bit too liberal for SD.,JadedAF,e99r5in,conservative
"No, no, you misunderstood me mate. 

I am against identity politics personally, it's that, it'd be good if we elected more female politicians in office.

Considering the fact that women are under represented in the media, it'd be a step in the right direction, to increase visibility of women.

I'd like to think that lots of women feel more comfortable voting for other women, no? 

They feel like they're better understood regarding women's rights/issues.

So increasing visibility of female politicians ain't hurting anybody, as long as they're worthwhile of course.",Azul19,e99363i,conservative
"pro-life, pro-2a, against corruption, not sure why he would even associate with the democratic party",rustyshakelford,e99rjxq,conservative
[deleted],,e998xjl,conservative
How is this not identity politics? ,ripecookies1,e9949lp,conservative
"How's so?

I just said that we should increase the representation of women all over politics/media.

I've never said that we should vote for women just because they're women.

Women are under represented in politics/media and it'd be a delightful thing if we contributed into closing that gap, no?",Azul19,e9a3vk8,conservative
"How it is?

I've never said that we should vote for women just because they're women, like these other loons did for Hilary.

All i said was, that women are under represented on the media/politics...i'd be a great thing if we increased their visibility, without lowering the quality.

Women may feel more comfortable voting for other women, because they can represent their rights/issues in a concise way.

So, getting more women in office to increase their representation, is identity politics now?",Azul19,e9a3u1w,conservative
"Since the gap is due to a difference in interests. Why does it matter? Why artificially alter things that don't matter, and more importantly, that cause zero problems. ",CinnamonAndCloves,e9ac7mg,conservative
"Yes. You are describing identity politics. Voting for people on the basis of sex, race, or sexual orientation rather than experience, ability, or ideology is identity politics. It doesn't matter what your reason for doing it is (I. E., ""we need more women in politics"" Vs ""women are underrepresented in politics"" Vs ""if more republican women were in office then more women would vote republican"".) even if your reason is more noble than the 3rd wave feminist screaming ""down with the patriarchy! Let women rule!"", it's still identity politics. ",ripecookies1,e9aj1as,conservative
Not only no but hell no.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9awva3,conservative
Hell no! Trey Gowdy if you want to drain the swamp!,Bubbacat7,e9c8o4a,conservative
"Not only no but FUCKIN' HELL NO!!!! Christie is a (D) in (R) clothing.. in other words, a RINO, with horns... 
Christie would be a BIG mistake... Now, somebody like Gowdy would be perfecto..
",LVDave,e9axgi6,conservative
"I don't think seat numbers are the best metric of success because of redistricting. Looking at the generic ballot, the dems won by almost 9 points, per 538. That's pretty big. A bit better than republicans did in 2010.",I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e98w4ce,conservative
"That's a good takeaway. When you consider that the Dems lost 60+ seats in 2010, then the fact the Democrats didn't gain anywhere close to that this go around is a positive for the General Election.",-Kerosun-,e98b332,conservative
### #BlueTrickle,FeelThePorn,e98ag9s,conservative
But they still succeeded which is what troubles me. We have had 2 great years of progress under Trump and they got people vote against him....that is scary. Real scary.,J0kerr,e984mem,conservative
[deleted],,e985qdf,conservative
"ok, i'm confused by this whole ""fake news"" stuff.  It keeps getting spouted by conservatives, mostly (from what I can tell) when they hear or read something they don't like.

&#x200B;

Any examples of real ""fake news""? Is it limited to the left only, or do the Right also have a ""Fake News"" media?",RobotXander,e985smb,conservative
"Do not forget, it was Democrats + Media + Hollywood that succeeded far less than the historical average for midterms.

Literally round the clock negative coverage, press and rhetoric for 2 years and they still couldn't run the table.",BeachCruisin22,e98opmw,conservative
It was more of a blue puddle but things will only get better for Republicans from now on! ,PapaGeorgio23,e98i1xp,conservative
The dems controlled 256 seats before the election in 2010 and dropped to 193 after the election which is approximately what the GOP has now. Dems started with about 200 and gained 30+ in 2006 and 20+ in 2008. If we're following historical data here they're performing as well as they have in the past. This shows that they held a disproportionate amount of seats in traditionally republican areas before 2010 as the GOP never got past 245 seats at the height of the anti-obama movement. ,Throwawaybd123,e98ijcd,conservative
This needs more upvotes,bigfloppydisks,e98kpbs,conservative
"There has to be something about the structural dynamic with these Presidential, first term mid-year elections.   I have to think (until shown otherwise) a great deal of it has more to do with something other than policy. 

The only two exceptions, where the party not in the White House didn't pick up House seats in this situation since Hoover (1930?), are FDR during the Great Depression and Bush in 2002 one year after 9/11.  Both presidents had unusually high approval numbers in those two cases thanks to major outside events.

Dem's performed about as expected historically this cycle.  Maybe even less than expected.  ",Roez,e985a9d,conservative
"It's not a great sign, but lets be honest, if we had hit it out of the ball park in congress, we would still have the house. 

Trump has his work cut out for him, but we got a managed to add Republicans in the senate while simultaneously getting rid of RINOs in the senate.

Hopefully we can restructure the senate committees and get some people with fucking backbones on the FISA investigation... move it out of senate intelligence. It would work fine in Judiciary committee, and I'm thinking Trump declassifies the docs in the next 2 months, giving enough impetus for ""new"" investigations.

In the house, they'll investigate like mad, but Trump will have to fight it out in court, and I guarantee they'll pick dumbass issues to subpoena, like Trump's tax returns... then they'll fill up the the air waves with so much useless shit that no one will know how seriously they should take their investigations... They'll call it a ""blue wave"" (let them! It does NOTHING for us to argue whether this election is a ""win"" or not... if we let them call it a ""win"" then they'll lose the wind in their sails... guaranteed.)

If we're smart, we'll put forward all the compromises that make the Republican landscape difficult. Weed legalization, infrastructure funding, budget cuts, prison reform, immigration, (there are literally so many things we haven't done...). We didn't do jack shit on these issues so it can't get worse... maybe Trump can succeed in selling it to legislatures as a bipartisan suicide pact that kills evenly and indiscriminately. ",54367543457109943628,e98a488,conservative
Most lost seats were people critical of the president,DJ_GiantMidget,e98957w,conservative
"I truly believe they are losing their hold on people. I’m not a big fan of social media (yes, I know I’m using it), but the silver lining is that conservatives finally have a platform where they can expose biases in journalism. This was never going to happen overnight, but Americans are growing increasingly distrustful of the media. After those bombs were sent to various democrats, there was a huge spike in internet search results for “false flag.” 

We’ve gotten our foot in the door. Every person we redpill about the media’s bias can redpill someone else. Once you look for it, the bias is so clear that you can’t “unsee” it. The bias used to be more subtle, but the left has been so emboldened that they barely hide it anymore.  ",zara_lia,e98b4ob,conservative
"Half the country doesn’t pay an income tax, that’s why 

",Al_Gayda,e98x5o6,conservative
[deleted],,e989vq2,conservative
"Here’s a recent example. 
On October 12, NBC tweeted this: WATCH: President Trump says ""Robert E. Lee was a great general"" during Ohio rally, calling the Confederate leader ""incredible."" Attached to the tweet was a misleading video that made it look like Trump had, in fact, said that because it cut out the context.

On October 14 (yes, two days later!) NBC finally issued a correction: “CORRECTION: An earlier tweet misidentified the general President Trump described as ""incredible"" at a rally in Ohio. It was Gen. Ulysses S. Grant, not Gen. Robert E. Lee. An attached video clip lacked the full context for Trump's remark. Here is the full clip.”

If you watch the full clip (which any honest journalist would have done), it’s pretty obvious who Trump called “incredible”: Grant, who led the Union troops. So why tweet that he was gushing over Lee, who led the Confederate troops? Ask yourself how a black voter might view a president who gushes about Robert E. Lee. 

And why leave that false tweet up for two days after immediately being called out on it by multiple sources? NBC didn’t bother issuing a retraction until Trump himself tweeted that it was dishonest. If I were an honest journalist who had made an honest mistake, I would have immediately issued a retraction and apologized. If I were fake news, I would brazen it out until I couldn’t get away with it anymore in hopes that the fake story would be seen by as many people as possible.

Do some digging. This is just one of many, many stories. Once you see it for yourself, it’s impossible to unsee it.

",zara_lia,e98cilg,conservative
"It's not always what they report, but often what they don't report.

Look back to the Synagogue shooting. Main stream media spent alot of time covering the people protesting Trump's presence at the Synagogue, and didn't mention that the Jewish leaders welcomed Trump and stated how warm and genuine he seemed.

Meanwhile, the ""right wing"" media covered what the MSM didn't - Trump offering condolences to the Jewish leaders, shaking hands with hospital staff, etc.

You've undoubtedly heard alot about Russian collusion, but probably less so about the Bruce Ohr hearings, McCabe's grand jury for lying to the FBI, or FBI agents Strozk and Page leaking disinformation to the media and their associated text messages congratulating themselves for it.",Sideswipe0009,e98z5d5,conservative
"How cnn spliced the video of Trump feeding the coy fish with Xi comes to mind, as does that one clip where they cut the video of that woman telling her neighbors to go “burn down the rich white peoples (or something like that) neighborhood instead of their own” and made it look like it was some sort of call to peace. 

Or search fake news in bing. Shit do that and compare vs google results. It’s gotten to the point if I’m trying to find a certain article I read to source my argument here I have to go to bing over google if it is remotely political. Especially for gun stuff. Like google figured out where I work based on how often my phone is in a certain location and they can’t tailor search results to what I’m obviously looking for? I wish I had some specific examples for you as some of them have been pretty egregious, maybe I’ll start keeping track going forward. ",churninbutter,e989g1q,conservative
"[Here's a good example](https://preview.redd.it/1fo6w8pf5sv11.png?width=1024&auto=webp&s=fa54bc3a31a875d899db306fd0f683be1e77bc2e) from the last couple of weeks. 

There's fake news on the right, for sure. It just doesn't come from giant publications. ",stanleythemanley44,e98b12h,conservative
MSNBC and CNN are the liberal equivalent to Fox News. They are paid to push a liberal agenda. Anybody on reddit that tries to say otherwise is influenced by their own bias and doesn’t have the ability to be impartial.,Phillipinsocal,e987gnc,conservative
"Its more of a trend and often subtle. Dems will have nice pictures and reps will look angry. The facts are generally true, but the wording is skewed towards one side and sometimes they will fail to report facts.

Its hard to keep up on all the disingenuous reporting, but one of the most egregious examples is CNN saying that it is illegal to view Wikileaks and only CNN can report on it legally. To quote Cenk Ungyar, ""Google it.""

[The AP gave up pretending to be nuetral reporters back in 2007.](https://archive.fo/ph8dN)",ElbowWhisper,e98baw4,conservative
"I will give an example. MSNBC was on while I was at the gym last night and the coverage they gave on the Florida gubernatorial race was so pro-Gillum I wanted to puke. The left acts like he was an angel sent down from heaven, not a corrupt mayor of a city who has one of the highest crime rates in Florida. 
Additionally, I kept waiting to see all of the results but they kept touching on all of the Democratic wins. I had to wait until I got home to see all of the other wins/losses.",blondemia88,e9886ny,conservative
"That's hilariously ironic considering the Democrats have called Fox and other outlets fake news for years whenever they say something that liberals don't like

the reality is that it liberal news is fake news. And if liberals bothered to fact-check anything they read on their left wing blogs they'd realize that

CNN lies CONSTANTLY

so does Huffington Post Washington Post the New York Times think progress MSNBC Rachel Maddow Stephen Colbert Jimmy Kimmel Etc. They lie so often that you can have in now and then they have to admit it

Simple Bing search can bring up hundreds to thousands of examples of left-wing media lying.

Fact is despite Democrats defending the media that they were caught controlling by Wikileaks. And despite them attacking Fox. Even the left wing superpacs PolitiFact can't find more than 50 lies from Fox",ExpensiveMention,e98e9x4,conservative
I think it is mainly just the motivation of the loser and voter fatigue of the winner.,-Kerosun-,e98b5rg,conservative
"It is the resentment of the other party after the lost election that bring voters to the polls. Though having a polarizing figure that says things when he shouldn’t certainly helps. 

Honestly though this democrat win might be a blessing. They seem to hate Trump so much that they go even more radicalized and I think people are getting tired of it. We will have two years of investigations and if Trump doesn’t do something incredibly stupid he should take 2020 easily. ",KLaParl,e98tzdo,conservative
"It has nothing to do with that. It has everything to do with the fact that the fake news media has a monopoly on the media and uses it as propaganda to prop up the Democrats. If you don't want the Democrats to eventually take complete control over the internet and the television and basically the country forever and you're going to have to accept that something has to be done to stop them.


If you keep going on about ""mug Free Press"" all the time then eventual result will be Democrats taking complete control over everything and America looking like North Korea where the ruling party controls all the media and silences dissidence


And the Libertarians will call that freedom

Sorry if I don't agree that Kim Jong controlling the media is the perfect definition of Free press",ExpensiveMention,e98e1ph,conservative
Is this true? I'm a bit out of the loop.,sjwking,e98ehwo,conservative
Yep. Same here. Whenever I Google anything political I have to use been because Google sensors all the real news and put Democrat fake news like slate Huffington Post CNN and NBC at the top,ExpensiveMention,e98ec6b,conservative
"Fox news is so outrageous these days, I would say they are more like thinkprogress or slate. CNN and MSNBC are biased, and push fake news from time to time, but they are not making ultra inflammatory remarks like fox news.",huntdawgin,e999023,conservative
"Fox has progressives in major positions (Shep Smith, Juan Williams, for example).  No other ""news"" network has conservatives in such prominent spots.

Also, Fox news anchors are far more down the middle than idiots like Don Lemon.",BeachCruisin22,e98p10x,conservative
"No they're not. Despite Democrat propaganda for years against Fox News. Fox is still the least biased and most truthful television network. It's not the best out of all of the Network's but for the ones that are on TV it's the best. Studies have found that they're pretty much not biased at all. And even the left when PolitiFact can barely find any times that they have lied

",ExpensiveMention,e98eegl,conservative
"just imagine at Fox News or any other right-wing Outlet head propped up the Obama birth certificate conspiracy. And take gone on for years claiming that it was a real thing.

Thats left-wing media with russia",ExpensiveMention,e98eqbh,conservative
"But that's not fake...it's just biased. Just because it's not the news you want to see doesn't mean that it isn't news. Same with Fox News. Dems complain that Fox is fake news, but it's still news, but with conservative opinion and talking points.",PUBG_Rico,e989dvn,conservative
[deleted],,e98g2z2,conservative
https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.usatoday.com/amp/1843131002,Minimum_balance,e999z3e,conservative
[removed],,e98j7hz,conservative
"seriously, Im conservative, but I cringe when I see fox news. The spin they do is absurd, and on the level of ultra left wing news sources. It is clear they are trying to make up peoples minds for them. CNN and MSNBC do it in a more subtle fashion, and I would say they are generally less biased than Fox. Not to say that they are a reliable source though.",huntdawgin,e9998z5,conservative
"When a channel refuses to report on something just because it doesn’t fit their agenda, that’s not just biased. Skewing a message so it makes one party look good is fake. I also watched Fox News when I got home and they had liberals and conservatives discussing the poll results. They didn’t just cover the Republican wins. It was the only channel that I could find a complete summation of the results. ",blondemia88,e98a5oi,conservative
"What do you think fake news originally referred to? It was the liberal media's response to the outcome of the 2016 election, they saturated the public space with reporting that claimed to be criticizing literal satire sites like yournewswire, but they also intentionally fudged it and tried to tie in sites like infowars and breitbart as well. As a pretense for justifying later censorship. So even the existence of the phrase fake news itself is built upon fake news. So, the reasoning you're criticizing and accusing /u/blondemia88 of using is actually the reason why the fake news term exists.",darthhayek,e992fu2,conservative
Too many barriers to entry at this point,BeachCruisin22,e98ouy7,conservative
Tell that to Alex Jones.,darthhayek,e991e6y,conservative
"So why havent u?

Because u cant",ExpensiveMention,e98r85p,conservative
Ur just another uneducated liberal,ExpensiveMention,e98r5pk,conservative
"> When a channel refuses to report on something just because it doesn’t fit their agenda, that’s not just biased

What is it then? They can choose to cover what they want to cover. You can't expect them to cover every single story out there. 

",PUBG_Rico,e98d0z4,conservative
"But Infowars is literally fake news. Infowars claimed that the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting was a hoax, that the Boston Marathon bombing was a hoax, and that the Democratic Party was hosting a child sex slave ring out of a pizza restaurant. That's disinformation and not opinion. It's fake.",PUBG_Rico,e996nag,conservative
[removed],,e98s04z,conservative
"that's right. They can choose to cover what they want to cover. No one's saying they can't. But we are saying is it that makes them propaganda

Examples of CNN lying include heavily editing a video of trump feeding fish. Staging a Muslim protest. With paid actors. Claiming that George Bush signed NAFTA. Lying about about Michael Brown having his hands up. Claiming that an airplane disappeared into a black hole. Lying about Kavanaugh by claiming his accusers were credible without showing any of the information about how they were discredited discredited

And that's just a few. There's literally thousands of examples online.

And that's just CNN. Not including Rachel Maddow blathering on about Russian conspiracy theories

or have Jimmy Kimmel literally lie about the GOP Healthcare Bill claiming that it wouldn't cover pre-existing conditions or that the GOP voted to and Children's Healthcare when it was really the Democrats who voted for it


",ExpensiveMention,e98enbg,conservative
Still amazed at what a blatant hypocrite you are.,darthhayek,e9a78h9,conservative
">But Infowars is literally fake news.

I'll repeat what you said before.

>Just because it's not the news you want to see doesn't mean that it isn't news.

Libtard hypocrite.

>Infowars claimed that the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting was a hoax, that the Boston Marathon bombing was a hoax, and that the Democratic Party was hosting a child sex slave ring out of a pizza restaurant.

And none of that strikes me as unreasonable as a conspiracy of 2 years to gaslight the American people into believing that the President of the United States is a Russian agent. That's an allegation that goes beyond stuff as radical and elaborate JFK assassination theories or 9/11 Truth. It's alleging that there was an illegal coup attempt against the United States, and that it was somehow successful and the perpetrators still haven't been caught.",darthhayek,e998tl8,conservative
Sounds more straight-up and honest than claiming you're not an agent of the Democratic Party when you're screeching that half of the American public is made up of literally neo-Nazis [along with Barack Obama.](https://thehill.com/homenews/news/405576-obama-how-hard-can-it-be-to-say-nazis-are-bad),darthhayek,e9923zg,conservative
"I'm not saying doing things like that aren't fake. I'm not familiar with all of those examples but I'd say in most cases those are fake. I was simply disagreeing with the other guy who said they were fake for only showing Dem election results and sharing news that only puts one side or the other in a good light. That stuff isn't fake, it's just not the entire picture.",PUBG_Rico,e98hjie,conservative
[deleted],,e9ahbyj,conservative
"Those things aren't ""things I don't want to see"" but literally things that aren't true. That's fake.

> And none of that strikes me as unreasonable as a conspiracy of 2 years to gaslight the American people into believing that the President of the United States is a Russian agent.

It doesn't matter what you think  is reasonable or unreasonable, what matters is facts. Those things Infowars pushed are 100% false. I never brought up all this Russian agent conspiracy stuff as something that was true and neither have any of the legitimate news sources either.",PUBG_Rico,e99a1ui,conservative
"I already did exolain. You didn't respond. You said ""Just because it's not the news you want to see doesn't mean that it isn't news"", but now you're saying that exactly that is the case just because infowars talks about stuff that Susan Wojicki and Bill Kristol don't like, and somehow censorship is justified because of it. This is the background of where the ""fake news"" term comes from, it wasn't originally some Trump thing.",darthhayek,e9ajl90,conservative
So PTSD. Non political it sounds like.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ani2k,conservative
"""Grassroots activists""",guitmusic12,e99g6wt,conservative
"Oh look it’s being pushed and headed by MoveOn

",Enzo_SAWFT,e99guy5,conservative
Win the house...Riot. amazing,iwasthebeaver,e99hwsz,conservative
"How can these people ""spontaneously"" have demonstrations when they have jobs to go to? Oh, I forgot, jobs... I think they don't understand very well what a job is. Oh yeah, it is when they get paid by Move On to demonstrate!",ctrocks,e99hco5,conservative
Wait but weren't these the same people that hated Jeff Sessions and said he was the absolute worst possible pick for AG?  I thought they would be dancing in the streets,Mormonster,e99i6zu,conservative
"> Above all, be civil. Do not attack anyone, or vandalize anything.

Haha, okay.

These people purport to believe that someone worse than Hitler is about to take over the country but that they should resist that peacefully.

It's how you know they're full of shit.  They don't like Trump because he's a Republican and Jon Stewart/John Oliver (depending on the age) indoctrinated them into believing that all Republicans are bad, and all of this is just a pretense to act like assholes.",Telineye,e99lef4,conservative
Perhaps the strangest trend in the era of Trump is the fetishization of government bureaucrats by the left,tja_1478,e99ihm5,conservative
I love how they plan protests during the day on a Thursday. It shows how few of them actually have jobs ,LumpyWumpus,e99hkme,conservative
"Finally. They've been threatening this march for nearly a year, when the idea got floated after the Nov 4 Antifa Jamboree fizzled out. Now it's time to put up or shut up and we'll see if they actually commit to this one, or if it was all just forum role play. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e99h57b,conservative
Oh no! Trump fired a wildly unpopular Attorney General! It’s horrible!,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e99i61j,conservative
I thought Halloween was over,TheCtrlLeftisafterme,e99hd4i,conservative
"whiny leftists always need something to throw a tantrum about, well known fact",VoinaYMir,e99nnii,conservative
"""An attack on the rule of law.""

This from the same people who want open borders and to abolish ICE?

",noiwontsharemyfries,e99t872,conservative
The fact they think they will change anything is quite cute.  These gasbadlgs are such a waste of energy.,GMU1993,e99grmt,conservative
"They do realize that if anything this will help Mueller because this allows him to come forward as a witness, right? ",CITY_F0X,e99hce0,conservative
"Wait I'm confused, I thought that Jeff Sessions was an evil racist.",MuricanStephen,e9ac89f,conservative
"One bozo over there said he was on a cruise for 10 days, and hoped there would be a country to come back to.

What has to happen to someone for them to get that stupid?  It can't be that bad for them if they can take off on a cruise.",mlmack,e99p37t,conservative
Time to dress up as Antifa...,MacTCarnage,e99hasy,conservative
Oh man... My coworker is going and invited me...i want to go but it might be too cringworthy,freedomhertz,e9a1a8r,conservative
Fun NPC action.  They're so cute!,paulbrook,e99wtvd,conservative
Organized and supplied by one of George Soros' big donation targets (moveon).,anuser999,e99twmx,conservative
"You mean the organization founded to criticize what they viewed as the mishandling of an investigation of the sitting president by independent council?

Well, surely they must be rallying to take to the streets in support of the president, considering that their whole purpose was to tell the country to ""move on"" from the controversy of a president who was not only being investigated, but who had admitted to lying under oath, was cited for contempt of court, and had obstructed the investigation into his..

...oh wait, that was a Democrat being investigated.  
Okay, never mind then guys, I guess the nonexistent evidence against a Republican president is more damning in their eyes than the actual substantiated evidence against a Democratic president.",misespises,e9apl0v,conservative
Totally grassroots!,KryptoPower77,e99pii1,conservative
The sky won't scream at itself,WeimarRepublic,e99lqmz,conservative
mobs not jobs,VoinaYMir,e99nlxl,conservative
Yes but now he’s a maryter until the Muller stuff is over. Then it’s Orange man needs to go to jail and everyone he knows or Muller surpressed info and lied to America and he’s evil,Enzo_SAWFT,e99qmnt,conservative
Protesting is their job.,TheWhiteFalcon,e99v6mu,conservative
"People don't work all day. Some jobs start early in the morning and end before 5:00, and some people work the night shift.",Tropical-Rainforest,e9cgam7,conservative
They're clowns all year round. ,strallweat,e99ir0u,conservative
"Eh, if they fuck up enough peoples' commutes they'll probably make a nice batch of new Republicans for next election.  They're literally planning to protest at rush hour, and we know how well they like to play in traffic.",anuser999,e99u2bg,conservative
That's hilarious.,noiwontsharemyfries,e99t5ps,conservative
It's gonna look like a parade of homeless ninja.,TheTrumpsOfDoom,e99hznr,conservative
"They don't really care about the people, so the House is nothing but committees to them. Listen to Waters. Holy shit! SO since they didn't get the Senate...REEEEEE!",DaveThe_blank_,e99pgof,conservative
And their cringe ass “rapid response protest plan” lmao. ,Zac1245,e99txpg,conservative
"And stunningly, America (the midwest especially) chose mobs in these midterms",YankeeBlues21,e99p1f3,conservative
">homeless ninja.

rofl",VoinaYMir,e99nmk6,conservative
You had a lot of dem candidates going out there and running as moderates. They'll get fired in a hurry in 2020 if they govern any other way.,superAL1394,e99p5eu,conservative
"At least we got the senate. The dem's victory over the house was pretty routine and not unexpected. We're still going to kick their asses in 2020. Their ""blue wave"" doesn't even exist

Edit: Looks like at least 3 leftists were triggered by this post judging by the comment score",VoinaYMir,e99p7uz,conservative
Hobo shinobi. ,TheTrumpsOfDoom,e99o22l,conservative
"It just galls me that voters aren’t able to see that there are 2 coalitions. Are these “moderates” going to vote more in line with Jim Jordan or Nancy Pelosi? And if a state showed a preference for Trump’s policies, why on earth would they support oppositional legislators (WV, OH, MT)

What did the Republicans even do wrong to lose the votes of people in Ohio, Michigan, Wisconsin, and Pennsylvania between 2016 and 2018? Those states supported us 2 years ago and then things went really well. Hell, the economy wasn’t even listed in most voters top 3 concerns *because unified Republican government set it right*! So they turn around and support an increasingly radical party that’s entire platform would have been viewed as insane a decade ago rather than a GOP that’s been incrementally effective and moderated out a few of its less popular social issues? 

What’s even the point of fighting for the ideals the country was founded on if enough Americans won’t support them? ",YankeeBlues21,e99pt8h,conservative
">You had a lot of dem candidates going out there and running as moderates.

I can't believe people fell for that.",noiwontsharemyfries,e99t3bb,conservative
I hope so.  If they don't follow through and break with the coastal leadership then the Republicans better hammer on that point in every ad they run.,anuser999,e99tyt4,conservative
We'll take back the house in 2020.,superdude411,e99j4yi,conservative
Wasn't this actually historically worse than usual for the party not in control?,zeldaisaprude,e98dvq4,conservative
"When you look at the historical results of midterm elections going heavily against the sitting President, this result has been a huge victory for the Republicans. ",johnmrson,e99csta,conservative
"Flipped 7 governors, control of the house, that's a win in my book",RhombusRoomba,e986nef,conservative
Funny because i made this same point and got downvoted to oblivion.....,Themusician67,e98ljic,conservative
"If you consider the midterm after 9/11 an outlier this was the best first term midterm for a sitting President's party in as long as I can remember.  

Clinton lost 54 reps and 8 Senators.

Obama lost 63 reps and 6 senators.

Under Trump we've outperformed them all.

Even Reagan, who probably lost slightly fewer seats in the house, made no gains in the Senate in 1982.",themanbat,e9ah3x2,conservative
34 seats is close to the average swing.  Add to that a decisive victory in the Senate and holding on to the majority of governorships and it's actually not even as bad as it normally is for the party in power.  ,DevonWeeks,e98fiyj,conservative
"Expecting to hold onto the House was unrealistic. Governors mansions stings a bit, but we had well more than half. Regression to the mean is bound to happen.

If anything, a loss of 34 seats in the house and a gain of 5 in the senate is pretty good all things considered.",WebSliceGallery123,e987ung,conservative
But they lose seats in the senate. It was an overall normal midterm. Historically this was nothing special and the democrats don’t control presidential nominees so it really wasn’t a major win for them. I would call it a minor win.,Ilikeminewelldone,e98f9k6,conservative
"Technically speaking, yes.

In terms of 'blue wave' - that was a large failure. Overall this election went exactly as expected. I'm kind of surprised it was so *normal* given the huge amounts of spending and buzz over a midterm election. ",Jibrish,e98jtq5,conservative
It’s a pretty ordinary election. It’s a win in the same way republicans taking control of the house under Obama was a win. It’s not some huge blue wave or criticism of Trump. ,Giga-Wizard,e98drs8,conservative
Yeah and here in Illinois it was lost long ago...rauner sucked.,SuperFunMonkey,e99oem6,conservative
Here or in r/politics?,mlmack,e992s20,conservative
Strange ,Dillionmesh,e98mem7,conservative
"You're right, gaining seats in the senate during an off-year election is very rare. Keeping the house would have been a very difficult and near impossible task because of the makeup of most of the toss up districts. 2002 was undoubtedly an outlier election. ",Dillionmesh,e9aheq5,conservative
Its currently 26 seats ITs entirely possible the dems walk away with only a 5-7 seat majority in the hosue which is pathetic and a virtual tie in any practical voting sense. ,Manchurainprez,e98xfqj,conservative
Retaining the governorships of FL/OH/TX is going to be fuckin massive come 2020,CCPCanuck,e99hljs,conservative
Decisive? I don't think thats the right word to use. Dems gained some ground but it was by no means decisive.,DeadHeadLibertarian,e98kocu,conservative
"Based on expectations, this wasn’t a “WIN” for Democrats. In fact, in the jiu jitsu of politics, this was a setup for a submission by Trump in 2020.",Otto-Carpenter,e98hv0l,conservative
">It’s a win in the same way republicans taking control of the house under Obama was a win.

Not quite. The Dems lost *a lot* with Obama in office.

The media would be creaming their pants if the same happened to Trump- but that didn't happen yesterday.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99zcfd,conservative
Didn't Republicans gain 60+ seats under Obama? The average is around 30 for midterms.,Rightquercusalba,e99bpcj,conservative
Here. Made me think this sub was being brigaded. ,Themusician67,e9967p2,conservative
I'm saying **Republicans** made decisive gains in the Senate. ,DevonWeeks,e98or6j,conservative
What ground did Dems gain in the Senate?,S_D_W_2,e98nbg6,conservative
Net loss of 3 seats ,Snowmittromney,e98nxwx,conservative
"None/little in the Senate (seats flipping), but some in the House.",DeadHeadLibertarian,e98ngip,conservative
[deleted],,e99umqi,conservative
"?

The Senate is unaffected by gerrymandering. Senators are elected statewide.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99z90s,conservative
This is incredibly messed up. I hate Fox News but Tucker is the one guy on there that I actually like. He's a genuinely smart and good person and nowhere near what these people think he is. ,top-perro,e99st5u,conservative
"Also the left: ""Why are you so scared of people and think that you need firearms to protect yourself?""",MadLordPunt,e99ulzg,conservative
"If you aren't prepared to defend yourself and your family with lethal force if need be, you're doing it wrong.

This is only going to get worse. Be ready. ",ConsistentlyRight,e99wyb2,conservative
"Well it’s obviously Republicans. I mean it’s. It like democrats would act in a threatening or violent manner, right?

/s",justhere2havefun,e99s2bk,conservative
"Fucking brownshirt tactics.  And they call us nazis.
",Arm-the-homeless,e99ufhy,conservative
"Do not forget that these people want you broke, dead, your kids raped and brainwashed, and they think it's funny.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ajr4b,conservative
The left is hates you and wants dead.  Be prepared for more and more violence from them.,StraightNewt,e99t19u,conservative
"They wouldn't know that because they don't actually watch his show or listen to anything he has to say.  They just know he's on Fox News and therefore he must be an evil racist mouthpiece for right wing extremism.  He's an admirer of Teddy Roosevelt and actually agrees with Bernie about some things, but none of these idiots would know that because they don't actually care what he says or believes, just what he stands for in their minds.

",Arm-the-homeless,e99unqh,conservative
"These are the same people who call Shapiro a Nazi and ""White Supremacist"". They aren't dealing in facts, only in what is useful for their political movement.",ultimis,e9a1srt,conservative
rip mde,tifuforreal,e9azyfq,conservative
I'd love to see any updates on this! Anyone else have any news?,Gnome_Sane,e9asr4e,conservative
"I just love that all the people Obama campaigned for lost, LOL. ",Maswasnos,e985v7c,conservative
Democrats won’t admit that their strategy of maligning white people is back firing. Turns out humans don’t like being vilified just for existing.,trelium06,e989do7,conservative
">It’s okay we now got felons, I’m sure they will all vote and all vote Democrat in 2 years

Florida Democrats ",Enzo_SAWFT,e9880g6,conservative
"This made my week. I'm really happy that Scott and DeSantis were able to pull through, and even more happy that far-left Gillum got denied the governorship. ",ConservativeChicano,e98wisd,conservative
Can we encourage the Democrats here to move to California?,CoyoteBanned,e98dz63,conservative
"It’s hilarious to see the ass clowns in the media claim that the blue wave was a success when they were reporting until last night that said wave was going to help the dems take over the house and the senate. Instead they got a very small portion of what they targeted for the house, lost seats in the senate thereby strengthening the Republican majority there and then proceeded to lose governorships. ",TomahawkSuppository,e98jeg3,conservative
He would only appeal to democrats and socialists.  DeSantis was our best choice.  ,Neanderthalbastard,e99g5tq,conservative
"Let's take a WAG at this emotional response - because a black candidate did not win we're now going to try to call it ""soul crushing"" with the unlying message that it was due to ""racism""? Not just that all the Florida ""Crackers"" weren't keen on Demoncratic Socialism?",JFGFNY,e99gst5,conservative
They did gillum a favor.  Now he won't have to move all his shit twice when he goes to prison.,Vulgrr_Display,e99v1s0,conservative
"Very pleased that Gillum lost.

A corrupt, race baiting weasel. Really nasty guy.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e99zs5f,conservative
"I _almost_ feel sorry for them -- no, wait, that's a negatory",RomeoMyHomeo,e98lhp4,conservative
"thats why I'm not feel too bad about losing the house. Its going to be annoying while they bury the administration in subpoenas for bullshit, but all the races they put big big money behind didn't pan out. ",iwasthebeaver,e9867ua,conservative
Is this 100% true? If so that’s amazing ,trelium06,e988yk9,conservative
"Why are people still saying this? This isn’t true and ya very easily searchable on your own. 

I’m all about Obama’s loonies losing, but you’re literally spreading fake news.",Broseidons_Brocean,e99jecp,conservative
">Democratic consultant Steve Schale was among the Democrats still reeling from Tuesday night. He acknowledged the party has multiple problems, but he wasn’t sure how to solve them.

Double down of course! F_ck whites 2020! ",AmericanYidGunner,e98eo8a,conservative
Is it backfiring though? in just a few years demographics will win for them.,JMB_was_a_god,e98t27q,conservative
They’re already doubling down in Florida by blaming white women for DeSantis winning. I’m sure those white women will vote against Trump in 2020 if you call them racists for 2 years /s,Tau23481992,e99f1v8,conservative
"Yeah that, plus shifting demographics. I think Florida will be blue from here on out, unfortunately. ",stanleythemanley44,e98apzo,conservative
"> Florida Democrats

Disappointing that one of the ballot issues won that now allows some felons to vote, but the article notes the type of people to lazy to get off their ass and vote...and must surely include felons.  Since most of them are busy with repeat offenses I don't think they are going to take the time to actually vote.",stancrouch,e9898ou,conservative
"It wasn't all great.  Donna Shalalya, that troll from the Clinton administration, flipped a R seat in Miami.  Really, what the fuck were you all thinking there.",WIlf_Brim,e98xnq3,conservative
"Nah, Democrats are  fleeing Cali because they’ve ruined one of the most beautiful and resource rich places on Earth.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e98lzqh,conservative
"Please no. We have enough leftist morons running around out here. We're trying to gain some ground back, even though the effort is probably futile. ",Jagoff86,e98xj38,conservative
"> all the races they put big big money behind didn't pan out.

*for now*

The demographic situation gets worse for us and better for them by the day.

",lost_snake,e98jskv,conservative
"Yeah - the more the House Dems beclown themselves, the more likely the House flips back red in 2020.",Khalinov,e986f6w,conservative
"It isn't, Obama showed up for Casten in the Illinois 6th district. Casten beat Roskam who was a member of Congress since 2007. 

Roskam was the only member of Congress who served with Obama in the state Senate. That is probably why he showed up, and because the district went 7% positive for Hilldabeast. ",Nightshade37,e98nnhn,conservative
"Maybe not 100% true since I think he threw in some support for relatively safe Democrats, but as far as I know all the people he supported that were in contentious races lost. ",Maswasnos,e989ir4,conservative
Wouldn’t surprise me one bit.  All the shock factor was used up by mainstream Democrats this cycle.,t3ch21,e98hdxz,conservative
"They’ll split when they win.

Pretend for a moment that the Republicans are voted out of existence in 2020. In 2022 the Democratic Party would split into two or more parties.",trelium06,e98tdxm,conservative
"People have been saying this for a decade and it still hasn't been playing out.  I was a polisci major in undergrad and took a whole class on Florida's demographics and electoral makeup.  It was basically a case study in how if African-Americans and Hispanics actually turned out to vote, a Republican would NEVER win.  But here's the kicker: THEY DON'T VOTE.

For whatever reason, those two groups don't turn out which gives Republicans a chance.  I think it will be the same for felons after Amendment 4.  It drives me crazy that a ton of people on this sub are putting their fingers in their ears over the coming demographic problems for Republicans, but the fact of the matter is that the ""doom and gloom"" hasn't played out yet.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e98mdp9,conservative
"My grandfather in Fla. voted Republican until the day he died, after which he began voting Democrat, so there's that...",RomeoMyHomeo,e98lmcr,conservative
Not so sure. It’s a tough road but it can be won. Just need to spend the next two years showing why the Democrats are all talk. First thing is to let them try to push repealing the middle income taxes.,Enzo_SAWFT,e98cmo0,conservative
It was blue before. Most states change their color over decades.,ReaganTroll,e98azu5,conservative
">Disappointing that one of the ballot issues won that now allows some felons to vote

Just curious, but what state are you based out of?  Before Amendment 4, Florida was one of four states that had some weird clemency process to restore voting rights to convicted felons who served their sentence.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e98mibl,conservative
Also very disappointed with Rep. Carlos Curbelo. Definitely some painful loses mixed in.,ConservativeChicano,e98z479,conservative
shh. Its great there they should all go. Or NY. ,CoyoteBanned,e98n8gk,conservative
"Its a one party state. the best thing you can do is move to a purple state where you can shore up the majority taking your census and tax contributions with you. 

Since Democrats have become more and more intolerant of us you can expect they donw want to live near us either. If we can get them concentrated in California, NY, and Massachusetts while getting the conservatives out from behind enemy lines we would benefit. ",CoyoteBanned,e98xp9f,conservative
"Demographics are definitely an issue, but not insurmountable ",iwasthebeaver,e98l61q,conservative
The republicans are going to have to take a look at people like Rep. Brian Fitzpatrick as a blue print how to win back some of these suburban voters that Trump lost. ,iwasthebeaver,e986nx7,conservative
"Let the circus begin!

Edit: Also, [this](https://m.youtube.com/watch?reload=9&v=HDbxzdbvGhU) , but with “clowns” lol. ",etherealsmog,e986pgb,conservative
into left and socialist/communist. no one wins here.,JMB_was_a_god,e98toia,conservative
"The only time they did turn out to vote was for Obama, who had ""first black president"" points, and apparently that's a motivator for black turnout.",LewaLew,e99nh8t,conservative
">Most states change their color over decades.

Sometimes because the entire population changes - - California could have still been a red State had Reagan not signed IRCA 1986. 

Doing everything we can to slow and stop demographic changes favorable to the left is a must now.
",lost_snake,e98jwjx,conservative
"I still can't get over that.  Donna Fucking Shalayla?  She was a notable incompetent in a cabinet full of them, and then completely screwed up at University of Miami.

Among notable mess ups, [she was in up to her neck in the Nevin Shapiro mess.](https://www.google.com/search?q=donna+shalala+nevin+shapiro&safe=off&rlz=1C1GGRV_enUS751US751&tbm=isch&source=iu&ictx=1&fir=1JCdO9dkR33YsM%253A%252C5vi6bxZya7sgXM%252C_&usg=AI4_-kQD5nd1sI-3p3KFPcWvt7pYa2YE3w&sa=X&ved=2ahUKEwjosPiolsPeAhXjQd8KHRs8BZwQ9QEwAXoECAYQBA#imgrc=6ZYO-9oz-azF8M:)",WIlf_Brim,e990o61,conservative
"The Curbelo loss is really unfortunate. The guy was a moderate, but I always appreciated his status in the party. ",ColYok17,e99zp44,conservative
I would love to live there if it weren’t for the insane politics. Those sun-kissed hills are gorgeous.,tim_tebow_right_knee,e98ralf,conservative
"I'd love to move out of CA, but work and family are what's keeping me here.  All of my wife's family is in socal, and I don't wanna live there again. I'm still trying to convince my wife to move to AZ (closer to some of my family) or Vegas, which is only about 4 hours from her family. Until then, I'm stuck dealing with the crazies that run this state. ",Jagoff86,e990z3h,conservative
"He's my representative. While I really hate him on a number of issues (most notably 2A), I have to admit he's a perfect republican fit for PA-01. Very moderate but conservative enough when it matters.",lion27,e98imfi,conservative
Got any sources how she screwed up at UMIAMI ,_mooch,e9ahyt6,conservative
"With a job market like this, now is the time. ",CoyoteBanned,e991178,conservative
"I'm in district 4 like 1 block away from the dividing line for PA1, I'm tempted to try and get ahold of him and come up with a strategy for setting up a political machine to try AMD Flip PA4. Madeline dean didnt even have to campaign, with the right message it could get flipped. I just have to bring a big enough campaign donation check with me to get the meeting lol. ",iwasthebeaver,e98l03y,conservative
Read about the University of Miami health system acquisition of Cedars Sinai Hospital in Miami.  Total mess cock up.  The hospital was screwed up: the ORs had to be shut down for months following due to mold contamination: no due diligence was performed.,WIlf_Brim,e9aiugh,conservative
Hopefully. ,Jagoff86,e993q58,conservative
You might want to contact the PA GOP rather than Fitzpatrick's office. I can't imagine he'd care much about a district that isn't his own.,lion27,e98ld93,conservative
"As we just saw, the PA GOP is useless. He has a machine set up in bucks county that just fought off a huge well funded challenge. Getting his people to help out in the district literally right next door would only serve to help strengthen his own influence over a larger area which is really all politicians care about in the end. ",iwasthebeaver,e98lodv,conservative
"If he can't act like an adult, revoke his credentials",BrockLee76,e98tykg,conservative
"Trump: ""Here we go!"" =D",RomeoMyHomeo,e98t1ko,conservative
Confiscate his coat.,TransSpeciesMafia,e98wrvp,conservative
He straight up assaulted her. She should press charges. [It's all on tape (11:20).](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=8hcSt_27b4k),ngoni,e99bhpz,conservative
"I covered football at an SEC school and if someone pulled this stunt they would have lost their credentials or been on very thin ice. 

Like this is so incredibly unprofessional and completely uncalled for.",Rayburn8923,e993lut,conservative
"Someone else said that Trump likely keeps him there because he’s a good foil and makes Trump look good. I can see it, regardless of if it’s true. ",skarface6,e99goii,conservative
Done.,xKommandant,e99o06y,conservative
"You know, I thought the same thing.",unibuckeye,e99di8f,conservative
"She reached for it, he blocked it. I wouldn’t call that assault. ",chaos_m3thod,e99kf5v,conservative
Hey if we're going to go frame by frame and analyze Lewandowski then the same rules apply. Acosta clearly swatted her arm away. That's assault. And it's on HD camera footage from multiple angles.,ngoni,e99y750,conservative
"Wasn’t familiar with that incident so had to look it up. To me, in that video and frame by frame, lewandowski pursues that female and pulled her away. He actively did this. Acosta swatted away the intern, IMO, in a subconscious defensive method the same way anyone would do if someone reached for something they were holding. 

By definition, An assault is the act of inflicting physical harm or unwanted physical contact upon a person or, in some specific legal definitions, a threat or attempt to commit such an action. It is both a crime and a tort and, therefore, may result in either criminal and/or civil liability.

Some can argue that Acosta made unwanted physical contact with the WH aide so it could be considered assault, but if you include the second part, he did not make an active attempt.  Again IMO, it was a defensive gesture. What lewandoski did was actively pursue, place his hands on her and pulled the female away from Trump. 

These are different situations. ",chaos_m3thod,e9a1glo,conservative
"But you failed to research why Lewandowski was interested in the reporter. She made the same sort of unwanted contact with Trump that Abilio Acosta did with the intern. 

Regardless Abilio no longer reports from the White House so now he can finally get his own hour on TV which has been his grandstanding goal all along.",ngoni,e9ax2vy,conservative
"Did she bump into Trump or reach out for him? To me, it looks like they bumped into each other while waking since it was a crowded hallway. I did see Trump pull away but it’s a hard angle and bad resolution to see if she pulled at him to get his attention or maybe just bumped him. 

But back to your original statement, it would be a hard case to make for assault. ",chaos_m3thod,e9b7b0t,conservative
"Realistically, how much longer can Texas stay red? I feel the demographics are not in its favor leading into the future. I’ll take this W though.",MasterDoot,e97kq84,conservative
"Dem dropping by, as I sometimes do, and I appreciate you guys' open discussion of the reality of how close this was rather than blowhard victory cheering. Kudos.",2totwo,e97mo9q,conservative
Can't stop the Zodiac!,veritas_lux_mea91,e97ggcx,conservative
He can’t win a senate race but everyone is already flying the 2020 flag.  Even after he said he wouldn’t run.,R0binSage,e9867nn,conservative
It's unfortunate that it was so close. ,LumpyWumpus,e97dp6e,conservative
Odds Robert runs for president in 2020?,Marcheesio,e97dxtj,conservative
[removed],,e97kvyz,conservative
"This was a close race, and we need to use that as a wake-up call even though Cruz held on.",weeaboo_swordsman,e97i00l,conservative
anyone think he might be a dem dark horse candidate in 2020? The media seems to love him almost as much as they did Obama when he was running for office. ,nickebee,e97i6a6,conservative
[deleted],,e97meyf,conservative
"Why was this so close? I mean Veritas has his campaign all but admitting sending election funds south of the border,I don't understand ,did the people of Texas not know this?",modifieddevice,e97vcop,conservative
I go to UT Austin and am a Gov major. My congressional elections class on thursday is going to be so nice.,kevinlord190,e97utkq,conservative
I don't how many blue checkmark people on Twitter I have seen calling the people of Texas either stupid or evil for electing Cruz.,Ryan_Holman,e97l3dl,conservative
Did anyone see Beyonce’s last minute Instagram support for Beto??? Beto is so cool now.,elvispresley1313,e9821yp,conservative
"For everyone troubled by how close this was, let's put this in perspective. Ted Cruz is a politician so despised, his fellow Republican senators have publicly fantasized about the prospect of him being murdered. That happened; Lindsay Graham really said that. Now me, I like the guy; since he boarded the Trump train, with his shitposting and his Zodiac Killing Cryin' Jimmy Kimmel in the ring-ball arena, ~~Lyin'~~ ~~Complyin'~~ Lion Ted Cruz has grown on me. Even so, I half suspect he's actually an ophidian monstrosity from a place beyond the death of time who was summoned into this world when someone solved the Lament Configuration with instructions from the Necronomicon; at which point Cruz killed the poor bastard using the arcane knowledge graven in the darkness between the stars, donned his skin as a disguise, and commenced to wandering our realm seeking fresh prey. I say as a Cruz supporter I find that entirely plausible. 

Meanwhile, Beto was a photogenic skateboarding punk-rocker. He was everything you could ask a politician to be to pander to 90s kids, short of running one of the original Power Rangers, or a literal Sega Genesis console. Hell, I think the Dems may have won if they actually ran a Sega. Make the slogan ""Genesis does what Republican't"", shit, it might even work on me. And behind this charismatic media darling, they sank ~~100 million dollars. One hundred million; that's more than the GDP of Croatia.~~ (apparently only 69 million, more than the GDP of Honduras. Ironic). And they lost!

They ran a fucking rock star against a man who's listed in the D&D Monster Manual as an Aberration and who's roughly as beloved as the Hebrew translation of *Mein Kampf*, and spent more than the budget of the original trilogy backing him, and all they got was a participation trophy? That's horrible, that's an abject failure for the Dems. They suck. This was a once in a lifetime chance to score the biggest coup they could imagine, they had their war-chest hemorrhaging to make it happen, and in the end they failed. They shouldn't be happy, they should be terrified that Cruz will smite them for their hubris by invoking the sign of the Inverted Solar Logos and singing his Rhapsody of Annihilation. 

edit: changed Beto's campaign budget. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e98zfsc,conservative
I'm not stressing that it was close. Beto was funded out of state so he had more of a platform.,14thAndVine,e97ea3c,conservative
Glad to see that Texas is still Texas! ,GuitarWizard90,e97fqp6,conservative
Beta.,chabanais,e97dmup,conservative
"Glad for the victory, but Ted needs to do a lot of soul searching to figure out what made the race this close - aside from literally the entire machine of the Democratic Party trying to meme Beto into the leader of their party.",gizayabasu,e97j1gg,conservative
"This can’t be happening. I’m having a breakdown. I don’t want to believe the world is so corrupt. I want a future to believe in. I want Beto to be senator and fix this broken coubtry. I cannot deal with this right now. It wasn’t supposed to be like this, I thought he was polling well in Austin???",LonelyMachines,e97h9xh,conservative
I did my part living in a state without a tight race. I supported Cruz in 2016 and supported him all I could this year.,rwwman50,e97eltp,conservative
"Way too close.

Hey Liberals who just moved to Texas,

Why do you think job opportunities were so available in Texas? Was it magic?",Hayes_for_days,e97j1xm,conservative
Lol all that money the dems flushed down the toilet with this.,zeldaisaprude,e97e4eq,conservative
Over in Houston I'm following a lot of my Facebook feed who happened to lean left. I could pay off a Roman legion with the amount of salt coming from them,TheGlen,e97hiay,conservative
Beto luck next time.,r777m,e97jyw8,conservative
"The Dems are pushing hard to make TX blue. What is going on to stop this? Seems like you Texans face dual migration issues, (1) from south of the border, and (2) from failed liberal states like CA.",Lepew1,e9846lp,conservative
Thank God.,noiwontsharemyfries,e97pujg,conservative
[How could Beto have lost with supporters like this?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L_RFQxnizbQ),gaynazifurry4bernie,e97krms,conservative
"Great for keeping the senate majority, absolutely awful for Texas. ",xMoody,e97ovyk,conservative
"r/Texas right now: NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Post Whataburger meme",Kickmull,e97jwq8,conservative
Way too close,cartoon88,e97icqm,conservative
[removed],,e983p1p,conservative
"Whew , Ted! ",JimboJehosephat,e97i697,conservative
"All that money he raised, guarantee it came from out of state donations. ",ViolentMayfly,e97i3ml,conservative
"Beto luck next time! 

No blue wave will hit our shores. Texas strong. ",c_ward5,e97isbd,conservative
[removed],,e97iy0x,conservative
"“You’re welcome”
                     -Texas",jesparza6311,e97m0v4,conservative
"It just goes to show that no matter how many tens of millions of SorosBucks, California astroturf losers, and lying shill media you muster you can't make an Irishman pretending to be a Mexican into a Senator.",kaioto,e97fbi8,conservative
"Grats Ted Cruz. Grats Texas.

  


A big ""whew"" from Florida.",Patches1313,e97pb92,conservative
What the hell Texas?  Are you fellers down there going soft that you almost put in a lefty?,loki-things,e97o6ax,conservative
[Duh.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9stscn/poll_cruz_leads_orourke_by_10_points_in_texas/e8s59wy/),bipartisanscreeching,e97elub,conservative
"Bye bye Beta boy. I don't think we'll see much of him except on MSNPC and CNNPC, just ask all the people who thought Abortion Barbie was a winner even though she lost. ",DH5650,e981f99,conservative
nice,gaylorf,e985ypi,conservative
"Ted only beat Beto by a thin margin because he is Ted Cruz, after looking at counties like Williamson and Harris - any other Republican would have done better those counties, and possibly won it.

Cruz performed surprisingly well in the cities based on the total vote counts displayed per county. 

I'm very confident that Cruz's unlikable personality held the vote down, but wasn't enough to lose it to a Democrat. This is a good sign for the future of Texas because Cruz won't be there forever.",c_ward5,e98u6c8,conservative
"Beta supporters are already saying, well beta for president! 🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️",littlebit90_,e97iw5i,conservative
>Beta O'Rourke,tehForce,e98020m,conservative
YAAAAS! Thank you texans who voted for cruz.,ABlackKidOnTheNet,e97gwhl,conservative
and...... no one is surprised.,Stunner900,e97lxis,conservative
I drink the tears of Beto supporters.,Subrookie,e97m8da,conservative
"Oorah

Don't mess with Texas

Edit: Lol looks like I triggered ~14 leftists judging by my comment score",VoinaYMir,e97gdzp,conservative
Yeehaw,Kali1437,e97km0n,conservative
Barely.... Bearly? ,biergarten,e97n9zj,conservative
"Beto only had 200,000 more votes than his 2012 counterpart.   It doesn't look good though.  Beats me.  ",Roez,e97zn3r,conservative
"Another way to look at this is that the 200k lead was probably the high end Democrats should expect. Everything was stacked toward Beto. He had tens of millions of more dollars in donations/funding, he had endorsements from the local and mainstream media, movie actors, and musicians, many Republicans don't like Cruz, etc.",Demplition,e984uux,conservative
"This race is not representative of the actual Texas electorate. Beto had the benefit of 4 significant and unique advantages this cycle:

* (1) an insane amount of out-of-state money (he outspent Cruz >2:1), 

* (2) a disgraceful amount of fawning coverage by bootlicking sycophants in the national media propaganda mill (why in any universe is the clear underdog in a Texas statewide race getting endless facetime on The Late Show, Ellen, The View, etc.?). (edit: local media was also extremely biased in pushing Beto much harder and sycophantically than they ever have for popular Democrat candidates like Wendy Davis a few years ago).

* (3) Beto had the young/hip/""cool"" factor and a laughable cult of personality among idiot under-30 leftists. Other candidates will not be able to replicate this; the Democrats had the same problem with Obama, you cannot maintain the 'political messiah' campaign strategy or expand it into broader enthusiasm for the party beyond the one candidate.

* (4) Cruz had the opposite of this ""cool"" factor. He is not likeable as a person, his voice is grating/nasal-ey, he looks kind of like a salamander. When contrasted with Beto, it is very much like the notorious Nixon-Kennedy debate where the mere appearance and likeability makes a huge difference. Cruz also suffered a lot of damage in the 2016 primary race (Lyin' Ted, Fish Monster, caved to support Trump after such brutal personal attacks by Trump).


It is also clear that even with these unique advantages for Beto, the extremely conservative Governor Greg Abbott still won easily by over 13 points, meaning that a big chunk of Texas voters went for both Beto *and* Abbott, which is a real testament to the cult of personality for Beto mentioned above.",walter_r_kovacs,e98dipr,conservative
I've lived in Texas for a couple years now and I've seen ONE Cruz sign and countless Beto signs and shirts. Anecdotal but still spooky.,FireChickens,e97yv6c,conservative
"Not much longer, the Californians are coming since the companies are fleeing the taxes.",arnold_bernard1,e97p6kp,conservative
"Estimates I've heard is that it can hold red through 2024, at which point the demographics shift will turn it blue.

My fear is that not only will this make it basically impossible for the GOP to win the White House beyond 2024 since we'll be losing 36 reliable electoral votes, but if TX Representatives also start turning blue, the GOP on the national level is pretty much done.  Within 10 years, every remaining Red state would essentially become irrelevant while the Democrats maintain and unbreakable 2/3 to 3/3 control of the Federal government and can pass whatever they want.

",Min0taur,e9850du,conservative
"I will be moving to Texas in two years, from California. I will do all I can to Keep Texas Red. ",paulbrevik,e981udi,conservative
"We’re fine, this was a D wave year where Dems happened to nominate a spectacular candidate, spent tens of millions of dollars in this race and still lost. Cruz basically didn’t have to do anything.",1wjl1,e988acn,conservative
that's why R's need to engage the public more often. Go door to door. But it's hard when the entire media is left wing.,Nostraadms,e986h8p,conservative
I agree - CA was red until 88 and then Reagan fucked us big time and allowed illegals to be citizens. Fckn Reagan. ,5937539859582754,e97p254,conservative
"I don't know, I think Cruz is a pretty weak candidate. He's just not likable, however much you may like his policies. I think we need to get some fresh blood in there.",ETChunter95,e988skc,conservative
"Forever. Or well at least as long as Republican Govenors keep winning. Just look at the spread between how much Abbot won by, and the spread between Cruz and Robert Francis O'Rourke. Cruz is just generally disliked as a republican in Texas. I can almost guarantee that if Cornyn was up for re-election, then he'd blown Robert Francis O'Rourke out of the water. ",Big_Joosh,e98j54b,conservative
Exactly what I thought. This is one of the political subs that isn't completely toxic for their own side really that I've seen so far... ,JingyBreadMan,e97ozi5,conservative
"It was a squeaker. Not being there, I wonder if the problem was voter turnout or voter demographics or disapproval of Cruz or something else. Or all of the above.",Cakeinthebreakroom,e986m2v,conservative
"With how long it took for Zodiac Ted to pull ahead, I don't consider this a victory - I consider it a sign that we need to fix our fucking shit in places we thought were strongholds. ",soylent_absinthe,e98e1e9,conservative
This is one of the best subs for actual discussion. ,ripinpeppers,e98gf3u,conservative
Can't snooze the Cruz.,JeantheDragon,e97nudd,conservative
Here's to Honest Ted  🍻,ItsReasonOrTreason,e9854oy,conservative
https://i.redd.it/i2qmogee4vw11.png,Publix_Deli,e987l1s,conservative
Waaaaay too close. Hopefully this race put a fire under the GOP so Beto is a loser a second time too in whatever he runs for next. ,Dunkeliness,e97e4o1,conservative
Shows you how well the Demographic Replacement Program is progressing.,leftajar,e97jn34,conservative
Yep. Very bad sign when a gun grabber can come that close to getting elected in Texas of all fucking places. ,GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97hv27,conservative
[removed],,e97ktob,conservative
"Ehh... not really. Beto had a lot of money from out of state, and Cruz's relationship with Trump probably hurt him a lot in this race.",the1egend1ives,e97lbdq,conservative
"O'Rourke did outspend Cruz by something like $10,000,000 so I don't think the fact it was super close is that surprising. It was a big turnout year for democrats.",vitrael2,e98206q,conservative
"No way I'd ever vote for Beto, but I couldn't bring myself to vote for Cruz either. I would have voted for a more moderate Republican, though.",regollyek,e9835yt,conservative
I wonder if anything will come of the project veritas tape about DACA votes.  I have very little faith in the voting system in all states right now.,motherofmalinois,e97eah7,conservative
Let's see how the non-resident voting investigation plans out before we be too dismayed. ,Dial-1-For-Spanglish,e98dg2s,conservative
That is my problem. That should never happen. ,Jayttt98,e97mxxz,conservative
"Huge. Even when the Dems lose, they convince themselves they won. 

Beto ran a national campaign in a red state and they have a ton of money invested in him. It was close only because there are enough Republicans that just don't like Cruz on a personal level.

Beto is the young rising star of the left. And he's going to run hard left, possibly take up the torch for the fossil Sanders. Conservatives need to be aware of Beto and not dismiss him.",MajesticMulva,e97gqwx,conservative
Fairly high. ,skarface6,e97fhkh,conservative
Probably would have the best chance at beating DJT,5937539859582754,e97oysu,conservative
Better than Robert O’Rourke.,Bullet_Lad,e97lp58,conservative
How is Ted Cruz a scum bag?,5937539859582754,e97oy1h,conservative
"He's definitely in the mix. IMO it's him, Kamala Harris, or Corey Booker. They might bring out Biden to play it safe but those three are the young up and comers. 

Harris and Booker have the edge because they are sitting senators but Beto will be there. The big money on the left loves him so he has a shot. ",MajesticMulva,e97il8w,conservative
Oh sure and he won't run under the name Beto.  He'll try for the RFK name recognition if he goes national. ,GajahMahout,e97jfa2,conservative
"I don’t see it, he doesn’t have the experience, and he lost in the state he was in. Yes it’s Texas but that still means something. ",xPineappless,e97muc3,conservative
What are you talking about? He’s not going back to congress. He didn’t run for re-election in his district because he was running for senate. ,steadyflying,e97p067,conservative
"I don’t think he ran for the house, just senate. He wasn’t on my ballot and I’m in that district.  Edit: I just checked and Veronica Escobar just won that seat so Robert is out altogether from Congress. ",raygunnnnnn,e97ortu,conservative
You realize he had to give up his House seat to run right? He got replaced by another Democrat.,ardee2124,e97xr4a,conservative
"Lol this comment is so condescending and so ignorant.

He's not going back to Congress. He didn't run for reelection. ",WithANameLikeThat,e97q0nn,conservative
He retired from the House and voters elected Veronica Escobar to the seat.,torik0,e97pweq,conservative
"Worse still, Ted looked weak...in Texas 

3%  while a win, is something that hasn’t happened in 30 years.
This might turn into Ted’s last term (If he ran again it would be in a presidential year when the dems usually have an bigger showing anyway.)",Tolken,e97o1cr,conservative
"> He came within striking distance in Texas, which means he would have easily won in any blue/purple state,

The Dems were pushing O'Rourke so aggressively because turning Texas blue has been a fantasy of theirs for a long time. Really doesn't have much to do with him being a great candidate.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97trwg,conservative
"Except he didn't run for the congressional seat, a different Dem won on it (Texas 16th).",crazymonezyy,e97rdi3,conservative
"Ted Cruz isn’t a very likable guy, and many people vote on that alone. ",Caltex88,e97z34e,conservative
"Cruz was running against more than beto. Beto is like a combination of the DNC Bankroll, College kids, and a good portion of mexico.",lulshitpost,e9819qo,conservative
"Lefties dismiss anything from Veritas as ""fake news."" ",Hayes_for_days,e98ggdk,conservative
you going to bring some spare packs of crayons and coloring books?,aCreditGuru,e987erw,conservative
"They're just showing their true faces. Their dislike for Trump and all Republican politicians is just a thin mask barely hiding their classism and intolerance. Two virtues that they claim to be against. Everyone, hold them to their own standards and call them out on Twitter.",zephz,e97nig4,conservative
"Well, so was Cruz",BuSpocky,e97h4m1,conservative
Barely. ,BuSpocky,e97h2lv,conservative
[deleted],,e97g24n,conservative
Thank God the scumbag trying to flee the scene after a drunk crash didn't get elected. I don't trust that weasel one bit.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97grgq,conservative
Lot of thought into that one mate. Good work.,harriharris,e97ow3i,conservative
Cruz=ALPHA,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97ih3d,conservative
"Beta raised $70m and spent $60m of it on this race (versus Ted’s $40m/$30m). That doesn’t include the PAC and soft spending. I think Ted did very well considering he was outspent by 50% and defended against the full force of the DNC, the national Leftist media, the Democratic Senatorial Campaign Committee, Soros, and all the others. ",DoktorKruel,e97p4kt,conservative
"How could he lose? He skateboards and eats Whataburger, this is so fucked",dhighway61,e97ht2c,conservative
"By perpetuating this stereotype, aren’t you too perpetuating the stereo type that republicans are insensitive dicks who don’t have any policies or ideas other than not be democrat? These types of comments are what tear this country apart, “I win and you’re stupid because you lost” - is that who you want to be? Is that what you want our country to be? ",itsreaditpeople,e97l795,conservative
Damn you left out my favorite bit about the nugs,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e97inn4,conservative
"If you want a good laugh you should watch ""The Final Year"" the documentary on Obama's Whitehouse.  One of the greatest unintentional comedies ever.  I literally giggled as they talked about all they accomplished and how Hillary would carry on their work.  It ends with Ben Rhodes crying on a park bench and the Samantha Powers Victory Party in stunned silence.",DS552014,e97iura,conservative
[removed],,e97l2sz,conservative
"In light of the national implications, such efforts are appreciated.",MillennialDan,e97iprh,conservative
[removed],,e97o68m,conservative
Flushed down the toilet? What exactly do you think happens to unused campaign dollars?,memejets,e97pxd3,conservative
Glad they spent it on Texas.  Please spent a billion next time.  For $1 million I will vote.,Davidk921921,e97knho,conservative
"Such fucking idiots right? Dems are dumb, republicans are smart.",itsreaditpeople,e97mz6t,conservative
"I have lots of friends here in DFW who were very very hateful last night, only to be a little more compassionate and understanding this morning. All the news sites are posting about the first Muslim congresswoman, first black something, etc so now they’re happy again. I don’t understand. ",fitnurse6,e986rto,conservative
File Under: Things that couldn't be any more cultureless-ly leftist and 'suburban white'.,zephz,e97nqds,conservative
59 million well spent,-Shank-,e97m6pc,conservative
Yep. The left still can't meme.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97tt1h,conservative
Explain.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97to2r,conservative
How close was it? I thought he was up 9.,Upasaka-paul,e97ivsi,conservative
"Democrats don't care about you that care about getting and holding power, and they will stomp on whoever it takes to accomplish this.",youngtxs,e983qh7,conservative
Yeah. His name is Robert Francis,chasemuss,e97p7ux,conservative
"No, of course not...




He’s a fake Mexican.",ReecesPieces213,e97m1ep,conservative
"But you almost can, and that's something to worry about",BuSpocky,e97h8ez,conservative
"I mean, Ted isn't his real name - and he's  a Canadian - so anything is possible ? ",flaminhotcheeto,e97ig34,conservative
Lots of people migrating from California these past few years..,FecalMist,e984fgq,conservative
Letting Californians in was a mistake. ,IVIaskerade,e97q2d0,conservative
It’s all the folks from blue states trying to bring their shitty politics here. Not on my watch.,EvilMEMEius,e97p6gw,conservative
Welcome!,EvilMEMEius,e97ozya,conservative
"Texan speaking up to second this.  This was probably the ideal situation for Democrats to take a seat.  Cruz isn't that well liked and ""Beto"" was loved.  If he couldn't pull it out in this election I don't see it happening for several more.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9880h2,conservative
"> Cruz had the opposite of this ""cool"" factor. He is not likeable as a person

This is constantly said, along with the idea that Cruz gives a car salesman vibe. For some reason, this goes over my head. I find him to be the most charismatic and outstanding politician in America.",mask_and_knife,e991tc5,conservative
"In Houston, I see both Beto and Cruz signs everywhere. I've always considered my city to be very balanced, but going to /r/houston won't give you that perception. ",OutFromUndr,e982ejn,conservative
"> I've seen ONE Cruz sign and countless Beto signs and shirts.

Maybe anecdotal evidence but in maine my commute passes some prime sign locations. Whenever I'd spot signs for republican candidates one day they'd be gone after a few days and more democrat candidate signs would be in their place. Obviously a different ballgame when talking about people's yards but it was pretty sad to see. ",Captinfucker,e98f4lf,conservative
"Cruz hasn't an ounce of charisma (I say this as a fan of his) and conservatism is so fractured into different groups that don't all support each other. In spite of this and in spite of the Democrats spending a bazillion dollars, Cruz still won. I don't think Texas has anything to worry about.

Political signs can give you a false impression of reality. I'm from MA. Elizabeth Warren didn't spend a cent on her campaign, I didn't see one ad or one sign. Diehl I saw everywhere, and he still got blown out. Diehl never had a chance in MA and Beto never had a chance in Texas. These states are what they are.",123hig,e982734,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/lKPaHzp.jpg?1,Ninja_ZedX_6,e985a81,conservative
"Fleeing a socialist state, but keep voting blue. It's like a pattern with these people, some form of cognitive dissonance. Or when the Muslims flee a country where the Sharia is the state law, moving to functioning western democracies, and keep demanding Sharia, from which they fled. ",ginkavarbakova,e97trhq,conservative
"Even the most blue county - Travis - had 120,000 Cruz voters compared to Beto's 400,000.   


And that was Ted Cruz, people like me were forced to move here for IT jobs, and we like low taxes and support Rs over Ds.   


Texas will remain red for awhile. ",c_ward5,e98uhc0,conservative
"First of all, this assumption is ridiculous. Ds has a pretty good night in TX because they had a pretty good night nationally. TX is still roughly 10 points redder than the rest of the country, the R governor still won easily.

Second, Dems are not going to take back the Senate for a long time at this rate. They are going to need 5-6 flips (6-7 if you assume Doug Jones will lose in AL) to win the chamber in 2020.",1wjl1,e988e7m,conservative
Yes. Republicans are worse at public engagement than Democrats.,8K12,e98bved,conservative
Yep love this sub,ChuanFaFist,e97yi0l,conservative
"Cruz is still kind of a damaged candidate from the 2016 run. As noted Beto only exceeded previous Dem vote totals by 200k with all the outside money and friendly media. Cruz hasn't been rebuilt up from his 2016 loss yet. Those on the Trump Train still hold a grudge, those die hard conservatives are sometimes holding a different grudge.

He really was at his weakest point here. ",aCreditGuru,e9873ao,conservative
"As much as I approve of Cruz, I think it had a little bit to do with not having a fresh face on the ballot. Beto's campaign seemed to have a lot of energy surrounding it. Also, people want legalization. Everyone I knew that was favoring Beto cited this as the primary reason for their vote however, every time I heard Beto speak he didn't come off as that intelligent or he knew what the hell he was talking about. He also never tried to appease the right in any face alienating a huge base. All of his stances, especially on the second amendment, were way left. If he would have done that, he might have won the damn thing. 

To add, I think the GOP would landslide if they would get behind legalization. It makes sense.",N7_Starkiller,e98quwr,conservative
I don’t care for Cruz but I love this saying. ,hundreds_of_sparrows,e97oy35,conservative
Like president? Those people invested so much fucking money into him. I don’t think he’s going to just fade away ,kotov9syndrome,e97eqoq,conservative
It’s only a matter of time before Texas inevitably turns blue...,Hohenschweinen,e97q7dc,conservative
"*Right?*

We lost the war a long time ago ",Hohenschweinen,e97qajk,conservative
"Greg Abbott was re-elected by a 13 point margin running against a Hispanic woman, so I read Cruz margin of victory as having to do more with his personal popularity and not that of the party,",ujorge,e97x5ul,conservative
Texas gun culture is quite overstated. ,steeled_iron,e97l230,conservative
"* Require background checks for all gun sales to ensure that firearms only get into the hands of responsible, law-abiding individuals. This means finally closing the gun show, online, and boyfriend loopholes.

* Stop selling weapons of war and high-capacity magazines to ensure that firearms designed to kill as effectively and efficiently as possible on the battlefield aren’t used in our schools, our streets, our churches, and our concerts.    
 
* Block the erosion of Texas’ license to carry standards by opposing Concealed Carry Reciprocity, which would force Texas to allow anyone from states with weak to nonexistent conceal carry laws to disregard our own public safety requirements.

 * Fully support federal research on gun violence so that we can better understand and address its root causes.

this is off his site, care to explain where here it says he's going to be *taking away anyones guns*

oh yah, it doesn't... you're just trying to smear him on a single issue ",DapperMasquerade,e97pq91,conservative
"Because liberty is so much better than tyranny. Because capitalism is so much better than socialism (even ""democratic"" socialism). Because integrity is so much better than cynical lying demagoguery.",PhilosoGuido,e97vfcc,conservative
"Immigration alone should be a no-brainer, I’d think. Irishman wants open borders and also wants socialized medicine. Where’s that money coming from? I’m sure as heck not interested in that.

This is coming from someone who isn’t a huge fan of Cruz too.

Edit: if you want to downvote, why don’t you comment with your reasoning? 

Edit2: Now I’ve got people with too much time on their hands going through my post history to downvote! ",WaningWaffle,e97merp,conservative
Mainly his platform. ,steeled_iron,e97l3ez,conservative
There is now a video about DACA people voting in TX. ,prplmze,e97uu27,conservative
"The Democrats spent $80 million on this race and lost. That's $80 million that could've gone to defending Donnelly, Heitkamp, and Nelson.  

That's a pretty big strategic victory. ",psstein,e97h7m7,conservative
"""Even when dems lose they convince themselves they won""

You're not kidding at all. Ask r/politics where the blue wave went, and they will say ""the one in the house"" 


So winning only one house, by a slim margin, next to a right leaning pres, senate, and supreme court is a blue wave huh?",Themusician67,e97h3k2,conservative
Beto could be the beige bernie the left wants. ,IVIaskerade,e97pu8j,conservative
All the repubs (and 1 dem) I voted for lost. I don't follow Ted Cruz so no ideas about him. Anyone else? ,dynamic-bacon,e97lsck,conservative
[removed],,e97mk70,conservative
"Exactly this. Cruz is not ideal, just better than the cancer that is Beto.",Flaboss44,e97ltft,conservative
[removed],,e97oct2,conservative
Running Harris would be the dumbest thing Dems could do. Which means its exactly what they're going to do.,Marcheesio,e97jjq5,conservative
"I personally think they’ll push Biden as a sacraficial candidate. He can’t run in 2024 because he’ll be too old, but he could reasonably put up some challenge against trump. If he loses, the democrats don’t lose fresh blood like they would if Beto won nomination and lost.",original_walrus,e97ltbk,conservative
Julian Castro is another dark horse.,the_guitargeek,e97lub0,conservative
"Considering his own party don't like him, I think it should be his last year.",BD1304,e97p966,conservative
Ted hurt himself badly with his behavior in the GOP presidential primaries.,StraightNewt,e97p1tx,conservative
Send him to the Supreme Court then...,ujorge,e97x830,conservative
It's probably more because of all the Californians who've moved into Texas.,noiwontsharemyfries,e97pv7a,conservative
Maybe so but Texas needs to take this as a fucking Warning Sign Man I mean I don't really want another state of California,modifieddevice,e98aty7,conservative
"Nah, I'll just be watching them try to say it is a historic victory.",kevinlord190,e98kpnh,conservative
Cruz had 18 full time staffers in his campaign. Beto had 805...,2A_is_the_best_A,e984vsx,conservative
Cruz spent *10 million less* and did not try as hard as beto.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e97ijtf,conservative
governor abbott is also getting re elected with 15% margin. cruz issues are his own. same with pete sessions that just lost his dallas area house seat.,dtlv5813,e97j24i,conservative
Not really. We lost the house ,flinstone001,e97h3jp,conservative
Ted Kennedy won tho.,chabanais,e97guqu,conservative
[removed],,e97kt2f,conservative
My 1 word caused you to generate 9 so...agreed.,chabanais,e98859l,conservative
#😭,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97yw72,conservative
"Okay, this is epic. ",sleepyradio182,e97k05e,conservative
"Right. All things considered this should still have been a cakewalk for Ted, even if the Democrats threw the moneybags to try to make Beto a thing. At the very least it should serve as something to think about, whether it's with his campaign or changing demographics of Texas. A win is a win, but it shouldn't be this close.",gizayabasu,e97pfa2,conservative
It’s the end of the world!!,ChaosBlaze9,e97i0bw,conservative
"whataburger? damn, i love that place when i'm in the south. how could a clearly wholesome and genuine candidate like mr. o'rourke have lost given that? /s

(whataburger is incredibly tasty, in all seriousness)",fireball3k,e97o7b2,conservative
"> These types of comments are what tear this country apart

Nope.  I'm pretty sure we can chalk that up to histrionic protests, Russia conspiracy theories, Nazi calling, and weaponized sexual assault allegations. ",LonelyMachines,e9865e1,conservative
The fun police isn't sending their best I see. ,unclemanpossum,e97ndcw,conservative
"That's not even a stereotype. I vote republican because I'm a certified moron. Can't even open my own juicebox or ride the full-length school bus. Trump 2020, baby!",LegitimateProfession,e97peju,conservative
"Caring about people is so stupid isn’t it! Trying to make the world a better place, caring about the work you do, what a waste of time!",itsreaditpeople,e97l3xo,conservative
Is that on any streaming websites?,Ryan_Holman,e97kyfu,conservative
I like him. I've agreed with him in all the debates I've seen him in. I don't know much more about him than that though. ,unclemanpossum,e97naw6,conservative
Probably someone capable of expressing themselves without profanity.,rwwman50,e97l4ue,conservative
"> Generally people are not too keen to move to the Lone Star State, but Texans for some odd reason think people are clamoring to.

It probably has something to do with the fact that [almost a million Americans have moved to Texas from other states in the last 7 years](http://www.newgeography.com/content/005837-the-migration-millions-2017-state-population-estimates). The only state that attracted more interstate migration during that period was Florida, which is mostly just retirees.",Publix_Deli,e9882tl,conservative
"He's not talking about the unused money, he's talking about the money that was poured into ads that would have been more useful going to a closer race.",wolfman1911,e97u93v,conservative
They sound like cats in a wood chipper. ,gaynazifurry4bernie,e97nu9g,conservative
about 3% at the moment,truls-rohk,e97k76k,conservative
"From the cbs reporting I saw, 51% to 49%. ",ksferg,e97lnq3,conservative
"Sen. Cruz is much ""Ted"" for being named Edward just like Senator Kennedy was. I can't blame him for using his middle name considering ""Vote Ralph Jr."" sounds awful.

Irishman Robert Francis O'Rourke trying to put ""Beto"" on everything to pander for Hispanic votes, however ... isn't that textbook ""cultural appropriation"" the NPCs are always ball-babying about? ",kaioto,e97k7qv,conservative
"Count your chickens fam. A decade ago it was unthinkable that Texas would be this close. Also, Cruz is a widely recognised republican figure, much more so than Beto was before the election, and Trump's endorsement definitely helped rally the anti Cruz/pro Trump conservatives behind Cruz.

It's very possible that a decade from now, or maybe even less, Texas turns blue.",nameerk,e98906x,conservative
"I guess aesthetics are in the eye of the beholder to some extent, but I totally see the unlikableness for Cruz even though I largely agree with him on most issues and think he is a really solid Senator from my state.",walter_r_kovacs,e99j88q,conservative
Can confirm my neighborhood everyone had a sign whether it be a Cruz or Beto sign in their yard.,etibbs,e983f8e,conservative
"The corporations make the decision to move; not the people working for them. The people obviously go where the jobs are. And younger, college educated people tend to vote blue.",English_Mothafukka,e98272v,conservative
"> It's like a pattern with these people

They're locusts. My brother calls them the Yankee Swarm after he watched them ruin Nashville.",Publix_Deli,e987h49,conservative
"It's complete stupidity. I'm sorry, but things like this demonstrate, to my mind anyways, that the left is no longer a legitimate political entity. Up to around 20 years ago you could view them as a bunch of people with a different view of how to run the country, but you could at least take their ideas in good faith. Now, it's pretty much openly advocating for destroying things.",mask_and_knife,e97zuud,conservative
I hope you're right.,Min0taur,e98cpzx,conservative
"not really...when the media is full blow leftist, it's expected.",Nostraadms,e98e83k,conservative
 I lurk here all the time just cause it’s nice hearing from across the aisle without reading constantly Kek and bigly victories and all that bullshit.  Plus the politics sub  is 90% a circlejerk and that gets annoying quick. ,Catdaddypanther97,e986hmi,conservative
He raised fucking $69m,khoodgrindin,e97hmt5,conservative
"Remember Jon Ossoff?

Exactly ",greeneyedunicorn2,e97foqn,conservative
"He kept a ton of money in his campaign war chest, right?",skarface6,e97fg2u,conservative
I’m seeing people on twitter wanting him to run for president ,213_,e97gu4m,conservative
He's not going anywhere anytime soon. Hollywood libs see him as a long term investment. ,Dunkeliness,e97f8sj,conservative
NPR was saying *we* almost won Texas and Beto will probably run for president in the future after this victory.  ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97j500,conservative
No refunds,-Shank-,e97gysk,conservative
Every other Republican in the state won pretty easily ,JobieWanKenobi,e982kq4,conservative
I give it until 2020,Dunkeliness,e97rgip,conservative
Very possible. Cruz has the likeability of a dead fish. ,GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97ysfl,conservative
"I live in Austin, lean slightly left of center, and had many more points of agreement with Beto's campaign than Cruz's. Went out and voted for Cruz solely because of Beta's gun stances.

¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯",gunsbootsandwhiskey,e9828ri,conservative
"Today I voted, loaded our truck, drove to a ranch, watched two deer fight, failed to find a hog to shoot and then returned home to clean 3 rifles. 

If anyone takes away Texas guns then they should expect their properties to be decimated by wild hogs - this is my first hunt in months that did not result in pork coming home. ",dzlux,e97lxye,conservative
"Are you positive? I have lived in Texas my entire life, ran with a bunch of different crowds, and guns are still seen in a positive light. Fuck, ccw classes are so common now and I've heard so many people who DONT actively shoot say ""well I'll get it just in case""",FuckingTexas,e9812xi,conservative
"> this is off his site, care to explain where here it says he's going to be *taking away anyones guns*

>oh yah, it doesn't... you're just trying to smear him on a single issue 

Wrong. In his own damn words he advocated banning AR-15s:

https://mobile.twitter.com/betoorourke/status/983481280573538305?lang=en",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97pyxd,conservative
The 2nd point... gun bans are taking guns. You literally wrote it out then said it's not happening? Why lie like that?,dsclouse117,e986x6p,conservative
[removed],,e97mwzh,conservative
[removed],,e97ldql,conservative
"no wonder donnelly lost. well, not that i'm complaining as a hoosier.",fireball3k,e97nvz8,conservative
Sad to see the Court considered a partisan body. ,SuurAlaOrolo,e97kj8t,conservative
"You’re suggesting Dems believed they were going to win the Presidency and Supreme Court in the midterms? 

AFAIK most Dems have only been expecting to take the House whereas the Senate would most likely not be taken because majority of seats up were Dems.

They did lose some key races they wanted to win, so in that sense the “Blue Wave” wasn’t quite up to par, but the net result is the same.",duuuuumb,e97nny8,conservative
Its all damage control there. They're saying that Beto/Gillum/The Senate was all just a pipe dream as if they weren't hyping those races up as real possibilities.,Marcheesio,e97htod,conservative
[removed],,e97l162,conservative
Do you even hear yourself.,jay_hubs,e97o5k9,conservative
"He’s a rich, privileged white guy selling socialism to poor people and minorities. ",DoktorKruel,e97oq0m,conservative
Cruz is not out to get our guns and ruin our economy with higher taxes.,Bullet_Lad,e97mu7f,conservative
Because O’Rourke is a socialist gun-grabber that is pro-open borders?,Bullet_Lad,e97p87e,conservative
Harris / Clinton 2020. Screencap this,bridgecrewdave,e97lw66,conservative
What did he do in the primaries? It was the first I'd really heard of the man and I was rather impressed with the showing.,MarioFanaticXV,e97umdw,conservative
But they both received tons of out of state funding. ,BuSpocky,e986hgk,conservative
Beto also was texting every single person in Texas to vote for him. I received a total of five text messages since June.,Herschey,e97k70p,conservative
Did not try as hard? It was a political death match! ,BuSpocky,e97pghl,conservative
wow yea cruz is divisive as hell even among his own party,GeoStarRunner,e97mk0a,conservative
"Very true. 

If it weren't for Trump coming to bail him out, he would have been toast. The man is smart, but just unlikable completely. You can't run Cruz's against the Beto's for much longer. You gotta run the Nikki Haleys or the Josh Hawleys and the John James'. In the case of John James, you know, actually SUPPORT HIM. 

Beto has a lot going for him in the current climate. He's like a Sims character of every liberal populist hallmark. 

1. kind of ugly, but kind of cute
2. muh new JFK????
3. fluent in "" woke viral tweet"" speak
4. sings the gospel of marijuana, $15 dollar minimum wage
5. will give socialism a handjob, but not a full on blowie
6. officially celebrity-who-doesn't-live-in-this-state endorsed
7. danced on ellen
8. dreamy ""im white but im self hating so its ok that im white"" vibe                           
(bonus hispanic sounding name!)
9. well known for his ""insert cultural/identity related polemic speech here"" than policy
10. ""guns are scary, but im moderate, but seriously turn in your guns""

I'm so, so pleased another democratic charlatan failed, but the GOP needs to start competing with these DNC Manufactured Woke Candidates or else they'll start losing red states because they run old candidates who refuse to evolve. 

&#x200B;",ZeroTheCat,e97lfv0,conservative
"No, cruz “issues” are you being demographically replaced in your own home",lipidsly,e97kdrv,conservative
"I somewhat agree, trump did real damage to Cruz in ‘16. That said it was still way too close for comfort.",ithinkmynameismoose,e983jm3,conservative
But it was expected. Part of the normal House cycle. ,SexAddictRecovery,e97h5lg,conservative
I’m just looking at the declared seats right now. Are the other races pretty much over?,samurguy990,e97hdie,conservative
Black page in the book of US politics. Glad we didn't see a repeat today.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97h0n3,conservative
Did he flee crash or flee the scene? Not saying it’s still ok but one is an order of magnitude greater than the other.,spadmin,e97l7r2,conservative
Fleeing the scene of a crime is a bit further along in the no morality department. Especially if sober ,MilitaryGuineaPig,e97ldh3,conservative
"Easy there, we're conservatives, not honest people who judge ourselves and others reasonably. GTFOH with that morality shit.",LegitimateProfession,e97pbiz,conservative
"> If you fuck it up yes. The only lasting legacy of Obama's foreign policy is the billions he gave Iran for them to fund proxy wars throughout the Middle East. They were so much smarter then everybody else because they just knew Iran would use it help their people and give up their dreams of nuclear weapons.

",DS552014,e97ljl9,conservative
"LOL, you think those people care about you? You are a pawn to them.",thetompain,e9847vm,conservative
HBO,DS552014,e97l3lv,conservative
Not on my Christian Reddit!,harriharris,e97oyfs,conservative
Damn 2% is close,Room480,e97nfht,conservative
"""Beto"" is a common nickname for Roberto (Robert) and given he's from a major spanish-speaking community it really isn't a stretch that he's been called that forever right? What aspect of  growing up/raised in a Hispanic community is considered appropriation? Doesn't it at that point just become your identity/culture regardless of your last name?

Edit: I should be clear - this is all just to say criticize Beto for something legitimate, but I don't see him pretending to be something he's not",flaminhotcheeto,e97kysf,conservative
"""I keep slamming my head into the wall doc, you have any idea why it hurts?"" ",Krieger117,e984l10,conservative
"Yeah lol, the left control all media and still dont blow us out of the water ",SussyPiff,e99ghyp,conservative
About half of it in the last 3 months.,ubmt1861,e97hogy,conservative
Most from out of state correct?,neemarita,e97jzyi,conservative
He didn't raise even a tenth of that from Texas.,kaioto,e97kaht,conservative
That's crazy,Martensight,e97l9nq,conservative
Who?,gizayabasu,e97ixty,conservative
"What I looked at showed he raised $69m and spent 59

https://www.opensecrets.org/members-of-congress/summary?cid=N00033540

Don’t know how accurate this is",khoodgrindin,e97hob9,conservative
I dream of a day when no one gives a shit what anyone on Twitter thinks. ,ThouArtMortal,e97i5s9,conservative
"While true, we *need* Texas 

Last night should be alarming. It would be like Ted Cruz losing by 2% in New York. A professed gunbrabber almost got elected in *Texas* 

Get this through your head: There is no realistically viable way for Republicans to ever win the Presidency again if we lose Texas...",Hohenschweinen,e98yvk8,conservative
"Yeap, but in all fairness I thought about the following after sending my previous message: Cruz had to fight against the millions of dollars that O’Rourke raised and spent to win this race plus the millions more in free media that O’Rourke got from the media.

That had to be worth about a couple percentage points among the suburbs and even in the big cities.  Also, I got at least some anecdotal evidence (which isn’t much to be honest) that some older Hispanics voters thought that O’Rourke was Hispanic.  I don’t know how many votes he got from that, but there you have it.

The lesson to learn from this for the GOP is that if you’re going to have a polarizing politician in elected office, do it in Texas or any other big red state (like Georgia) as that would attract millions of dollars from wealthy liberals wanting to score a big one against our side.  Just imagine if all that Beto cash would have gone to Florida or Arizona instead...",ujorge,e988gkb,conservative
Thank you for that. I’m glad you see how important the 2A is. ,SovietUrsa,e98ejm4,conservative
"Also live in Austin, typically lean left on social issues like abortion and marijuana.

Beto's 2A stance was just horrific, he lost because of it. No way in hell he would get my vote with that garbage.   


Plus I like Cruz's tax stance, Cruz was my guy for this one. ",c_ward5,e98usj8,conservative
Wild hogs are not something that your average gun control voter has to contend with.,Cardiff_Electric,e983j5x,conservative
[removed],,e97ovr8,conservative
"That sounds exactly like my Sunday evening, minus the voting. Went to the ranch, watched two mule deer fight, looked for hogs and didn’t find any. Saw a couple whitetail, but they were across the fence. Found some neat skulls for my carving projects though. ",Ask_Me_About_Mormons,e97neqh,conservative
"Guns are still seen as a good thing in Texas. However a lot of my conservative friends voted Beto bc they think Cruz is a massive slimy rat of a politician. 

My opinion was/is that Beto was just Obama 2.0 as he spoke in a cadence that sounds good, but will wear you out over time. Plus his policies were based on Relativism which are terrible. ",StocksNBonds,e983eof,conservative
"I mean, sure, stories about people you hang out with are nice. Talk to me when TX passes constitutional carry though. ",steeled_iron,e985jdf,conservative
"*thinly veiled racism* 

So is every other post scarcity country racist? Most have far stricter immigration controls than we do.  

And the meme about “your taxes won’t increase just rich peoples” is bullshit and everyone knows it, including democrats.  Right up there with “you can keep your doctor” and “health insurance premiums won’t increase”. ",wrath__,e97nfu0,conservative
"And you think the rich are going to pay for all this “free” healthcare? I don’t care if it’s Donald Trump or your fav liberal movie star. They are and have been paying as little taxes as possible. It’s just rich bleeding heart libs get a pass for being hypocrites. When you talk “free” healthcare you’re talking regulations and tax hikes on small businesses and the middle class. Walmarts and big businesses can overcome these hikes while it puts small businesses in a bind, i.e. competition. People who don’t pay taxes shouldn’t be allowed to vote. No one is stopping immigration into this country. ",Kwisstopher,e97nr3j,conservative
"Robert is for open borders and is anti-gun. Can you imagine a situation where we have potentially dangerous immigrants crossing the border without going through any kind of security system? If that isn’t bad enough, now you don’t have guns to defend yourself and your loved ones. Is that a situation you want to be in?

On top of that, how many immigrants is Robert O’Rourke going to put up in his home? How many are you?

While I’m not in support in everything that our military is doing, I do recognize that without a strong military, it opens the door to more potential threats. Ideally, I’d prefer to have a strong military and use it much less than we do now. I’m definitely not going to leap a mile left and agree that open borders is ever a good thing. If you think it is, please provide any amount of evidence to educate me.

Also, you DO realize that the upper echelon of wealth in the USA pays about 50% towards taxes, right? You think we should just keep adding on that number? If so, how much? There’s nothing stopping them from bailing to another country. Now there’s no money from them. People love America because of the opportunity that it has to offer. If that’s gone, they bail. It seems relatively straightforward.

If we socialize medicine, what’s to stop people from now asking for food, clothing, and housing? It’s not my job or any billionaire’s job to pay for someone who won’t work for success themselves.",WaningWaffle,e97nwuu,conservative
Of not being an insane leftist? Have you read Beto's platform?,WhyDidIDie,e97nh9v,conservative
"Ahhh the [political thicket.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hi8NCQbOZvc) Honestly if you have a chance, listen to this episode of ""More Perfect"". It's one of their best.",Big_Joosh,e97kvol,conservative
"They always have been. Why? Because people arent robots and have opinions about things. Should they do their best to constraint it in attempt to be impartial? Sure. Absolutely. But lets be honest.... Who is really doing that as often as they should as they hear cases, make rulings, and write dissents? 

Yea. We all know what the answer to that one is. ",Themusician67,e97m5ug,conservative
[removed],,e97lr4a,conservative
Except when your side does it?  Right?,Rogdaddy,e97xlar,conservative
"I know what cruz stands for. I voted for him in the primaries. 

Sorry trump. ",Themusician67,e97m1oz,conservative
Wut,MilitaryGuineaPig,e97la7p,conservative
[removed],,e97n663,conservative
[removed],,e97n7wb,conservative
After losing the primaries he chose to not endorse the Trump for president and helped divide the republican party coming up to the general election.  Sore losers are seldom well liked.,StraightNewt,e98gvcu,conservative
Even those who don't even live in Texas. I've still got my phone number but I haven't been a Texas resident for over 10 years.,bejeavis,e97o5na,conservative
Did you sign up for them? I've never gotten any political texts unsolicited.,memejets,e97pvqy,conservative
[removed],,e97meda,conservative
Best thing I’ve read all night.,EvilMEMEius,e97ozil,conservative
Yeah god forbid non-Whites call Texas their own home.,DEFCON_TWO,e97l9l1,conservative
"If that’s the case, then why did Abbott win by 5 times the same margin that Cruz won by?",original_walrus,e97lkyz,conservative
"Yeah was really hoping to break that cycle, as we did in 2016",flinstone001,e97h6ej,conservative
Actually I guess there are a lot of close races currently ,flinstone001,e97hef7,conservative
Gotcha. So DUI fine?,jmet123,e97oq3n,conservative
"Just so we’re clear, dui doesn’t cross the line then?",jmet123,e97oqw7,conservative
How do you think their approach differed from republican policies and the approach by GW Bush? Do you take as much issue with their approach?,itsreaditpeople,e97lpqz,conservative
"Thank you, I don't have a subscription there, but I may look into it.",Ryan_Holman,e97l70y,conservative
Or perhaps I’m just capable of expressing myself without resorting to insults and profanity for emphasis. You don’t need to be a Christian to be polite.,rwwman50,e97p1of,conservative
[removed],,e97pu1z,conservative
"He bragged about not taking any money from PACs, but declined to mention that he received a massive influx of cash from CA and NY Liberals trying to influence the election in TX.",Min0taur,e9858dd,conservative
"Guy who ran against Karen Handel in that special election last year.

Unless you're joking and I can't read sarcasm",hisverbisdictis,e97m68n,conservative
$59 mil on what exactly? Traveling around and advertisements? Blows my mind,poly_atheist,e97jq0a,conservative
I wish. But our president loves to use it.,brandon9182,e97jklr,conservative
"It will be when there's no fucking food in the store because the hogs are eating all the crops.


Had similar shit happen with my uncle. These two guys that my uncle knew bought a house and planted a huge garden of flowers and shit. My uncle asked if he could hunt there and they were vehemently against it. Well a few weeks later the $20k garden they put in has been completely eaten by white tail. They called my uncle up and told him to kill as many deer as he could. ",Krieger117,e984f2i,conservative
"Yeah, actually leftists do want to take everyone's guns away and More and more are openly saying it. There's even a sub dedicated to debunking this gaslighting talking point: r/NOWTTYG. Gaslight somewhere else.",PhilosoGuido,e97vjan,conservative
"I never understood why people care so much about how ""personable"" a politician is. I'm voting based on policy, not who I'd prefer as a drinking buddy...

Cruz might not have the friendliest demeanor, but he's pretty good about representing conservative voters.",Mewster1818,e98ehhp,conservative
"I’ve listened to every episode. It’s a wonderful podcast, maybe the best one I’ve ever heard. I practice con law and often feel annoyed at how nonlawyers cover legal issues, but I’ve never heard a clear inaccuracy in the show. ",SuurAlaOrolo,e97lojm,conservative
It was a literal question. What does Cruz stand for? It seems his best quality is not being  democrat.,itsreaditpeople,e97mnps,conservative
What are you confused about? ,itsreaditpeople,e97lfsk,conservative
"> Wouldn't the latter be worth higher taxes?

If it was guaranteed to actually work, *maybe*. ",IVIaskerade,e97pssp,conservative
"I don’t see anything wrong with protecting our borders. In fact, I’m in favor of our military assets being diverted from overseas to working on the border.",Bullet_Lad,e97nd9y,conservative
Less money in the hands of the people,chasemuss,e97p0o6,conservative
Less spending.,Bullet_Lad,e97nbeg,conservative
"""Sore losers""? Do you forget how Trump treated him on the campaign trail? You wanted him to give a half-hearted attempt to pretend that the two of them were buddies after that? He worked with Trump once the man had *earned* it.",MarioFanaticXV,e99emda,conservative
"I'm confused what you're suggesting. That we don't question the motivations that drive identity politics that takes advantage of social strife in this country for centralized government aims? 

Are there people who genuinely believe in a concept of ""social justice"". Yes. Sure? But does that mean Nancy Pelosi is suddenly ""woke"" because she's a Democrat? 

I think you're misrepresenting whats being called as a ""fraud"". I'm referring to the Obama-esque charade of appealing as unifying moderate through a questionable morally relativist lens. In that sense, yes, Beto is a self made man, appearing as something he's not, following a script by and large, for a particular audience.  The dude was running ads that were playing **out of his own state.** The stuff about the national anthem, ect, is all a part of the myth making. I don't know what to tell you if you don't believe in that being not entirely genuine or PR on his part. He's a politician. Social politics are how these people connect with a majority of voters who are otherwise unable to connect with policy ideas and they exploit it as they see fit. Anyone whose followed his campaign can see the tactics at play are pandering to a very specific discussion surrounding identity driven issues. They don't say anything new, rather affirm something their base already believes. 

I ask this question of Republicans a lot too actually, and identifying how rhetoric appeals to the base. At what point do you really believe politicians are just acting and when they are actively looking to solve these problems, rather than campaign off of them? 

I've heard for years now, especially in college, that what matters is the ""conversation."" At what point are we just talking at a wall, here? Or preaching to the choir? ",ZeroTheCat,e97noxc,conservative
"more importantly, what the hell is it with you having been a reddit member for six years, but the only posts in your history are the ones you posted in this discussion thread just now? it screams shill to me.",fireball3k,e97o27i,conservative
"It's due to the same canned responses to arguments. The faces change, but the talking points stay the same.",jamesthunder88,e97n1a2,conservative
">I sure would love texas to become california 2.0

You rn",lipidsly,e97lgil,conservative
Abbot didn't go on a killing spree in the 60s. ,TmRaUgMaP,e97oljl,conservative
"Idk much about abbott but im gonna assume either texas as a whole is less hispanic and liberal than cruz district or abbott has policies that buy him the hispanic vote like bush did by getting millions of them housing loans they couldnt/wouldnt pay back

Not to mention the propaganda machine against cruz and ive heard nothing against abbot
",lipidsly,e97lrt8,conservative
What broken cycle? The cycle has been fairly consistent since Truman with a blip in the 70s and HW,DrGazooks,e97kyho,conservative
Did I say that?,spadmin,e97oqmd,conservative
I didn't say that. I just said  compared the two ,MilitaryGuineaPig,e97p66g,conservative
"Starting the war in Iraq was a mistake.  Being so desperate for a foreign policy legacy that you let the biggest state sponsor of terror in the world dictate the terms you know they have no intention of honoring then give them billions in cash on top of it is on another level.  Its as if Bush shot himself in the foot, and Obama said ""Hold my Beer"" and then put the gun in his mouth.",DS552014,e97m5un,conservative
Good Lord.,neemarita,e97qb03,conservative
"Yeah it's sarcasm. We'll be saying ""Who?"" about Robert Francis O'Rourke soon enough.",gizayabasu,e97m94s,conservative
Every time I’ve watched Hulu in the past 3 weeks I’ve had to endure Beto ads during every commercial break ,Florida_Boy,e97opo0,conservative
Yard sign printing,-Shank-,e97k1vh,conservative
"He had commercials on during every break of the morning news for the last month, here in Houston.",Auto5SPT,e982o5b,conservative
Don't forget the spam texting campaigns. I haven't lived in Texas for over 10 years and I was contacted and removed from their list no less than 5 times this year.,bejeavis,e97nvsm,conservative
Sounds like we'll have a giant state run animal control program in twenty years.,bad_news_everybody,e986eo6,conservative
"You practice constitutional law? 


Do you have an opinion about the use of the equal protection clause to cover things like gay marriage and things like that?",Themusician67,e97m7u6,conservative
Are there really any other Supreme Court podcasts that they can be compared to? I have yet to find one of similar caliber and/or production quality.,Big_Joosh,e97q77j,conservative
Constitutional conservatism. ,Themusician67,e97muls,conservative
Your comment. It's nonsensical ,MilitaryGuineaPig,e97lj0u,conservative
[removed],,e97pkap,conservative
Did you see how Ted treated Trump?  It was a rough primary.  Ted inability to put his ruffled feathers aside for unity showed his true self.  People noticed.  ,StraightNewt,e99rxoi,conservative
"I suggested that it’s nonsensical to assume that people who parrot liberal talking points are doing so disingenuously.

I’m not sure where all that other stuff you talked about came from.",lmoesby,e97o4fv,conservative
"You really fumbled on that little rant, little fella. The OP never even said the word ""fraud"", so you literally went full Kaczynski on him about absolute nonsense. 

Going forward, at least try to calm down and respond to what people actually say, and not your hallucinations of what they said or did. Don't be a Sayoc, mate.",LegitimateProfession,e97p3xo,conservative
Have the arguments changed?,lmoesby,e97n6gm,conservative
"Saying that demographic change is bad is just mindless fearmongering. Republicans have shown they can win the minority votes when they actually advertise and campaign on them, fearing demographic change is fearing the future. ",BrosephStalin45,e97n70h,conservative
[removed],,e97p9b7,conservative
"Cruz is a senator, he doesn’t have a “district”. He, like Greg Abbott, is a state level politician so he has to appeal to the exact same people Greg Abbott does. 

Greg Abbott hasn’t done anything to “buy” votes of hispanics, he’s just a lot more likeable and well liked than Ted Cruz. It has nothing to do with population replacement. ",original_walrus,e97m0j9,conservative
Stop commenting itt. You are coming across like a complete idiot.,dtlv5813,e97mmo0,conservative
The cycle of electing bureaucrats and political swamp monsters to the presidency. That cycle. ,flinstone001,e97l286,conservative
"So you’re not arguing in good faith, or what? I’m confused. If one is further “along the no morality” line and therefore disqualifies, and the other is more moral and doesn’t disqualify, it stands to reason you’re ok with DUIs. ",jmet123,e97pord,conservative
"That’s a convenient way to describe it. Bush made a mistake, Obama royally fucked it all up. Does it give you any pause to describe the differences in such drastically different ways? ",itsreaditpeople,e97mltw,conservative
Here's hoping. They put a lot of money into him though so I could see the Dem media establishment pushing him anyway.,hisverbisdictis,e97mck7,conservative
"Shit’s expensive, yo",emaw63,e97pwwt,conservative
Hmm I wonder who's going to pay for that? ,Krieger117,e986v49,conservative
You didn’t use enough words therefore Just spelling out “Constitutional conservatism” is like saying I like vanilla milkshakes...oh really? Good for you. Can we discuss something important?,Kwisstopher,e97o0ze,conservative
Lol.. yes because the economy revolves around one person making 32k a year. I guess if you wanted to be more like the government you could take that 500 dollars and light it on fire.  ,Rightquercusalba,e97xpmo,conservative
Didn't realize you're the only person who participates in the economy,dw565,e97shj0,conservative
"You mean how he responded to accusations of his father being part of the JFK assassination? Or perhaps how Trump went after his wife? Constantly called him ""Lyin' Ted""?

You can't praise one guy for standing up to false accusations then turn around and bash another person for doing the same.",MarioFanaticXV,e99tdv8,conservative
"And its nonsensical to believe that all of them are genuine. 

Like...I think we're just at a deadlock here in belief. You do you, brother. ",ZeroTheCat,e97o84m,conservative
"> Republicans have shown they can win the minority votes when they actually advertise and campaign on them,

Where.",lipidsly,e97nbx4,conservative
"> You mean, become a state with a booming high-tech job market that brings in the next wave of billionaires and trillion-dollar companies?

With no middle class and the state with the highest poverty and regularly has to deploy hazmat teams because their sidewalks are so caked in shit and piss it causes hepatitis outbreaks?

Sounds lovely

>muh white sharia

Lmao

>good riddance

Boy, you sure sound like a proud texan to me. Where in LA did you grow up?",lipidsly,e97pm61,conservative
"> Cruz is a senator, he doesn’t have a “district”. He, like Greg Abbott, is a state level politician so he has to appeal to the exact same people Greg Abbott does.
> 

Yeah im retarded lol

>”buy” votes of hispanics

Press X to doubt

X


X

X


X

X

X

>nothing to do with population replacement

How do hispanics vote? Are there more of them than last cycle? How do they keep coming here? Who wants them here? ",lipidsly,e97m78m,conservative
You can suck my cock tbh,lipidsly,e97nada,conservative
"I am very tempted to say that someone who lobbies is not far off from a ""swamp monster""",DrGazooks,e97l76i,conservative
"Only one of them claimed their foreign policy was ""don't do stupid shit.""  Bush thought he could Nation Build in the Middle East he was wrong,  apparently Obama thought after watching Iran kill our Soldiers in Iraq for 8 Years, that the answer was to give them billions of dollars, and they'll all of a sudden become our friends.",DS552014,e97ng1v,conservative
For sure. I can imagine them salivating over a Warren/O'Rourke ticket in 2020 and not seeing the sheer hilarity of it.,gizayabasu,e97mdxl,conservative
"Yeah, but he won't be in any kind of office for at least two years. That is an eternity when you are desperately hoping that people won't forget you so you can run for president.",wolfman1911,e97ttpk,conservative
"> Constantly called him ""Lyin' Ted""?

Ted didn't tell any lies during that campaign?  I can name several.  But I'll start with the worst: Donald Trump will appoint Liberal Judges to the supreme court.  
",StraightNewt,e99two4,conservative
[removed],,e97ppks,conservative
"> doubts something you have admitted to having no knowledge on

And we wonder why people think Republicans are narrowminded.",original_walrus,e97mddi,conservative
Okay ,flinstone001,e97l8wr,conservative
I'm already breaking out the popcorn for the Democratic primary next year. It's gonna be very entertaining for Hillary alone if she really tries to run again.,hisverbisdictis,e97mjxf,conservative
"I wasn't aware Ted Cruz was a prophet. Making an inaccurate prediction is not the same as a lie unless you know in advance the prediction is inaccurate.

Also, I love how you're trying to call an inaccurate prediction a lie, but ignore the fact that I just named a yuuuuuuge lie that Trump told. Should he have just constantly gone around calling Trump ""Lyin' Don""?",MarioFanaticXV,e99xmvt,conservative
"> You actually believe that, huh.

Not proving me wrong. Youre just saying “wow just wow” 

>you couldnt think of anything

I could think of laughing at you, yeah. “Hey, lets not make the same mistakes california did.” “YOU WANT SHARIA”

Its just funny. You a muslim by chance?

>pertner. yeehaw and hail Jesus

Right...",lipidsly,e97pzhj,conservative
>who could possibly infer things from past trends,lipidsly,e97nba5,conservative
"Ted didn't say Trump might appoint Liberal judges, he said Trump would appoint them.  He lied as demonstrated by actual results and slandered Trump to boot.  He was Lyin' Ted and he suffered for it in that last election.  Trump had to swoop in and save his ass. ",StraightNewt,e9a274v,conservative
"It’d be one thing if you were making an inference in combination with knowledge of the current situation. However, you are making an inference based on a situation from almost 20 years ago in an election that you have admitted to having no knowledge on.

It should be noted that Governor Abbott’s opponent was an open borders hispanic woman named Lupe Valdez. If self serving hispanics are the reason why Beto almost won, then she should have almost won too.
However, she did not. The more likely scenario is that Ted Cruz is just not that likeable of a person compared to the charismatic and decent looking Beto. The only two statewide races that we showed any real possibility of losing were attorney general Ken Paxton and Ted Cruz. This is because Ken Paxton is currently under investigation for fraud, and because Ted Cruz is not very popular. ",original_walrus,e97ns5s,conservative
"> However, you are making an inference based on a situation from almost 20 years ago

Quite a roundup

>slef serving hispanics

No, hispanics here want to shut out other hispanics once theyre in. Look at cesar chavez who literally coined the term “wetback” and got posses together to literally beat the shit out of illegals because they were driving down farm laborer wages

Chavez was still a socialist tho

>charismatic

Beto had more flop sweat than nixon in the debate with kennedy",lipidsly,e97oaop,conservative
"These people are seriously lacking in mental capabilities, was going to say a non pc word, but I like this better anyway. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e993d6j,conservative
"Gerrymandering affects the House, not the Senate, because EVERYONE IN THE STATE votes for senators, not just those in a drawn district. SMH, this is why civics needs to be required.",AyyyGreens,e994mit,conservative
"Democrats may have ""won the popular vote"" for the Senate, but California had over 6 million votes for Democrat vs Democrat for Senate. Because of the ""top 2"" primary choices, the vote was between democrat Kevin DeLeon vs. democrat DiFi with no Republican nominee.

Add that 6.2 million (https://vote.sos.ca.gov/returns/us-senate) to the 1.8 million in the New York Senate race (https://nyenr.elections.ny.gov/), and you've got a wash in the other 48 states.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e99ahbt,conservative
Brilliant analysis.,gster50,e993jpi,conservative
I for one am surprised that she's the only one who noticed that Braun only won after Indiana annexed half of Kentucky,burtmaklin1,e99ahla,conservative
"gerrymandering, racism, sexism, ableism, ageism, homophobia, trans-phobia, patriarchy, white privilege, anti-immigrant, deplorables. nativism, orange-man-bad, etc..  Its like a grab bag of leftist catch phrases and excuses.  

Just put you hand in and grab an ism for explaining why things didn't go the way you wanted.  ",stoffel_bristov,e99iwlz,conservative
"See she got the dem talking points in her email and tried to apply them correctly but sometimes things just don't work out.  

Those darn founding fathers drawing those state lines to insure GOP senate victories 250 years later.  ",stoffel_bristov,e99z07z,conservative
I just watched this clip on Tucker.  My jaw dropped.  She is so ignorant that she so much wanted to throw out the word gerrymandering that she didn't realize they were talking about a senate race.  The other guy in the tape calmly told her that the Constitution sets the borders of a state.  Just another moronic liberal tool that is fed the talking points in the morning and tries to parrot them on her shit show circus.  And I'm starting to think her talking points for memorization are attached to candy bars and she is eating them.,optionhome,e99krme,conservative
"""Well if we lost surely it was due to something being wrong with the system!""",Deathless-Bearer,e99uvck,conservative
/r/notthebabylonbee,MarioFanaticXV,e9a75es,conservative
This woman is a braying jackass - oh wait - just a run of the mill Dem!,JFGFNY,e9ba6n8,conservative
"I thought that was the joke in the headline, TBH. ",ozric101,e996aad,conservative
"Without the Electoral College, the presidential election would be reduced to Texas, California, Florida, and New York. Which is exactly why the leftists want to eliminate it. Just like they were all for gerrymandering as long as democrats were doing the mandering. ",ngoni,e99aswe,conservative
">Democrats may have ""won the popular vote"" for the Senate

And also won most of the senate seats that were up for election yesterday, but they never note that. ",PubliusVA,e99f82p,conservative
Clearly the code in her programming is outdated.,RAZRBCK08,e9a9s5f,conservative
Dropped Flake but picked up Romney. Kind of a wash.,ngoni,e99ch38,conservative
"There are times where I think Trump should keep his mouth shut and not say what's on his mind.

This IS NOT one of those times.",Blake-bottles,e994mac,conservative
Good riddance,goldmouthdawg,e99g4zt,conservative
GTFO.,chabanais,e995kkw,conservative
We still have Murkowski,superdude411,e9acc32,conservative
Corkers gone too,Marko_Ramius1,e99dhr1,conservative
[removed],,e996hz2,conservative
And mccain,Reven1911,e99whvv,conservative
"Right, because saying someone with a sub 20% approval rating should be gone from the Senate is really going to hurt voters. ",latotokyo123,e99ce93,conservative
Dumb suburban women are never going to get over the pussy tape anyway. ,iwasthebeaver,e997gm2,conservative
*petty,Blake-bottles,e997jz1,conservative
Thanks for correcting that. ,hipsterdufus84,e997nr4,conservative
Dead Pimps > Live Democrats,Enzo_SAWFT,e99yqcg,conservative
Another Republican has a 24 vote lead in a their state senate. Hope any votes found in a recount go to him. Nevada is not in good shape politically right now.,SendixBunny,e9a2t5o,conservative
"The probe has been going for two years with no interference from the White House or DOJ.  If there was anything to find, it would have been found and leaked by now.  

At this point it's taxpayer-funded opposition research and should be ended.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9aqlnk,conservative
"It's not an investigation, it's a fishing expedition.  If Mueller was intent on Justice being served, Hillary Clinton and Obama's cabinet would have been indicted by now, or at bare minimum, interviewed/questioned.  Instead, his investigating team is comprised primarily of *Hillary Clintons fucking personal lawyers*",Jizzlobber42,e9aqfou,conservative
It needs to continue unimpeded. ,Nevaknosbest,e9bzkrf,conservative
$20 says nothing actionable comes of it and the heads of liberals spontaneously combust ,mnslice,e9asm1e,conservative
"I think there’s a reason these protests are springing up today, and it’s not because they’re sad for Sessions..

There was a lot of downplaying of the Mueller probe a couple of weeks ago, and it seems obvious there’s no there there.

At least now with a new AG they can feign that Trump is ending it early or somehow interfering, when in reality it seems it ran its course and didn’t go their way.",niresangwa,e9apt8y,conservative
"If Mueller had anything related to actual collusion between the Trump campaign and the Russians, it would have been leaked by now.  And if he has something, dragging this out 2 years past the 2016 election is a disservice to our country and our democracy.  He should lay it all out now.

However it is overwhelmingly likely at this point that he has nothing related to this.  So I am sure he will try to hit a few more people with unrelated process crimes, but ultimately this entire thing will have been a multi-year long fishing expedition that more or less shows no real wrongdoing by the Trump campaign.  Hillary Clinton was just a terrible candidate.",theheadfl,e9apthv,conservative
"At the end of the day, I think it will be a pointless waste of money. They haven’t really gotten much for what they have put in.

As for Mueller himself, I don’t think he’s a horrible guy like some want to make him out to be. At the end of the day, I think he’a just doing his job, however pointless that job might be.",XMAGA_1776X,e9apj0m,conservative
"It’s been 2 years and essentially nothing to show for it. The worst they’ve done is sentence a guy for shady stuff he did pre-Trump that they found incidentally and another guy who’s mad sentence could’ve been 6 months (and ultimately got 14 days).

I want results. None of this fishing expedition shenanigans we’ve seen thus far. If you didn’t find what you initially set out for, you call it done. You don’t widen the scope until you find what you want. That’s textbook confirmation bias. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9ap4t4,conservative
"Witch hunt, waste of money and soft coup if successful.",JMB_was_a_god,e9apwt1,conservative
Initiated due to lies thus rotten roots.,chabanais,e9ar2hi,conservative
Witch hunt.  Remember all the leaks occurring in the beginning of the administration?  Dont you think if they had anything on Trump it would have been leaked somehow? ,asianhokie,e9apyhd,conservative
He's investigating the wrong campaign ,cmiller1225,e9astty,conservative
"Given that he stacked his team with anti Trumpers including FBI agents who supported Hillary and  who have been fired for trying to harm Trump, it's illegitimate.  Using hardcore partisans to investigate someone is unethical and unlikely to result in justice.  He should stick the Russian stuff and release his report within 90 days.  But he won't.  It's a fishing expedition to find anything to use against Trump.",StraightNewt,e9awe1c,conservative
I wish someone paid me to do nothing for 2 years.,SirCheekyLongballs,e9axlxp,conservative
"Indictments of four former Trump advisers, 26 Russian nationals, three Russian companies, one California man, and one London-based lawyer. Six of these people (including now all four former Trump aides) have pleaded guilty.

That's nothing? ",noisewar,e9aurzx,conservative
"I agree. They’ve had an unlimited budget as well. 

In two years if they can’t find anything you either hired horrible people or there’s nothing to find. ",Chapka69,e9au95j,conservative
"> Six of these people (including now all four former Trump aides) have pleaded guilty.

Nothing to do with the 2016 election or collusion.  Try again. ",lastbastion,e9avoj9,conservative
Pleaded guilty to?,goldmouthdawg,e9avdej,conservative
"Flynn, George Papa, Manafort, and Gates were all key Trump campaign people. Their guilty pleas include conspiracy against the US, lying to the FBI about contacts with Russians, and tax/financial fraud (of which Russian institutions figure heavily). While Trump may be innocent, these guys are not.",noisewar,e9aycy8,conservative
"> Their guilty pleas include conspiracy against the US

This is the same charge as what was brought against Martha Stewart and was related to financial under reporting.  Scary title - common charge.  Try again.

> lying to the FBI about contacts with Russians,

Comey was on record saying Manafort didn't lie purposefully.  None of the contacts had anything to do with 2016 or the election.  Try again.

>and tax/financial fraud (of which Russian institutions figure heavily)

Now tell the class what years these crimes occurred.

I'll say it again since you are confused: Nothing to do with the 2016 election or collusion.  Try again.",lastbastion,e9b7g8t,conservative
"> This is the same charge as what was brought against Martha Stewart and was related to financial under reporting. Scary title - common charge. Try again.

A charge that carries up to 5 years per offense may be common, but that isn't trival. And no, it is NOT limited to financial underporting at all.

> Comey was on record saying Manafort didn't lie purposefully. None of the contacts had anything to do with 2016 or the election. Try again.

Source? Also, the mandate is not that they have anything to do with the election, the mandate is to investigate ANY links between Trump campaign people and Russia. That's exactly what's been done.

> Now tell the class what years these crimes occurred.
It doesn't matter when these crimes occurred. Read the mandate.


The real problem is that you don't know the mandate. Now you can argue on whether the mandate is too broad or whatever, but in the literal sense, Mueller has done nothing but stick to it, and deliver results on it. The mandate is not / not limited to ""investigate if Trump colluded"" or ""see if the election was hacked"".
",noisewar,e9bbjcd,conservative
"Haha awesome. 

She’s the one who completely lost it with her ineptness last time. 

He’s setting up for a 2020 Republican take over if he’s banking on the House focusing on 2016 the entire time. ",c_ward5,e99bmig,conservative
Lol-wut?,Tomcat_AL200,e996rhj,conservative
"Because she's horrible and he knows it! She failed at her job before, and she'll do it again.

I honestly think he is saying this tongue-in-cheek because Trump has a sense of humor I think few people really understand. ",DeadHeadLibertarian,e99torl,conservative
Why?,MisterMouser,e99dic8,conservative
"""Keep your friends close and your enemies closer.""  Actually, she does have some endearing qualities.  Check out her [Makers.com video](https://www.makers.com/profiles/591f27c3a8c7c4265c6428c1).",guanaco55,e99drvl,conservative
"Because then he can make her the face of ineptitude when legislation doesn't go anywhere, and use it to hammer democrats nonstop until 2020, where he'll hopefully be reelected and the house will flip (R) again.",blunt_person,e9b3nzh,conservative
"<This comment was removed by Verizon Wireless for violating the terms and services agreed upon using this service. The exact offense was a violation of Article 13 Subsection A of the EULA, which states ""It is prohibited for you \[the user\] to make any statement that promotes a competitor of Verizon Wireless, or any statement that discourages others from using services provided by Verizon Wireless"". If you feel this comment was removed in error, you can contact us at [legal@verizon.com](mailto:legal@verizon.com) and agree to pay the $500 USD minimum fee for violating the EULA and Terms of Service previously agreed upon by using this service.>",UnedGuess,e9aitz8,conservative
How did you deal with Big Internet’s evil plans since it was essentially a hostage situation and you were unable to leave one company to go to another.,DarthNaseous,e9aduwe,conservative
Have I survived the paris accords....,Delta_25,e9ahlvi,conservative
"Since everyone now knows you survived Net Neutrality repeal, does that mean George W. Bush is now going to target you with his hurricane machine?",soxfan90,e9aiye9,conservative
Were you scared of having to pay $1.99 per google search?,xJownage,e9a21ms,conservative
Mods plz let me shit post just this once,rbsh123,e9a00jq,conservative
What exactly changed?,SaltineAmerican_1970,e9a6sga,conservative
Impossible. There were no survivors.,flextov,e9a8mcu,conservative
Well... there's your problem. You agreed to the terms of service.,Cr8er,e9amc5d,conservative
"During his 8 year as president he had a *horrible* record backing winners or supporting anything. It was due to his insane levels of narcissism and making it all about him no matter what the issue was or who he was campaigning for. I remember him flying over to give a ""big speech"" to swing the Olympics to the US, and we weren't even put into contention for the slot.

No matter how much you want to mock Sarah Palin, she has an infinitely better track record backing ""tough candidates"" and having them win. Obama is a self promoter, who drug people out based on the cult of personality around him. That began to fade in his second term, and he still doesn't know how to deal with it.",ultimis,e99op58,conservative
The Democrats didn’t pick candidates with broad appeal.  Socialism doesn’t even appeal to the old yellow dog democrats much less independents.  Gillum was like Florida ‘s Hillary Clinton.  Only appealing to the base.  Bill Nelson was in the Senate long enough to be fossilized.  Barack is yesterday’s man and he no longer leads anything.,Neanderthalbastard,e99watp,conservative
"I hate titles that have too many words. Remove the ""at midterms"" part.",Cr8er,e9aewrm,conservative
"Maybe an American flag would have been a better choice. Hell, a Michigan flag would have been best. ",Dmfconrad,e9869h3,conservative
"How many times can you reference your Palestinian heritage in a 2 min clip?
Her allegiance to Palestine over the USA is clear. ",lazerpantherr,e98cfsw,conservative
Seeing the headline I knew it had to be near Detroit. ,RightMillennial,e989vqq,conservative
Wearing the flag of a legitimate terrorist state while celebrating your election. What human garbage. ,LumpyWumpus,e98l2kx,conservative
Wonder where her interests are...,LSU_BAW_2020,e98fn2q,conservative
"""Thanks for electing me!  FUCK YOU STUPID AMERICAN'S!  Thanks for being completely ignorant, you stupid mother fuckers!""",Jizzlobber42,e989gzj,conservative
"It’s just shameful that if someone is waving OUR OWN flag that there’s no pride in that, they’re labeled a bigot. Yet someone can be elected too high seat in the nations capital and be applauded for repping a foreign country FIRST. What if it was an Irish flag? Or Australian? I wonder what the story would be then? This is sooooo strange. ",Tekshow,e98nlx0,conservative
She's gonna hate it when she realizes Palestine isn't recognized as an actual country by the United States. Go Israel!,mikebets,e98gb1b,conservative
You are either Palestinian or American.  You aren’t both as they fundamentally disagree with each other.  Unless of course your goal is to turn America into the same shit show the Middle East is?  Which confuses me because why would you not want to turn the Middle East into a duplicate of America?  One is faaaaar nicer than the other.,mattmcd20,e9919k9,conservative
No go zone in the making,J0kerr,e98dbkp,conservative
"This was in Dearborn, MI, where the street signs are in Arabic.",chief89,e98bc0y,conservative
"I think the point here is that voting for inferior candidates for sake of having a greater number of minorities in office is the opposite of what America is all about. 

",LongIslandRiceTea,e98k3rm,conservative
Any evidence of her being an anti-Semite?,arogozine,e99eyu1,conservative
Strange choice. Why not a flag for Narnia or Westeros?,heyyoudvd,e99xx2f,conservative
Palestinian spy? ,bitERRORrate,e98ku5a,conservative
"The do not assimilate. They invade and conquer. They convert by the sword. 

Same playbook since ~700 Anno Domini.",machinerer,e98didn,conservative
"Democrats ""decry"" gerrymandering, and yet would do anything to create communities of a totally homogeneous people that vote reliably as a bloc. 



They see absolutely nothing wrong with Black Americans voting +90% for Democrats, and viciously attack white women that vote 60/40 Republican. 


Political tribalism at it's core. 

",kavanaugh1,e98hj7v,conservative
Usually you hear about this stuff in Dearborn but not Detroit,sil3nt_gam3r,e98cslh,conservative
"TBH - many of her constituents are like minded.  So smart on their part.  As was said years ago in the Netherlands, we will not fight you but will outnumber you at the voting table ",GlenGanges,e99a1wv,conservative
Dearborn does not have street signs in arabic that I have ever seen. Do you have pictures? Maybe I'll go find the intersection just to see.,BruceLeePlusOne,e98fsue,conservative
There's historical precedence of Democrats doing just that: Voting Rights Act of 1965.,Big_Joosh,e98kdo5,conservative
"True, but Dearborn is in the Detroit metro area. It looks like the 13th district contains most of Dearborn Heights and a sliver of Dearborn.",RightMillennial,e98krx5,conservative
"I do not have pictures, but I did some work there and saw them. This was roughly 10 years ago. ",chief89,e98k1yg,conservative
"Weird. About 10 years ago was when I went to college there. Right across the street from a mosque. Never saw that. Are you sure these weren't signs from, say, a private drive? ",BruceLeePlusOne,e98lcd1,conservative
"Sorry.  I just went back and looked around googlemaps.  It was not street signs, but signs on the street for restaurants and such.  In my head I remembered it as being all in Arabic as I was only working with Muslims.  Here's the area.  https://www.google.com/maps/@42.3048478,-83.1447848,3a,75y,281.43h,83.85t/data=!3m6!1e1!3m4!1s8crx4MEyUmVefiQCRXyjEQ!2e0!7i16384!8i8192",chief89,e98owr7,conservative
I guess be more careful with your claims next time.,BruceLeePlusOne,e98r8av,conservative
It's really not a big difference. My point was only that that is a largely Muslim area so of course they will elect a Muslim. ,chief89,e98sy0d,conservative
"The 13th district covers several areas that are not predominantly muslim. Republicans didn't even run a candidate there, and she won the Primary for her party. Private businesses and the city street signs are a very big difference.",BruceLeePlusOne,e98tjl5,conservative
I mean it's a district that misses the national average on education by 10% along with being poor. Surprise perpetually poor people voted a candidate who wants to give them free stuff. ,glockedup1,e98gxr1,conservative
The fact she got 78% makes me tearful,gtrdundave2,e98frnh,conservative
What really bugs me is this seems to be a precedent now. Wonder how many more DemSocs will start coming out of the woodwork?,cons_NC,e98wmz4,conservative
"""Lets just pay for it""",nomaslee,e9986vf,conservative
Sheila Jackson Lee has been riding this same donkey for the longest time...,GFZDW,e98ofu3,conservative
English speakers are the minority there as well.,JMB_was_a_god,e98q2w1,conservative
"The worst part is, they don’t realize that they are poor because they keep voting for these people. ",JustVoicingMyOpinion,e98ymkl,conservative
"Government ""free stuff"" is stuff you don't pay for up front but continue to pay for your entire life whether you used them or not.",ngoni,e99cea9,conservative
Is it surprising at all? They pushed her as the Great Bronx Saviour the amount of press she got was what you'd expect a presidential candidate to get.,smileimhigh,e98g2y4,conservative
"I think Bernie Sanders was the precedent, no?",ProfessorArrow,e99ajro,conservative
They need to change the law so that national media coverage of local elections is treated as an in-kind campaign contribution.,FelixFuckfurter,e98jlt5,conservative
"Sanders certainly sets a precedent for the ideology, but I think the relevant difference is that she had no political experience before running for national congress and will encourage future no nothings that can repeat Bernie and Cenk Uygur talking points to be seen as dream candidates for Congress. ",Trisagion-und-Isolde,e99ee48,conservative
"Fair point, albeit most think he's old and was hoping he's on his way out, and boom we get the youngest female rep in history in his place.",cons_NC,e99c2wi,conservative
"I'd be for it, she's a complete fool propped up by glamour pieces from liberal media, she's not even ""from the streets"" like she likes to brag about, she's had more privilege than most of ""evil privileged white men"" MSNBC always talks about.",smileimhigh,e98llhx,conservative
"Honestly my takeaway is that each side had enough positives that they can each fall back on their confirmation biases, in actuality not much has changed, except the big hurdle for legislation becomes the house instead of the Senate.

IMO a whole lot of nothing that will be made into a big deal by whoever it suits at the time.  The real winners are  us in the State of Arizona who finally get a damn break from campaign ads lol. I heard somewhere we had 1 out of every 3 ads for the past 2 months was a campaign ad lol",mbarnar,e97zydh,conservative
"I think this'll pan out well for Trump and the GOP. We have a firm grasp on the Senate and can push through any judicial nominees we want, and we still have the ability to cut out executive regulations from the White House. The Democrats will focus on trying desperately to bring down Trump, which will make them look terrible, especially when literally none of it pans out. They also get Nancy Pelosi as a Speaker, which gives Trump an enormous punching bag to hit until 2020. 

Considering what the outlook was just back in August, this is about as good an outcome as we could have hoped for- we could have easily lost the Senate as well. Kavanaugh really powered us through, and if we get another SCOTUS justice before 2020 that'll help too. ",Maswasnos,e9801ih,conservative
"If this was a referendum on Trump, then looking at those seats he campaigned hard for is good measure. And those seats went Republican. Trump did not campaign hard for the House.

We are looking at 54-55 senators in the R column.

Last I heard it was Democrats with a 26 seat advantage. Clinton lost 50 or so in his midterm, and Obama lost over 60, and Bush lost 30. The seats they picked up were around the historical average, and far below the recent history.
",Lepew1,e983sov,conservative
"And we’re officially RINO proof in the Senate. Murkwoski, Collins and probably Romney now cant stop good legislation. Corker, Flake and McCain obviously gone. Is there someone I’m missing? ",latotokyo123,e981fqk,conservative
"This was not a blue wave, it’s not great but even in the house the Republicans hardly got trounced. Trump has a lot more support than the media let’s on. 2020 going to be interesting ",JIDF-Shill,e981p05,conservative
"This is overall a win for us. Keeping the house was at best a pipe dream. Taking down beta alone is a big win. That said it’s too close for comfort.

I’m mostly concerned about the new house putting a stopper in our recent economic growth. We’re already looking to an upcoming bear market and their stonewalling could hasten and or worsen it for the country.",ithinkmynameismoose,e9845qc,conservative
[removed],,e97zzbl,conservative
This is why impeachment will fail if tried.,bigdaveyl,e98bmjl,conservative
"Shocker - McConnell's leadership held the majority.  


Paul Ryan's failed - I wonder if it was because Paul Ryan was inept as hell. ",c_ward5,e98vpsm,conservative
"At the local level, this election cycle has been about personality rather than policy. To be honest, the Republicans needed to weed out some of these personalities. Hopefully, they can provide better candidates the next round.",sangjmoon,e987523,conservative
Trump did his part pulling the close race senators over the line. We needed that for judges. Good job. We also could use a lose in the house to stir up the crazy and get our base out to vote in 2020. We get very chill when we win too much.,right_mind_mechanic,e988evv,conservative
"The GOP lost a lot of governorships. This really wasn't that great an election, it just could have been much worse.",-Shank-,e982vr2,conservative
"Yep, it was terrible and almost as bad in Texas. Nearly every 3rd ad was libel being spewed against Cruz like that he isn't pro-life and that he wants to rip babies out of mothers' arms which of course never actually happened. Unfortunately they are required to play all paid for ads unless they are deemed offensive. It's BS.",godsdragon79,e980xxd,conservative
"Best take on things so far:

[It’s not what happens next. It’s what won’t happen.](https://hotair.com/archives/2018/11/07/not-happens-next-wont-happen/)

> Bottom line… nobody has any reason to celebrate as far as I can tell. This election was “historic” in terms of the numbers and the split decision, but that’s only of interest to those of us who engage in political trivia for a living. The practical downstream effects are virtually nill.",RoundSimbacca,e986fb3,conservative
"Well this is kind of wrong. We put ourselves  in a better  position for 2020, the Dem majority in the house is a lot smaller than democrats were hoping for, making it easier for us to retake. Our senate gains are huge and should not be understated  - most of what we've been doing the last year is nominating judges, not passing legislation, and that just became significantly easier. The moderates in the Senate will no longer be able to hold up our nominee's, we can now put through anyone we want. That's a legacy that will last decades.

In addition, the Senate is now in a better position for us to hold onto in 2020, where Trump will be on the Ticket, AND Alabama will be a guaranteed retake. The idea that republicans should be upset because we didn't have some massive blowout of the democrats, or that they managed to win *some* governorships is ridiculous.

Hate to break it to people, but they were going to win something at some point. The fact we kept it as minimal as we did, in a time when historically gains for the out of control party are massive, is a big deal. Republicans won 63 house seats and several Senate seats in 2010. 

We will now be able to pump out federal judges, supreme court judges, and cabinet picks at an increased rate  and with no holdups from moderates for 2 years, and then we very possibly will get the house back. Besides that, it's not as if we were able to pass much legislation anyway since we didn't have a supermajority in the senate and dems would fillibuster anything not using special rules. People don't seem to understand that.

There is legitimate reason to be pleased or relieved, not just ""confirmation bias"".",Zyrioun,e987rn1,conservative
"I think the lefts winning the house is going to hurt them in the long run. They now have a huge portion of their base that thinks they have repudiated Trump also that the Anti-fa like violence and Kavanaugh personal destruction antics is the right path.

I think the loss of the house has shown the GOP to not ignore issues, I man we got ate alive on healthcare (which is why I hated that our own killed it). 

Of the two I think the GOP is the one that has the greater capacity to learn from this election.",Racheakt,e983qi6,conservative
"As a Texan, I don't think there was a lot of enthusiasm for Cruz this election, but at the same time if this trend with illegal immigration and people mass migrating from California and other blue states persists, this state will be blue in 10 years.",FecalMist,e98blgn,conservative
Arizona was absolutely insane with the ad spam...,GeneticsGuy,e98dlut,conservative
"My fear is that we won this battle in Florida, but have lost the war there, permanently, with the ballot initiative. The state just went red by 50kish votes, but the next election they'll have a 400k dem advantage.

It's going to be real freaking hard to win the presidency without Florida.",2A_is_the_best_A,e98f50v,conservative
I think there is also a silver lining in the fact that most of the Dems that won did so by running as moderates. Meaning if they go hard left and start acting like leftist it may be hard to survive reelection. So they may be forced into some compromise with us and will keep the craziest stuff from passing.,TheModernDaVinci,e981bnn,conservative
"Still need to win az and mt just to be sure, and to make up for nv loss",dtlv5813,e981cvq,conservative
"Most seats that were up for re-election were Republicans, so it is not surprise that they held their seats.",Lucidification,e98fple,conservative
"If McSally and Rosendale both lose it'll still be a little iffy if Romney becomes the new Flake.  But if either one of them wins out we should be fine.

More importantly, running up the score in the Senate probably puts the Senate out of reach for the Dems in 2020, even though the map is far more favorable to them than it was this year.",joozian_,e982e0n,conservative
Romney won? But he's gonna put y'all back in chains!,doobsftw,e98qisg,conservative
Even in the races dems were expected to flip they only did it y a couple thousand votes ,billswinthesuperbowl,e983zlk,conservative
Spending is what has me a little upset. We couldn't get it under control with both majorities.,King6of6the6retards,e98apup,conservative
"Yeah it's going to be annoying with the investigations that the dems will leak to their friends in the media, but it wasnt a blue wave, more like a purple ripple. All of the high profile candidates that the dems highlighted lost, so I actually feeling pretty good. ",iwasthebeaver,e980j68,conservative
"It isn't bad.  The default expected outcome is the incumbent presidential party loses house seats.  It happens every single time.

Holding and expanding the Senate is important and it is an important strategic victory going forward to lock up those seats.

Holding the House was a pipe dream.",zuckscyborgpenis,e980c4z,conservative
"Tell me the great stuff passed under ryan? Besides tax cuts
",notviolence,e980jg5,conservative
"True, but that was expected. The GOP took a lot of ground the last 20 years, it was bound to slide back sometime. The House was expected as well. Honestly the GOP did better than everyone predicted, and gained several Senate seats. This makes it easier to hold the Senate in 2020 as well. ",valmeister,e986972,conservative
Total number of governors and state legislatures don't really matter unless you get blown out. Governorships are no indicator of presidential elections either. I'm just sad good people like Scott Walker lost and for the people of Wisconsin. ,latotokyo123,e985s8f,conservative
I don't care about governorships outside of my state. They don't represent me.,mbarnar,e9833an,conservative
"It might have been steven colbert who said something like this but I agree: this mid term election has polarized the GOP so the only remaining members who are on office now have the platform of whatever trump says and not maintaining classic Republican values,  most of the classic Republicans are replaced by Democrats so now all that's left are Dems and Trump loyalists. 
I agree that this was a bad election but it was bad because we lost value diversity, so it'll be harder to get anything done.  ",mustang23200,e99yzdn,conservative
"2 years after OBama, republicans won 63 representatives in the house; 2 years after Trump democrats won about 35.

2 years after Obama, democrats lost 6 eats in the senate (although, they still kept a narrow margin) ; 2 years after Trump the republicans furthered their lead in the senate to one that is larger than dems had in 2010. 

I think it went pretty ok. Sure I'd like to have kept the house, but we can at least look forward to having the judiciary on our side for quite some time since the senate will be even busier replacing circuit judges.

Now it's on to win the cultural war... which we're getting crushed in unforutnately",snoppballe,e99cst5,conservative
"> Cruz like that he isn't pro-life and that he wants to rip babies out of mothers' arms

What in the hell?  Libel to the N'th degree holy shit
",PerceivedShift,e981ny4,conservative
"I mean you kind of prove my point lol. You highlight all the good things about last night, and briefly note, but ultimately dismiss the things that went right for the Dems last night.

Both sides had some good and some bad.  Not much about last night moves the needle for me (except the public's referendum on the Kavanaugh situation with how they voted in MO & ND)


By the way...

>The idea that republicans should be upset because we didn't have some massive blowout of the democrats, or that they managed to win some governorships is ridiculous.

*Pleaseeeee* tell me where I said that Republicans should be upset? ",mbarnar,e98ai0i,conservative
"I think the issues with the left don't have much to do with the house. They still have the same problems, they have no viable 2020 candidate right now and they don't have any platform other than resist Trump.

Meanwhile the Senate races showed people were mad as fuck about the way Kavanaugh was handled, and that is much more likely to reflect long term (culturally) than winning the House in a midterm.",mbarnar,e983xsx,conservative
"I have so many thoughts on this that I just can't say openly.

So I'll just say I'm not going to stand for communism taking root in Texas. ",ConsistentlyRight,e98xdto,conservative
"That's a bad thing.

The mask coming off and the left showing the American public who they really are is a good thing for everyone. We should not want the left to go back to hiding their true nature, pretending to be reasonable, sane, even-handed, bipartisan, and caring about things like liberty and constitutional rights just so that they can appear to be reasonable during elections. Because they're going to go back to actually running their offices like extreme radical leftist communist anyways. Since that's how they always actually run their office, we should want them to do that in the campaigns and show the American people who they really are. Putting the mask back on and successfully hoodwinking the American public is not a positive thing.",ConsistentlyRight,e98xozn,conservative
"While that was a factor, it did not save Bill Clinton or Barrack Obama from massive losses at their equivalent mid terms.",Lepew1,e98tqdr,conservative
Both in the lead now.,latotokyo123,e9830zw,conservative
"McSally isn't losing. At this point I think Sinema is just hoping the margin falls close enough to do an automatic recount, but honestly it doesn't look that way.",mbarnar,e9842gg,conservative
Which high profile candidates do you mean? Besides the obvious one -- Beto.,clausternn,e983alj,conservative
[removed],,e98114w,conservative
"Yeah, the Obama years were a high-water mark for Republicans in a lot of ways.

Good news is that Larry Hogan survived reelection handily.",RoundSimbacca,e986gun,conservative
Some states became fully under Democrat control so it does suck for them quite a lot. RIP to gun owners ,___-III----III-___,e987wc8,conservative
"Census happens in 2020, need to care about it a bit.",ultimis,e987lww,conservative
"Yeah, it was really bad. I actually called his Cruz's office to report it.",godsdragon79,e982dj8,conservative
"I'm not dismissing them, I'm actually applying historical context. Democrats should've won a lot  more than they did, historically the first mid-term is usually a slaughter for the party in power. The only way you can say this was a big win for democrats is if you ignore all context and history.

It wasn't a ""red wave"" or whatever the MAGA voters were hoping for, but we did exactly what we needed to do. It sure as hell wasn't a blue wave. Analysts had been making it perfectly clear  for atleast a month now that the only way we held the house  was if we had a landslide victory in toss-up's which would've been historic if we pulled that out of a hat. That we barely lost the house and actually gained in the senate is not a bad result when all things are  considered.",Zyrioun,e98aopm,conservative
"Winning more seats in the senate is way bigger than the loss in the house (IMHO), I agree that having a bigger majority in the senate will make getting more conservative justices in the courts easier, and in the long run have a greater impact than two years of vindictive house committees. ",Racheakt,e984ije,conservative
Tester is likely to just edge Rosendale. McSally looks to be the winner.,-Shank-,e98oabs,conservative
"I think McSally holds on.  Rosendale looks a little shakier though, the areas remaining to be counted in Montana are pretty blue.",joozian_,e984ad3,conservative
"Gillum, Nelson, Abrams in Georgia. Those were the 3 big money races and the dems lost all of them. ",iwasthebeaver,e98432u,conservative
"They took the house, but they might not even have it by a big enough margin to actually have a speaker Pelosi. 26 dem reps said they wouldnt support her. The state legislatures is a problem though, forgot about that. ",iwasthebeaver,e9815zr,conservative
“Blue wave” would imply they took both chambers ,JIDF-Shill,e981qb1,conservative
"It’s an off year election, the party out of power almost always makes gains in Congress. The ‘blue wave’ suggests some sort of historical democratic resurgence when really they made typical gains in the house and lost seats in the senate. This wasn’t a good night for republicans but democrats were expecting a whole lot more.",WenchSlayer,e9821aa,conservative
"Yeah. You don't win 1000+ elections and expect to keep that momentum. Republicans overreached, which was fine. Now we are losing some seats that we're blue all along. What's insane is how much the Republican party has grown in my lifetime. Look at which party controlled the house since WWII. ",valmeister,e989iwp,conservative
"Hogan is so popular in MD, I wasn't surprised at all. His views on a lot of issues that matter in particular to Marylanders (education funding, environmental protection) are pretty mainstream Democratic party, and his more right-leaning views are less weighted by MD voters",JaunxPatrol,e98uj7d,conservative
Voted for him,JdPat04,e9878ep,conservative
Washington passed a really shitty initiative on that. This state is changing rapidly due to all of the Californians and young tech voters. ,a_bearded_man,e988ukq,conservative
"Meh, I'm a big proponent of states being as independent as possible, I don't want people from outside my state sticking their nose in my state elections, I'm not gonna do the same to them.  ",mbarnar,e987qir,conservative
"> The only way you can say this was a big win for democrats is if you ignore all context and history.

Once again where did I say this?? You keep making up arguments that I'm not refuting...


>Democrats should've won a lot more than they did, historically the first mid-term is usually a slaughter for the party in power. The only way you can say this was a big win for democrats is if you ignore all context and history.

This is like textbook confirmation bias dude. Confirmation bias is defined as "" the tendency to search for, interpret, favor, and recall information in a way that confirms one's preexisting beliefs""

By dismissing the fact that the Dems won the house and over emphasizing the fact that ""they should've done better"", you're *literally* interpreting the results in a way that confirms to your preexisting beliefs.  You're ignoring the information that does not benefit you or the conservative side (the fact that the Dems *actually won the house*) and using the fact that they didn't win by as much (which is basically an anecdotal history note) as basically you're only talking point from the house elections is practically the textbook example of confirmation bias.

If you want more of a sports analogy you're clutching onto ""moral victories"" and ignoring the final score.


Its okay dude like I said the left is doing the same thing right now (ignoring the Senate and building up hype around the house)... just gotta be able to call a spade a spade.
",mbarnar,e98bgji,conservative
Why is Montana such a blue state?,phantomcut3,e986n7p,conservative
"The Florida races were bad but I feel like it was a fair trade for the 1.6 million or however many felons that regained their right to vote. That's a big number, and I'm assuming that ex-con demographic leans Democrat fairly heavily. For comparison, Trump only beat Hillary by 113k votes in Florida.",clausternn,e986x9u,conservative
"Tennessee, Indiana, Florida senators, Georgia governor, really their only name win was the Kansas governor",Freerange1098,e988noa,conservative
"Personally, I don't see why we wouldn't welcome Pelosi as the confused and bumbling head of Ds nuts! ",BuSpocky,e982b9i,conservative
I'm a Democrat but I sincerely hope we don't get speaker Pelosi. I fear that would bring out a lot of Republican votes in 2020.,clausternn,e983917,conservative
[removed],,e981gkx,conservative
[removed],,e98222y,conservative
"> Republicans overreached, which was fine. 

I wouldn't even call it an overreach. They took advantage of the Dems' weaknesses and it paid off.

> Look at which party controlled the house since WWII. 

Interestingly enough, the geographic and demographic factors that aligned to let Dems dominate the House for 40 years is starting to happen to the Republican Party. We very well could be in store for decades of a GOP-dominated House if things break just right.",RoundSimbacca,e98afhq,conservative
"Interestingly enough, you don't need to be a conservative to be a Republican, though it is a bit rarer these days.

However, to be a Democrat you increasingly are required to support the leftist agenda.",RoundSimbacca,e98v1kx,conservative
"Hey! I voted against him, you silly!

(Not trying to start a fight, just.... Hello!)",JohnLocksTheKey,e98afif,conservative
It’s truly insane that Californians leave due to the failings of their government and then try to transform other states into new Californias.,xKommandant,e98lu91,conservative
"Analyzing the data, the disadvantages and advantages of each side, how they performed in that context and comparatively to historically similar situations is not fucking confirmation bias. I'm not *ignoring* data. Are you fucking kidding me? I'm not saying republicans had some fucking huge win or something, i'm saying we held the line and did better than historically expected and that's reason to be relieved or pleased, that was my whole fucking point and you dismissing that as *confirmation bias* despite the very real, analytical reasons to think so is pissing me off.",Zyrioun,e98bodl,conservative
Unions,Freerange1098,e988fqs,conservative
"Because the Californians settled Western Montana, which is where the population is. Central and Eastern is more Midwestern, culturally and politically. 

I grew up there, AMA.",GeneralELucky,e98k9e6,conservative
felons are known for their drive to civic duty. We'll see what happens with that development. ,iwasthebeaver,e9888xz,conservative
I want Ocasio-Cortes as speaker tbh,iwasthebeaver,e982pi9,conservative
"It absolutely would. People want moderates in there, and she would not fit that bill. There is some legislative agenda like infrastructure that could get done, but not with a speaker Pelosi at the helm. Also if the democrats choose to go with an investigative agenda its going to be bad for them as well. ",iwasthebeaver,e9841kf,conservative
"A lot of these new dems ran on willing to be able to compromise, if they dont they are out in 2020. Its bad, but it's nowhere near as bad as 2010 when Obama got destroyed in the house and Senate. ",iwasthebeaver,e981pko,conservative
"It's bad, but it's not the end of the world.  The Republicans have held the House for eight years now, so it's natural to feel like this is a seismic event—but it's really just the pendulum swinging back toward the other side.  It'll come back our way in a few years, too, as it always does.

One of the things we forget is that we won't always win.  And when you factor in Trump's relative unpopularity and controversial nature with the fact that we *gained* in the Senate and that the new democratic House majority may indeed be rather thin, it wasn't too bad of a night for us.  That itself is a pretty good way to end this chapter, because it could have been much worse.

I'm not over the moon, and I wish we had kept the House.  But history predicted that outcome, anyway.  It'll be alright, and it'll allow us to hopefully remove complacency from the equation come 2020.",jreed11,e982dzf,conservative
"Okay? A big wave that's a repudiation of Trump would have involved taking both chambers, not narrowly leading in 1.",JIDF-Shill,e982msm,conservative
"Your right, though taking that many seats in Dem country still means it's hard to defend them. But it was a good thing to take them. Dems had to spend a ton of money on these elections. 

Hope so, would be great. ",valmeister,e98bck8,conservative
We are all entitled to our opinions wether they be different or the same. As long as we shave respectfully then it doesn’t matter to me who you support (as long as they aren’t total evil of course),JdPat04,e98busf,conservative
"I'm not saying you're wrong or dismissing what you're saying. What you're saying is factually correct (to an extent, I'll get to that).  But it's the way you're handling it. You're not looking at the entire picture, only the part that makes the Republicans look good.  


>Analyzing the data, the disadvantages and advantages of each side, how they performed in that context and comparatively to historically similar situations is not fucking confirmation bias

Also if you were *actually* doing this you wouldn't be coming to the conclusions you are in the House because the Dems basically hit the historical averages on the nose. Despite you consistently mischaracterizing it by saying it should've been a ""slaughter"" when in reality it was pretty much par for the course.

>dismissing that as confirmation bias despite the very real, analytical reasons to think so is pissing me off.

Where are you getting you're data for these *analytical reasons* you speak of? Because on average the GOP should've lost about 30 seats.. which is pretty much what they did.  Part of me thinks you actually haven't analyzed it yourself and you're just going off what you've heard from pundits and other redditors (which, I hate to break it to you buddy, is riddled in confirmation bias).

You can get mad at me all you want but the matter of fact is you're *objectively* wrong in your assessment of the House, and *most likely* glossing over it with a certain form of bias that is becoming a trigger word for you.

Not only that but in your very first post, citing 2010 (which was a statistical anomaly) in regards to the house as if it was the norm, is once again, ignoring the big picture.",mbarnar,e98cqxo,conservative
How often did you see wild bison roaming the plains?,xKommandant,e98mcy0,conservative
"That's would be hilarious n stuff, ya know? I'm no expert but i got a poly-sci degree, ya know? I dunno. ",BuSpocky,e986knr,conservative
"At the same time, there's some truth to be said that the job is a bit of a poison pill. Pelosi, Boehner, Ryan, their reputations are down in the gutter because of their Speaker role. Whichever congressman hypothetically replaces Pelosi would have to be willingly to stain their reputation as well.",clausternn,e9875ku,conservative
[removed],,e981y1o,conservative
"I agree with you that it wasn't a blue wave, but you can't just pretend congress is all there is to politics.

Governorships and state legislative seats are very important too, specially this year because of gerrymandering. Censor lines get to be redrawn in 2020.",clausternn,e9839sm,conservative
Agreed,JohnLocksTheKey,e98r0bc,conservative
"Not to double post, but maybe it would be easier for both of us if i ask this: What have i said that you believe is a result of Confirmation bias? All i've said is that republicans have some objective reason to be happy, that overall we've stemmed the blue wave and done better than was expected going into the night(odds actually had us at 50% chance losing the senate, we gained), that our gains in the senate actually improve our ability to approve judges, and that with how the election played out, we're set up to actually gain or hold in the long term, and given our lack of supermajority in the senate we weren't doing much legislatively anyway so the house isn't the biggest loss, and is unlikely to be a long term loss since the Democrats didn't make major gains.

Do you believe any of that is wrong, or the result of confirmation bias?",Zyrioun,e98fs2c,conservative
"And what of the gains in the Senate? That isn't par for the course for first-midterms. Or the fact that many of the Representatives that lost had a weak Top Ticket? Meaning they could've been held with a better ticket. Or the fact that Many of the Dem pickups are in spots that would be easy for Republicans to take back? Maybe i'm using hyperbole with ""should've been a slaughter"", but there were indicators that was going to happen this election. *it* *didn't*.

Those are all analytical reasons for why this win isn't as good for Dems. At  *most* it's average, which means there was no  Blue wave whatsoever. But there's also reason to argue that it was a very weak win, especially with what happened the senate.

You keep saying ""no you're wrong"" and yet you, yourself, had provided no argument except your last post for why *i'm* wrong and you're right. Just yelling ""confirmation bias"" is poor form and borderline concern trolling.

If you wanted to argue with me on the data and think i'm wrong on that  front, i'm cool with that. Saying i or other am wrong and just dismissing us as falling into confirmation bias, no i'm not cool with that, and have every right to be upset at that.",Zyrioun,e98diz0,conservative
"None, they're almost extinct. I did see a guy shove his arm in the side of a cow (for research). ",GeneralELucky,e98mwbe,conservative
"Tax cuts, roll back regulations, get rid of the individual mandate, passed a bill to help vets with being able to go to private doctors as opposed to the VA, confirmed a bunch of judges. Not terrible, it was the Senate that stopped most of the legislative agenda, and the Republicans are going to expand that majority. ",iwasthebeaver,e982kxn,conservative
">And what of the gains in the Senate? 

Jesus fucking Christ dude this is literally what I'm talking about!!!! The minute I point out that not all was well for the GOP you basically ignore it and jump to something that favors you're opinion... *that's fucking confirmation bias*!!!! Lol it's not even concern trolling (random buzzword is garbage anways) its literally a textbook example of it!

This midterm was a virtual tie, dems won the house,  GOP won the Senate. Nobody won, it was basically a tie.


But you're just proving my top point from my first post. Theres enough positives for both sides that each side can simply fall back on some of the results last night as confirmation bias for their side ""won"". And that's literally what you're doing!


Anytime youre focusing on one piece and not the whole puzzle you're being disingenuous.  This midterm was a virtual wash. Any positive gains in the Senate is neutralized by the fact that the house won... digging around for comparisons with history is just digging for bias, because lord knows when history doesnt side with you (like I showed with the House) you'll ignore it and just focus on the parts of history that do (like your Senate comment)









It's not even a bad thing dude and most of what you're saying are reasonable points... but you're viewing them in a vacuum not as the big picture so it's not providing an accurate representation of the situation.",mbarnar,e98g99y,conservative
"How  am  i the one who's ignoring the big picture?

You're ignoring:
-Gains in the senate in a first mid-term are not average
-Dems going into tonight were looking at a 40+ seat gain
-Dems did not gain a strong position to hold going into 2020, gaining mainly seats with weak top tickets and not off a strong voter shift
-It is now actually *easier* for us to get through judicial picks

Yes, we lose the comittee's, which may or may not suck because if they overplay their hand it will actually benefit us. Legislatively, we already did about as much as we could do with the current senate. Do you have any legislation you can actually think of we could've  passed in the next 2 years without a senate supermajority?

I have acknowledged literally every negative you have brought up, but you mainly haven't acknowledged my points. You keep *yelling* that i'm lying or bias, rather than actually arguing my points. That's concern trolling (that isn't a buzzword, that's an actual rule for the sub that i was bringing up). If you want to argue me on data, be my guest, do not just call me a liar (or a fool, depending on why you think i'm falling into confirmation bias).

My whole fucking point, is that there is objective reason to think republicans did ok this election. Not gread, not good, but okay. That there is *objective* reason to be ok or even happy with how the election went. I gave reasons why. You just say i'm selectively picking and choosing data, rather than giving actual counter points. You keep doing that. You just did it again.

What am i ignoring? Why is my point wrong?  Stop being a damn concern troll and actually counter my points.

You're acting like i said Democrats didn't win or something. That's not what i'm saying at all.",Zyrioun,e98gs3b,conservative
I want Trey Gowdy. ,Rapidfiremma,e9azs3l,conservative
Watching Jim Jordan mentally spar with Nancy Pelosi will be hilarious. Watching old age take its toll will be beautiful.,xKommandant,e98kssj,conservative
I’m just gonna say it.  We need a man with fiery intensity to counter the swarm of Dem nonsense.  A wrestler is exactly the kind of man for this job.  They have built in intensity that can’t be matched except by those who went through the same experience.  Pelosi doesn’t have the will to fight the intensity of a championship caliber wrestler ,ravenswin,e990n1w,conservative
Good choice. Put as big of an age gap between the GOP leader and Pelosi,Enzo_SAWFT,e98d475,conservative
"that's good, i like him, he's a good caretaker",sylect,e98n8u6,conservative
Jim Jordan... Jim gordan... We gonna get the commissionaire of Gotham boyos,MyUsernameIsReallyOk,e98ngif,conservative
Yes please!,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e99cl4l,conservative
How many times will she call him Paul Ryan?,Galax-e,e98txzg,conservative
She'll probably call him Gingrich,JMB_was_a_god,e9982uy,conservative
"Voters are going to love that.

Clinton's looming impeachment was a major issue for the 1998 midterms and [the first time since 1822 that the President's party gained seats in the House during the President's second term.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Six-year_itch)",Yosoff,e99cjth,conservative
This is why we can’t give them ANY power. Ugh.,HolsterOfNuts,e99bbma,conservative
Shhhh nobody tell them impeaching Kavanaugh is a bad idea,guitmusic12,e99cv41,conservative
"Good luck, bud. Totally wont backfire on you.",Dank_Cartographer,e99bagc,conservative
"It takes the consent of the President and 2/3 of the Senate to do that.  Not gonna happen.  

By all means, let them waste the effort and mindshare trying.

A word to the Left:  how about waiting until an official actually *does something* before playing the impeachment card? ",LonelyMachines,e99hk5d,conservative
About what I expected they’d do ,Marko_Ramius1,e99dcf6,conservative
America reaps what it sows...  I for one look foward to 2 years of total chaos. ,ozric101,e99jkgi,conservative
"These people should start getting paid based on positive, tested results. Their priorities will change quickly.",Terra_green2,e9a1m4s,conservative
"I welcome a full investigation into Kavanaugh.  We just didn't welcome it at the 11th hour before voting was set to occur, when they knew of the allegations for three months.",r777m,e99dvb1,conservative
It's going to come down to whether the left can restrain themselves or not.  Their base is itching to take out Trump.  ,Roez,e9aaeg8,conservative
"I haven’t had a chance to read everything yet but I wanted a sanity check.

Does this seem nutty to anyone else?",claptrapwonder,e9a1gso,conservative
"""Rabid Response"" would be the more appropriate term.",Khalinov,e9acst1,conservative
Squirrel turds,gtrdundave2,e9a1hmu,conservative
"If any of you are in any of those areas, I hope you're carrying your own ""rapid response"" and have the training to use it if worst comes to worst and the left does what the left does best; lash out violently at innocent people. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9ae5kz,conservative
Not exactly nutty when you think about it. Winning the House risks letting some of the air out of the left's carefully built hysteria. They need to ramp up the insanity right about now in order to keep the hysteria alive. That's one reason why the msm is behaving as if the Dems not taking the Senate as well is some kind of atrocity.,jd_porter,e9a2e5x,conservative
That hadn’t occurred to me. My brain hurts now.,claptrapwonder,e9a2se5,conservative
"It's all theater. I can guarantee that it won't do a damn thing to convince anyone of anything, but it will give the msm lots of juicy anti-Trump footage and it'll keep your average Dem satisfied that they're fighting off some kind of Nazi takeover.",jd_porter,e9a31z9,conservative
">It's all theater.

It's more like a Nazi torchlight march.  It shows power and is intended to intimidate.",StraightNewt,e9a3fp7,conservative
It actually shows the opposite of power.  These gatherings in my city (Salt Lake City) always end up with 95% of the state driving by and laughing at these nutcases,Mormonster,e9a5kgi,conservative
They probably don't have power over the police in SLC.  Places where they do they are able to abuse the public without fear of retribution and people who fight back end up in jail.,StraightNewt,e9au26i,conservative
Yeah that shit won't fly here,Mormonster,e9aw9fu,conservative
This is unacceptable. What happened to all the cries for CIVILITY we got treated to last week by these very same people? ,be_quiet_roo,e99fin4,conservative
"Nobody cares, hes already been on tv and the entire network and all the other networks are defending him like hes a hero. I am already seeing on my Facebook that Trump is Hitler for trying to silence the media. It honestly makes no sense and makes all of them look like gigantic hypocrites. 

&#x200B;",Doran902,e99egho,conservative
"I wish Trump followed thru on his urge, and went down there and took it from him.

He should do it next time.",Gnome_Sane,e99eydb,conservative
He deliberately physically overpowered that woman to keep the mic.  He should be charged with assault.,BrighamYoung,e99la1k,conservative
"When you serve your time and rejoin society you should start again from zero not negative zero. 
",chabanais,e98a8ek,conservative
"I don't care about the tactics of it, I believe felons should get a second chance and vote again. I didn't base my decision on whether they vote blue or red. I thought the murder and sex offender restriction was kinda strange and doesn't really apply to voting, but I still voted yes. And I am glad I did.",brainfreeze91,e98tjv5,conservative
"Why shouldn't felons be able to vote? I think the same thing should happen with gun rights (for non-violent offenders). After your sentence, you should not be discriminated against further (like how you cannot discriminate against someone with a felony conviction when doing background screening for employment).",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e98d1ms,conservative
"Might not be as bad as y'all think. There are probably tons of white redneck-type felons in Florida who'll happily vote red. 
",Maswasnos,e98a6ym,conservative
Bye Bye Florida!,IndefinitePresent,e989k4e,conservative
"the fact that there are one million felons in Florida in the first place is concerning, but not surprising.",Nutcracker1466,e991v0l,conservative
"This is good. They’ve done their time, they deserve to get the right to vote back. Idc if turns Florida blue, it’s still the right thing to do. It’s not fair to serve time in prison and then never be allowed to vote. ",NotUrAvrageFish,e998dx1,conservative
"Apparently only a handful still had that law. 

Oh well more reason for Trump to keep building the black base.",Enzo_SAWFT,e98a5j1,conservative
I think it won’t impact the elections much. Many of them won’t even vote in the elections.,Ilikeminewelldone,e98fcd3,conservative
There goes Florida.,JMB_was_a_god,e98e82b,conservative
"FLORIDA, WHY?!?!",Reven1911,e989a6b,conservative
Does anyone smarter than me know if the Constitution addresses this?  I thought everyone had the right to bear arms and vote per Constitution. ,Nonsenseism,e98pq7v,conservative
It’s weird to hear people defend the passing of this amendment by saying “they served their sentence” while simultaneously arguing sex offenders who served their sentence shouldn’t have the right to vote. The contradiction is very peculiar.,JeanValJean72,e98qbr6,conservative
Will the one million felons in Florida regain the right to bear arms?,TheGAGLine,e99wgl1,conservative
"Florida now, Texas sooner rather than later. ",AntiIntellectual,e998lbt,conservative
"I agree. If they're too dangerous to be trusted with voting or the right to bear arms, they shouldn't be released in the first place. When you serve your time, that should be it.

That being said, I'm very much against those who think that those in prisons should maintain voting rights while still in prison.",MarioFanaticXV,e9a7tbn,conservative
Are you against sex offender registries? ,Dmfconrad,e98rco5,conservative
Fine.  But that wasn't the agreement with these particular felons.  Part of their sentence was that their voting rights were suspended - now that's changed.  ,lastbastion,e98gdwx,conservative
"I disagree. I don't think people change for the most part. It's one thing if you fuck up in your twenties or if you got into drugs bad but, I don't think any wife-beaters, assualters, rapists or other heinous crime-committers should ever be fully integrated back into society, or at least it should be hard. ",dwoods105,e98w0mr,conservative
Me as well.  I'm proud that it passed.   ,TBSportsFan1254,e9byqtg,conservative
"Would you let a sex offender who served their time spend the day with your kid? Yes I know it’s a little extreme and cliche, but the premise stands. Just because you have been to prison, does not mean you make better decisions. 77% of felons are repeat offenders so why should we not limit their exposure in our government.  It’s not like it’s a secret that you lose your right to vote when you break the law. ",Dmfconrad,e98ruju,conservative
I personally think if you commit a felonious crime against your fellow citizen(s) you should not have a say in public policy that affects others. Restoring a felon's personal freedom after time served seems sufficient. ,FallingPinkElephant,e98f9ff,conservative
"Very high odds of recommitting crime.  I actually don't believe anyone should be voting unless they pay income taxes, because they don't have a stake in how their own tax dollars are spent.  People voting for their own self-interests are part of the problem.  This is why democracy will fail someday.",Reven1911,e98dnvb,conservative
Why is it okay if it's a sterotypical republican voter but not a stereotypical democratic voter? this shouldn't be the mindset somone uses when voting for something this important. ,xounaut,e99b2zt,conservative
It's not even close.,Reven1911,e98aly5,conservative
How can Florida voters be so foolish?  They literally just turned Florida blue like Virginia turned blue in the last decade.,Reven1911,e989oju,conservative
"Yeah, the reelection isn't looking good.",JoshClarkMads,e98k69a,conservative
"Normally I would agree, but Florida has a history of incredibly close elections.  Felons are not the type of people who should be deciding our next leaders.",Reven1911,e98flyf,conservative
"I don’t think so, many of them probably won’t even vote in elections and Florida will still be a toss up state. I would hardly call it a lose state.",Ilikeminewelldone,e98fevf,conservative
"You do realize that this backwards process has only been around for as long as Scott was governor?  I'm a huge fan of his, but Crist and Bush never enforced this and automatically restored voting rights.  We still managed to win elections then...                    ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bz3vx,conservative
I voted yes on it.  They served their time and are not reintroduced to society.  they already paid their debt to society.  ,castlein09,e98qizb,conservative
I voted  no on it. But yeah....,ArctiClove,e98a43h,conservative
Due process can remove all your rights and even your life. The 13th amendment even leaves open slavery as a form of punishment.,ultimis,e9a1y5p,conservative
"Yes.  The felony conviction is enough to keep sex offenders out of most important things, but the registry acts as a scarlet letter that prevents truly rehabilitated offenders from reintegrating into society.  Of course rapists and child molesters should get life sentences so that truly dangerous criminals can’t rejoin the community.

Also, statutory rape should not be put on the registry provided no force was used and the minor was a willing party (I understand they can’t legally consent).  The prison sentence should be enough for this, especially if the perp was unaware that the victim was a minor.",joozian_,e98z90u,conservative
"Accessible to the general public, yes.",chabanais,e98uay9,conservative
Things change.  I think if you serve your time when you are released you should be given every opportunity to do it right.  I get that some people don't like it because the Democrats may gain voters but I don't think it's right to make this decision based on how some of them might vote.,chabanais,e98gv0u,conservative
"And that's a large part of why recidivism rates stay as high as they are.   When offenders struggle to rejoin society because of employment discrimination, when they're unable to have a voice in their government because their rights to vote are taken from them, and when they're forced to the margins of society it's no wonder that so many of them return to crime.

That does not diminish personal responsibility for ones actions at all, I'm an ex offender and I would never blame anyone else for the choices I make.  But I can tell you right now that it wasn't easy to put that part of my life behind me and this kind of attitude doesn't make it any easier. 

This is circular logic.  Criminals deserve to pay for their crimes.  But if you want less criminals, it doesn't make any sense at all to set up every possible roadblock to rehabilitation, especially for people who offended young.  I do think that some people don't care to change their ways and rehabilitation is wasted on them.  But I met a lot of guys in the system that were decent people who made mistakes.  It saddens me to know that some of them don't have the kind of supportive family I have, and probably ended up doing life on the installment plan as a result.
",Arm-the-homeless,e98y5zp,conservative
Well that’s the whole point of time served- they paid for their crimes under the rule of law and deserve to be a full functioning citizen again.,Tekshow,e99bkwq,conservative
"The recidivism rate for sex offenders is high but there are plenty of cases of people who get classified as a sex offender who didn't rape a 10 year old, they maybe dated someone 1 year younger than them, etc...

>I don't think any wife-beaters, assualters, rapists or other heinous crime-committers should ever be fully integrated back into society, or at least it should be hard.

I think you can set it up so they have to live in a halfway house for a good amount of time, etc...  I think that's fair and a good compromise between keeping them locked up forever and letting them roam totally free.",chabanais,e98zg1r,conservative
"This amendment specifically mentions sex offenders and murderers, and they still have restrictions on when they are allowed to vote even after serving their time.",brainfreeze91,e98tqhi,conservative
"Depends. Were they a teenager who had a teenage girlfriend, or a 60 year old man who kidnapped little kids in his van? Hell, in my state if you're drunk on the way home from the bar and decide to piss in a dark alleyway you will be charged as a Sex Offender.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e99afoq,conservative
"Getting convicted on a possession charge can lose your right to vote forever. Once you have served your time, then your punishment is over. Sex offenders are a little different. Not every law has to be one size fits all.",riseoftheorange,e99nly9,conservative
"In Florida, stealing something as little as $300 in value is a felony.  Should an 18 year old who steals an iPhone be barred from voting for the rest of their life?",cartermatic,e98q1x3,conservative
"So if a teenager sells some weed to his classmate, he should never have any rights for the rest of his life? Makes sense /s",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e98fe5i,conservative
"K, I'll be sure to stay home next election.  I had my voting rights restored but apparently I shouldn't be allowed to vote because of some shit I did 20 years ago.  Thanks for your input.",Arm-the-homeless,e98rpt9,conservative
"If they recommit a crime, they get retried and put back in prison upon sentencing, losing their voting rights in the process.",AyyyGreens,e98exj7,conservative
Then it is a good thing the US isn't a democracy.,mlmack,e98effu,conservative
"Looking at California, I'd say the failure is here. (rescue me)",popeye44,e98e2o4,conservative
"Very high odds of recommitting a crime that has nothing to do with a weapon in the first place (as stated by the disclaimer of NON-VIOLENT)? It's not like felons cannot obtain firearms regardless of their felony status, and the ones who do that already were more than likely **violent** felons. The right to bear arms should not be stripped for petty crimes in which violent tendencies were not shown.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e98e8sq,conservative
The 24th amendment disagrees with you strongly.,Endormoon,e98k5mg,conservative
Both of them are okay. These people have paid their debt to society; I see no reason to keep them from voting again. I was addressing the concerns that Republicans seem to have that these felons are going to vote mostly for Democrats. ,Maswasnos,e99bwar,conservative
"What's not even close? 

> Despite the law’s racist history, white men make up the majority of the disenfranchised felony population in the state.",Maswasnos,e98b2ob,conservative
"Some decisions should be made regardless of how we think it will alter the voting base. 

This goes much further than Red vs Blue. Floridians decided that this suspension of voting rights was too harsh. And that’s that. ",Yung_Money_Yung,e99hec2,conservative
"Its over for trump

He didnt defeat the fake news like ye needed to

He didnt combat online censorship

He didnt drain the swamp

Now democrats will permanently take the country.

The gop is dead",ExpensiveMention,e98s0wu,conservative
True,Ilikeminewelldone,e98ftb7,conservative
"It's not 100% gone, but not having it locked down is VERY concerning.",JoshClarkMads,e98kar7,conservative
Yeah but Florida is always *so close*. This along with Peurto Rican refugees means we'll be lucky to win it ever again. likely the last time is 2020-24. coincides with the last chance at a GOP POTUS. ,JMB_was_a_god,e98gr4j,conservative
Does your mind waiver if knowing that 77% of felons are repeat offenders? ,Dmfconrad,e98ri0c,conservative
"I voted no on it; these are matters of law, not constitution. 

The constitution is the rule book for government, not the repository for junk a special interest group can't get the state legislature to act upon.",r4d4r_3n5,e993afy,conservative
"The conviction rate for rape is not enough to keep sex offenders out. Rape is very difficult to prove and has a very low conviction rate. Even people that have admitted to sex when someone couldn’t give consent have been given slaps on the wrist lately. It’s sick. 2 years ago, a guy in the air force raped 3 girls and got 8 years. 8 years!!! He will be 35 years old and looking for a place to live after that. Not next door to me I hope. ",Dmfconrad,e991e7h,conservative
"Really? Then I guess you are consistent lol. I want to know if my neighbor has done something that could negatively affect my children or spouse. That’s just me though. Seems like that is fair info to be released about people. But hey, we disagree... guess I’m supposed to hate you now lol ",Dmfconrad,e98vsf1,conservative
">I get that some people don't like it because the Democrats may gain voters but I don't think it's right to make this decision based on how some of them might vote.

Well said.  The ends don't justify the means.  If somebody paid their debt to society, I'm not going to prevent them from voting just because they might vote D.     ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bylf0,conservative
">I think if you serve your time when you are released you should be given every opportunity to do it right.

Except I'm arguing that they didn't serve their entire sentence since the loss of voting rights - part of their original punishment - was commuted by voters.",lastbastion,e98h5cz,conservative
Well said!! ,TBSportsFan1254,e9byo8e,conservative
"Again, that suggests a problem with what the judicial system considers a felony, not a reason why felons should have a right to vote. The definition of a felony is a serious crime. You'll excuse me if I think a murderer shouldn't have a say in public policy even if he served his time. ",FallingPinkElephant,e98sr9e,conservative
"That's not a felony and I'm only talking about their right to vote that can influence his community.

Edit: selling a small quantity of weed to a friend is not a felony you morons",FallingPinkElephant,e98fgvr,conservative
Have you petitioned in the last 20 years to get your rights restored?  Because you can do that you know.,LessThanNate,e996qx2,conservative
"Good for you

There's consequences for your actions ",FallingPinkElephant,e98skf8,conservative
"Yes and in the meantime, between their release and whenever they get caught **again**, they're influencing our political process.  We know most of them are going to be criminals again, it's just a matter of catching them again.  The statistics are clear that ex-felons are not some sort of demographic that has turned over a new leaf.  Most of them are shit people and they will always be shit.  Period.",Reven1911,e98f39z,conservative
Felons are disproportionately people of color compared to the rest of the population.  Roughly 20% of African Americans in Florida has a Felony conviction.  I assure you 20% of 'white rednecks' or white people in general do not have a felony conviction...,Reven1911,e98bbpw,conservative
I bet it's been a hard 2 years for you. And I bet the next 6 are going to be a lot worse.,wtcode,e98uv3c,conservative
"Republicanism is designed to die

It doesnt fight for itself or its values and just ""hopes everything works""

It doesnt want to do anything productive to help itself while democrats use govt to push there agenda

Its designed to die",ExpensiveMention,e98s8cw,conservative
Then put them back in jail,ExpensiveMention,e98s3z4,conservative
"So punish them by putting them back in jail. But if you serve your time, then you should be welcomed back into society once your sentence is up.",riseoftheorange,e99noge,conservative
...and part of that is because former felons are marginalized by not being able to get jobs and participate in civics through voting.  This has all been studied for decades.            ,TBSportsFan1254,e9bz7ma,conservative
"Exactly.  The Constitution is the legal analog to a home's concrete foundation.  The point of a foundation in construction is that it gives you a solid, stable platform on which to build.  The stronger thd foundation, the stronger your home will be and the less likely it will be to collapse.

If your foundation were fluid, changing shape with every stiff breeze, your house would wobble, shaken and eventually fall.

This nonsense of popular vote to amend our foundational document needs to stop.  Especially, when they start stacking multiple changes into one amendment (like the drilling and indoor vaping one... those two things aren't even remotely related.)",robotoverlordz,e997xnz,conservative
Sex offender registries aren't any use against rapists who can't be convicted anyways.,PubliusVA,e99dye9,conservative
Ya ever have drunk sex?,LettuceAndCabbage,e99f9lq,conservative
"> I want to know if my neighbor has done something that could negatively affect my children or spouse.

You'll never know that... only the ones who have made it into the system.  If your neighbor was convicted of arson you wouldn't easily be able to know though they could be a pyro and like torching peoples' homes.",chabanais,e98zjj8,conservative
"""Serving your time"" means when you're in jail or on parole.  If you are not in either category then you should be 100% free from the limitations those two categories place upon you.",chabanais,e98izf2,conservative
Murderers and felony sex offenders are still barred from voting after this Amendment in Florida.,cartermatic,e98ufep,conservative
Yes it is... It can easily be a felony.,DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e98fjb2,conservative
"Where I'm from you don't need to do anything, once you're off parole they're restored.  As it should be.",Arm-the-homeless,e998cfp,conservative
"Recidivism rates in FL are 33%, and most felons are there for drug charges or failing to complete parole/probabation. So I think it’s wrong to say most will go back to prison. I think you need to calm down. There is nothing to worry about as of yet, and you’re just getting yourself worked up over your own assumptions. If you’re worried about polling, polling here is worth garbage. Polls had Gillum and Nelson leading by several points, yet both lost.",AyyyGreens,e98fse4,conservative
"But there are still more white felons than other races, and Republicans are making gains in minority populations. I don't think this is all that bad for Republicans.  ",Maswasnos,e98c18o,conservative
200 acres is the solution to this,snoppballe,e99blld,conservative
Hmmmm interesting ,Dmfconrad,e9bznqv,conservative
"Uh dude, I spent 2 years working sexual assault cases and rapes in the military. I know the difference. ",Dmfconrad,e99ghxi,conservative
"Ehhh I can know if they are in the system at least. That’s something. I’ll admit that it is purely selfish reasons. The safety of my family is more important to me than the rights of convicted sex offender. I get there are people on it that shouldn’t be and I do think there should be some reforms to it, but in general, I want to know something like that if I can. ",Dmfconrad,e991451,conservative
"If I can agree stealing something worth $300 perhaps shouldn't permanently remove someone's right to vote and you can agree murderers and sex offenders shouldn't have their right to vote restored, how about you give me a list of criminal activities that you think shouldn't count as a ""felony?"" That seems much more worthwhile. ",FallingPinkElephant,e98vhof,conservative
"Then the issue is with marijuana being charged as a felony, not whether or not felons should have their voting rights restored. Most felony drug charges require you to be a *distributor* of illegal substances due to the amount required for it to sustain the charge. You're using a specific crime in specific jurisdictions to justify your argument for all felonies. ",FallingPinkElephant,e98g9r2,conservative
">most felons are there for drug charges or failing to complete parole/probabation.

Source? Last I checked people serving time in federal prison for drug related offenses was less than 20%",FallingPinkElephant,e98kls3,conservative
"Nationwide 90% of Blacks, 77% of Asians, and 69% of Hispanics voted for (D) candidates. That's a lot of ground to make up.",Trevor_awesome,e98ojbb,conservative
"> Republicans are making gains in minority populations

Source?",Reven1911,e98e3bq,conservative
"While I can see your point, one could also say they'd like to be notified whenever anyone moves within 10 miles of them who has ever been convicted of any crime.

I think once you've served your time and are out of the system you should be able to start fresh, which includes your neighbors not protesting that you've moved next door.",chabanais,e991t3l,conservative
Yeah I'm not going to go through the entire US legal code to pick out what should/shouldn't be felonies.  I voted yes on Amendment 4 and am content with my decision.,cartermatic,e98vpp9,conservative
"I don't think you are seeing the point... There are dozens of petty ""crimes"" which are considered felonies that have no bearing on someone's moral compass. Hell, in some states a 15 year old who dates someone in their own grade can be charged as a felony sex offender. It's easier to change one law on allowing **non-violent**felons to gain their rights back than it is to look through ALL the laws and change all the ones that fit into this category.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e999z82,conservative
"Honestly, for that I was citing heuristic. I’ll try to find a source when I get to my desktop",AyyyGreens,e98leq9,conservative
"Those are old stats. What happened to 40% of black men support Trump? 

Also, stats are stats, but we dont know these people or what they believe. When we start grouping up people by race we lose the individual and become just like the left. ",,e99f8if,conservative
"One of many: https://www.cnn.com/2018/08/18/politics/poll-of-the-week-trump-black-voters/index.html

Haven't you seen all the posts on this sub about that? There have been non-stop posts about Blexit and other related things. ",Maswasnos,e98ed62,conservative
"Oh don’t get me wrong, I know that either way I can’t protest them moving next door. I would wish to take a few extra precautions though. Fresh starts are good. I’m just reminded of the saying, “always forgive but don’t forget”. ",Dmfconrad,e992r16,conservative
">Yeah I'm not going to go through the entire US legal code to pick out what should/shouldn't be felonies.

Then why did you specifically nitpick theft of ~$300?",FallingPinkElephant,e98woo5,conservative
"It's you that doesn't see the point. There's a logical reason to not allow felons the right to vote. It seems you don't grasp just how heinous of a crime you have to commit in order to be stripped of your liberties and serve time. 

Your repeated attempt to redefine the word felony as basically a simple misdemeanor because some crimes under certain circumstances is not a ""serious crime"" doesn't take away the fact that most felonies are in fact deserving of harsh punishment due to the severity of the crime committed. ",FallingPinkElephant,e99e13e,conservative
"Those are literally the statistics from this election, they aren't old. The 40% of black men supporting Trump was never more than a fiction of this subreddit's imagination, 88% of black men voted for Democrat candidates this election cycle. ",Trevor_awesome,e99hmrk,conservative
"Black approval of Trump hasn't manifested in actual votes that matter, yet.",Reven1911,e98eqn8,conservative
"> “always forgive but don’t forget”.

 If only more people share that sentiment.",chabanais,e993lfi,conservative
That seemed to be the bare minimum I could think of that would strip someone's right to vote for the rest of their lives.,cartermatic,e98wvnb,conservative
"And most of those crimes are VIOLENT, therefor I am not trying to defend giving gun rights back to people who commit those! Woah, work on your comprehension skills!",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e99e72l,conservative
Yeah it has. GOP gained 6 percentage points over 2016 for the black vote in Florida. That is a huge deal. ,Big_Joosh,e98kxn4,conservative
I have it but it is very hard to live by ,Dmfconrad,e9941ld,conservative
"So non violent felons should have a say in public policy that affects the public after having committed a grave sin against the public. How profound. 

Maybe you should work on your reasoning before criticizing someone's ""comprehension skills""",FallingPinkElephant,e99ei1u,conservative
"Lol ""grave sin"". You're nuts. ",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e99eqbl,conservative
">Lol ""grave sin"". You're nuts.

From Merriam-Webster

>Felony: **a grave crime** formerly differing from a misdemeanor (see MISDEMEANOR sense 1) under English common law by involving forfeiture in addition to any other punishment

>b : **a grave crime** (such as murder or rape) declared to be a felony by the common law or by statute regardless of the punishment actually imposed

>c : a crime declared a felony by statute because of the punishment imposed

>d : a crime for which the punishment in federal law may be death or imprisonment for more than one year

You're a moron.",FallingPinkElephant,e99exsu,conservative
"Yep, every felony is tantamount to murder and rape. It's not like the U.S. legal system is built for profit or anything /s. Open your eyes.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e99ne5q,conservative
">Yep, every felony is tantamount to murder and rape.

Yep because every felony that is not murder and rape isn't serious. It's almost like I was right on the money calling you out attempting to redefine the word felony into a misdemeanor just to fit your narrative.

Shall I explain to you the definition of felony again?",FallingPinkElephant,e99nfkt,conservative
Hard Pass. ,iwasthebeaver,e9aukwt,conservative
"Absolutely, NO.",FuriousChef,e9aulgb,conservative
No,MaddSim,e9atueq,conservative
"Fuck Christie, keep him the fuck away from the executive branch ",molon-labe7,e9av5s4,conservative
"Wow that’s underwhelming.

What’s Gowdy up to these days?",emaw63,e9au3qq,conservative
No can do.,R-M-Renfield,e9avyzo,conservative
What a horrible idea.,StraightNewt,e9avxj2,conservative
No,ShiningComet,e9avxuv,conservative
plz no,JMB_was_a_god,e9awcv8,conservative
"The guy thinks it's a good idea for the government to provide college tuition for illegals.

So no, this is not a good idea.",tenshon,e9atyv3,conservative
Don't.,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e9az58y,conservative
Why not Rudy?,_Gardien,e9azjjt,conservative
"Zero chance that Christie will be picked - this is no doubt Christie astroturfing his name via surrogates.              

Aside from confirmation issues, he disappeared during the Access Hollywood weekend, which wasn't an amazing display of loyalty.                                             ",tau_decay,e9b0d6v,conservative
">Others reportedly being considered include former New York City Mayor (and attorney to Trump) Rudy Giuliani, Florida Attorney General Pam Bondi, and former Attorney General William Barr.


Please go Barr or Bondi",Enzo_SAWFT,e9ayisb,conservative
"Jesus Christ, really? This is the best guy for the job? Come on. Seriously?",Nevaknosbest,e9c9swb,conservative
Gangsters calmly stand for 90 minutes answering stupid questions?,ReaganTroll,e9at5rr,conservative
"I remember how mad the MSM got when President Obama revoked Fox News' press pass, does anyone else?  Anyone?  Hello??

[ “We’re going to treat them the way we would treat an opponent,” she says. “We don’t need to pretend that this is the way that legitimate news organizations behave.” - White House staffer, 2009, concerning Fox News](https://www.newsweek.com/when-obama-went-war-fox-news-632424)

President Obama had **one** news outlet dedicated to smearing him.  President Trump has *every major media outlet in the United States* dedicated, unwaveringly, to smearing President Trump.  Get fucked CNN, and get over it ",Jizzlobber42,e9avs2i,conservative
OP is right. BAN HANDGUNS!,AddictedToGlue,e9auyio,conservative
Democrats only care about control and they will use whatever story they need at the moment to gain more.,chabanais,e9auebk,conservative
"Guns aren’t causing the problem, our hands are. So ban hands instead.",Dualiteit,e9avay1,conservative
True. Second amendment only mentions arms. Clearly Hands are not protected by the Constitution.,AddictedToGlue,e9avsci,conservative
"Hands aren’t causing the problem, out free thought is. So ban free thought instead.",Dank_Cartographer,e9avwt4,conservative
"And it only mentions 🐻 arms, so human and other animal extremities should totally be confiscated. ",dtlv5813,e9aw4ok,conservative
"Free thought is a trait of the human brain. Therefore, I think it is imperative that we all die before any more innocent lives are taken. ",Dualiteit,e9bfva8,conservative
[The_Mueller's last 24 hours](https://www.reddit.com/r/TheNewRedScare/comments/9v4i4x/the_8_stages_of_reactions_to_the_2018_elections/),Gnome_Sane,e99b5ck,conservative
"Well if the left thought today would be about them in the news cycle, they were dead wrong. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9938e6,conservative
Remember Trump still has the FISA docs and DoJ texts he can declassify.,ngoni,e99afyj,conservative
What the new acting AG should do is put constraints on the Mueller probe so that it is focused as it should be.  Nobody should ever give the special counsel a blank check to serve a second Justice department as was done here.  There are reasonable constraints that should be placed on the Mueller investigation as to what must be the focus of the investigation.  ,stoffel_bristov,e99bdkm,conservative
"Love him or hate him, Nobody can deny that Trump knows how to manipulate a news cycle. ",iwasthebeaver,e997bmi,conservative
"Despite what the left is saying, Freedom of the Press is perfectly alive. Freedom of the Press is a right we all have. Being a White House Correspondent is a privilege. If you act like a baby in front of your colleagues and the President and refuse to give up your microphone, you might lose that privilege. The Bill of Rights says nothing about Jim Acosta having White House privileges.",pk3maross,e9adjeb,conservative
https://gfycat.com/ImmaterialDelayedBinturong,alc59,e9af1u4,conservative
"Wow I just noticed, she really tried to yank that shit out of his hands. ",Nevaknosbest,e9c030g,conservative
"I think he’s right towards the end of this article. 

You need to put out the fire on your own house before running around helping the neighborhood ",Chapka69,e99m4ay,conservative
"It is really ironic. Super liberal and half funny half stupid @TheFatJewish posted a clip of a pastor rapping, ""That's why Jesus Christ is my N*****"" in a rap video in humor. If Trump would have said that, people would be tearing him apart. Like, I can't believe he said the n-word.

Like come on.",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e99othi,conservative
"I was kind of hoping he'd switch things up and go with Nikki Haley or Rand Paul.  Last time around Pence helped Trump with evangelicals and the conservative base.  This time around those groups trust Trump on his own, so I'm not sure what Pence adds for demographics and electoral math.",Yosoff,e98nldv,conservative
Go Rand!,cons_NC,e98wovw,conservative
I was hoping for Haley. I think she would help attract a lot of women voters and people of color which the Republicans need to win.,Laneyrush,e98nqhk,conservative
Has an incumbent US president ever switched VPs before?,Luke_Flyswatter,e98v736,conservative
"Pence may not be an electoral asset, but he’s a good man who has been a good Veep.  Trump likes him, and keeping him on board is good for people that care about Conservative principles.",joozian_,e98zl89,conservative
"Trump says a lot of things.  It's a comment at a presser, not a contract.  He can do whatever he wants.  I think your analysis is pretty good.  ",timbowen,e9986hs,conservative
She is weak on alot of the issues that got trump elected. she should be kept out of the administration.,JMB_was_a_god,e98qjzh,conservative
Have Republicans won those demographics before running minorities? I think Trump will reach around 15% of the black vote by then anyway. ,latotokyo123,e98nz9q,conservative
If Trump wins reelection and Pompeo leaves Haley will be SecState.  That will set her up for a run at POTUS in 2024.,joozian_,e98zp3z,conservative
"Jefferson, Madison, Jackson, Lincoln, Grant, McKinley, F. Roosevelt, and Nixon all had different VPs in their 2nd terms.",Martbell,e98xw7b,conservative
"Spiro Agnew resigned after a conviction.   


But that was after 1972 election. ",tm1087,e98vufr,conservative
He will be around 15 possibly higher in Black Males. In Texas Cruz crossed the 15% black males this election. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e98ppnq,conservative
Thank you for the info.,Luke_Flyswatter,e990ayr,conservative
I expect black women to stay less than 10% honestly. Black males to go possibly 20-25. ,latotokyo123,e98wd66,conservative
"> On Monday morning, police officers in Anne Arundel County, Maryland showed up confiscate 60-year-old Gary J Willis’ guns. A family member had called police and asked them to suspend Gary Willis’ gun rights, and the local police department was more than happy to oblige.

> When the pounding on the door began at 5:17 am, Gary showed up to his door holding a firearm. **When he saw it was police, he put the gun down to talk to them.** But then, the officers informed him they were there to confiscate all of his weapons.

> Imagine how you would feel. You wake up out of a sound sleep to pounding on your door. You grab a gun in case it is a criminal, but it turns out that the police are there to confiscate your guns without even accusing you of committing a crime…

> Gary Willis refused to comply with the confiscation order. That is when the fight broke out. During the struggle, one of the weapons discharged. Police, fearing for their lives, opened fire on Gary Willis, killing the 60-year-old man in his own home.

> **Gary Willis was not charged or even accused of committing a crime.** All of this happened because one extended family member told police she was worried that he was dangerous. No evidence, no proof… just one person’s word. And now, an innocent man is dead.


""SEE?????  He *was* dangerous, just like his distant relatives presumed he was!""  - The Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9aq1xk,conservative
This law is just begging for even responsible gun owners to not register their firearms with the state.,Drunkenly_Responding,e9arag9,conservative
https://www.washingtonpost.com/national/correction-police-shooting-maryland-story/2018/11/06/db60dd20-e1fe-11e8-ba30-a7ded04d8fac_story.html?noredirect=on&utm_term=.a8732cd42113,cons_NC,e9arij5,conservative
"I mean.. the article is pretty bias. Apparently he picked the gun back up when they told him why they were there. As a general rule.. If the police come to confiscate your guns, comply and then go to court and call every new agency you can find.

Source: https://www.cbsnews.com/news/maryland-officers-serving-red-flag-gun-removal-order-fatally-shoot-armed-man/

https://www.baltimoresun.com/news/maryland/crime/bs-md-aa-shooting-20181105-story.html",guitmusic12,e9ardgf,conservative
Thank you,Ilikeminewelldone,e9asvau,conservative
"yes, let them take your guns and call the suredly unbiased news to back you up. ",iwasthebeaver,e9avb8x,conservative
You call Fox and you will be on live TV that day,guitmusic12,e9avi4h,conservative
"not really, Fox is just another branch of the MSM. If thats not in their narrative for the week it will simply be buried. ",iwasthebeaver,e9avtv9,conservative
"Happy Cake Day iwasthebeaver! Today is your day. Dance with fairies, ride a unicorn, swim with mermaids, and chase rainbows.",EncouragementRobot,e9avtxj,conservative
"funny thing, this is an alt account i made a year ago. My other account thats i think 8 years old or so doesn't have nearly as much Karma. ",iwasthebeaver,e9avwku,conservative
T Swift doesn’t really even live in Tennessee anymore. I doubt she even knew anything about Bredesen other than what her assistants told her the day she made that social media post. ,ice_blue_222,e98p2gt,conservative
"Part of the way to look at this is celebrities endorsed in situations where the candidate was a longshot to win, which is why they endorsed in the first place.  It's not necessarily like their endorsement caused the candidate to lose.",chabanais,e98gzqm,conservative
"When you are a white guy pretending to be hispanic and a member of the party who constantly blames society's problems on white men,  the message that you are sending is ""I am so ashamed to be white that I now identify Mas hispanic."" and I,  as a white male,  saw this as not just an insult,  but a continuance of the Left's viewpoint that white people are what is wrong with the world,  that white people are less than human.   

That wasn't the only thing that told me to not vote Beto,  but it was a major one.   ",GreatJanitor,e997f2j,conservative
I hope so.  ,gtrdundave2,e98gu4r,conservative
Good read. But man these authors really need to watch out for typos. ,link_ganon,e98hazo,conservative
"That's a great point.  Nobody expected Robert Francis O'Rourke to win, so there's no credibility lost by going all in on him.  
  
",FelixFuckfurter,e98lzh6,conservative
">When you are a white guy pretending to be hispanic and a member of the party who constantly blames society's problems on white men,

Especially when your opponent is actually half Hispanic...",Sideswipe0009,e99c5e3,conservative
I don't think celebrities help overall when they endorse specific candidates. ,chabanais,e98miaf,conservative
I dunno. A lot of dumb dumbs on Austin certainly did. ,BooshDag,e99fi30,conservative
They sure got Robert Francis a shitload of money.,FelixFuckfurter,e98n0eo,conservative
Yup and I wonder what will happen to the unspent amount. ,chabanais,e98n84e,conservative
YOU get an abortion!  And YOU get an abortion!,FelixFuckfurter,e98njb7,conservative
"Check out the full press conference down below. Pres. Trump (of course) shows a very good understanding of how this was a victory for the Republicans and even preferable over the Republicans only keeping control of Congress by a small number of seats. The President is open to working with the Democrats on issues of common interest. We'll see if the Democrats are even interested in legislating in good faith soon. Will they obsess over investigations and subpoenas, or will they govern? Time will tell!",BudrickBundy,e98zb9e,conservative
Acosta literally karate chopped that female staff,ExpensiveMention,e990gn4,conservative
[deleted],,e9931r3,conservative
Watch Trump condemn any democrats that want to replace her.  He has already done the work to brand her as crazy.  He wants her to remain the face of the House.,stancrouch,e98sx08,conservative
Quite the tactical move. ,Wiseguy2013,e98t7pf,conservative
Keep yur friends close keep yur enemies closer,gtrdundave2,e98slg9,conservative
"While I love what Trumps trying to do here, I don't know if Pelosi will end up being speaker. So as of right now (4PM ET Wednesday) the House is 222D, 196R, with 17 seats left to be officially called. Of these 17, Republicans currently lead in 11. So for the sake of argument, let's assume they win all 11. This would make it 228D, 207R (hardly a blue wave). Pelosi needs 218 votes to be speaker. Tim Ryan got 63 votes last year in his bid to become Dem leader. WaPo says that at least a dozen new Dems said they won't support her. Should be a close one",Marko_Ramius1,e991mzc,conservative
"> Mr. Trump emphasized at a press conference Wednesday afternoon at the White House that his tweet was not sarcastic.

Oh, you sweet summer child... ",LonelyMachines,e99gyl0,conservative
She's got dementia or something.,tehForce,e98ttj7,conservative
She's got dementia + something else.,sjwking,e98w342,conservative
"This is no longer a ""news media"" - but a propaganda/indoctrination machine now.",raffu280,e98j6hl,conservative
"I had fox streaming on one screen and this streaming on another, since fox' s stream was silent, just showing numbers and info. I had to turn these guys off... it was disgusting. Could they be any more bias?",Cr8er,e98xa1j,conservative
"Now imagine those of us Conservatives living in Oregon. At least Texas has a large enough distribution for voices to be heard; here in Oregon, 1 fucking city runs the entire state. ",Vrael22,e98znrj,conservative
https://v.redd.it/cpg2u80agzw11,VoinaYMir,e99dpl6,conservative
"It has been that way for a very very long time, when you are in the cult it looks normal. ",ozric101,e98m0mj,conservative
The thing is once you see the media manipulation techniques its impossible to stop seeing them. ,iwasthebeaver,e98nrw0,conservative
They better be more aware of what Dems are talking about in these Congressional races. Most of them going on and on about how Repubs would destroy healthcare and Repubs let it go unanswered. Cost a ton of seats last night.,the-divine-comedy,e999r1r,conservative
"The democrats have no solutions either, but they will get the blame this time for doing nothing. ",ozric101,e99jouo,conservative
"So, with Sessions, he had to recuse himself because he implied that he met with Russian oligarchs or something, potentially biasing Sessions’ actions.

What’s Schumer’s reason for this recusal?",AyyyGreens,e994k0e,conservative
Schumer's a twat.  Give him nothing.,BrighamYoung,e99odpq,conservative
"LOL..  Not going to happen Chucky Boy... 

I dare the DNC to start an Impeachment of Trump.   ",ozric101,e9934cg,conservative
Nnnnope!,lax714,e998bsc,conservative
Orange man bad,hello_japan,e9a07xr,conservative
"If I had to guess ""something something attack on our democracy rabble rabble undermining our institutions.""",Tea_is_unAmerican,e99bxz3,conservative
It was something he said about the russia probe or locking Hillary up. Comments where made awhile back. Total Bs from the Dems ,Anon2471776,e99gn7j,conservative
Whitaker had Russian dressing on his salad. Obvious evidence of bias. ,PhilosoGuido,e9acpj3,conservative
We've all met with Russian oligarchs.,1amF0x,e9avyn2,conservative
Babylon Bee is satire guys. ,IAMAK47,e97b8zj,conservative
I knew it was satire because Google wouldn't apologize. ,HissingGoose,e97hj29,conservative
Reading the title it didn't even occur to me that this might be Babylon Bee.,bjivy,e97fq9y,conservative
[deleted],,e97b4va,conservative
The Bee has had some fire articles in the last few days!,TacoTacoma123,e97f1a2,conservative
"Satire guys, calm down",zjwo,e983qzs,conservative
Yea... second paragraph goes on to say that they tried to drone strike conservative voters. Definitely satire. ,nameanxiety,e98777s,conservative
This can’t be real ,W0nt0n1212,e97b6ye,conservative
The best thing about the B-Bee is you can't really tell half the time if it's true or satire.  It can't be said enough.  I could actually see an internal Google test like this popping up somewhere by accident.,Roez,e984wvy,conservative
"Love the Babylon Bee, it's my go to for all news source :D accuracy is their moto there. /s

I do love their articles though haha",callthereaper64,e986iq2,conservative
Google does collect all our information andncan identify us as right /left tho. I woildnt be surprised if they did something similar or this tho,UTSAV97,e988ctu,conservative
"""Accidental""",_nonredditer_,e988o2p,conservative
If this was actually real it wouldn't even surprise me at this point.,kelsoATX,e9921jb,conservative
The Babylon Bee is closer to the truth than CNN :),nharding,e9d3452,conservative
"I feel like some rogue moderator would actually do something like this. Wouldn't be surprising, the left doesn't care about free speech or professionalism. ",xJownage,e97c8qx,conservative
oof. Was this fake news?,NormalStranger,e97lcpm,conservative
Wow...Google is drone striking people now? How far more down can they go?,moderatorsaretoxic,e97fy5k,conservative
"Wait, what? I have always thought that they were the go-to source for information? Did the UN not eat ice cream and declare all war is over?",Staplesnotme,e97wxp1,conservative
Duh,Rydiak,e97den6,conservative
"If it weren't for my (and many of ours) policy of not giving money to reddit, you would be ""gilded"" with a bunch of ""reddit gold"" for that Truth bomb.

So, please accept this as gilded without all the wrongness of giving cash to reddit.",jade_crayon,e97yzlr,conservative
I almost believed the first part because it totally sounds like something Google would do,JingyBreadMan,e97p1pi,conservative
Ignorance is bliss I guess ,SilenceoftheSamz,e981oxn,conservative
Based on the porn you watch ,TheGreatPJDJ,e97j35x,conservative
"Google tracks your search history, duh. The conservatives are those who google things like ""why do black Muslim Mexicans keep trying to murder-rape me"", ""is .223 or 5.56 better?"" and of course the evergreen classic ""how can I tell if my sister's baby is mine or my dad's?""",GorathThorgath,e97hrqk,conservative
From your data,TheSuperFabio,e97cnn8,conservative
Surfing history.,chabanais,e97bf4b,conservative
"Based on the kind of data we browse. There's a lot modern algorithms can make sense of just based on a day of history. It's scary to think, isn't it?",goldrotmgonly,e98c9rf,conservative
"This one is ~~pretty good~~ EPIC 

>[Ben Shapiro Just ABSOLUTELY DESTROYED This Denny's Waitress With FACTS And LOGIC After She Rejected His Expired Coupon](https://babylonbee.com/news/ben-shapiro-absolutely-destroyed-this-dennys-waitress-after-she-rejected-his-expired-coupon)",gaynazifurry4bernie,e97qifd,conservative
You're in luck because the Babylon bee is satire.,gaynazifurry4bernie,e97qgwg,conservative
It's satire.,secret_porn_acct,e98dwj1,conservative
"To clarify, i know that this is satire, my point was the left is so out there at times it wouldn't surprise me to see this actually happen sometime.",xJownage,e97hm8g,conservative
Satire,V3rzamm,e97unhu,conservative
"Well that last question you asked, that was truth.",Splickity-Lit,e98fk6r,conservative
I'll happily accept Reddit Silver 8-),HissingGoose,e980pm6,conservative
">white man and woman missionary 

>duration: 33 seconds 


Damn how’d they know ",sleepyradio182,e97k440,conservative
roll tide ,lolb42,e97prci,conservative
[deleted],,e97days,conservative
He didn’t tell her anything about his wife?,Splickity-Lit,e98fyys,conservative
"I dunno; they accurately capture the clickbait-style headlines of Daily Wire, but once you get past said headlines, the reporting inside is generally very solid. Whereas they continued to use the same style for the headlines inside of the body of the article itself, which makes it sort of a poor allegory for Daily Wire.",MarioFanaticXV,e97xrgt,conservative
"I’m starting to get stung by the bee a lot lately, kind of freaky that this is somewhat believable ",kowbrandt,e98tgi3,conservative
Purest Form of fake news ,tinyhands-45,e99mjkr,conservative
Yup . There are search engines battling that like duckduckgo but they don't have many users .,UTSAV97,e988gjr,conservative
Tards are pretty creepy tho.,chabanais,e97dc0r,conservative
"She's a doctor, you know.",gaynazifurry4bernie,e98ijqx,conservative
She is?!,Splickity-Lit,e98mqpl,conservative
The Midwest is a fairly normal place that doesn’t like radical candidates.,Ilikeminewelldone,e98fiql,conservative
"Of course they did. Most people don't like change, or at least changing too fast. Seems like progressives want to up end the system every 10 years or so.",Sideswipe0009,e99c1jc,conservative
Explain that to Minneapolis,TheGreatPJDJ,e9962nh,conservative
Big cities lend to blue.,Ash_of_Astora,e997z0i,conservative
"Madison, WI, too...",bionic80,e99ip08,conservative
*blue AND radical,TheGreatPJDJ,e9981ip,conservative
"Why does Trump think he won?  Because facts are awesome;  [In every midterm election since the Civil War, the president's party has lost, on average, 32 seats in the House and two in the Senate.](https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/elections/everything-you-need-know-about-2018-midterm-elections-n832226)  The ""Blue Wave"" wasn't even average, it was *below* average. ",Jizzlobber42,e9aqt3h,conservative
Trump met his objectives. Keep the Senate. He knew the house was going to flip because of where his base is located. So he spent his time working on the Senate.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9ak64q,conservative
He kinda did though.,chabanais,e9ak4nn,conservative
Hell yeah. A blue “*wave*” mixed with some red rain.,menardo3,e9asxaj,conservative
The losses in the House are not that bad all things considered.  Trump and the GOP held pretty well. ,ozric101,e9ampzw,conservative
"Very well. The Dems will old the house by less than 10, which is a pretty big deal all things considered. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9amubz,conservative
" Expectations were it would be much worse (""blue wave""). Trump always seems to be in the underdog position and he always makes the most of it, coming out better than expected. 
",zroxx2,e9aonse,conservative
"I was told a blue wave was coming, that is no wave, that is just politics as normal. ",ozric101,e9an70x,conservative
That wont stop the MSM from claiming so,Dank_Cartographer,e9annl4,conservative
"On the contrary, a lot of members of the media were saying ""this is no blue wave"", even on election night.",Martbell,e9ar4fp,conservative
"The MSM has been screaming at the sky for 2 straight years, so it really matters little. ",ozric101,e9anwp5,conservative
Never saw that coming. /s,_Gardien,e98wf39,conservative
About time,cmiller1225,e9916a4,conservative
"https://twitter.com/EmeraldRobinson/status/1060273491533094912

Rosenstien may be out aswell!",JMB_was_a_god,e991mfr,conservative
"The salt flowing from the Democrat mines... They're already wildly speculating. 

I can't wait to see where this goes. ",CoyoteBanned,e98yyag,conservative
Trump summoned Rod to the Whitehouse... He might fire his dumbass too. ,ozric101,e98z6kr,conservative
Summoned RR. Nice. ,CoyoteBanned,e98zcxu,conservative
"Can’t wait until they use algorithms to draw new districts. While it wouldn’t be perfect, and while the code itself could contain bias, I think a systematic approach would be better than attacking it with biased partisans.",AyyyGreens,e994fgf,conservative
"https://bloximages.newyork1.vip.townnews.com/heraldmailmedia.com/content/tncms/assets/v3/editorial/4/2f/42fe9496-5915-11e7-a373-ef318b5b5dd3/594ec0a721c78.image.jpg?resize=1200%2C702

Seem like a totally reasonable congressional map to me!",guitmusic12,e9943z0,conservative
"Why bother when they're going to be redrawn in two years anyway by Hogan, a Republican?",gbimmer,e999f2j,conservative
Thank God; I was beyond pissed when they gerrymandered away the representation for Western Maryland. Roscoe Bartlett was a good rep and didn't deserve to have his career ended like that.  ,Maswasnos,e99kpaz,conservative
"Nope... Part of the spoils of a successful campaign, so no.  ",ozric101,e995w02,conservative
Do districts not have to be contiguous?,genericusernametwo,e998ta4,conservative
State legislature draws the districts and it’s heavily D controlled,Molly-Cow,e99a2xe,conservative
"No, they do. The map you see just doesn't have enough detail to show the connections. I believe in some cases the connections literally go down the middle of a street...",Maswasnos,e99kj63,conservative
Oregon votes by 3 cities Portland salem Eugene.  If you live anywhere else you basically don't matter ,gtrdundave2,e98fwkh,conservative
"I realize I'm a dinosaur, but have any of these people heard of Civics 101?",biggermustache,e98fr05,conservative
"Funny, because I see a lot of people saying that the rural areas are being dominated by an urban minority. I wonder who’s right?",AyyyGreens,e98en9i,conservative
"The Rural minority is the part of the country that makes all the food, oil and raw materials the cities require to function.

This hatred of the rural portions of this country are totally unhealthy adn will ultimately lead to the cities being dmaged horribly",Manchurainprez,e98gh32,conservative
Those pesky Founding Fathers. WHEN WILL THEY GO AWAY!!!!,fifaislife206,e98gku1,conservative
"Well, we've had that darn constitution and electoral college in place for about 250 years.  Wanna have a civil war to change it?  Fuck off NBC.  ",stoffel_bristov,e998vhk,conservative
What are they going to do about it?  Nothing... right.,Reven1911,e99zoe1,conservative
"Unless you vote republican and live in one of those cities, then you also don’t matter haha",Dagrr,e98gorj,conservative
"Basically. I mean, how else would Kate Brown keep her seat? This state is quickly devolving into a total crap-show.",Dantooine123,e98hbj2,conservative
"Oregon is lost. Move to Montana and force the hippies out of Missoula.
",Trucker_with_a_cat,e98vyjh,conservative
nope it used to be taught at the highschool level until the 80s.. ,Delta_25,e990du4,conservative
"Well, in fairness Democrats did receive a literal majority of the votes cast in the House elections. But we aren't supposed to have a pure ""majority rules"" system. Whether the urban portion of the electorate is a majority or a minority is somewhat beside the point.",PubliusVA,e98igtu,conservative
"Whites a majority: 

""REEEEEE, you're oppressing minorities!""


Whites a minority:

""REEEEEEE, you're ruling undemocratically!""

",lost_snake,e98lxpz,conservative
"Not to mention owning and caretaking more of the country by area, proportionally, as well as having mutually contradictory needs. Christ, city folk really desperately need to spend a year of their lives on a fucking farm. ",Yamez,e98mz04,conservative
"She'll fight for a recount.  Even if she doesn't win, her next best scenario is to fight the results to bring him under 50%.  Georgia rules state the winner must have over 50% to win.

The positive of this is that Kemp has $250k specifically for the runnoff campaign while Abraham's only raised $100k for that.

",tehForce,e9825cv,conservative
Pretty disappointing how close it is...,ADamnTroll2,e981nhd,conservative
To the surprise of no one. ,amjourdan,e981fjm,conservative
"Playing the race card in 3,2,1...",puddboy,e987v01,conservative
She lost because of Russian collusion.,Lepew1,e989jfm,conservative
I’ve been stalking the results since last night and I’m really getting nervous now.......,HumbleRaspberry15,e98ecwd,conservative
What a pleb,benhur217,e981cpc,conservative
"No matter how complex the situation may be, the left will come up with the most unsophisticated response possible.

Racism.",elvisjulep,e98gxfk,conservative
[removed],,e98bjjz,conservative
Almost time to whip out the Race Card!,JFGFNY,e9bad86,conservative
"She will get millions from out of state,  that’s what she’s counting on ",dudeman4win,e987nnr,conservative
"It's been reported that we'll have to wait till Friday for the Provisional ballots deadline. We've also got absentee votes being counted in the process. I doubt she'll gain enough to to bring Kemp under 50% for a runoff, and even if we go to runoff, we're looking at a higher chance of winning with the Libertarians voting.

&#x200B;

It's a gonna be a looming anxiety for us the next few days.

&#x200B;

EDIT: It's been confirmed that all the absentees have been counted. About 25,000 Provisionals are left and it is determined that there will be no runoff and Kemp is gonna be gov..",SpekkMasiaf,e997g97,conservative
"I can’t wait to see the amount of campaign donations she had. I bet she outspent Kemp, and she’s still going to lose. ",BayernMunich22,e981tei,conservative
"To my knowledge, she has not used it in the past and does not seem like she's going to use it here. It seems she just wants to fight for the vote, it's a democracy I don't see why not. what's so wrong with that and why do we need to default to trying to take away from their credibility because they're black? ",xounaut,e99behk,conservative
Hello fellow conservative! May I suggest /r/politics for your reading pleasure?,rationalhuckleberry,e98d7w2,conservative
Wasting money is a Dem tradition! ,ADamnTroll2,e9840qg,conservative
"Plus, r/politics is still in full REEEEEEE! mode ",BayernMunich22,e984rqf,conservative
They have been since 2016,stanleythemanley44,e986tfr,conservative
It's no fun over there because it's like 80% lib NPCs that just downvote anything that isnt their narrative. ,ADamnTroll2,e98o8sg,conservative
"That's how it's been in r/Atlanta  the last few months, anything not positive about her is removed and all political  comments are restricted to only pro her submissions.",capt_evil,e99fy24,conservative
"Losing the house means libs control committee's. They are going to go on a rampage of impeachment, investigations, empowering Mueller, supeana power. 

Nothing constructive will get done for another 2 years.",cmiller1225,e97g05q,conservative
"It's going to make nominations a helluva lot easier, that's for sure. No more having to rely on Lisa Murkowski and Susan Collins.",GuitarWizard90,e97fpna,conservative
"Let's get more federal judges jammed through, and maybe another Supreme Court justice next year.",SendixBunny,e97hbxq,conservative
I’m just glad to know that I belong to the party that won’t be out screaming in mobs for a week across the country because we lost the house. ,MangoSalsa933,e97luxf,conservative
"When you consider that over 2/3 (26/33) of the senate seats up for re-election are democratic, it’s not really all that surprising.",Enoraptor,e97jykp,conservative
I swear this country is politically schizophrenic. Anytime one party gets going they flip a chamber of Congress.,professorkdj,e980wu4,conservative
"The sad thing is that with “the future of the party” Ocasio-Cortez victory, and renewals on Feinstein, Warren, Waters and Sanders, the socialist loons are going to march their progressive agenda emboldened, as they always do. ",m2guru,e97kyy0,conservative
Looking forward to Justice Amy Coney Barrett,setyourblasterstopun,e97luj4,conservative
They have a 4 seat majority which isn't bad. They might not even be able to impeach Trump because some of those fuckers are in red states.,MuricanStephen,e97wbok,conservative
"As a new jerseyan, I apologize to you all. The dems in this state voted in a pedophile and a criminal. But as mad as that makes me, I’m so glad Cruz won. ",TheTrueIron,e97fe7x,conservative
Sometimes $70 million just isn't enough! ,BuSpocky,e97wlag,conservative
">We just solidified a conservative Supreme Court, guys. Think about how important that is. 

This is how we win permanently. ",TmRaUgMaP,e97orpl,conservative
Losing the House means that now Trump has something to run against for the next 2 years.  Democrats are about to be exposed as the Party of Spite and every normal American will hate them for it.,Yosoff,e97gw7d,conservative
"I'm surprised by this election result really. For the ""blue wave"" I expected a party shift of roughly 10-20 more seats than were actually flipped. I believe Republicans gained over twice the amount of seats in the 2010 election swing. Democrats now only have ~11 seats above a majority which really isn't that safe. Republicans had 241 seats, and now Democrats have roughly an estimate of 229. Still control the courts, senate, governors, and presidency so I think we'll be fine in the long run, if democrats want to shoot themselves in the foot and try for impeachment, they'll likely take a big hit during 2020.",Auxilae,e982rn3,conservative
I refuse to call the House on the Dem side until I see the numbers come in. I think it was kind of weird of Fox to call it so early based on projections.,getupkid1986,e97fby2,conservative
"Somebody help me out here: why are they calling it so early when many states haven't reported? Are we past a threshold/majority number?

(I'm kinda salty because Alaska is last to report and everything has been called before then usually)",gab907,e97miol,conservative
"What I wrote 3 months ago:

>If we keep the House, it'll only be by a few members, but I think we'll end up losing it. The Senate, the map really favors Republicans this time around, and we'll end up gaining a couple of seats.
>
>It'll be bad for trying to get legislation through, but it will be easy to get MOAR judges confirmed.
>
>Losing the House will also be a boon to Trump's 2020 reelection chances.

Mitch is going to be smiling bigly this morning, here come the judge(s) here come the judge(s)!",DH5650,e981ikz,conservative
There's just no hope here in Minnesota. ,Unicorn_Priest,e97pww8,conservative
"The house seats are all up every election. The map in the Senate this time was more favorable, due to many more incumbent Democrats being up for reelection than Republicans. It's not surprising then that more flipped.",Cryptic0677,e985xyk,conservative
It’s not over yet,STFU_Donny724,e97f88t,conservative
"You cannot be civil with a political party that wants to destroy what you stand for, what you care about. That's why I believe, if we are fortunate enough to win back the House, that's when civility can start again. But until then, the only thing that the Democrats seem to recognize and respect is strength. /s",hamberger7,e97j3bn,conservative
[removed],,e97p0fg,conservative
"What's losing the house and keeping the senate even mean anyways, in terms of passing of policies. Assuming everyone vote according to party lines, what changed from before the election? Lets say RBG falls over tomorrow and needs to be replaced, what are the odds of getting another SCOTUS pick passed? What about another try at getting rid of Obamacare or wall funding? ",CN9YLW,e97m93a,conservative
"It wasn't a blue wave, it wasn't a red wave. The R's did as best as they could have hoped for. If all the D's have is endless ""muh Russia"" investigation then they won't have anything to run on for 2020. Trump won't get impeached. He won't resign. Firing your FBI director for being a retard isn't a crime. ",Nostraadms,e986ny3,conservative
"Hey, if Stefanowski wins, I can live with two years of gridlock. Just makes it easier to vote read in 2020",giobbistar21,e97lb9c,conservative
First time voting ever. A nice night I’d say.,213_,e97go3c,conservative
So what bad can come with the Dems having the House?,R0binSage,e97hezk,conservative
"Fuck the House, it has no walls.",ModeratorsAreDouches,e97qkpg,conservative
"Republicans do not have a legislative agenda binding the party together. Having the house is nice, but not the be all end all of GOP governance. 

Republicans do have a judicial agenda. That is what matters at this time. 

Trump does have a legislative agenda, but not wide support for it in all corners of the party.",memberCP,e9890bu,conservative
"With The frenetic nature of the house its going to be hard for pelosi to do anything,  at this rate the Dems might only pick up 10 or less seat majority.  Thats a dead heat when it comes to the house. ",Manchurainprez,e98aga4,conservative
"If Mitch and company play their cards right, they can force Democrats into looking like petty obstructionists whose only platform is resistance. This can be a big victory for us in 2020 if done right.",8K12,e98cduw,conservative
We lost our governor here in Wisconsin. It was looking like Walker was going to win by a slim lead when Milwaukee pulled 50000 absentee ballots out of thin air and boosted Evers to a 30000 vote win. ,Wisco1856,e97r339,conservative
"Democrats killed themselves with two October surprises: Kavanaugh, and caravans.  Let's hope their House oversteps with investigations and they kill their majority in 2020.",Lepew1,e984c2o,conservative
Hopefully Ginsberg falls off. Then the D's will definitely lose  their minds.,Nostraadms,e986tqo,conservative
So then they have to run in 2020 on 2 years of obstruction ,Enzo_SAWFT,e97g264,conservative
GOP tried this and it backfired horribly in the 90s.  Bring it on.,timbowen,e97mbqr,conservative
"I'm a liberal. Mark my words. It won't pass the Senate, but if they try to impeach Trump I'll vote conservative for the rest of my life. ",thesedogdayz,e97yroj,conservative
"Can’t argue with your first point, although the old guard won’t let it get out of hand on impeachment. They were around for the Clinton backfire. Second point maybe isn’t so bad. The less government does, the better. IMHO.  I feel like we have more issues from them ‘doing something’ than when they did no harm. ",A_WildStory_Appeared,e97xr3u,conservative
This might be painful in the short run but all but secures 2020 for Trump ,digitalexecution,e980d78,conservative
"As I stated in my above post, they can moan and complain and have committee after committee. It will all die when it’s submitted to the Senate",electricspook,e97wnei,conservative
Doing nothing is the second best thing the government can do.,rapitrone,e9800wx,conservative
"> They are going to go on a rampage of impeachment, investigations, empowering Mueller, supeana power.

they will make themselves look like giant douche bags.  Pelosi, Waters, Schiff, and cummings will be the head of powerful committees and on TV regularly.  How will that effect the electorate in 2020?  ",stoffel_bristov,e97pt4i,conservative
"Let them impeach trump. Then we get Mike Pence. We still win. Trump might even be voted back in, in 2020 lol",Staplesnotme,e97x72d,conservative
"Nah, they are already tempering expectations. The democrats have a way of shitting the bed when they get power. 

Plus trump has declassifications yet to play. ",ChuanFaFist,e981pvs,conservative
Why is obstruction suddenly undesirable?,TheJerkku,e97za7h,conservative
"Trump will rule via Executive Order, much like Obama did.  Unfortunately nothing permanent via Congress will get done.",Shadowstalker75,e982929,conservative
"Bingo. So what, the Dems spend time investigating this or that, that have already been investigated. And try to pass extremist laws that get shot down I Senate. Meanwhile, the senate can still do things that matter long term. ",MaddSim,e97gqbt,conservative
"In the long run, judicial nominations are the most important legacy of Trump and will exert influence for decades.",chabanais,e97ge2m,conservative
Amy Coney Barrett's nomination is already loaded in the chamber.,Buce-Nudo,e97qheb,conservative
Or 4,TallMikeSTL,e97kexf,conservative
I went on Twitter and the whole beto thing is a mess there. God I hate Twitter...,JingyBreadMan,e97p471,conservative
"This is an understated point,.  The opposite is true in 2020, when  20/33 seats open for re-election are Republican.  Will be interesting to see how the next two years play out going into an election with a controversial president, Democrat-controlled House, and Republican-controlled Senate. ",UncleKRob,e97p2xp,conservative
"Democrats don't like more money in their pockets apparently.  Then again, most don't have well paying jobs anyways therefore pay pennies in taxes.",PerceivedShift,e9856oz,conservative
It's just human nature. Grass is always greener and all that.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e98b1lx,conservative
"Someone suggested last night Ocasio-Cortez will help form a Democratic Socialist caucus.  Maybe not straight away.  She's probably going to be around for decades though.  She's in tight with that group associated with Farrakhan, who all happen to also be Socialists.  I never considered it before.  It's a very real possibility.  ",Roez,e984mpx,conservative
"That's really the most frustrating part, how ""loud"" these people are. It doesn't bother so-much that they won, but that I have to listen to their 2 year long victory speech.

\*edit: Spelling",NPC8705,e97zxk7,conservative
And it will be there downfall.,Person74,e980hr9,conservative
"*All embrace her*

*It's her time to rule at last*.

*Two years has SHE BEEN WAITING, TO SIT UPON THE BENCH!*



*One allegiance, she will swear the oath!*

*Robed by Trump, and robed by God, as*

*HER JUDGEMENT IS DIVINE!*",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e98508n,conservative
[removed],,e97p2lk,conservative
"It's definitely less than people where expecting but still in line with the polls. Also, I'm pretty sure this impeach stuff is political grandstanding. At most it'll be an act, and at worst it's going to hurt them in favor of moderates. The fact of the matter is that while Trump is divisive among the american public there's really not a whole lot of people who want him impeached.  
My mom brought up, ""but what about all the investigations"" and all I could think of is ""what would really change?"" It's not like house republicans haven't given the democrats every investigation they asked for. ",MAGA_Carta,e98ahlw,conservative
I was kinda surprised MD stuck with a Republican Governor though. Like the first time in half a century they’ve gotten a Republican governor for two terms. ,Tnargkiller,e97qmpt,conservative
"Same here. I didn't really have much hope for a good outcome, but I'll be able to sleep at night knowing my name wasn't attached to trash in the end. Also glad to see Cruz won, I was watching that closely.",katouhayato,e97ii62,conservative
"Well, Delaware voted for a [wife beater](https://freebeacon.com/politics/tom-carper-admitted-to-hitting-his-wife-in-1998-interview/) and career politician. So blue..",DEYoungRepublicans,e97fjzy,conservative
"I second this apology. Hugin really didn't have much of a platform though, other than, Menendez is a crook. Although the race was closer than I thought. People in NJ don't vote for some reason.",wwg1wgamaga,e97xpmd,conservative
I'm too ashamed to admit what Illinois elected...,Beastmode3625,e97ih0g,conservative
"I vaguely remember this. Weren't most of those claims found to be unsubstantiated? In which case, how is it so dissimilar to the recent claims against Kavanaugh? (In the sense of people saying that there wasn't sufficient evidence to believe Ford's claims) But I could be forgetting a lot of that situation (Not trolling, honest question)",RunagateRampant,e987of5,conservative
"Sometimes $70 million and 20 times that much of in-kind support from the CNN Fake News MSM doing puff pieces about BETO while the Silcion Valley Mob censors conservatives just isn't enough.

FTFY. ;)",jade_crayon,e97z4sf,conservative
"The chances of a constitutional conservative supreme court (as it should be, its their job) is looking greater and greater for decades to come.  It is our last strong line of defense for freedom.  However I still fear for our country economically as the left continues their never ending push to socialism.

Welfare is so incredibly hard to repeal as eventually people *depend* on it, *in a simplistic sense the left buys votes with our tax dollars.*  Like all socialist states they eventually pop economically and I feel like our victories only delay the inevitable.  But unlike other states the *world* depends on us, our collapse will cause a chain reaction around the globe.  I don't think anyone can predict what will happen, but it won't be pretty.   ",PerceivedShift,e9850id,conservative
"> Democrats are about to be exposed as the Party of Spite 

No they won't because the media will applaud them every step of the way. ",atomicdiarrhea4000,e97nzdc,conservative
Exactly.  The dems taking the house could be a blessing in disguise.  Now Trump has someone to blame when things don't work out and he'll have a field day with all the nonsense the dems are sure to attempt.  2020 is going to be a dem blood bath.,wynhdo,e97hfw2,conservative
[removed],,e97my7z,conservative
And their base won't give a shit. If seeing mobs of people attacking conservatives didnt change minds then nothing will. ,AgrosLastRide,e97y1e3,conservative
"<30% of the country reporting in? Let's call it for the Dems!

Assholes.",diamondeyes18,e97htx9,conservative
"Extensive polling and analysis tells them things, example:

Candidate A will win if A has 60% of vote with 15% reported. (In a specific sector they know which votes get counted first and how to weight them against the remainder)


Edit: also they can know which seats will have 95% likelihood to be retained and they count those eggs as hatched ",trelium06,e97o0of,conservative
"I don't know. Maybe they need time to change votes from Republican to Democrat.

I really don't think they should call races for a few days just to make sure there was no fraud. And at this point, I really don't trust that things are being done above board. Not with this many crazy leftists fired up, working polls, etc. ",noiwontsharemyfries,e97qe0u,conservative
Hello Darkness my old friend...,Moonthrower,e980799,conservative
"Yep, it feels like every candidate I voted for was pointless. Only the MN state representative won out of all the candidates I voted for. That won't stop me from voting every election I can though.",houseoftolstoy,e98nhu2,conservative
[removed],,e97wkai,conservative
"Democrats have to be careful or they are going to look mighty ridiculous if they dont play ball. The people are expecting a change. If the Democrats tank the economy or dont get anything done, republicans are going to have a grand ol time in 2020.


There were a lot of voters who want action. There may have been a ""blue wave"" but if all the Democrats have to show for that wave is a lot of bickering and non partisanship then Republicans can easily secure a win in 2 years.",talann,e97w8tl,conservative
"Here's a scary thought. In 2020 when rebublican senate seats are up for grabs, imagine losing the senate while the dems keep the house (with the massive gain they got) and then Trump losing to a democrat too. ",UrdBurd,e97q8po,conservative
Yep. So much this. It was a solid blue wave and anyone who says it wasn't is delusional. We are fucked until 2020. ,Dunkeliness,e97rsj7,conservative
The whole election was rigged by the Democrats! ,kickintheface,e97p2jx,conservative
"The House has no role in confirming Supreme Court Justices, so the odds of confirming a replacement for RBG just went up with the 3 additional Senate seats.

Things like wall funding require votes in the House so it means Democrats and Republicans will have to work together.  Which means we would need to give the Democrats something they want in exchange for the wall.",Yosoff,e9831q7,conservative
Nothing really passing. Just years of obstruction and using every committee to probe at Trump,Enzo_SAWFT,e97i0nf,conservative
"We'll put the middle income tax cut bill forward, which will also make income tax cuts non-expiry.  This will not look good for democrats, we'll also pressure them on the budget, as many ran on ""fiscal responsibility in Washington"". (Many of these dems posed as moderates to win)  They will likely go after the military budget, we've had to increase mil spending lately mainly due to mil budget cuts during the last administration. (I read the bill)  If that is now covered mil funding may drop next year anyways giving us an edge.  Three wars ending could also reduce spending and look great for Trump.  But, we must be very careful not to leave a power vacuum like Obama did in the middle east bringing about the rise of ISIS.  I believe we should also pressure other western countries to live up to their damn military spending promises, we are freakin subsidizing them and they know it.",PerceivedShift,e9862vt,conservative
">Thousands of ballots were damaged and had to be recreated,"" Reisinger said, clarifying that he was speaking of the Milwaukee County votes. ""Until there is a comparison of the original ballots to the recreated ballots, there is no way to judge their validity.

[You have got to be kidding me, this is bullshit](https://www.jsonline.com/story/news/politics/elections/2018/11/06/milwaukee-county-has-more-than-50-000-uncounted-absentee-ballots/1916187002/)",PerceivedShift,e986a3z,conservative
They will be happy to do it and their supporters will lap it up,MikePenceVP,e97gr3r,conservative
They just ran on 2 yrs of obstruction.  And went +34 in the House.  ,Rogdaddy,e97widl,conservative
It worked for Republicans. ,Squigglefits,e97gpsv,conservative
"And you think they won't?

Remember Kavanaugh and gang rape smears. Remember how unhinged Democrats are. When leftists lost the presidential race in Brazil /r/politics lost it's fucking hivemind. Some highly upvoted loons claimed people are going to be dragged out of their homes and killed now.

They believe their own fearmongering and as a result, they will rationalize their every action as self-defense.",Kryvakryz,e97svi2,conservative
Yikes... the irony,twitch_imikey30,e97rorb,conservative
It did work for conservative voters....,Falkamper,e980xph,conservative
"Mark those words, folks. ",VeggieHatr,e9850ca,conservative
"That doesn't make any sense to me.

If you're really a liberal, you wouldn't vote against policy just because of that. Especially since the common liberal viewpoint is that he's committed multiple impeachable offenses.",olaf_the_bold,e98grwb,conservative
Well said. ,PeeMud,e9841ho,conservative
">they will make themselves look like giant douche bags.  

No it won't. That's what the people who voted for them want those individuals to do. That's the problem.
",soylent_absinthe,e97wjal,conservative
Hav fun getting 67 senators to agree on anything lol. Trump isnt going anywhere. ,TrumpWinsTrumpwins,e97ympo,conservative
No we won't. They can impeach Trump but then the Senate has to convict him. Republicans weren't even willing to do that for Bill Clinton. There's no way they'll do so for Trump.,,e97xwn2,conservative
Impeach is like handing down a formal claim to have a trial or whatever in the Senate.  It would be political move only.  Trump's not going anywhere.  ,Roez,e97zdhs,conservative
"I know right? I was watching the superbowl and one time there's a touchdown and everyone cheered, a few minutes later another touchdown happened and everyone groaned and yelled at the ref.

People are so complicated sometimes... ",DangerToDemocracy,e9801ku,conservative
"Also, for anything big like impeachment, they would need to the Senate to remove Trump from office which will NEVER happen, and I think that this midterm election made that very clear.",wwg1wgamaga,e97xk3n,conservative
Great point,cmiller1225,e97ipiw,conservative
Agreed. Trump has something like a dozen judicial nominees in the queue and I’d hope the Senate gets to installing them. ,Tnargkiller,e97qorm,conservative
It's the main reason I voted for Trump.,Havebaconwilltravel,e97tqbq,conservative
Don't federal judge nominations have to go through the House judicial committee which will be controlled by Democrats going forward?  Will Trump be able to get any more judges appointed after this?,Shadowstalker75,e982z16,conservative
"Poor Thomas Hardiman. Always the bridesmaid, never the bride...",Taylor814,e97qpig,conservative
"I'm now violently hungover and covetous of death, but that's one thing that gives me cause to hope. Soon we'll be able to say goodbye to Notorious RBG, and usher in the Virtuous ACB. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9849w6,conservative
YUMMY.,amdgph,e97s9es,conservative
"The next seat should go to Cruz. Aside from him being eminently qualified and the GOP now having the margins needed to confirm him without adverse consequences, it'd be a nice way to rub salt in Democratic wounds by filling the seat yet again with somebody not named Beto.",gprime,e9817x9,conservative
"Let's nominate Kavanaugh's frat bro Mark Judge to replace RBG.

It would be perfect.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e98apwx,conservative
"Check out the [2020 map](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Senate_elections,_2020). 

That's not exactly map that will thrill Democrats with pickup opportunities. Not a lot of obvious options for Republicans to pick up more, except Alabama. I'm sure there will be additional opportunities if someone passes or retires, but nothing is evident right now.

2022 isn't much better for Dems, with only a couple of extra pickup chances.",RoundSimbacca,e9804ip,conservative
Only one of those 2020 GOP Senate Sears will be in a State Clinton won.,Taylor814,e97qqjv,conservative
"They're MUCH easier to defend in a presidential election though, and Trump will likely be much popular by then after he ends a war. (North Korea, Iraq, or Afghanistan)",ChopSuey2,e97r1zs,conservative
"Great, let them. These ideas need to be discussed and debated in the light of public discourse.

And exposed for what they represent: the decline, if not the destruction, of the American way of life.",m2guru,e984vla,conservative
Cortez is tight with Farrakhan? I didn't know this,royallprick,e98gldq,conservative
"*She was chosen by Donald*

*Say her name when you pray*

**To the skiiieees**

*See Justice Barrett rise*

*With the Constitution her protector*

*Make them bow to the law*

**To the skiiieees**

*See Justice Barrett rise*",JuliusEvolasGhost,e98bdqr,conservative
"Stridently originalist, expert in constitutional law and statutory interpretation, well published, great personal story, stands her ground ",setyourblasterstopun,e97qp1o,conservative
"She has been at the forefront of accomplishment everywhere she goes, much like Kavanaugh. Great integrity. Very caring and professional. A solid Constitutionalist.

[Here's a lecture of hers.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7yjTEdZ81lI)

[Here's her on a panel discussing Scalia's influence.](https://youtu.be/bD9jq9Tdge4?t=332)

[Here's her hearing in front of the Judicial Committee on her nomination to the 7th Circuit.](https://www.c-span.org/video/?433501-1/amy-coney-barrett-testifies-seventh-circuit-confirmation-hearing-2017)

[And here's a fun little tidbit of Al Franken making a fool of himself, trying to take her down. Not proving anything about her career. It's just nice seeing Democrats struggle to attack people.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iHpqoCmVbjU)

Here's some quick background info:

https://www.nationalreview.com/bench-memos/who-amy-coney-barrett/

>**Age:** 45 (approximate)

>**Current Position:** Circuit Court Judge, U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit

>**Education:**

>B.A., Rhodes College (1994), magna cum laude; Phi Beta Kappa, Most Outstanding English Major; Most Outstanding Senior Thesis

>J.D., Notre Dame Law School (1997); summa cum laude; recipient, Hoynes Prize (awarded to the graduate with the best record in scholarship, deportment, and achievement); Dean’s Award (best exam in Administrative Law, Civil Procedure I and II, Constitutional Law, Contracts, Criminal Procedure, Evidence, First Amendment, Torts II, and Legal Research and Writing); Executive Editor, Notre Dame Law Review; Kiley Fellow (full tuition fellowship)

>**Judicial Clerkships:**

>Judge Laurence Silberman of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit (1997-1998)

>Associate Justice Antonin Scalia of the U.S. Supreme Court (1998-1999)

>**Experience:**

>1999-2000: Associate, Miller Cassidy, Larroca & Lewin (merged with Baker Botts in 2000) (Washington, D.C.)

>2000-2001: Associate, Baker Botts LLP (Washington, D.C.)

>2001-2002: John M. Olin Fellow in Law, Adjunct Faculty, George Washington University Law School (Washington, D.C.)

>2002-2017: Assistant Professor of Law, Associate Professor of Law, Professor of Law, and Diane and M.O. Miller II Research Chair in Law, Notre Dame Law School (South Bend, IN)

>2017-present: Circuit Court Judge, U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit

>**Notable matters:**

>At Notre Dame, Barrett taught and researched in the areas of federal courts, constitutional law, and statutory interpretation. Her scholarship in these fields has been published in leading journals, including the Columbia Law Review, Virginia Law Review, and Texas Law Review. Her recent publications include Congressional Insiders and Outsiders, U. Chi. L. Rev. (forthcoming 2017), Originalism and Stare Decisis, 92 Notre Dame Law Review (forthcoming 2017) and Congressional Originalism, 19 U. Penn J. of Const. Law (2017).

>From 2010-2016, she served by appointment of the Chief Justice on the Advisory Committee for the Federal Rules of Appellate Procedure.

>**Awards:** Distinguished Professor of the Year (2006, 2016)

>**Update: Letters of Endorsement for Amy Coney Barrett**

>*Supreme Court Law Clerks who clerked with Barrett:* her former colleagues unanimously agree that she “is a woman of remarkable intellect and character” who is “eminently qualified for the job.”

>*450 Former students:* “Her students learn that lawyers have an unyielding obligation to think deeply and well about the law. And they see that Professor Barrett cares deeply about the rule of law as the foundation of our constitutional system. … We are convinced that Professor Barrett will bring to the federal bench the same intelligence, fairness, decency, generosity, and hard work she has demonstrated at Notre Dame Law School. She will treat each litigant with respect and care, conscious of the reality that judicial decisions greatly affect the lives of those before the court. And she will apply the law faithfully and impartially.”

>*73 Law professors:* “Professor Barrett’s qualifications for a seat on the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit are first-rate. She is a distinguished scholar in areas of law that matter most for federal courts, and she enjoys wide respect for her careful work, fair-minded disposition, and personal integrity.”

>*49 Notre Dame Law School Colleagues:* “She is a brilliant teacher and scholar, and a warm and generous colleague. She possesses in abundance all of the other qualities that shape extraordinary jurists: discipline, intellect, wisdom, impeccable temperament, and above all, fundamental decency and humanity. Indeed, it is a testament to Amy’s fitness for this office that every full-time member of our faculty has signed this letter. … Despite our differences, we unanimously agree that our constitutional system depends upon an independent judiciary staffed by talented people devoted to the fair and impartial administration of the rule of law. And we unanimously agree that Amy is such a person.”",Buce-Nudo,e97se1k,conservative
I guess we'll just glare at each other for the next two years. Here I'll start ಠ_ಠ.,MuricanStephen,e98cq93,conservative
He might have a chance at POTUS one day if he wants it. Good dude. He does a great job. ,Dmfconrad,e97x0zp,conservative
We like our Larry quite a lot around here. ,Maswasnos,e97znn6,conservative
Cruz winning makes up for the governor we just elected in Kansas. I mean not officially or anything but to me. ,soylentcolammgood,e97q4hj,conservative
"Hey, Minnesota, too, for wifebeater general!",Moonthrower,e9802du,conservative
Illinois is a fucking dumpster fire,Larson338,e97sbej,conservative
We’re a special state.,Mavonac,e9843td,conservative
"Pretty sure the fbi had good evidence to validate the pedophilia claims. The legal matter concerning corruption was declared a mistrial. I don’t know every single fact about the case though. But it’s much different than Kavanaugh, who never was even put on trial and there was no corroborating evidence between witnesses to prove anything on him. ",TheTrueIron,e987vsp,conservative
More and more Americans are waking up to the media's lies every day.  They aren't all powerful.  Trump should have been run out of the goddamn country by now with how much they lie about him and twist his words.,jreed11,e982qxi,conservative
"That was over actual legislation not ""orange man bad""",WhoIsHarlequin,e97nx9e,conservative
[removed],,e97sr6h,conservative
They declared Klobuchar as the winner in MN with 0% votes in.,ElusiveSnowman,e97lklg,conservative
They called for Tim Kaine with less then 1% in and he was losing by 29.9-70% I was highly annoyed ,theblondepenguin,e97xcy7,conservative
To be fair that’s all you need for an accurate projection ,crash94,e98b3sy,conservative
"Ah, I see. That sucks.",gab907,e97o1nd,conservative
"When your a cool Commie Dem your intelligence, or lack thereof is beyond repute.   I’m glad those skateboarding tricks and punk rock didn’t work on Texans.  They are too smart for that shit ",DPistola,e97zpno,conservative
Seriously! The woman is a complete and utter fool. ,oraerdna541,e97xbms,conservative
[removed],,e97y8bg,conservative
"Only one 2020 Senate GOP seat is in a state Clinton lost. Add in the fact that Doug Jones is toast in Alabama, and that scenario becomes really hard to imagine...",Taylor814,e97qsg4,conservative
"Nah; the biggest things for Trump are judicial appointments and executive regulations- neither of which need the House. Negotiating for a budget will be a pain, but that's just business as usual in Washington. This is one of the best case scenarios because it gives Trump a huge punching bag- Nancy Pelosi. ",Maswasnos,e97zqzm,conservative
"Gains in the house are less than average for president's opposing party's first midterm over the past 100+ years. 

It still ain't pretty but it ain't a ""wave"". 

Edit: I may be wrong about that average. ",aboardthegravyboat,e97zoms,conservative
We weren't expected to gain in the senate by as much as we did.  They need that if they want any shot of removing Trump.  They didn't and they now likely can't have it again in 2020.  They're stuck with us and we're stuck with them... for now.,ravenswin,e97ylvg,conservative
[removed],,e97p8oy,conservative
Probably the wall for easier citizenship.,ThatDeceiverKid,e986za6,conservative
"So instead of making progress, they’re going to be up Trump’s ass.  Yikes.",R0binSage,e97iqv7,conservative
"Running on obstruction is only a bad thing if you don't control the media

They will have 2 years of countless racist and xenophobic investigations into the president. Subpoena hang his tax returns investigating every little thing he does. By the end of two years of theyll made him look like some kind of criminal

it will embolden the racist conspiracy theories have been xenophobic Russian conspiracy theories theories",ExpensiveMention,e98ewdx,conservative
Yeah but the middleground will hate it and that is who really matters,DJ_GiantMidget,e983h58,conservative
[deleted],,e97y65m,conservative
"Statistically speaking, the party out of power gets +29 on the first midterm of a President. The PA State Supreme Court redistricted the state to favor Democrats, and they gained 5 or so seats from that.

Dems could have run on anything and statistically they'd have still have gotten the House.",RoundSimbacca,e97zprd,conservative
The opposition party always does great in the first midterm. We did great in comparison to previous administrations first midterms.,Person74,e980dkt,conservative
"Republicans came out about as well as they could have hoped. The house was always going back to the Dems, that wasn't really a question. To gain 3 seats in the senate and win a number of tightly contested governor's races, specifically Florida and Ohio, was huge for Republicans. Florida especially since the governor appoints the secretary of state who is in charge of the 2020 election. Ohio also elected a Republican secretary.   


The way I see this playing out: Pelosi and the other lunatics over play their hands significantly, come up empty, and nothing gets done. The American people are going to see the lunacy and lack of ability to get anything done and Trump is going to have a smooth trip to reelection.",Kemaro,e984ix4,conservative
Don’t remember any calls for impeachment or investigations into Obama personally ,Wittyusernameman,e97o2gl,conservative
They had 2/3 of Pres-House-Senate it stands out more when it’s 1/3,Enzo_SAWFT,e9818fs,conservative
"I'm Mark, and those are confirmed to be words",treenbeen,e98602e,conservative
"Because in their mind it’s an open and shut case. Impeaching Trump should be a breeze (in their mind). In reality, it would take incredible leaps and stretches of the imagination to even remotely build up a constitutionally Sound impeachment case, which will be laughed at.",Gmen9256,e97z43c,conservative
"If you look at the nationwide results, you'll see that the extreme left (not as a whole but in general) lost.  The moderate Left won a lot.  Gilliam lost.  Beto lost.  Even Pelosi is quoted as saying that it would take a bipartisan effort to impeach Trump.  Plus the fact that it was only a +34 in the house means that the public saw through the crazy and said no.  ",jedichric,e982na8,conservative
Nope. The House has nothing to do with federal judges.,r777m,e983ral,conservative
Ginsburg might kick the bucket soon or retire. I doubt she will retire though because she wants to try to hold out until the 2020 election.,TheEsophagus,e98m9r4,conservative
"Barrett replaces RBG's seat. The politics of having a conservative prolife woman on the court for life, are far more significant for the long term. Cruz can have the one after that.",J-Team07,e985hy3,conservative
"I'd be down for that if Cruz had lost last night.

Right now he's valuable in the senate. ",JuliusEvolasGhost,e98avei,conservative
Doug Jones is on borrowed time and he knows it. ,DontMakeMeDownvote,e984vhv,conservative
"Also, people will run to the polls because they are tired of nancy pelosi's bullshit. XD",PerceivedShift,e9849km,conservative
"Exactly. Right now she is only relevant in her tight loony liberal circle. But the moment she steps on the federal (and national stage) every eye will be on her. She and her band of commie lunatics will get dissected and exposed for what they are: dumb and disgusting commies.

",r-magnificient,e98cpj1,conservative
"By tight I mean they share a lot of ideological beliefs.  She's also praised him and been seen with him.  There's more to it.  I just don't have the names handy.  One of the guys who worked with Ocasio during her primary is also associated with Linda Sarsour's group, and extremely anti-Semitic.   ",Roez,e98hf6z,conservative
"Clerked for Justice Scalia too, huge plus. Oh and devout Catholic. ",amdgph,e97sb15,conservative
"Well the good news is that the economy rather likes split governments (at least historically) and coming off trumps rather good economy from his first 2 years might keep markets looking pretty good coming into 2020. It's probably because nothing gets done, and the best government is one that only does something when it has to.",MAGA_Carta,e98devv,conservative
/r/cfb of all places said how well liked he was. Couldn't believe my eyes that a Republican was being well spoken about on Reddit. ,Sh-tstirrer,e97yien,conservative
Got it. Thanks for the info. I guess I could go read more about it but not feeling particularly motivated...,RunagateRampant,e9880te,conservative
Or remember when Scalia died with a pillow over his head and wasn't given an autopsy? ,ravenswin,e97ypcq,conservative
"In their defense, and other outlets too, they may have info on unofficial totals",trelium06,e97nvhi,conservative
Awww. Did you come up with that all by yourself?  Better be careful you don’t get evicted from the Democratic Party. They don’t encourage any free thinking. ,electricspook,e97yc10,conservative
Of course! This isn’t the first time Democrats have stolen an election. It happened in 2008  and 2012. Hillary and George Soros are clearly the culprits behind tonight’s loss of the house. Democracy is dead. ,kickintheface,e97qntt,conservative
Pretty much.,Enzo_SAWFT,e97itp7,conservative
"when has that ever been who really matters? the middle 50% don't vote. period. as long as that remains true and they don't exercise that, extremists will continue to see exclusive government control",shotpun,e98uf06,conservative
That's a very interesting stat / take. Makes me feel a bit better about the whole affair. ,Sh-tstirrer,e97yfci,conservative
"Actually it was expected that the GOP lost 50+ seats depending on what model you saw, and most had Republicans picking up 1 seat at most. ",ed_merckx,e987s2l,conservative
"Okay so following that trend of the GOP won't lose as badly as Obama did. But that doesn't mean that they'll win

Trump won an election by 80000 votes against the worst candidate in history. People pretending that it's all going to be smooth sailing because he barely eked out a win are in denial

especially considering he did that before Facebook started censoring conservatives",ExpensiveMention,e98ezfl,conservative
I don't think the redistricting is going to be undone by 2020,DangerToDemocracy,e97zuke,conservative
"Yea, but it was rough for me because I believed those dreamers that said we could hold the house. I fantasized about a giant, all-encompassing red tide. Today I feel empty.",VeggieHatr,e984xk9,conservative
"There were some - https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Efforts_to_impeach_Barack_Obama

Probably not as many as democrats will call for against Trump, but that doesn't mean they didn't happen a few years ago",sclvt,e97ogmw,conservative
I will mark Mark's words that he has marked,Chutzvah,e9885rd,conservative
"Sure, but dollars to donuts the ""moderates"" will vote with their party, and the party is being run by people nuttier than squirrel turds. 

The problem is the left has nobody as ineffective as Ryan running things - they have the liberal equivalents of Alex Jones in ranking positions. ",soylent_absinthe,e985lb4,conservative
"Ah, great, I thought it was the same as the Supreme Court.",Shadowstalker75,e983vpk,conservative
"lol if Alabama would have ran a German Shepard with a R beside its name on the ballot it would have beat Doug Jones last year

but no, we chose to run Roy Moore...... the one Republican that even Alabamians won't vote for.",HittmanLevi,e9858sl,conservative
"He's the only obvious pickup right now. Of course, in the next two years the map will shape up and there may be unexpected chances. NJ should have been a curbstomp for Dems, but Menendez dragged them down fairly far.

Still got a majority, which says a lot of the people of NJ's priorities. ",RoundSimbacca,e985wk3,conservative
"I mean, hopefully the Alabama GOP makes sure their Senate candidate isn’t perving on teens at the mall this time",Freerange1098,e98agj7,conservative
Also we'll have Trump on the ballot.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e98aze6,conservative
"Don't forget Young. It might not be something your mind instantly goes to, but she could sit on the Supreme Court for 40 years easy.",Notalent13,e97uhi4,conservative
[removed],,e97uwcp,conservative
"The court is made up entirely of Jewish and Catholics except for Gorsuch, who was raised Catholic and became an Episcopal.  I don’t see why we can’t have some Protestants on the court.

It would be nice to end the Harvard/Yale stranglehold on the court.",user1492,e97xyvs,conservative
"Most major outlets do exit polls, so they definitely have unofficial estimates before actual totals get released",h3half,e97ny60,conservative
Are you saying only people with extremist views vote?,DJ_GiantMidget,e98v5ib,conservative
[deleted],,e97yzp5,conservative
"And we cannot minimize the minimize the fact that the Republicans are probably going to go a staggering +3 in the Senate, which means any judicial nominee will almost certainly pass through with flying colors 

Edit: +4 not 5. Dean Heller lost 

Edit 2: +3. Looks like Tester won MT 
",Snowmittromney,e980isu,conservative
Agreed!,cmiller1225,e983imd,conservative
"Well here’s a take that mine not make it feel so good. The house is gerrymandered So it harderer for the Dems to take seats and the midterms ALWAYS (this year being no exception) skew very old and white. Old and white is the republicans breads and butter demographic.
",CapitolHillFreak,e98it9u,conservative
"Hollywood lost every race they backed. Abrams, Beto, Gillum, etc. Take that as a consolation prize.",Kemaro,e98534d,conservative
"Wow, it was mentioned at a town hall meeting in Oklahoma. Glad that made the list. Oh I heard Jim Bob down at the 7-11 say he wishes Obama would have been impeached. Want to add that to the list? Meanwhile there have been tons of calls on Trump by high ranking elected officials because they disagree with his ideas and 0 basis in the constitution. ",Dmfconrad,e97x78p,conservative
Certainly not to the extent you see it now ,Wittyusernameman,e97s2cc,conservative
"Markedly remarkable, Mark, and Mark’s marker of Mark’s marked words. Woof!",VeggieHatr,e98d5hx,conservative
"While a lot of what your saying is true, I think losing the House may just be a positive.  It will give Trump a lightning rod to strike at every corner.  Think about the Russian Collusion investigation by Mueller.  This was a HUGE thing in 2017 and this was not an issue on the ballot yesterday.  They can open up 1000 investigations into Trump and his businesses but the more they do, the more the American public will tune it out and think, ""oh, this again?""  Trump will turn it into a campaign issue and hammer the Democrats over the head with it.  

And those moderates need to get elected again, so they better watch out exactly how they vote because the American people are starting to wake up the the fact that they can't trust the media and are doing research on their own.  Losing the House stings, but I don't think it's the end of the world.  

Now, if they had had a blue wave and taken 70-100 seats, then we should worry.  But that didn't happen.",jedichric,e9883pq,conservative
"These kinds of things will happen from time to time. Happened to McCaskill's opponent the last time, so she basically won by default. Didn't happen this year. Generic Republican who didn't put his foot in his mouth beat her.",RoundSimbacca,e985o7p,conservative
So true. ,DontMakeMeDownvote,e985gcv,conservative
"I’m from Jersey born and raised. I can’t for the life of me understand the thought process of these people I live among. Hugin was not a real republican, but to vote in menendez boggles
my mind. NJ loves these tax and spend democrats. I’m from south jersey which is a world apart from the north. Most of my friends just want to be left alone and don’t particularly like the heavy handed ness of our government. We also just passed a HALF BILLION DOLLAR spending bill for schools. This economy should be one of the strongest in the republic but we’re spending ourselves into disaster. ",TheTrueIron,e99haoh,conservative
A devout Catholic is almost certainly 100% pro life. That's probably what the poster was getting at.,pimpinassorlando,e97xcfe,conservative
About 30% of the U.S. Population would see that as a good point. The rest (like myself) dont really have an issue. ,Ace_W,e97wq4a,conservative
"Well if Gorsuch is an Episcopal, wouldn't that make him a Protestant? Or are you saying that you want more Protestants on the court? 

>It would be nice to end the Harvard/Yale stranglehold on the court.

Barrett graduated from Notre Dame law so she would check that box. :)",amdgph,e97yquz,conservative
"Maybe catholics are naturally attracted to the law (and legal professions) which mean a lot of them end up lawyers, judges, and stuff like that.   
I know police departments tend to heavily favor Catholics.  

Also, some of the best affluent private schools that tend to turn out these prominent lawyers and judges are catholic schools, so that's probably some of it too. The power of nepotism and all that.",MAGA_Carta,e98a7fr,conservative
"yes, that's objectively true. that's why voter turnout has been criminally low for a century now. 'extremist' is an exaggeration but there is no reason to cater to the middle ground when centrists just dont vote.",shotpun,e98vf4j,conservative
"From what I’m gathered, the places the Republicans did weak yesterday were light red districts with weak tops of ballots. We won’t repeat that problem with Trump in 2020",Snowmittromney,e980mpu,conservative
I can only hope Pelosi as speaker and electing Cortez will only further expose how out of touch the DNC is and provide some good cannon fodder. We will see...,Sh-tstirrer,e97z52u,conservative
They won't get anything through House committees with Democrats in control.,Shadowstalker75,e982il8,conservative
"Where are you getting the +5? We won IN, ND, MO, FL and maybe MT, but we lost NV. Don't forget that AZ was Jeff Flake's seat, if McSally pulls it out it's a hold, not a pickup.",Martbell,e98n7vt,conservative
"Don’t forget 40 some Newley elected dems have said they wouldn’t support Pelosi for speaker (granted some because she’s not leftist enough), there are plenty of blue collar moderates who next to having a (D) in front of their name are honestly closer to the GOP on policy than they are any of the nutty crap being pushed by the DNC. 

Republicans are also fine working with the other side in passing another tax cut, immigration deal, healthcare reform, will even concede on some things. They won’t refuse to vote just because the other guys also voted for it. Not that I think a ton will happen, but the real “blue wave” is the moderate blue collar dems that are trying to get back the working class and who have to actually put up, they can’t go off the rails leftist on policy or they lose in 2020 ",ed_merckx,e9887na,conservative
"> While a lot of what your saying is true, I think losing the House may just be a positive.

I hope you're right. I'd love to be wrong. Also GET TURNT for the first time in the history of US politics that the Speaker of the House is referred to as ""horseface.""",soylent_absinthe,e988jsc,conservative
She's also likely to uphold religious liberty.,amdgph,e97xhnx,conservative
[removed],,e97zhwa,conservative
[removed],,e97zmtv,conservative
"> Well if Gorsuch is an Episcopal, wouldn't that make him a Protestant?

Most Episcopals don't consider themselves to be protestants.

Even so, the court is made up of 3 Jews, 5 Catholics, and 1 Episcopalian.  The US population in general is 50% protestant, 20% Catholic, and 20% unaffiliated/atheist.  Jews make up less than 2% of the population.

My point is that the Court is very unrepresentative of the population of this country.",user1492,e982opz,conservative
"> I know police departments tend to heavily favor Catholics.

Maybe in the north-east.  But this isn't true throughout the rest of the country.

> Also, some of the best affluent private schools that tend to turn out these prominent lawyers and judges are catholic schools, so that's probably some of it too.

All of the members of the Supreme Court are Harvard or Yale graduates (except Ginsburg, who started at Harvard and transferred to Columbia).  Harvard, Yale, and Columbia are not Catholic universities.",user1492,e98c5fl,conservative
"Why would someone who takes this to heart not vote?         
And why do candidates go moderate near elections?",DJ_GiantMidget,e98vkkk,conservative
I am in Illinois 6th Congressional District and for the first time in many years a Democrat took our House seat.  I can not believe it happened.  I am so disappointed.,Shadowstalker75,e982hi4,conservative
[deleted],,e980r05,conservative
Democrat voters just don't care. They reelected bob menendez for christ sake. Democrat voters think government is there for them and to help them prosper.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9871t9,conservative
Judicial nominees don't go through the house.,NuclearMisogynyist,e986rl7,conservative
"Someone correct me if I'm wrong, but judicial nominees need Senate confirmation. The House has nothing to do with a judicial nominee .",LavenderGoomes,e98b4os,conservative
"Oh dang, didn’t know Heller lost. Thanks 

Edit: +3. Looks like Tester won MT",Snowmittromney,e98nauu,conservative
So you're supposed to stop fighting for something you believe is right just because it’s a “guaranteed loser”?,Mizmata,e981gbs,conservative
"Is that more or less acceptable than a wise Latina woman letting her life experiences dictate her legal decisions?

Shouldn't all judges rule without their personal views getting in the way?",Moonthrower,e9800hc,conservative
"Yeah, this was lost while drafting. I meant for primary schools. It's kind of amazing how many of these prominent people grew up together, all going to the same 30 or so schools for their childhood, and a large portion of those are catholic schools.
Maybe Catholics just make good lawyers, particularly devout ones.",MAGA_Carta,e98d8w8,conservative
I can,cmiller1225,e983sid,conservative
"Exactly.  The Democrats are going to do what they do best—putting their hands in their own mouths and turning moderate Americans off.  And if they go crazy with trying to impeach and stir up obviously political controversies, could very well backfire in 2020.",jreed11,e982li2,conservative
Thanks!  Good news!,Shadowstalker75,e986sjs,conservative
"The house does not get involved, I was incorrect, which I am happy for.  The courts will be ours for a long time to come.",Shadowstalker75,e98bbyw,conservative
[removed],,e980azj,conservative
"I can, but I can't.  We are a White wealthy area and have voted for many Republicans.  That said, I do think Trump played a negative role in this lose.  The district voted for Clinton over Trump in 2016, but also voted for Romney and Bush.",Shadowstalker75,e983yxk,conservative
The bad news is they blew their chance to investigate people like Hillary. Trump can still do it but he won't do it with a Democrat as Attorney general,ExpensiveMention,e98f1bq,conservative
"Have you ever read a Sotomayor dissent?

She's batshit fucking crazy.",Moonthrower,e980dcg,conservative
Hillary wasn't getting investigated. It's bad practice to prosecute the politicians you've beaten.,NuclearMisogynyist,e98y0uw,conservative
"Maybe some of the people actually voting based on  the “Stars” will realize their opinions are just that. 

We should not grant political influence to people with a talent for singing or comedy.  Sounds ridiculous to me and I hope it sounds a little ridiculous to everyone.",Ted-the-Pirate,e983f2g,conservative
He still has checks so how can the State be out of money?,lax714,e996zpo,conservative
Read the article.  It is not required,hipsterdufus84,e995j2b,conservative
"Misleading title...  Shame on you, OP.",SideTraKd,e99ykm2,conservative
Math is racist after all!!! /s ,ozric101,e995rxr,conservative
Math is pure evil,hipsterdufus84,e995t3h,conservative
Good.  Let's get this party started. ,lastbastion,e991p43,conservative
This article was written by Trumps chosen replacement of AG sessions. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9914i7,conservative
As Trump said two can play at this game.     ,ozric101,e9936x5,conservative
"Should have put ""By Matthew Whittaker"" in the title!",Gnome_Sane,e99dybe,conservative
"God no. The far better thing is for the Democrats to overreach in their “investigations” (i.e. temper tantrums) while Trump trolls the shit out of them for two years. 

Clinton ought to have been indicted, but doing that now would just look like corrupt retaliatory tactics. ",etherealsmog,e9bc3o6,conservative
hindsight is 20/20,JMB_was_a_god,e99i0v8,conservative
Democrats are embarrassingly racist.  Idiots.,BrighamYoung,e99lr6i,conservative
It's a win for the white women. They voted for a winner!,lax714,e99hpa4,conservative
Blame white women?!?  DAMNED MATRIARCHY!,UrsaPater,e99s3l3,conservative
"Because white *women* = patriarchy, aka a *male* dominated society.

Do they even know the definitions of the ""slander"" they try to use against us?",DeadHeadLibertarian,e9a6ru8,conservative
Can McSally eke out a win based on what’s outstanding? The numbers are in the article.,learner1314,e99delh,conservative
We seriously need a better system. This takes too long. ,latotokyo123,e99doyu,conservative
"Based on the numbers in the article, *if* the candidates' percentages of the outstanding ballots are the same as their percentages of the votes counted in those counties so far, McSally should still be in the lead by a few thousand votes when the counting is done.",PubliusVA,e99erby,conservative
Any reason to think these early ballots would favour Sinema more than election day vote?,learner1314,e99iab0,conservative
"Kemp is over the 50% threshold. I don't see how she could force a ""Do-Over"". Also why are democrats never gracious in defeat?",iwasthebeaver,e989l2v,conservative
They ARE crazy.,lax714,e98ckps,conservative
What a tard.,chabanais,e989udn,conservative
So we'll just keep doing it over until we get the outcome we want. Best two out of three?  ,JFGFNY,e9bahx0,conservative
Her face could use a do-over,pdcrawjr,e98nm9l,conservative
"Heard on the radio that if the difference is 0.5% or below, it triggers a recount.  Not sure about a runoff.",mlmack,e98fw65,conservative
Democrats feel entitled. They are unable to accept when what they want is not given to them.,Kemaro,e98mfwg,conservative
They're too busy trying to figure out who to blame for their loss.,mlmack,e98qc2n,conservative
Meanwhile. Roy Moore still hasn't conceded. Salt is bipartisan ,duffmannn,e9a27tm,conservative
Lol he hasnt? What an idiot. ,iwasthebeaver,e9adr8f,conservative
Gotta work hard on the House and Senate and States. 2020 is the year folks. Fight back or surrender ,Intimidator94,e9a1llz,conservative
"6)  virginia is a total blue state now

7)  Texas will be soon and if Texas goes blue that is a lot of electoral votes for dems.

Rush Limbaugh was talking about these takeaways today.",Dudehitscar,e9a0jvl,conservative
The best thing is listening to Democratic women in this state praise electing the first two female representatives and then trash Kim Reynolds.,xKommandant,e98kjxd,conservative
Good for her!,Ilikeminewelldone,e98ffun,conservative
Something something votes against her own interests ,i_floop_the_pig,e98slwj,conservative
"Well they're feminists after all, they respect women so much and their choices /s.

",Azul19,e98tivx,conservative
further democratization will kill this country. The senate should have never stopped being a appointed body.,JMB_was_a_god,e98e6m8,conservative
"I’m just curious how the 56 Democrats and 44 Republicans would be chosen. Would there be a nationwide, 200 candidate ballot? In that case, why stop there, why not have the house be a national election, it is the house of the people after all, so that’s 1070 candidates to choose to select from (soooo glad I get to finally vote for beta AND AOC!). But wait, what about governors and state senators and reps, what about the county clerk of west Chester New York!! Democracy or die dammit!",Freerange1098,e98fusp,conservative
"Agreed,  Hell id give up my personal right to vote if we had some sort of standard for sufferage. 

Why should everyone have the right to vote for no reason at all? ",Manchurainprez,e98hvjp,conservative
How about registering to vote by filing a tax return,BrockLee76,e98p6pj,conservative
Property ownership should be the standard. I say this as a renter. ,WhatMixedFeelings,e98zv0p,conservative
I really dont care what it is as long as its fair and can demonstrate some sort of productive capacity or interest in the good of the general state. ,Manchurainprez,e98q6jx,conservative
"Do Condo's and Co-ops count or full ownership of land?  And how much 

I will make a fucking killings selling 3inchx 3 inch plots of land so you can be a voter. ",Manchurainprez,e98zzlw,conservative
I would say condos should count. What do you suggest then?  Seems to me property owners have the most at stake when electing legislators who could raise taxes. ,WhatMixedFeelings,e99062x,conservative
It's actually extremely American to call out journalists and news media. ,CITY_F0X,e98z752,conservative
Acosta is the least American media personality I can think of.,BrighamYoung,e99ok6t,conservative
"What's disturbingly Un-American is hijacking a press conference and spending 5 minutes trying to talk over your president.

I hope they ban him from the White House for good.",mikecx79,e99nvfu,conservative
Presidents have been speaking out against their opponents in the press [almost since the beginning.](https://www.history.com/news/presidents-relationship-with-press),ngoni,e99b0bi,conservative
She is without a doubt bat shit crazy. But man is she smoking hot!?!?,sambo2366,e99ot8b,conservative
I’m worried about AZ. Anyone have any intel on how that’s looking.,the-divine-comedy,e990uri,conservative
Not good a co-worker advised McSally up .68%,F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e991qeq,conservative
Can he fucking not dox people?,Dank_Cartographer,e99e2uv,conservative
"Complete and total transparency, right?",zardoz68,e99dipm,conservative
"Hey man if you want your information published in an excel for the world to see you do you, I’d say that’s pretty irresponsible to put all that in an excel then give access to it.",rsmith151,e99dkmn,conservative
"I actually have no problem with this. It’s not like they posted people’s medical records or financial information. Granted, they could’ve left off the “reason”, but is it REALLY that big of a deal? No. It’s not. Stop the faux outrage.",HolsterOfNuts,e99e9cx,conservative
You’re saying it’s not irresponsible for the incoming governor to post an excel file with all of the contact info for absentee voters? Really? ,rsmith151,e99eatd,conservative
"“When reached, Georgia secretary of state’s press secretary Candice Broce told TechCrunch that all of the data “is clearly designated as public information under state law,” and denied that the data was “confidential or sensitive.”

“State law requires the public availability of voter lists, including names and address of registered voters,” she said in an email.

That might be technically true. Voter and electoral roll data is public and available,...”

Your mad because publicly available information was made more public? You are really reaching for things to be mad at my friend. ",Philgentry,e99hqwk,conservative
Future medical school here (accepted and start next year). I have seen similar when I did clinical research and other gaming of the system to get treatments covered. ,Zac1245,e993qyo,conservative
Welcome to reality ,gtrdundave2,e993dus,conservative
report it to the state ag for fraud but dont expect them to do anything and have another career (not job but a career in a different field) lined up,Delta_25,e99df32,conservative
"Fox was fine.  Chris Wallace was kinda annoying, but they weren’t bad.",XMAGA_1776X,e99rkbt,conservative
Fox Showed their true colors last night by making the prediction that early. ,iwasthebeaver,e99psvx,conservative
">You have to go all the way back to Reagan to find a Republican loss the same as Trump’s -- 26 in 1982. None lost their second term.

The point here is that you have to go back to 1982 to find a Republican loss of the *exact same* number of seats? What significance does that have? Is it just to distract from the fact that both Republicans after Reagan lost *fewer* seats during their first midterms?",PubliusVA,e99skuf,conservative
"we need conservative representation. fox isn't it. checked crtv for the first time with optimism. nope. they had someone labeled as an ""LGBTWXYZ conservative"" (a ridiculous oxymoron) as part of their election coverage, not as a guest, but as part of the panel. the culture is corrupting all, sadly even those who used to be conservatives.",ErasmusLongfellow,e99rvwy,conservative
All 24 hour cable news networks need to go away.  I can't wait for them to die off with the older generations.,Dudehitscar,e9a0mih,conservative
The GOP outperformed historical trends. that is the point.,JMB_was_a_god,e99utay,conservative
"CRTV is fantastic. If you’re writing it off for that, you’re making a mistake.",hello_japan,e9arf0k,conservative
Are you suggesting gay people can't be conservative? I have some unfortunate news for you,Bilxor,e9crnmh,conservative
"If he lost more seats than the last three Republicans did in their first midterm elections (because he *did* lose more than Reagan's 26 seats in 1982--the number in the article was based on preliminary numbers with several seats still undecided), what historical trend did he outperform?",PubliusVA,e9ae14y,conservative
"not writing it off entirely, just as i'm not writing off fox entirely, it's just obvious and depressing that the conservative movement in general has been corrupted by the devolving culture in the same way that it's been noted in frustration for years that most newly elected 'conservative' pols become altered by 'the swamp' once they get to washington. 

5 out of 9 justices on the supreme court decided that they had the right to arbitrarily redefine marriage to include the pairing of sexual deviants and spiritually weak, weak-minded conservatives collectively sighed in resignation and relief...""oh, well, we lost that one. that's one battle we don't need to fight anymore."" pathetic. 

once a moral line is crossed, more will follow and become easier to rationalize. those who thought it would end if we just accepted larry the hairdresser and harry the florist engaging in a pretense of marriage that that would be it. no harm no foul. well, clearly that has not been the case. 

it was the moral core that drew me from the left to conservatism, and it has almost entirely been abandoned. ",ErasmusLongfellow,e9b26zi,conservative
Sneaky but I don't see how it's fraud.  ,Dudehitscar,e9a0yk3,conservative
"Look up Limbaugh's original ""Operation Chaos.""",ngoni,e9a1405,conservative
Alyson would have had a good chance to win if it wasn’t for Bender.  She’s a great person.,XMAGA_1776X,e99hegk,conservative
"Was really an election with two strong candidates (especially after that last idiot Sawyers). Alyson is wonderful, Lateef I'm sure would do a good job. Just kind of shady with the Bender stuff. ",killercankles,e99ilkn,conservative
"I’ve got family that have him as an eye doctor. He’s a decent guy, unfortunately he’s pretty progressive. Alyson will probably run again in a year, so hopefully she’ll have more money next time.  She did pretty good for haveing almost no campaign funding.",XMAGA_1776X,e99rab6,conservative
"> The idea that gridlock is good is based on the notion that most of what Congress does is probably bad, and that when Congress can’t do much we’re better off. As Bill Kort wrote in 2017, “Gridlock is good because when Congress is tied up in knots they can’t do anything to hurt us. This idea has been verified by the market many times over the past 25 years.”",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e98ps5f,conservative
"Yeah this was pretty bad.  
  
The people in the city are so out of touch with rural Kansas. And now the whole state is screwed because of them.  
  
Also Kobach picked a terrible campaign manager. I tried countless times to volunteer. I begged for signs. I asked to go door-to-door, to text people.  
  
And I lived in Wichita.  
  
He blew it.",jina100,e99ag1h,conservative
Cali is controlled by a few cities too. It's a nationwide thing.,Terra_green2,e9a1nzb,conservative
"I’m sorry but as a born and raised Kansan (now living elsewhere but hoping to go back home someday), I think the real issue here is that too many Republicans in Kansas want a “conservative purity” candidate like Kobach instead of someone who can win a statewide election. 

The Democrat won because of the hardliners in the Kansas Republican Party rejected a primary candidate who would have won easily in a statewide election in order to win a moral victory at nominating the die hard conservative. 

Elections have consequences, and if I still lived in Kansas I wouldn’t have voted for the Democrat... but I wouldn’t have shed any tears over the loss of Kobach either. ",etherealsmog,e9bdb7s,conservative
"> The people in the city are so out of touch with rural Kansas.

Same here in WA State.  10% of the counties in WA just decided the fate of the other 90% and that 10% is so wildly detached from reality I seriously wonder how they are able to tie their own shoes in the morning",Jizzlobber42,e99b9c5,conservative
PA too,DeadWater27,e99f5p0,conservative
"> President Trump never looks a gift horse in the mouth (forget about what the heck a ""gift horse"" is or why anyone would look it in the mouth).

Kids today... A ""gift horse"" is a horse that is given to someone, as a gift.  Why would you look in a horse's mouth? To see how old it is.  The condition of the horse's teeth is a good proxy for the animal's age.  

if somebody gave you a horse as a gift, it would be very insulting to look in its mouth to see if it's a ""good"" (young) horse or a ""bad"" horse (old).  ",r4d4r_3n5,e987qjg,conservative
"Why Democrats insist on making that crypt keeperesque windbag their speaker is beyond me. I'm not complaining, I just don't see it. ",smokejaguar,e989ayv,conservative
dude gets it,puddboy,e988715,conservative
"Tell me more, grandpa",puddboy,e9886rl,conservative
She has access to a lot of money and knows where the bodies are buried. ,iwasthebeaver,e98abrz,conservative
Money money money. She’s the best at getting it.,trelium06,e98akja,conservative
Democrats are killing Republicans on money. I would assume people like Pelosi are kept in power because they bring in lots of money for the party.,ultimis,e98c7un,conservative
We used to have these things called “ass whippings” back in the day for disrespectful little whipper snappers. ,RutCry,e98y3lx,conservative
"> Democrats are killing Republicans on money.

yet democrates advocate for income inequality... ",Delta_25,e98nnd2,conservative
They aren’t even ashamed of the hypocrisy any more so long as they can fool enough of the people enough of the time.  ,RutCry,e98yf67,conservative
"""Touching her"" isn't the official reason from the White House that his credentials were revoked. Doesn't matter what speed you watch the video. Sanders said he assaulted her and that's why his press pass has been revoked. How can you possibly watch the video and agree with her lie? ",Unitedfan777,e9agh1a,conservative
??? Her job was to take the microphone. He was being an asshole. Now he is a dribbling vagina.,godsdragon79,e9ab54j,conservative
Pretty sure he got drunk in high school though. Fire him for that.,probablybiased,e9adqmf,conservative
That’s fine. Then say you’re suspending his credentials because he refused to follow instructions and let others have a chance to ask questions. The “he put his hands on an intern” story just doesn’t line up with reality. ,Hotal,e9adndt,conservative
maybe it was jim that raped ford... ,Delta_25,e9b8efe,conservative
The issue is that he was supposed to hand her the microphone and he broke protocol and defied a direct order from the president for the sake of pushing a liberal hoax and self glorification and he would not allow her to do her job and take the microphone. If you watch the video she simply went to peacefully take the microphone and he bogarted it like a kid refusing to put a candy bar back at the checkput line that he wasn't allowed to have and DID put hands on her to prevent her from taking the microphone. She didn't harm him in any way and he had no right or reason to keep her from doing her job or puttimg his hands on her for any reason. Freedom of press does not give you a license to be a slanderous libellous douchebag. The president has answered the question multiple times and it didn't even need to be asked in the first place because on brainwashed liberals believe that muh Russia isn't a hoax in the first place and that's only because they refuse to look at actual proof it's a hoax.,godsdragon79,e9aes9v,conservative
"Nobody cares, Fuck CNN. ",ozric101,e9alaj8,conservative
"> The “he put his hands on an intern” story just doesn’t line up with reality.

Okay. He literally didn't ""put his hands on her"" but he did try to break her grip on the microphone, or maybe shove her away, by using his forearm. My take on the video is that you can see that he exerts enough downward force on the crook of her elbow to jerk her shoulder down. The entire time Acosta was speaking, he was holding his hand up gesturing to the president. It only came down when she tried to grab the mic, then went right back up. That tells me that the use of his forearm to keep the intern from taking the mic was intentional; though possibly incidental.

Regardless, it's unprofessional behavior and he deserves to be booted from the press corps.",mastaxn,e9anx9z,conservative
"I watched the video. They made physical contact while she was trying to take the mic from him. He never put his hands on her. 

I never said anything about the rest of the things you mentioned. I never said he had the right to the microphone or that he wasn’t being a douche and ignoring instructions. But “he put his hands on an intern” is false. ",Hotal,e9ag6cq,conservative
">and defied a direct order from the president

Acosta is a blubbering asshole, but the president doesn't get to ""order"" private citizens around",SouthernTrumpVet,e9aqo3p,conservative
"> But “he put his hands on an intern” is false. 

It's literally plain as day in the official CSPAN video...
",CAGUnion404,e9awjx7,conservative
"No, but the press are allowed to each ask a question or two once guven permiission to speak. He asked 3 and was told that he was not permitted to ask any more and to politely pass the microphone to another reporter. He refused and tried to grandstand and spur a debate over something that isn't even real and refused to let the intern do her job of passing the microphone. If someone comes into my house I can order them to get out or take their feet off the couch or change the channel or whatever I want. The White House is where Trump has the authority to do the same thing. He was invited in as a guest, was an asshole, and now has lost his invitation because of it. Case closed.",godsdragon79,e9ar0py,conservative
My eyeballs must be lying to me. ,Hotal,e9axleh,conservative
Probably federal decriminalization of cannabis.,mkgandkembafan,e99peig,conservative
"Infrastructure rebuilt should be one that both sides can agree on. We desperately need to update a lot of bridges, roads, power lines, internet etc. ",Enzo_SAWFT,e99prf2,conservative
Becoming energy independent,Dudehitscar,e9a0uv6,conservative
"I think there are certainly issues that could get broad support... say, 65% or more popular support.

But I don't think much legislation will pass in the next two years because Democrats believe it is in their strategic interests to be seen as opposing all GOP bills at all costs, and GOP House members likely will react the same way.  This is just political gamesmanship, but it is part of the game.  The GOP largely found itself in the same situation during the Obama presidency.

What I expect: a lot of virtue-signaling and pointless gesture-type bills being passed in the House and the Senate refusing to consider them.  Not unlike Harry Reid's Senate.  Also plenty of Congressional subpoenas about virtually anything and everything Pelosi, Maxine Waters, Adam Schiff, and their band of idiots can come up with.  These will largely be denied or ignored, to no real consequence.  See also: Holder, Eric.

Truly, there is nothing more useless or ineffectual than the types of bills an impotent House majority passes, because as we saw with GOP Healthcare reform in recent years, the types of bills you pass when you know they can't pass, and the types of bills you actually pass when you know they may see a Presidential signature are quite different.",theheadfl,e99p5og,conservative
"Ah so it's not a belief held only in the left? Not meaning to sound rude, I just thought that it was a general conservative belief that cannabis should remain illegal.",nearnum2,e99svts,conservative
"Definitely agreed. Though, this isn't meant to sound argumentative since I just want to know your opinion - which parts of America do you think will receive these changes?",nearnum2,e99tpba,conservative
It's time for the Republican party to take on a stand on statism. Privatize the roads. Stop it with these shannanigans of needing further funding. There is enough funding. It is government bureaucracy that is getting in the way and wasting money.,mkgandkembafan,e99v1o7,conservative
What energy sources do you think will receive bipartisan agreement?,nearnum2,e9alpv2,conservative
"It's a given these things might happen, it's happened before and it will definitely happen again. However, I like to be optimistic about our political system and personally believe that, even if there are many many things that our representatives will disagree on, there HAS to be some things that will at least be agreed upon as a necessary change regardless of party affiliation.

Do you think there might be any changes that will receive that status of bipartisanship?",nearnum2,e99t87l,conservative
"You're fine. Thank you for having an open mind.

But in response to your question, it depends what sort of ""conservative"" you're referring to. On the libertarian and palecon side of the aisle, absolutely. We believe in small/no government and personal freedom, liberty, and negative rights. Those on the neocon and social conservative side of the aisle are a different story. Neocons are sort of like the politicians when it comes to cannabis, while the social conservatives are probably the ones you're thinking of when you mentioned keeping drugs illegal as a values. As for Republicans, the actual politicians supposedly representing conservatism, it's a give or take. But I think it would be a major win for the Republicans to be the ones to legalize cannabis and a lot of them seem to have political savvy, so I can certainly see them going for it.",mkgandkembafan,e99ux7b,conservative
Probably the Northeast. Throw Schumer a bone.,DogBeersHadOne,e99tsz9,conservative
Bridges and roads probally SoCal and North East. Midwest could most use some internet and the gulf really needs to burry their power lines or something that is less prone to damage in storms.,Enzo_SAWFT,e99v12g,conservative
">Do you think there might be any changes that will receive that status of bipartisanship?

Sure, I'm sure plenty of bipartisan bills will pass to deal with the essential functions of government, spending bills, etc.

But I do not expect anything major.  Probably both sides could agree on infrastructure for example, but I just don't see it happening in this political climate.

I believed Trump would be fairly successful in bipartisan bills back when he got elected because he is truly not an ideological guy... he's a pragmatic deal maker.  But I think his brand is so toxic to Democrat members of Congress, nobody wants to be seen collaborating with him.  It's a shame.",theheadfl,e99wj70,conservative
"Republicans being at the forefront of cannabis legalisation would be an achievement, but it would be hailed as such regardless of party identification. Why do you think this hasn't been the case? Or like what do you think is stopping this change?",nearnum2,e99vxx5,conservative
"Ah so it's across the board that the US needs infrastructure upgrades then, but just in terms of different necessities. Definitely agreed.",nearnum2,e99vpqo,conservative
Can you clarify? I'm not sure what you mean.,mkgandkembafan,e99wbua,conservative
"Well, like you said, taking a stance on legalizing cannabis would be a win for Republicans, but how come they haven't yet? States have gone out and legalized it, but federally, why hasn't it happened already?",nearnum2,e99ws6x,conservative
"Ah. Because prior to the shift on the narrative of cannabis in recent years, most politicians were social conservatives. Now that it's popular, they've had a change of heart. ",mkgandkembafan,e99wtzp,conservative
He is lucky he won after caving into liberal feefees and selling out the 2nd Amendment.,M6D_Magnum,e97imz3,conservative
"My favorite comments on Social Media over this (and the Governor race in Florida):

> ""Florida is in the south. What did you expect?""  
>  
>""Florida's racist came out to vote.""  
>  
>""This is because of all that gerrymandering that happened in Florida.""  
>  
>""All the places with universities are blue. That means smart people are voting blue.""

To those, I respond with this:

1) Was Florida in the south when Obama won Florida in 2008 and 2012?

2) Did the racists stay home in 2008 and 2012 when they had a chance to vote against a minority/black candidate by voting for a pasty white Military Vet (McCain) and very white, very religious businessman (Romney)?

3) How the heck does gerrymandering affect statewide popular votes? Did they redistrict state lines to get more Republican votes? 

4) No response necessary.",-Kerosun-,e985cqj,conservative
I haven't seen or read a nelson concession yet.  He's seem so out of it they may have to tell him in January he lost and can no longer go back into the chamber.,optionhome,e97vkpo,conservative
Lol suck on it libs. Florida is still ours. ,MaddSim,e97gxra,conservative
"This is getting a little ahead of the process. Currently the race is within 0.5% which in Florida triggers an automatic recount. Also, absentee ballots have to be counted and only had to be postmarked Tuesday. It's probably going to be a few days until a winner is declared.",SandmanMS,e97vqhj,conservative
Going into a recount now.  Hope the results hold up.,TBSportsFan1254,e98l9e1,conservative
"Sort of. Teachers can carry on campus if they choose because of his bill. Partial win. Partial loss.

https://www.cnn.com/2018/03/09/us/florida-gov-scott-gun-bill/index.html

Edit: I try to link to liberal outlets because then the inevitable leftist brigade can't argue against it.",Hayes_for_days,e97jcox,conservative
Worthwhile sacrifice to defeat an incumbent. I am sure he won't be so liberal on guns in the future.,anewleafthrowaway5,e97l17o,conservative
Gerrymandering is always my favorite one. “The Senate is gerrymandered!” “Trump won because of gerrymandering!” Right kid. ,better_off_red,e98btrf,conservative
It's ridiculous to think that going to college makes you smarter.,superdude411,e98by5b,conservative
The amount of ignorance needed to think that gerrymandering affects the statewide popular vote is shocking. ,Faraday314,e98gi9z,conservative
Nelson has information from nonexistent sources that the Russians hacked the election. ,Faraday314,e97xvz3,conservative
"I'm literally shaking, Bill Nelson has been a senator for my entire life. I don't know how I'm going to keep living.",afgator58,e97j4wq,conservative
I should add that I’m from the panhandle but living in South Florida and people are so mad here! I can’t help but feel a little pride for my hometown. Even a hurricane can’t bring them down!,blondemia88,e987wos,conservative
"Yeah, but I used to be able to buy a shotgun. Now I can't for another year because of that law. I'm 20. Fuck that.",bigjake0097,e97onic,conservative
I only deal in absolutes when it comes to politicians fucking with my rights. I dont compromise on the 2nd.,M6D_Magnum,e97jer4,conservative
"Maine and Nebraska are the only place were gerrymandering can affect the electoral count, but they still give 2 electoral votes to the statewide popular vote.",superdude411,e98c25b,conservative
"Yeah. Had to explain to someone (in person, about 35 years old) that state lines are permanent and are not subject to gerrymandering. Then, I had to explain the purpose of redistricting and why redistricting is necessary and what gerrymandering actually is.",-Kerosun-,e98nr3t,conservative
Yup! Those pesky Republican Governors always fudging state lines around!,-Kerosun-,e98nkq2,conservative
"> I'm literally shaking

This made me lol.",mastaxn,e97nn8w,conservative
I'm so glad we got rid of him. He was the worst senator that you've never heard of.,Hayes_for_days,e98g81u,conservative
Get yourself an 80% receiver or ask around at a fun show. I'm in Pinellas if you need help.,richardguy,e97v8ra,conservative
"I genuinely don't know the law in question, but wouldn't you be grandfathered in if you were able to buy one legally at one point? ",hockeyfan1133,e97ykk9,conservative
That's shitty,Hayes_for_days,e98dbqf,conservative
"I agree, but I see this as a win/lose. Shouldn't teachers be able to carry? I get the bad because of the age restriction (I hope the NRA wins the lawsuit), but I can't ignore the good.",Hayes_for_days,e97jngx,conservative
"I'm good, literally bought the gun I wanted 2 weeks before that law passed and I turn 21 next month. More the principle, ya know? Also I have family in other states I could visit and get one there if I really needed it",bigjake0097,e987nu9,conservative
"Nope. My rights have literally been stripped until I turn 21, when I will have been an adult for 3 years. Because apparently being an adult isn't enough",bigjake0097,e987k1t,conservative
No,GFZDW,e9852pw,conservative
"ERPOs

Bumpstock/trigger ban

More waiting periods

Under 21 total gun ban

I don't really care about teacher carry- you're protecting against things that happen extremely rarely. We're talking about millions of people who are getting treaded on pretty hard.",richardguy,e97v85l,conservative
Yup. As soon as the shooting happened I knew some stupid bullshit was gonna get through. I went out and got an AR lower a week before the law passed. ,_SkeletonJelly,e98ysvf,conservative
"Fair enough. Hopefully, the NRA wins their lawsuit. ",Hayes_for_days,e98daov,conservative
I wish these kinds of things happened to me. Just whip out the cell phone and collect your winnings! ,Lionstriker2,e98q2pt,conservative
How about removing the race of the person in the application?,HowRememberAll,e99ah81,conservative
"It’s funny you say that.  My son is bi racial, looks White, and because biracial is not an option on the birth certificate, we checked White.

Now that we are thinking about elementary schools, we are forced to put Latino /Hispanic because the best local schools in my area give priority to every race, but white. 

It’s a 12 point system to get in. Right out the gate, Black, Asian and Latinos get 4 points.  Whites get 0 points. 

No joke. I can’t see how this is legal. ",billbobb1,e997wmz,conservative
"I would guess we would lose the opportunity for those “points” that would get us closer to 12 points needed to get into the school. 

I’m not sure though. I’ll look into it. 

This is totally and complete bullshit.  I can’t believe this is legal. ",billbobb1,e99dcel,conservative
I'm sorry you're in that situation. I know it's tough whatever you choose to do. I do hope you can find a way to strike a legal blow against this monstrous institutional racism against whites. ,Lionstriker2,e99n3vl,conservative
When I was in 2nd grade I apparently was kicked out of a school bc there were too many of my race. I’m not going to say what race it is bc I know you wouldn’t believe me.,HowRememberAll,e99ktsw,conservative
"For me, it’s not even a white thing.  Just as qualified Asians are being left out of Harvard, race should not be a factor, qualifications should be the only factor. ",billbobb1,e9a0bo0,conservative
"No matter what race you are, it shouldn’t happen to anybody. ",billbobb1,e9a07a3,conservative
"She corrected the headline:
>""UPDATE: Donald Trump Jr. Inner Circle Say No Concerns Over a Mueller Indictment""

>""A source close to Donald Trump Jr. says there are no concerns that he will be indicted by Special Counsel Robert Mueller and that the news–first reported by Politico–is false.""",ngoni,e99a872,conservative
"BULLSHIT: This is misleading, the politico article sourced by the article in the OP, https://www.politico.com/story/2018/11/07/trump-2020-elections-campaign-968942, doesn't say he's expecting to be indicted and it isn't the main  story, it only mentions off hand that donald trump's son has ""has told friends in recent weeks that he believes he could be indicted, according to one of those people.""

",Zyrioun,e99994c,conservative
For......?,BeachCruisin22,e9980rp,conservative
"Are they trying to start a civil war? 

They better have something really good if this ends up being true.",gster50,e999se6,conservative
they are going after his family now.,JMB_was_a_god,e9984an,conservative
"Yeah, I doubt this report. CNN would have it if it were real. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e998qkx,conservative
Is this true? I'm not seeing this on any reputable sources - not even on left wing sites that would love this.,Zyrioun,e998tp5,conservative
Can Mueller already release his findings like he promised? Everyone's sick of this thing.,Terra_green2,e9a1r2v,conservative
For what jaywalking?,paper_boy_1,e997r0f,conservative
Good. Indict all the corrupts.,winner_in_life,e998ic9,conservative
Having the last name Trump? ,ozric101,e998kyb,conservative
">[As Law&Crime reported earlier Wednesday, reporting months back about how Trump Jr. may or may not have lied under oath about the infamous 2016 Trump Tower meeting has suddenly become relevant again](https://lawandcrime.com/opinion/could-this-be-why-president-trump-suddenly-sent-jeff-sessions-packing/)


Apparently lying or something like that from the interviews ",Enzo_SAWFT,e998ueo,conservative
Is it that Russian lawyer thing? I'm not too clear on the indictments that were handed out.,unityrootts,e99azme,conservative
"Something, something James Clapper. ",justhere2havefun,e998zle,conservative
"That is the thing about politics, it should never be considered a career. ",ozric101,e98djmk,conservative
Nelson has held office since I was 6! That's not a career - that's almost a lifetime. A true case for term limits as at some point we all get burned out at a certain job and are just going through the motions.,JFGFNY,e98m6xf,conservative
"Ain’t that the truth. Some of these people have been there their whole life. Robert Byrd 51 years! Ted Kennedy 46 years. Joe Biden 35 years. And there’s a few on the republican side. But wtf. All of these people rich as could be 

So displaced from the American voter. very few worked in the private sector and know what it’s like to live pay check to pay check. Getting more and more money taken from them to hand out to other people ",Chapka69,e98flto,conservative
What a great way to put it! The whipping left(y) winds have been tamed - for now. Florida has got to be vigilent least all those transplanted New Yorkers try to transform Florida into a mini-Cuomo land.,JFGFNY,e98mdkr,conservative
"That is correct. Last year, in Trump v. Hawaii, the Supreme court confirmed the president can turn away aliens who are “detrimental to the interests of the United States.” Now with the support of Kavanaugh on the SC he could stop the Caravans for good.",be_quiet_roo,e99f3y9,conservative
"How the hell can you sue for Constitutional rights of a nation you aren't a citizen of lol, absolute farce.",smileimhigh,e99g7zf,conservative
Don’t forsake us here in California. We exist!,69mikehunt,e989fmq,conservative
"Yes but much like college sports, PAC, Mountian West etc get no love because the pollsters are asleep and blew their wad hyping the stuff in the eastern time zone.",Enzo_SAWFT,e987xjl,conservative
"I am shocked Steve Knight is out considering these areas used to be a conservative stronghold, but redistricting some time ago has changed that. (The independents on the board were Democrats. lololol)

&#x200B;

Pleased Mimi Walters held out. I worked for her in college.",neemarita,e98hq3n,conservative
Never listen to a Democrat who tells you that Republicans don't have standards and begs us not to vote for one of our flawed candiantes. Melendez re-elected against one of the most moderate Republicans out there too...,latotokyo123,e988svv,conservative
I love this. Now I can use it anytime a Dem says “we prosecute and throw out our bad apples.” Sure ya do. ,Applesauce_Police,e99eenw,conservative
Minnesota not so nice,Beechboy96,e98autx,conservative
"Menendez being re-elected is by far one of the most ridiculous things this election. The excuses for voting for him are all centered around how this race was “too important”, yet when voters in Alabama used the same reason to vote for Roy Moore, they were called lunatics. The double standard is insane. ",FloatyFish,e98p4wk,conservative
Minnesotan here. r/Minnesota is unbearable today. ,UltimoRush,e996cl7,conservative
Seriously.. I’m disappointed too. Especially with the election of ilhan Omar. ,dianeyung,e99eg2d,conservative
"Wait. Did you just post an article - written about your own defeat? 

That’s some respectable shit. ",c_ward5,e9bi9uu,conservative
"High demand for supplies and housing, and increased need for taxes to keep things like roads, water, electric working.  

The result is higher costs for goods and housing since people are willing to pay them.   Taxes are higher to help pay for the upkeep and construction.

In the end things cost a shit ton to buy, costs a shit ton to live.  Free stuff starts sounding great",Castaway77,e9agxh1,conservative
"Wait, what? How many Jews are employed by Trump? Related to Trump? And since when has he been remotely hostile to them?",justhere2havefun,e9alrxd,conservative
"""[The Jewish masochistic tradition continues throughout the centuries.](https://m.jpost.com/Opinion/From-Abraham-to-Woody-Allen-The-Jewish-masochist-tradition-409614)""",RomeoMyHomeo,e9ajdp3,conservative
Reform Judaism is more aligned with progressivism than religion. This really isn't much of a surprise.,mastaxn,e9amjq3,conservative
"as if that matters. Most Jews are the most liberal of liberal. Socialistic, open borders anti-gun. This isnt a recent thing either, goes back at least 100 years.",JMB_was_a_god,e9aon6y,conservative
"Maybe someone should tell them that?

Or they already know and just don't care.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ama8j,conservative
"Only Reform Jews and they aren’t having any kids so...

Conservative and Orthodox have the most kids and vote Conservative. Case in point = Ben Shapiro",Laneyrush,e9apike,conservative
that may be true but it's the liberal Jews that hold have power right now. Orthodox Jews by comparison hold none. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9aqa1x,conservative
"Liberals in general hold power. It’s not just “the Jews”. Reform Jews are just more left leaning than not. Plus Jews as a whole tend to be very well educated so they tend to go into law, medicine, the sciences, finance, basically anything that requires a lot of education. Politics is a natural progression for a lawyer.",Laneyrush,e9atp1s,conservative
"I know its not just the jews, thats silly. but this topic and specific thread was about the jews so....",JMB_was_a_god,e9au4jf,conservative
"While it's not good news that we lost the house, the election as a whole wasn't really that *bad*, either. It's true that we beat some estimates for how many seats we'd lose, which is great, but we still lost seats.

I think the result is pretty much a resounding ""meh"" for both sides. Purple puddle indeed. ",Maswasnos,e9835ye,conservative
By basically all metrics this election was just so...average ,i_floop_the_pig,e98u826,conservative
"I honestly think its not terrible news we lost the house. The one bad thing is once the house gets organized and the new committees set, investigations into every little matter trump will fly. However Trump now actually has a foil to blame policy problems on. Which he hasn't had until now; whereas he was often attacking the republican party for this sort of stuff. So this should further unite republicans and trump will have someone to blame shit on as 2020 campaigns ramp up. Also with the larger senate majority we can continue to put originalists on the bench. Hell we might even get another SC appointment. And this time we wont have to worry about one or two soft republicans messing up the vote. So overall things are decent.  ",the-G-Man,e998h13,conservative
The hispanic vote surprises me. I feel like that's higher than normal with Republicans? 40% is not bad. ,TRKillShot,e98bhnj,conservative
Those Latino numbers make me happy,Aech1274,e98o25i,conservative
"The economy didn't matter, tax cuts didn't matter, race mattered. 

When will the GOP learn that in a multicultural society, democracy is nothing more than a racial headcount?",IndefinitePresent,e989npo,conservative
Demographics is destiny.,Lionstriker2,e98pe2a,conservative
Where did you get this chart from? I'm curious about other candidates as well.,CommPuma,e99a978,conservative
"""but muh based African Americans.""

conservatives have to realize that people of color do not lean right. stop lying to yourself, there is no conservative poc movement.

 The left is telling the truth about the republicans being a club for whity

edit: well, perhaps Latino men having 40% isn't bad.

",Ghostclone22,e98deig,conservative
"Cruz underperformed among the biggest electoral group white women. I imagine the suburban soccer moms are to blame.

Republicans do need to get serious about winning back the suburbs. Too many once reliably gop house seats lost this electoral cycle including 2 in tx.

",dtlv5813,e98eo2z,conservative
"Hispanic guy here, trust me theres a lot of hispanic republicans more than you think, they just hide it from fear of how others will respond ",CodeGag,e99rhbo,conservative
A lot of my coworkers are Hispanic. They all voted for Cruz.,T3nsion2041,e99rxew,conservative
"Im all for multiculturalness just not multiculturalness that comes with lock step, hive mind, leftist thought. ",Themusician67,e98atqe,conservative
Race mattered? But Cruz is hispanic and O’Rourke is white. So how did race matter? Ideology is what mattered ,hello_japan,e99cs6f,conservative
">conservatives have to realize that people of color do not lean right.

Well, a big part of the reason why ""gay marriage"" lost in Kalifornia when it was on the ballot was because blacks voted ""no"" on it while voting ""yes"" for Obama.  But, overall, I agree that they don't vote Republican...*generally*.",chabanais,e98f7uo,conservative
"Wrong. Blacks in fl helped them win both the Senate and governor races.


Nice try share blue shill.",dtlv5813,e98egk8,conservative
"> I imagine the suburban soccer moms are to blame.

*Single* white women tended to vote for Hillary but *married* white women tended to vote for Trump.",chabanais,e98f9uy,conservative
"Tbf I don't think that is Cruz' fault but rather a by-product of Trump... He is hated by minority women, white women, and college educated women... But you're right, GOP needs to work to get them back. ",TRKillShot,e98fc0u,conservative
"I know there are a lot more, but those numbers were not expected considering Cruz was running against ""Beto""",Aech1274,e99v88b,conservative
That's great to hear.,Aech1274,e99v8um,conservative
So you're  for multiculturalism and everything  that comes along with it? This is always  the result of multiculturalism. Is there ever an example of this not being the case?,ArctiClove,e98bkia,conservative
"O'Rourke ran as ""Beto"" and Cruz doesn't make his being Hispanic a talking point.",Aech1274,e99vc0h,conservative
Cruz is a white cuban hispanic... for what the US actually refers to as Hispanics (central Americans) he might as well be white. The republican party has never been able to capitalize on the wide range of culture differences among “hispanics” because just like democrats they put them all in the same boat. A white cuban (even a black one) has a vastly different set of values and culture than a Mexican (the ones that come to the US anyways) .,lgalucard,e99xlf1,conservative
"Though remember a lot of blacks in Florida are actually Cuban, Dominican and Puerto Rican. ",lgalucard,e99xppm,conservative
"That multicultural societies always lean left? 


The US being a melting pot was all about multiculturalism. And i say there was some periods before 1900s that it wasn't bad. 


No, the left are just taking advantage of their ignorance of our system. They wouldn't lean or vote left if they weren't being lied to incessantly. ",Themusician67,e98ctxd,conservative
"They don't  always lean left. People tend to lean with their group though, that they feel they belong to. And new groups don't feel apart of the shining city on the hill.



The USA in the 1900s was not really at all comparable  to current times. The cultures of those coming was already very similar, and they looked similar  to those already here. Once their families spoke English and intergrated, you couldn't really tell as much. People still mostly celebrated the same holidays, spoke the same language(after living here), and shared  simar moral beliefs. No one came for the welfare state, and leftist politics  weren't  allowed to take hold as much (beyond progressive movement). Even with all of that going for it, it still brought  problems, but they were overcome and people slowly identified  as a relatively cohesive group. Assimilation  mostly worked. Oh, and multiculturalism  is NOT assimilation. People were encouraged and pressured  to assimilate in the past.




Right now assimilation  is outright  rejected by those on the left. People are encouraged  to speak their own language, and putting  pressure on those  to conform is considered racist. The people don't look alike, so the left has an easy time convincing people  to seperate themselves into in and out groups based on identity  politics. Our cultures are not similar enough  to blend  together easy. Hispanic culture  is much different, look at every  nation  south of the border. Places in the middle east and africa are unimaginably  foreign  to our culture and ideals. Add ten of millions of illegals who are in our nation that don't  give a single damn about the USA, having citizen children who have zero connection  to this country, and  you see it is much different than the past.



The democrats are spouting hardcore racist ideology, particularly against  white people. Their younger representatives and members advocate for  genuine socialism and open borders. That's  one of the two major parties seeped in radicalism.




Multiculturalism  and identity politics are bad things. They foster divisiveness.



 And yeah people are lied to, but convincing them  to just abandon their  whole ideology is no easy task; otherwise, democrats  wouldn't  need to import millions of voters to win. Hence why amnesty is  electoral suicide.


This  is not  the same as the past, and it shouldn't be just written off.",ArctiClove,e98euwn,conservative
So the melting pot of different ethnicities of white people? ,Giga-Wizard,e98dnhk,conservative
and why would they instead lean or vote right?,shotpun,e98uujh,conservative
"I said pre 1900s. The US melting pot idea was absolutely about multiculturalism and it did work, when it was handled properly. All of those points you mentioned were about leftists lying and not about different peoples coming here. 

I know your point. Other peoples outside of the US that come here, are ripe for leftist indoctrination. But when assimilation was emphasized, and illegal immigration handled properly, it worked. ",Themusician67,e98fr0v,conservative
"There were several different peoples in this country for a long time. 

You're delusional if you think pre 1900s the US was nothing but mixes of european peoples. Was there a majority? Durh. Of course. That's always been the case. That doesn't mean there isn't a melting pot though... Its obvious there is and was for a couple of centuries now. ",Themusician67,e98fzvz,conservative
"Here’s to two years of gridlock, fellas. ",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97hwbu,conservative
Bright side: Nancy Pelosi as speaker should be a real fucking treat. ,CITY_F0X,e97i8wv,conservative
I’m pumped for Nancy as speaker. She’s going to fuck the shit out of her own party ,_JackieBoy_,e97iimf,conservative
Trump is going to have so much ammo for his 2020 run.,Yosoff,e97hsot,conservative
"The worst part, we literally wasted 2 fucking years sitting on our majority asses doing jackshit with a Republican government. Passed very few conservative policies.

Lost House, now it's for sure never going to happen.

Why are Democrats allowed to pass thousands upon thousands of liberal bills when they hold at least 2 of the 3 government branches, but we look like fools with a majority across the entire US government? The GOP is getting pretty pathetic. ",uniquecannon,e97lqft,conservative
Honestly we will have a field day with these lunatics. 2020 could be a landslide for us with craziness like this,xJownage,e97hutq,conservative
"So, I went to r/politics to see what they were doing and they're more radical than I thought. They're talking about Beto and Gilliam running in 2020, how people should boycott Florida, and they're celebrating Cortez.",MuricanStephen,e97x2c3,conservative
"Don't forget Alexandria ""just pay for it"" Ocasio Cortez",top-perro,e97y6ra,conservative
Watching Pelosi right now on Fox News just confirms that it'll be a GOP landslide in 2020.,bipartisanscreeching,e97idoo,conservative
Well here is to  2 more years on non ending investigations. ,Usmc42fan,e97k8bx,conservative
"Jesus christ do we need term limits.

Merry Christmas & enjoy the circus! ",joeysuf,e97hjhm,conservative
"While this will be painful to tolerate for the next couple of years, without the Senate, there's only so much damage they can do. It'll probably create some good 2020 campaign ad material nonetheless.",mastaxn,e97jm3i,conservative
"I guess the plus side is they get to televise the finest of their rot even more mainstream now. The same media that cried over the Hillary hearings won't be able to hide the blatant hypocrisy if they try and cover for the inevitable show trials we're about to see. Waters is unhinged, Pelosi is the glorious, GLORIOUS gift that keeps on giving, and Elijah Cummings is equally as disastrous. 

How is going to look when Auntie Maxine goes off on semi-coherent rant about impeaching 45 and driving out republican diners, while Americans are suffering from the lack of legislative action in the house? People don't want this shit anymore, especially form someone as terrible as Maxie. They don't care. Only Buzzfeed does for the clickbait, and newsflash, that audience isn't middle America. 

People thinking this is a loss for Trump don't realize that he thrives off of personalities like theirs, because it *masks* the criticisms people can make of his own. He brings them down to his level, and keeps them there. Its pure Washington viscousness, with any ""cordial"" pretenses removed. The difference being in 2020, amidst all this toxic rhetoric, he has the advantage of the prestige of the Office. If he can clean up his act, all he has to do is watch the left eat itself trying to not only take him down, but also each other to get the nomination.

People are out for blood, red and blue, the Dems just don't realize that its a game Trump plays far better than them, and without an ace in the hole with Mueller, they only reach levels of petulance the Tea Party only was imagined to be.

The best the Dems can do is attempt to legislate, formulate some sort of vision and then campaign on it being ""stopped"" by Trump and the Senate in 2020, but with the Dems currently in power, I don't think they're interested in a workable vision. Its about power, pure and simple, and the rhetorical, identity dog whistling showmanship that gets them a couple of seats where needed. 

&#x200B;",ZeroTheCat,e97j8k3,conservative
"The good news out of all this, is that the Dems didn't win MORE than expected. They performed about what you would expect for the opposing party of the Presidential Election. This suggests that the Democrat voters weren't as motivated as the loudest voices suggested. I think this creates a positive outlook for the 2020 Presidential Election.",-Kerosun-,e980ufr,conservative
"Democrats really risk digging their own graves here and losing majority in 2020.

There was a huge Kavanaugh effect on the Senate races, and if the Dems overreach and continue with this shrill uncivil harangue on investigations, I think the public will make them pay at the polls in 2020. There will be great temptation for them to launch any number of investigations, and if this is how they use their majority, I think they will not fare well.",Lepew1,e983jex,conservative
"Just keep in mind, #bluewave was the absolute BEST the dems could pull off. They spent $70mil on a pro abortion gun grabber in Texas, they had a 50/50 Senate split and needed ONE seat, they had a close house that they were very likely to gain a majority in, they orchestrated high voter turnout nationwide by engaging college students and scaring old people about Medicare, every single opponent of all their beloved candidates just so happened to be a bigot white supremacist and like just the worst you guys, they completed the bluing of Virginia, engaged the suburbs, and they got...mucky stagnation. They have a slim majority in the house (until they screech about impeachment for the next 2 years and their purple darlings get booted out), their big heart throb candidates  (Tn, Tx, Az, In, Fl senators, abrams in Georgia,) all lost. Don’t let the dems claim they weren’t expecting these to be wins. The past 2 years all I’ve heard is about impeachment and investigations, and supermajorities. They took the Alabama senate race as a mandate and not a moderate dem who didn’t inflame people going against a creep who was perking on teens at the mall. 

If this result is the best they can muster after all of the hoopla, all of the money spent, the baseless accusations of white supremacists being everywhere, and Oprah/Beyoncé/Taylor Swift, then they should be reminded at every opportunity that they LOST. We likely looking at a close house (somewhere around 235-200, which can easily flip back), a 10 seat advantage in the senate (very likely flipping Doug Jones’ seat once he’s not running against a pedo), majority of the governors mansions being republican, an already solid SC with 2 liberal justices edging on retirement (though rbg will likely die in her chair rather than give trump control of her replacement). Make no mistake, liberals lost.",Freerange1098,e986qlp,conservative
"I think D. Trump won re-election tonight.  

The dem house crazies are going to be the face of the dem party for the next two years.  This will drastically hurt the dems for 2020 as they will certainly overreach.  

",stoffel_bristov,e97lvj6,conservative
Only place Waters should be is in a padded room.,FooLyCooLie,e97mq1p,conservative
"If the Dems actually go with ""IMPEaCh ALL ThE THInGS!!!""

..it will so, sooooooooo backfire.

I almost hope that will backfire so badly that the corporate Hillary-Dems will finally wake up and realize they need to purge the SJW cancer from their party.

Almost.

I'm sure the SJW MSM will save the day and keep the SJW-Dems on target for complete double-double-down self-destruction.",jade_crayon,e97wfj4,conservative
Full retards.  All of these people.,MigzMando,e97hvjk,conservative
They're going to make fools of themselves and then it will help us in 2020. ,AMollenhauer,e97ll2z,conservative
"I said this before the results came in, and I'll say it again now. The Democrat party winning the House is not a big deal and is possibly a net positive for President Trump and the GOP. 

If we see a cyclical recession, this can easily be blamed on the Democrat party. I expect a recession sooner than later, which would mean the recovery would be well under way by the time election day 2020 rolls around. 

Even bigger is what is alluded to in the headline. Just look at who is going to be leading the House Democrats! Keeping in mind that many of those who just elected a Democrat house are apolitical/poorly informed ""moderates"" and Never Trump ""conservatives"", just imagine how they'll react to an increasingly unhinged Democrat party. Rep. Pelosi is going to have a difficult time balancing the wants of her lunatic base (impeachment now! subpeona now!) against the practical needs of her party to not come across as completely unhinged. I don't have much confidence in Mrs. Pelosi to do a good job here. 

If we are to lose one chamber or the other, the House is the one to lose. Look to advanced age of Justices Ginsburg and Breyer. Can they hang in their another 2 years? I saw Ginsburg when I attended the inauguration. Look beyond the Supreme Court. The Republicans have another two years to fill the lower courts! Also, with it looking like 54 seats that's a decent cushion for 2020. ",BudrickBundy,e985b9k,conservative
"I think the Dems taking the House will help Trump's reelection chances.

Putting Pelosi on center stage only serves to remind the public how loony she is and her party.  Trump will now have an enemy to attack constantly and I fully expect the Dems to overplay their hand by launching hollow investigations that will backfire on them.  

",puddboy,e987bb3,conservative
"The interesting bit for the next weeks is not seeing how the MSM from CNN to TYT try to spin this as ""Well, actually it was a Blue Wave!""

But seeing how they deliberately ignore the fact that many on the right are actually pretty much OK with this ""Dems barely take the House, then use that power to do tons of insane SJW Impeach ALL The THINGS!!!"" stuff scenario and how it plays out to not-insane American voters to complete GOP victory in 2020 so strong that a Constitutional Convention run by conservatives may even be in the cards. 

Also, they'll be deliberately not noticing that there ain't no salt to be mined from conservatives this day. There will be no compilations of tearful conservatives, because there are none.",jade_crayon,e982oie,conservative
"Hate to say this you almost need this to rattle the cage, to make sure we all get out to vote in 2020.",right_mind_mechanic,e987wvc,conservative
"Wow I thought a lot of Dems disagreed with NP being the head but I guess they were threatened with their political careers. Too bad, I feel like some of the younger dems wouldn’t be as extreme as Nancy or Maxine. They seem to be the crazy of the party. 

Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez got elected, I guess nobody watched the countless meme videos on her horrible interview responses. Wanna talk about delusional...

Looks like the next two years are going to be a bunch of nothing besides the hundreds of “investigations” being opened up on various members of the White House and Republican Senators. ",Jabronies96,e988pm1,conservative
"Emotion and reactionary based politics pure and simple. The Republicans need to learn how to use them to recruit young voters.

",postonrddt,e97sr28,conservative
I am so glad President Trump got so much done in the 2 years that we held all three branches.  The next two years of gridlock will hopefully show the absolute *lack* of vision on behalf of the Ctrl-Left.  The *only* thing they offered was constant reeeeeeeesistance to Trump,Jizzlobber42,e9843gx,conservative
I don’t fucking believe this,stillbatting1000,e97mfgp,conservative
Get ready for the mobs.,Salt_n_Light,e980xkk,conservative
It ain't over 'til it's over. Keep the faith.,paulbrevik,e97iku9,conservative
"T
Fk",tearblast,e98vym0,conservative
I wont be to quick to pass judgement. I'll wait and see what happens. Let's see if her actions ring true to what she said earlier. ,Gonzila077,e97oqb4,conservative
"Sunlight is the best disinfectant.

Give the nutjobs the air time they want - and let America see how ridiculous they are.  Should wrap up nicely in time for 2020.",parkowork,e982ho8,conservative
"Heard there's a good size group of Dems who are ""Just Say No to Nancy"". It should trouble everyone regardless of party, that we have a group of elected officials who because of their personal dislike of Trump are willing to waste our time and money investigating rather than legislating. 

Maxine is 80 and behaves erratically , Feinstein at 85 can't figure out if her staff is leaking info and 78 year old Nancy is slurring her words and flapping her hands. This type of leadership plus the supported up and comers like Ocasio-Cortez and Beto O'Rourke aren't a real threat to Conservatives.",JFGFNY,e98od7v,conservative
"As Brett Kavanaugh once said, try to look at the sunny side of the mountain. We will have a solid Senate majority, and can confirm as many judges as we want. The sunny side of this mountain is way more important.",paulbrevik,e97i64m,conservative
It's not like the last two years produced a whole lot of legislation either.,ngoni,e98a7md,conservative
Worse things could happen.,Mentat_of_Roshar,e97i18f,conservative
"Maybe they can work together on infrastructure.

A man can dream.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e98brln,conservative
"It doesn't make much of a difference.  For the last two years, Trump didn't really have control of the senate.  Between the Dems and the anti-Trump republicans, it was extremely difficult to pull a majority in the senate.  On big issues, it really only happened twice for the tax cut and the confirmation of Brett Kavanaugh.  Now, the Trump GOP will have control of the Senate but not the house.",stoffel_bristov,e98ftnj,conservative
"Things are going well in America economically. Gridlocked isn't a bad. If the Dems use their majority to screech for 2 years, I think tonight showed it'll hurt them in 2020.",Faraday314,e97t281,conservative
Didn't we have 2 years of gridlock already? ,SilenceoftheSamz,e981m4y,conservative
"Gridlock?  I think you mean two years of Republicans obstructing the representatives of the people.

The left is already portraying this as a mandate to impeach Trump and enact the latest batshit crazy policy of the week.",user1492,e97xnc0,conservative
Gridlock is generally desirable. It is especially desirable in this case because the Senate remains free enough to get the most important things done and to keep the House in check.,SheCutOffHerToe,e9871k5,conservative
"Yep, gonna be this shit 24/7 

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2018/02/07/pelosi_my_grandsons_birthday_wish_was_to_have_brown_skin_the_face_of_the_future_of_our_country.html",atomicdiarrhea4000,e97nqpx,conservative
"Just wait till she's on the house floor making a big televised speech and the dementia starts kicking in.
It's going to be hilarious and sad at the same time.
",MooMooCudChew,e97mwkx,conservative
Think of all the free new Gop ad material! ,PerceivedShift,e97xmsw,conservative
"Go figure, the biggest mush mouth in politics will be the speaker of the house.....",jdizzle161,e987bn9,conservative
"Honestly if Americans can elect ocasio cortez to Congress, I don't see trump winning in 2020.   The voter base in the US is full of idiots.",Poopinthebumm,e97teog,conservative
"When did the Democrats pass thousands upon thousands of bills? They got Obamacare through because they had 60 votes in the Senate. Truth is the system is built for gridlock. The lefties are saying the same thing right now about Pelosi , from their view they give up too much to Republicans. ",latotokyo123,e97luwn,conservative
I agree with this. How did no one in the GOP have the vision that it is very likely we lose the house and obviously can’t really pass much for the two years in the lead up to 2020? ,5937539859582754,e97p956,conservative
"We passed the tax bill. That took alot of work. I live in a blue state though so overall it looks like my tax bill is going up a little but that’s cause of the high property taxes that I can’t deduct anymore apparently. However if the stock markets keeps going up it’ll make up some of the difference. Sucks we didn’t keep the house, no chance of eliminating property taxes now.",sonicthehedgehog16,e97stnf,conservative
"They wasted their time and will now pay the price. 
Hopefully the party learns from this and is **much** more productive when they get the house again ",ItsReasonOrTreason,e984n9p,conservative
I think you feel like they passed a bunch of bills but its really just them crying the loudest. ,talann,e97n63w,conservative
"People are getting complacent with the good economy and markets. Too many people stayed at home playing red dead 2 than voting.

Dems are full of anger and spite right now.

Pelosi talking about removing dark money from elections after the Beto campaign in texas. She's just lying through her teeth.

",Cuisinart_Killa,e97itrz,conservative
Maybe we can secure more minority votes. That'd be swell. ,joeysuf,e97hy1n,conservative
"Strongly disagree on a ""landslide.""

Places that swung for Trump in 2016 voted blue this year. I think a lot of our side deluded ourselves into thinking those areas were turning red, but they're not. It may have just been a referendum on ""fuck Hillary"" than ""go Trump."" Those places are still infested with unions and reliable Dem voters.

Consider that things have gotten so bad that Zodiac Ted wasn't a sure bet for *hours.* Losing the House is going to be worse than people realize - they can defund border patrol and just allow illegal immigration to just *happen.* If the Republicans refuse, they can shut down the government and still get the same result.

Republicans need to show some fucking spine for the next two years.

If the Dems shut down the government over refusing to fund border patrol or ICE, we should not pay federal workers that do not work. Up to this point, every federal employee has gotten paid for doing nothing during a shutdown. Every district with federal employees in Virginia votes blue, so make it hurt if their party shuts down the government. 

Furthermore, previous shutdowns direct an ""orderly shutdown"" - is it possible we could instead scuttle things like EPA or HUD or NLRB during this process? As in ""back up your data to this disaster recovery site, we're going to liquidate all your assets"" and when the government is no longer shut down, they spend the next three years trying to get back up and running? 

Dems spent years fucking us because a government shutdown didn't hurt them; blue federal voters still get paid, welfare checks still go out etc. If they're going to play fuck-fuck games to let illegals in, we need to make sure they pay the iron price for it.",soylent_absinthe,e97ym2u,conservative
"Most of our losses appear to be from the RINO camp anyways... still bad because we lose the committees but we still get judges, we still have a say on budgets, Trump said he is prepared to shut the govt. down over spending, and maybe we can get some progress on weed or other issues. ",54367543457109943628,e97jvfk,conservative
Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups.,Zarlog_,e9803vz,conservative
"Good boycott Florida! Maybe they can all leave Miami,Broward, and west palm",abuigues,e9809ok,conservative
">celebrating Cortez

Looks like they forgot the memo that blindly agreeing with a woman isn't going to get you laid. They should have learnt that 2 years ago. Seriously, Cortez is just only a pretty face.",dgd_mobius_centurion,e980tvg,conservative
"Tards gonna tard, my friend.",FireChickens,e97zvrr,conservative
"""We're going to fight against corruption!"" 

(ignore the fact we just re-elected Bob Menendez)",TheWhiteFalcon,e97im0s,conservative
Why so much confidence?,MoistStallion,e97igw1,conservative
Two years of wasted tax dollars,goldmouthdawg,e97rrxa,conservative
We have term limits. They're called elections.,dhighway61,e97hylw,conservative
"> Pelosi is the glorious, GLORIOUS gift that keeps on giving

Any bets that after a few weeks of insanity and word salad (the unintentional kind caused by a rotting brain, not the intentional kind of a political hack dodging a question), the MSM will sudddenly discover that yes, she actually does have senile dementia and should resign?

Or will they just hide her from view like they did Roosevelt's wheelchair?",jade_crayon,e97wnx7,conservative
"> I said this before the results came in, and I'll say it again now. The Democrat party winning the House is not a big deal and is possibly a net positive for President Trump and the GOP. 

It's not like the Dems have a super majority or anything close to it.",bigdaveyl,e98bsob,conservative
"It was predicted by a lot of conservatives that this would happen. I would not fret though. The Democrats will be on their heels because their ultimate goal is to get the president seat. This is no real victory for them and no ""blue wave"" as they claim.",talann,e97na4r,conservative
Worked perfectly 2 years ago! Good night for the Republicans and 2020,TNB55,e987b0z,conservative
"Get a better cabinet, judges (hopefully Supreme Court) and the new trade deal. Still a lot to do. The only negative is spending more money on dumb Dem things, that's all we've really lost. I'm disappointed there's no chance for amazing conservative policies to be passed but hey you win some you lose some. ",latotokyo123,e97kw1k,conservative
This is absolutely huge. If another judge dies or retires in two years we could be looking at a solid conservative court for decades.,deepfeels96,e97lupr,conservative
You mean the senate can confirm as many rapists that the Left doesn't murder in the next two years. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97jd7k,conservative
Yeah better than them actually being able to pass stupid shit. They will screech for two years and then we probably win it back. Not a big deal. ,Zac1245,e97ie8p,conservative
Yeah like the states that voted blue vote blue in 2020. ,fett4evr,e97jd0b,conservative
"The Republicans did that during Obama's last term, and it never did them any harm.  
They cock blocked him at every turn",RobotXander,e9859kv,conservative
"I was on the phone with my dad about this last night. My take is pretty much the same. If we have gridlock for 2 years after 2 years of successful policy accomplishments I'm ok with that. I'm thinking of it as a short breather. It will give us a little time to see how well this economy does in the long run and its not as if they can really pass anything with a majority in the Senate. Plus we still have the power to put justices up. A loss in the house is still a win for us. We can wait them out. 

Besides... Does anyone think that the house isnt going to try to go crazy and show their asses for the next 2 years? The optics will be beautiful for 2020 if that happens. ",MrFizzardsWizard,e983qpu,conservative
Let them try... They don't have the votes in the Senate and it makes them look like posturing idiots. ,MrFizzardsWizard,e983unw,conservative
"Wow that sorta makes my skin crawl, blatant fetishization of skin color by politicians",jouwhul,e987fyv,conservative
AOC is in a solid blue district in New York.  How is that a litmus test for the rest of the country.  ,IWurgency,e981ztv,conservative
"She won?!???!?!

That is probably the best news of the entire night! Sooooo many memes are coming.",jade_crayon,e97wtx1,conservative
"> Honestly if Americans can elect ocasio cortez to Congress

Have you been to the Bronx lately?  It's not very American...",McCalzone,e97xr9g,conservative
"That's like saying Trump is gonna lose in 2016 because Bernie was the senator from Vermont. Blue states are gonna blue, it's how it's always been.",shatter321,e988m0t,conservative
">the system is built for gridlock

And thank goodness for it. I don't want anyone in DC having that much power, even with all 3 houses.",stanleythemanley44,e987udt,conservative
"Wow. A tax bill. 

What happens to that when the socialists take control of congress and presidency in the coming decade? We had a small window to dismantle their propaganda machine and we missed it. The future now belongs to the socialists.",Vacomiun,e986ubn,conservative
"Unfortunately, this trend is not new. Especially in the House.

* [Rand Paul on Spending: ""When Republicans Are In Power, There Is No Conservative Party""](https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2018/02/08/rand_paul_on_spending_when_republicans_are_in_power_there_is_no_conservative_party.html)",DEYoungRepublicans,e9859sl,conservative
I managed to vote *and* play Red Dead Redemption 2. :),The_Mighty_Rex,e97nxqo,conservative
It's kind of funny. Honestly I see the dems making themselves looking even worse out of all of this and possibly giving up the house in just 2 years. ,xJownage,e97j1cy,conservative
"I don't think you're entirely wrong, but if the right was calling it quits we wouldn't be hanging onto the Senate right now. Seeing as the incumbent's party historically loses seats in the House and Senate in the midterms, I'd say we're in pretty good shape holding onto the Senate, especially seeing as the Dems were banking on the thought that they were going to run away with both houses. 

Everyone was pretty well predicting the Democrats would steal back some House seats, it's no secret they're pissed off. We just need to keep that in the back of our minds, because they're going to be even more pissed off they didn't sweep the floor this time. They might be goofy, radicalized and out of touch but that doesn't mean they aren't a threat.",TankerD18,e97n5ak,conservative
"> Dems are full of anger and spite right now.

Right now?  ;)

Half of Dems are Dems **because** they are full of anger and spite against anyone happier and/or more successful than themselves. When you're a bitter, lazy psychopath with no job nor social skills, that makes one angry and jealous of a lot of people.",jade_crayon,e97wr3f,conservative
"Here is my take. If this is what the dems can produce while being full of anger and spite. I am OK.

2 years of potential craziness from them might be a kick in the pants for those who thought we were good to go. It could flip into a bigger swap for us conservatives in 2020.

This gives us a another Trump effect chance for 2020. It worked once and again with how weak the dems actuslly turned out to be with their anger and hate 2020 could very well be glorious. ",RansomedAmbassador,e97zm9u,conservative
I heard that shit about dark money on the radio on nor this morning. Wtf are they getting on about? Seems like deflection away from how much they spent on Beto and lost. ,DontMakeMeDownvote,e987gr0,conservative
Florida was up with black gop votes I think. That’s a good sign,Enzo_SAWFT,e97i92j,conservative
"> That'd be swell.

It sure would, Beav, it should would.",chabanais,e97iiay,conservative
Probably is fairly likely when they figure out the left doesn't give a flying fuck about them.,xJownage,e97ixrp,conservative
"And even then, only marginally. I don't think the pretty outweighs the crazy.

Remember dudes, dont stick your dick in crazy.",awksomepenguin,e981k72,conservative
Mendez seriously won?!,The_Mighty_Rex,e97nzvn,conservative
Pelosi is notoriously inept and her last stint as Speaker ended with a historic defeat.,psstein,e97info,conservative
Did you feel the same way about the Benghazi hearings?,MustardBranches,e98u1xl,conservative
Those aren’t term limits. Corruption keeps these people in power. We need real term limits. ,runs_in_the_jeans,e984m8z,conservative
There is almost no job that has the job security of a member of congress.  They get re-elected with >90% frequency.  Between gerrymandering (done by everybody) and the incredible power of incumbency it's easier to fire a civil servant that it is to lose your job as a member of congress.,WIlf_Brim,e987at0,conservative
"It just seem so *bizzare* to me. More African Americans have left the Democratic Party, Republican support was surging, independents were leaning red... and this?? I just don’t get it. I’m just angry and baffled.",stillbatting1000,e97nmda,conservative
"Frankly, there's no chance of any real legislation ever unless there's a unified government with a senate supermajority. Dems would filibuster anything amazing :(. ",paulbrevik,e97lip2,conservative
"Time for retirement, Baby Ruth.",Otto-Carpenter,e9838hr,conservative
"Demokkkrats will launch COUNTLESS racist Investigations into trump based on racist conspiracy theories

They will subpeona his tax returns and use subpeona power to dig up political dirt

They will try to undo ALL of his successful agenda and then blame him

They will prevent him from firing mueller two years after he found nothing

And since they control the msm it eill be EVEN HARDER for him to win 2020

(Unless he grows a pair and passes an executive order stating that stations calling themselves ""news"" cant lie)

They will stop at nothing to destroy america.

",ExpensiveMention,e97p2gi,conservative
Huh?,Alittlebitofjontax,e97k8xy,conservative
"I agree, I see the Democrats spending the next two years acting like children, pushing EVEN HARDER on the 'freak out' button around 2020. Then the electorate will go ""huh, not doing THAT again this time."" Then we get a big red wave. Only time will tell what happens after.",Narratron,e97nzm5,conservative
"which is historically what happens

right? Just like 2012!

",shatter321,e988fve,conservative
"I truly believe that the Dems winning the house helps Trump get a second term.  They were crazy without power, now they will have a small amount of power and go crazier.  They can't sit there and say they are going crazy because they have no power any more.  It also gives Trump a punching bag.  Anytime he wants to take a jab at the Dems, all he has to do is push something forward that he knows they will knock down just because its him.  Then he gets to point to them and say, ""See what they did?  They don't like you, the American People.  They just want to attack me at your expense.""  I can see this being a weekly thing for the next two years.  So congrats on winning the house Dems, and go nuts.  Let the American public see your true colors.  The colors that elected a corrupt politician who flies private jets overseas to hire underage hookers.  The colors that elected a politician who beat his then girlfriend.  The colors that elected the dumbest person in the world, all because she is a socialist.  The American public will watch for the next two years.  The left will always vote left, and the Right will always vote Right, but those swing voters will see your insanity.  Game on!",jdizzle161,e987a4z,conservative
Xenophilia.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e98btuo,conservative
It just is a different part of America. Just because there are brown skinned liberals doesn't mean they're not Americans. This kind of bullshit is the reason conservatives get a bad rap. ,10outofC,e98141h,conservative
Que??? ,BeachCruisin22,e97z86x,conservative
I don’t know good question. In 2 years a lot more could have been done. I don’t understand why they aren’t back to work right now before the Democrats take over the house don’t they have 2 months left? Why are they just twiddling their thumbs they can do whatever they want for the next two months and they’re doing jack shit. It’s almost like they want the Democrats back in power again,sonicthehedgehog16,e9d3mw6,conservative
There should be a sticker for that. ;),jade_crayon,e97ws7z,conservative
"I threw a little Call of Duty in there too!  Voting takes no time at all!  A vote in the morning, a quick haircut, and then two video games through the day.  Not difficult at all.",jdizzle161,e987foa,conservative
"Problem is dem cucks vote on feelings and orange man bad is all they care about.

They would destroy the economy and our borders just to spite us.

They vote out of spite, how else can they justify having pelosi and maxine ? ",Cuisinart_Killa,e97jb88,conservative
"It's going to be endless attack on the POTUS. They don't care about the nation, there's no aisle crossing on anything with them.

",Cuisinart_Killa,e97ndc7,conservative
"I think the reason we lost is because the democrats had more to lose in the Senate.  We put most of our focus on a few key Senate races while the democrats put their focus all over the place, that affected the House votes because we seemed to only focus on building up hype in those few areas with Senate races we could win/had chance of losing.  I bet if we had a harder Senate election this time around, we would’ve campaigned differently and just might’ve kept the house, or made the dems win a bit more narrow.",acada,e981665,conservative
they've had 60 years to figure that out and haven't. ,JMB_was_a_god,e98frhm,conservative
"Yup, people who bitch endlessly about Trump being corrupt just gleefully re-elected the mostly blatantly corrupt member of the Senate.",Min0taur,e985i0s,conservative
You shouldn't talk about retarded people like that. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97jgrd,conservative
Theres like 3 states that have like 1/3 of the seats and they always always vote blue,Kotef,e97q6e2,conservative
Dont let it get to you. They cried the loudest. Really nothing will change though. Dont let them think this is a win. It really isnt but they are going to push hard to make it seem like they are winning the war. They lost heavily and a lot of them know it.,talann,e97q6jx,conservative
"You’d have to be reading incredibly biased sources to believe all that. African Americans are as Democratic as ever, in the last two weeks things were actually swinging back towards the democrats, and  independents have been leaning Democratic. Republicans actually outperformed today compared to what the signs were (Most notably taking both the Senate seat and Govenorship in Florida), but the signs leading up to this election were definitely in line with what happened tonight. ",SymmetricColoration,e97rv6p,conservative
"Because midterms rarely correlate to presidential elections.  Obama lost 63 House seats and 6 senate seats in 2010 and still won reelection (pretty solidly) because presidential election is a different beast.

All those metrics you pointed out are good signs for 2020, but don't mean much in a midterm.",mbarnar,e980ap5,conservative
Welcome to how Dems felt in 2016. Everything they knew showed that Hillary had it in the bag.,PUBG_Rico,e983r9b,conservative
Commifornia.,Black_m0ngoose,e97nqh4,conservative
[removed],,e97o7pv,conservative
"I can’t take seriously anyone who uses “Demokkkrats”, no matter the point...",gt4674b,e97xkvm,conservative
I don’t think the news station thing will fly and i wouldn’t recommend it. That comes dangerously close to violating free press.,deepfeels96,e988ldj,conservative
Imagine believing this.,Squiddy_titties,e99249a,conservative
[removed],,e97vp5o,conservative
The left isn't going to be passive about the senate approving these judges even if they don't have to political power to stop them. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97kc4l,conservative
They're not Americans.,groyperslefthand,e9857ws,conservative
"They dont speak English, they dont have a American culture and they are not assimilated.

The only thing American about them is the piece of paper in their pocket.",JMB_was_a_god,e98fmmp,conservative
">brown skinned liberals

They are culturally not American, you're lucky if they even speak English.",McCalzone,e99r41q,conservative
**¿Has estado en el Bronx últimamente? No es muy americano.**,MrFizzardsWizard,e983yla,conservative
I am a democrat and this is not how I voted. I vote on policy and for candidates that represent what I want in my government. Voting on just feeling is stupid. For/against either side.,craftyrafter,e97y0a7,conservative
"Oh hell no there isn't, it's going to be gridlocked up there. I hate it, but I'll take gridlock over Democrats sneaking their weaselly shit under Trump's nose with a majority in both. Let them attack the POTUS though, that's just helping him in 2020.

I kind of feared that if we kept both houses that we'd get *really* complacent and would suffer for it in 2020.",TankerD18,e97nnn5,conservative
"And Keith Ellison, because we don't believe *all* women, after all.",ShillinTheVillain,e989pze,conservative
You shouldn’t talk about mentally challenged people like that.,ShamooTheCow,e97pnag,conservative
That's really constructive there guy. You sound like a real winner,Gonzila077,e97osio,conservative
"+1 that. Also... ""libtard"" makes my eyes roll pretty hard too. ",MrFizzardsWizard,e983hov,conservative
I was going to downvote for that alone...,r4d4r_3n5,e98d0of,conservative
"Nah it doesnt. Fuck ""muh free press"" arguments

Libertarians would have the usa be like north korea with the media controlled by one ruling party 

""Kim jong controlling the media is free oress and freedom! How dare u suggest changing that!""",ExpensiveMention,e98cp2r,conservative
"Mueller: Nothing directly approaching Trump

Tax returns: looking for Russian collusion based on a faulty premise

3. Terrible point",BuSpocky,e97wkaq,conservative
So what.,chabanais,e97le3f,conservative
were they passive about kavanaugh?,xJownage,e97lkwz,conservative
What is your logic? Is anyone with opposing values or political views not an American? ,jouwhul,e987jqc,conservative
"""The only thing American about them is the piece of paper in their pocket."" 

What is American culture? I'm serious. America was never some homogeneous cultural place. Or did you forget that the country was founded on religious minorities fleeing persecution and being a melting pot of the known world. Maybe that was the narrative pushed in the 'good old days' but it's never had cohesive cultural norms across 50 states. To imply that is silly and is cherry picking history. I know this is a rough source, but: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_immigration_to_the_United_States 

And to be frank, for the republican party to flourish and some say survive, we need to embrace that demographics are shifting and that fearing and villainizing brown people WILL MAKE THEM VOTE DEMOCRAT. All the immigrants (and children of immigrants) I know are more socially conservative than me. It's all the white SJW girls I know who are screeching liberals. If the party can get over its racial insecurity and tap into this huge pool of immigrants who were frankly conservative in their home countries, we could take largely blue counties back. Because immigration is happening whether we like it or not. It increased to 1,000,000+ people a year under the bush years and it doesn't show signs of slowing down. ",10outofC,e98huqh,conservative
"Are you really saying African Americans, who came over around the time alot white religious immigrants came, and make up the majority of bronxs population are not Americans? Is this the hill you really want to die on? And again, to imply that the United states of 300 million people, a country made up of immigrants from around the world, all share a uniform culture is actually laughable.

 Have you read a history book? Are you not aware it took immigrants from Europe a generation to learn English back in the 1830s when they came over and their children picked it up first? Sounds familiar? I'll link sources when I have a computer. 

Ps. In the 1830s the navitist/know nothing movement was founded to reduce immigration from religious and racial insecurity. They were scared of the Irish and Catholics. Your insecurity isn't even unique. ",10outofC,e9acia4,conservative
[deleted],,e981qsq,conservative
Censorship is retarded.,ShillinTheVillain,e989r23,conservative
They are demokkkrat libtards,ExpensiveMention,e98clng,conservative
[removed],,e97wu21,conservative
This is a sub to discuss politics. I'm saying the Democrats are going to try to block judges outside of the democratic process. What's your problem? ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97llio,conservative
They weren't. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97lqhb,conservative
"Is anyone with a US passport an American?  I would say that you could measure Americaness by how many years their family has been in America and living among other Americans.  AOC was elected almost entirely by immigrants and the first generation children of immigrants.  Moreover, they are living in cosmopolitan enclaves rather than communities of Americans.  There's nothing to suggest that they think like Americans and no reason to think they are Americans.  
  
Actual Americans whose families have lived here for many generations among American communities support AOC.  That doesn't disqualify them, but they aren't plentiful enough to drive many elections.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e988qt5,conservative
[removed],,e987y0f,conservative
"They will vote democrat either way. get that in your head. being a social conservative means nothing when they DO vote for:

More Gun control

Large social welfare

Socialism

Further democratization of our institution. ",JMB_was_a_god,e98iduu,conservative
"I voted for Lamont because Stefanowski has no ideas for how to balance the state budget. He wants to “cut taxes” but change nothing else.

I voted for Murphy because of his stance on healthcare, gun control, and women’s rights. And of course his vote against Kavanaugh (whether you believe him or not about his high school days, he did perjury himself and is obviously partisan).

I voted for a bunch of local Democratic candidates because of the overall policies of my state’s Democratic Party platform.

I am pro smaller government, while being a Democratic Socialist: I want a much smaller military, much smaller IRS, abolishing ICE, no spying on US citizens by the NSA (one of my major criticisms of the Obama administration). I do want the government to provide basic services that most modern governments do provide: basic (humane) border patrol, road maintenance, police services, education up through college, and healthcare. I believe those five are the essential services that any government should provide. Any candidate who promises those, Republican, Democratic, or Martian, will get my vote.",craftyrafter,e98cw3j,conservative
"Healthcare 100%. 

Having lived (currently living in as well) in a number of countries where healthcare is accessible and cheap, I have no idea why the US can't put together a reasonable healthcare plan. We pay more per person than other countries as individuals and in tax dollars. ",unsuccessful_entry,e982e7a,conservative
"Mueller found those tax charges by a fishing expedition, it'd be like a local sheriff spending 2 years investigating you for any crime because he suspects you may have committed something and they should be suspecting other countries to try to interfere with our elections all the time just like we do to other countries. ",Dranosh,e97x0zs,conservative
"Why is what they want relevant.  Republicans have the votes... fuck em.  What's *your* problem?
",chabanais,e97lptf,conservative
"> The left isn't going to be passive about the senate approving these judges even if they don't have to political power to stop them.

My bigger question to you, is, is this a threat? What exactly do you mean by that statement. Are they going to start shooting people? ",Havebaconwilltravel,e98qdxg,conservative
that's the point.,xJownage,e97lws9,conservative
">AOC was elected almost entirely by immigrants

District is almost 50% white and around %50 US born.

Do first and second generation citizens have less of a right to congressional representation than ""real Americans""? whatever that means.",teutorix_aleria,e99053c,conservative
"The only thing that doesn't stop is change. For the party to keep cultural relevance, doubling down on our ever decreasing base is not the way to do this long term. Short terms gains don't mean squat when we'll overall lose. All I'm saying is there is an untapped pool of genuine conservatives who vote democrat because our party's base and policy victimizes them. 

We can agree to disagree, but I want to have my values and my party represented in 50 years. ",10outofC,e98kso3,conservative
A socialist voting for the dems?? But /r/politics told me that the dems are centrist or even rightwing!,Autismprevails,e98dex2,conservative
"I think we need to define ""healthcare"".  

In this country, a minor broken bone is relatively inexpensive to deal with, even without insurance.  Last time I paid for x-rays out of pocket, they were $15/ea, and even the prescription for the percocets was about $60.  I think I paid about $300 total after it was all said and done.  That's not a lot of money.

Is that affordable?  I think that's pretty reasonable.
",s0briquet,e983izs,conservative
Good lord man. Why are you upset that I said the Democrats are going to continue to resist? ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97lsae,conservative
"I wouldn't be surprised if the rhetoric, desperation, and political violence continues and is continually encourage by the DNC and the media.  ",Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98qxo8,conservative
"> %50 US born. 
  
So the other 50% aren't.  And who do you think that other half voted for?  Holy shit you must be dense.  
  
> Do first and second generation citizens have less of a right to congressional representation than ""real Americans""?   
  
That would be ideal, but our laws aren't just.  They are way, way too lenient toward immigrants.  To compensate, we should send all those wetbacks home.  Immigration since 1965 is illegitimate.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9914h0,conservative
":) Reading some of the comments here, I think a lot of people are highly misinformed about what a democrat looks like. The past two years have pushed centrists form both sides out of the picture. Some on here call them RINOs and DINOs, but in reality they were the centrists. Both parties have grown more extreme in their own directions. 10 years ago you wouldn't have heard anyone running for office seriously identify as a Socialist, a Democratic one or otherwise. People had a very strong association of Socialist == Communist (which is as wrong as saying that Capitalist == Fascist). Today the Democratic party has attracted people from broader on the spectrum, socialists to centrist free market advocates. The GOP from what I've seen is focusing on austerity and cutting taxes, which ironically flies in the face of the conservative base actually mostly being pro universal healthcare aka Medicare for all.",craftyrafter,e98ej9r,conservative
"I'd pay around $20 where I live now in Taiwan. I also pay less taxes overall than I would in the US, even though I'm in a relatively high tax bracket. 

For people in the US who work near minimum wage jobs, 300 is a lot. 

Lived in Spain, France and Japan and had similar experiences. Better healthcare experience than the US most of the time, despite having great insurance while living there.",unsuccessful_entry,e991exh,conservative
"What if I told you in communist Canada, that would all be free? 

(I think the sarcasm here is lost)",j8s8n,e983vyi,conservative
They're irrelevant. ,chabanais,e97m5ye,conservative
"Fair enough, and they probably will. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e98t2qp,conservative
"50% isn't ""almost entirely"" it's half.",teutorix_aleria,e991t4l,conservative
"What's your point? 

I don't live in those countries, and don't want to emulate them. 

edit: You know what - I hope single payer passes, and ends up in the exact same state as education in this country.  Then you will have gotten what you deserve.

2n edit: I'd pay around $20 where I live now in Taiwan. I also pay less taxes overall than I would in the US, even though I'm in a relatively high tax bracket. 

I also don't believe that you live in Taiwan, and if you do, I'd be interested in knowing what the median income is in Taiwan vs. what the $20 represents for a person living on the median wage.

3rd edit: Are you an Expat? ",s0briquet,e991uix,conservative
"I'd say you're lying because these things cost money and it has to come from somewhere. Doctors can't live off of $0 per hour. Your bill comes out of your paycheck, and everyone else's.",doobsftw,e984pmu,conservative
"Nothing is free. We all pay for it via taxes instead of premiums.

The idea that government = free stuff is wrong, stupid, and dangerous.",ShillinTheVillain,e985wwt,conservative
Okay? Should I expect the level of political discourse around here to go to shit? ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97mip2,conservative
And getting elected requires half+1.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9936jn,conservative
"Civil conversation about healthcare doesn't seem to be on the table, so have a great day. ",unsuccessful_entry,e996511,conservative
Sarcasm didn’t come out there whoops,j8s8n,e986dol,conservative
"Not only that, but I have no desire to give more power to a government entity.  What would happen if the government decided to start withholding healthcare from dissidents or political opponents?  What if we went medicare for all, insurance companies went out of business, and then the government decides that gun owners aren't entitled to coverage? 

",s0briquet,e9857w7,conservative
"What does one have to do with the other. 

You said:

>The left isn't going to be passive about the senate approving these judges even if they don't have to political power to stop them.

I said...so what?  They don't have the votes. 
",chabanais,e97muig,conservative
So you're saying that AOC got zero votes from US born people? I'd like to see how you worked that out since she got 78% of the vote.,teutorix_aleria,e993hhv,conservative
"Apparently, you didn't bother to read the side bar.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/wiki/index/whatrconisnot",s0briquet,e996my9,conservative
[deleted],,e985uhe,conservative
Thank you for your input. They didn't have the votes last time and it was still a big affair. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97n7e5,conservative
No.,PlasmaBurnz,e9an8u1,conservative
"And they lost.

I think every Senator who voted against Kavanaugh lost their race. The one Democrat who voted for won his.

So as I said...Dems are irrelevant.",chabanais,e97ne6f,conservative
Well that's very smart political analysis. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97np34,conservative
[deleted],,e9812ps,conservative
It's simply a fact.,chabanais,e988all,conservative
I'm just currious why they think everything that happened with the Kavanaugh hearing is irrelevant other than that he got through. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98mrqt,conservative
Yes and everything about the lefts opposition to Kavanaugh should be entirely forgotten. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98myq1,conservative
I'd say judging by the election results of those candidates it wasn't forgotten.,chabanais,e98n9mu,conservative
So why be so pissy that I brought it up? ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98nqso,conservative
"You mean why did I comment that how the Democrats feel about it is irrelevant?

>The left isn't going to be passive about the senate approving these judges even if they don't have to political power to stop them.",chabanais,e98oihr,conservative
Yeah why be so pissy that I brought up that even though the Republicans controlled the senate that we can expect a similar reaction to future judicial nominees. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98p5ph,conservative
"I said what Democrats do is irrelevant,  they lost and don't have the votes.",chabanais,e98pf49,conservative
Well be sure to completely forget about what happened with Kavanaugh and get pissy if anyone brings it up. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98pu06,conservative
"Why would I ""completely forget about what happened with Kavanaugh?""",chabanais,e98q5s0,conservative
Why be so pissy that I brought it up? You've been throwing a fit for two days now dude. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98q84x,conservative
You're the one continuing this discussion.  My point was fairly elementary... it doesn't matter if the Democrats will be mad with judicial nominees since they lack the votes to actually do anything.,chabanais,e98t4u5,conservative
Well be sure to forget what happened to Kavanaugh and be pissy if anyone brings it up. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e98tcnx,conservative
And googlie eyes Oco’s seat was going to go to a democratic anyways. So having her around will probably be a net benefit as well. ,Username4418,e98164a,conservative
"Yep. The only way they can save 2020 is to actually compromise and present themselves as the compromise party.


And I think we know the odds of that happening.",Enzo_SAWFT,e97ibwa,conservative
"My feeling is that there is absolutely nothing incriminating in Trumps tax returns, he understands the media better than anybody. He knows that by not revealing them he creates hysteria and unfounded accusations. He sets up the media to embarrass themselves if they are ever forced into public viewing, there really is no downside to withholding them for Trump as his base doesnt care about his taxes.",_Baldo_,e97yh6r,conservative
"Agree with this 100%. Liberals are still melting down. We have Senate control. The house Democrats will only show how crazy they are with 'power'. 

Trump is a master troll with an end game always in sight. This just boosters 2020. Let the games begin ",optimist2929,e97zjz0,conservative
"1. Pelosi will be in a fight to retain leadership.
2. DJT just called her
3. Now she's made a speech which sounded mighty friendly to a Trump agenda.


Hear the wheels turning?
",paulbrook,e97kmiv,conservative
Yea I agree. Also they will demand his tax returns which personally I don't think are gonna make him look bad. Maybe he's not as rich as he says. What would they be looking for anyway?,CentrOfConchAndCoral,e97igde,conservative
"If the Dems have proven their good at anything, it's stepping on rakes.  

I expect them to overplay their hand with their House win.  They haven't won anything in forever, so they'll come out loaded for bear, and try to bring down Trump no matter how flimsy their case.  Look at what they did to Kavenaugh.

But the public is smarter than that, and Trump will make them look foolish, helping his reelection chances in the process.

That's my prediction, anyway.",puddboy,e987pk6,conservative
They're going to be pushing to impeach Trump and Pence to get Pelosi to become president. And not even be joking about it. It's a small loss that will lead to a huge victory in 2020. This will be a fun two years as they spin their gears on the nuttiest things.,gizayabasu,e97mb3p,conservative
"And even if he does get impeached (unlikely), we've got the Senate.",downsouthcountry,e97p56s,conservative
"Trouble is, in 2020, the Republicans will have 20+ senate seats to defend.",NocturnalPatrol,e984v3n,conservative
I gd hope so,BATTLECATSUPREME,e97rbdy,conservative
"Exactly this.

What can Democrats really do with their majority in the House? There will be great temptation to use it to launch endless smears and investigations on Trump, Trump's taxes, and anyone associated with Trump. The media will suck up all of this and feedback positively to the Dems in the House to keep it up.

I was watching Steve Doocy do simple crowd reactions to what drove them to the polls and Kavanaugh got the most people yelling. All of the lost Democrat senate seats were by people who voted against Kavanaugh, and Manchin saved his run by supporting Kavanaugh. The public has zero appetite for another Kavanaugh.

The other thing is people are sort of sick of the incivility. If the left keeps this up via endless investigations, that also takes away any kind of sympathy for them.
",Lepew1,e9899tv,conservative
"At least their TDS will be on full display for the next two years.  2020 they can enter the fray having accomplished absolutely nothing for their constituents for a solid two year span, and the only thing they can promise for the future is more absolutely nothing.  Their entire platform is pillared by REEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE 24/7.  What can they offer their loyal voters?  REEEEEEEEEEEEEE-nothing.  What will they deliver?  Reeeeeeeeeeeeee-nothing.  What will they promise next cycle?  Reeeeeeeeee-nothing.",Jizzlobber42,e988veu,conservative
What if there is evidence? What then?,swampthang_,e98d96n,conservative
I am almost certain that senior Dems are telling her that she has to shut up for the next couple years. No way they let her spout her BS in the name of the Democratic Party lmfao,TheEsophagus,e98nq76,conservative
"Many Minnesota Democrats who won their races claimed to be for unity and working towards common goals, but I don't trust them on their word. Most likely, the ""common goals"" are just leftist policies and ""unity"" means going along with them 100 percent. I say this as their history of ""compromise"" is for them to push for their policy for nothing in return for those on the right. The best the right can hope for is just a little less of what they asked for. And that is supposed to be a compromise.

I only believe they are about compromise when they actually do it. That is, actually give us on the right things we want in exchange for things they want. Not just them asking for us to give everything without anything in return.",houseoftolstoy,e988twu,conservative
"I agree, but I think they will find some small thing to nitpick and will zoom in on it to make it look like a big deal. This is how the media operates. Then they'll have the whole left whipped into a frenzy about his tax returns, as if they're incredibly fraudulent. If they can make democrats believe that Kavanaugh drinking beer is reason to keep him from being on the SCOTUS, they can find something on Trump's tax return to trigger [run=outrage.exe] from the left. They'll find a picture of him retrieving a package from Amazon, and point out he didn't report the sales tax, or something stupid like that. ",mrjohnnyhoax,e982oyc,conservative
"If you can find loopholes to pay lower taxes, there’s nothing immoral about that. Illegal maybe, immoral no.",hopoffZ,e986qws,conservative
"This post is from t/SandersForPresident 

>what did pelosi just say? 

>get her the FUCK out 

>""must work together both parties on legislation moving forward"" 

>NO. NO NO NO NO NO!
STOP.TRYING.TO.PANDER.TO.REPUBLICANS. 

>we concede and concede and concede, FUCK! 

",Trisagion_und_Isolde,e97lgww,conservative
His income tax returns would say nothing about his gross worth.,ozric101,e97ms82,conservative
What could possibly be in his tax returns? I bet he's been audited every year for 30 years,BrockLee76,e97kl38,conservative
I've had a few NPCs saying they'll be able to get them now. What are they expecting to find?,HohlraumHe3,e97y4q0,conservative
">  Maybe he's not as rich as he says.

People forget that income isn't the same thing as wealth.  

Also, Trump and his companies likely used legal rules to reduce how much actually got taxed.  All individuals and companies try to do this for obvious reasons.  If a publicly traded company didn't try to reduce tax liability, you'd have some unhappy share holders....

>   What would they be looking for anyway?

See above.  They would likely try to audit his records to see if he used any illegal means to reduce his taxable income.

The problem is that the IRS is more likely to scrutinize the tax returns of people like Trump because he makes a lot of money and may be on the hook for more tax.  The IRS is less likely to come after someone who make $45K a year and under paid their taxes by $0.42",bigdaveyl,e98bk77,conservative
They think he funneled money from the Russians via his hotels over there.,Enzo_SAWFT,e97is8z,conservative
"And an even more conservative President.

And yes I consider Trump a net positive by a good margin. ",RansomedAmbassador,e97zvi0,conservative
"> Trouble is, in 2020, the Republicans will have 20+ senate seats to defend.

That's fine; by 2020 the Ctrl-Left jig is up.  They will have, for a solid 2 years, offered nothing, promised nothing, and accomplished nothing.  They have no platform except to impeach, upend, and dispose of President Trump.  No promise of prosperity, no hope for a better chance at the American Dream, no message going forward.  Hopefully their constituents will finally understand now that they helped elect the dumbest of people on Earth (crazy-Eyes Cortez) alongside people with absolutely no message outside of impeaching Trump.  And they wont do it because they know it will go nowhere.  They can either break their empty promises to their constituents or they can fail doing what was never going to happen anyway with impeaching Trump.",Jizzlobber42,e989awn,conservative
All but 2 are solid red states and Alabama will flip to us.,JMB_was_a_god,e98g0ck,conservative
"Who knows, but it's been 2 years with pretty much nothing.",rimjibber1901,e98eju1,conservative
"I’m sure they’ll load her up with a script, but they’ll be pimping her too hard on the talk show circuits for her not to repeatedly put her foot in her own mouth. Her head is just too empty not to. ",Username4418,e98o6qc,conservative
lol. Their outrage and despair brings me [great joy](https://imgur.com/HgPwJ1v).,MooMooCudChew,e97ouuj,conservative
"That stupid leftist needn't worry, her actions in the future will speak much louder than her words tonight. 

She's already winding up the three-ring circus. ",soylent_absinthe,e97yzwy,conservative
"The general public doesn’t know what depreciation is, so they’ll probably point at lower reported income and say he’s dodging taxes. Most people don’t take financial accounting.",yackippo,e9884h6,conservative
Exactly! Someone like Trump has been in the public eye for decades of he's evaded taxes he would have been caught. Also didn't they find that his 2005 tax returns showed he paid more taxes than Obama and Bernie Sanders. ,CentrOfConchAndCoral,e97l547,conservative
Please the whole Russia scandal thing is so absurd to me. He's not that nice to Russia as president why would they be paying him. ,CentrOfConchAndCoral,e97j6w1,conservative
">by 2020 the Ctrl-Left jig is up

I thought the jig was already up. The Democrats' utter insanity and hatred of middle Americans has been on full display for two whole years. They *still* won the House.",NocturnalPatrol,e98aw34,conservative
"Yeah, they still don't get that he gives them lip service and hits them with sanctions. Or they do. ",BuSpocky,e982jyk,conservative
"Midterms tend to go badly for the president's party. In 2020 i expect we'll make up some of our losses in the house, and we have a good chance of picking up the senate seat in Alabama. Furthermore, the seats we'll be defending are in states that voted republican in 2014 and for trump in 2016. I don't see them flipping to the dems anytime soon.",General_Queipo,e98g68h,conservative
"Exactly right. The senate map is stronger for Republicans because those on the right have less political mobility than those one the left. It’s easier to persuade a left-leaning independent than it is a right-leaning independent in the modern political climate, and Democrats  have done that to themselves with their own hysteria. Democrats have moved further from middle America every election since Clinton left office. They have to rely on Republican blunders to gain any traction.
",xKommandant,e98k0gp,conservative
Ted Cruz's win was too close for comfort. We are losing Texas. ,NocturnalPatrol,e99ukum,conservative
Good for him. Hope he can do a great job in spite of the Democrats in the House!,Maswasnos,e985qb8,conservative
imo the SNL thing only helped him,unityrootts,e98bapb,conservative
Glad to see this. He's a great guy!,Starky_McStarkface,e98alow,conservative
"Eh, no one should be off limits. It's just satire. ",Josh__19,e99674j,conservative
"""Is this sexual harassment""

-CNN probably ",unityrootts,e98yj3b,conservative
Because she’s in a left wing district ,the-divine-comedy,e98kp4y,conservative
This is why we lost the subarbs.  Jesus Christ stfu ,hipsterdufus84,e98tkpc,conservative
After this historic election a new day has dawned in America.....                      wednesday,FeelThePorn,e98hrlt,conservative
>Grandma Pelosi gets the gavel and the subpoena power and that’s enough for Democrats. ,guanaco55,e98l6u5,conservative
Aborted baby hats could work...,guitmusic12,e98lfxu,conservative
"The opposite of the ""pussy"" hat?",RomeoMyHomeo,e98lznq,conservative
a dick head?,aCreditGuru,e98ozil,conservative
"They don’t need hats for that, they just go as is",Dank_Cartographer,e98wwp8,conservative
"Because most of us are bald or balding?! He-hey! Old man jokes, too! Nice.",Cr8er,e98zbm0,conservative
"I understand that this shit is supposed to be making fun of me, but hell yeah you can bet I’m mad and swaggin’ out lmfao.",magnificent_succ,e97rwlr,conservative
"Came from r/all. Not gonna lie, exactly what I expected from this sub lol",TheSquidKick,e97v4y6,conservative
"Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted? Have you voted?

**FOR THE LOVE OF GOD! YES! I HAVE VOTED NOW LEAVE ME ALONE!**

",zuul99,e96tlqv,conservative
Liberal lurker here: This shit is funny. ,pn2013,e97bgxk,conservative
I don’t know how to be offended...,Lakota-36,e97tu3y,conservative
Why tf does this subreddit keep on appearing on my page,Piritiup,e97krc7,conservative
> today,vorcazm,e96k5fo,conservative
"Today my Dad talked about how he was perplexed from so many millennial voters giving a shit. I think this is how he sees us. 

TBH he isn't wrong...we're like poor peasants trying to get heard. ",Ownfir,e97w7zf,conservative
Today? You mean EVERY DAY. ,m0bscene-,e96irzr,conservative
I’m liberal and found this pretty funny.,nobleduck,e97albq,conservative
All over popular jeezus,Regor77,e98bvr5,conservative
[removed],,e96vyrr,conservative
libtards pwned epic style xD,we_out_here_cuz,e97oftg,conservative
Nice another libtard pnwnd,shcniper,e97e8zf,conservative
"You should hear them over on CNN!!!  Everywhere I travel overseas, they have CNN International on.  No wonder other countries hate Trump!  Geeeez!  Thankfully, I'm able to stream FNC (audio only).",NavyVet99,e96f2iq,conservative
This meme is great. Gotta love the hive mind. Everyone here please always try to be self aware and don’t blindly do things just because the party says something or the media says something or blindly follow political rhetoric. Make sure you take context into everything and be reasonable. I know there’s some of you somewhere here,EJR77,e97hclx,conservative
You mean every day,Okchud,e978zps,conservative
"They're out in full force today. The firearms subreddit is filled with, ""I support the 2nd amendment, but I'm voting straight antigun because orange man bad"" posts.",Oh_No_That_Sucks,e96s8bt,conservative
“Blue wave coming guys”,Skarp1214,e97gf6v,conservative
"This is hilarious, and it's even funnier that you think we give a shit. ",Thatoneguy567576,e989y43,conservative
You're being Puttyphobic,BlizurdWizerd,e96fu5a,conservative
Lowkey adorable ❤️ and hilarious ,ShadeBabez,e97uy16,conservative
Accurate ,AlderAndrew,e96hm1q,conservative
This is actually really fucking funny lmao,dubiousCabbage,e96vg2s,conservative
[removed],,e96z8fi,conservative
Wasn’t this posted a month ago?,thegypsymc,e96vrbp,conservative
Wait until tomorrow when they wake up and find the real world isn't a circle jerk like Reddit and Twitter. ,biggestballz,e97b8hx,conservative
Today?,Hereforpowerwashing,e97h0z0,conservative
I love power rangers ! ,Fair_enough42,e975d3e,conservative
Better on Reddit than out voting.,immunogoblin1,e97d72s,conservative
"Yup, I've been feeling the heat today, bring it.",PerceivedShift,e971v0x,conservative
Can someone teach me (or just link me to a tutorial on) how to make these things? I have what I think is a great idea for a face replacement video.,ithinkmynameismoose,e98408b,conservative
OMG is there an election going on today?,SuspiciousBrick,e976r8t,conservative
Liberals are a rare and dying breed according to my local leftist organization. It's sad leftist are filling the void. ,Wiseguy2013,e96zj6t,conservative
Do you have a link to the original video?,aabicus,e96pqgl,conservative
"Hey Republicunts! When are you assholes going to realize that liberals run Facebook, Reddit, Twitter, Instagram, Music and Hollywood. Every time you use these services, you are contributing to liberal causes. This also means we control all of this media. We may not get you, but it’s a slow war and liberals will control this country again. ",Franinpa,e9byf9d,conservative
"This is so accurate, it barely qualifies as humor.

You should have one murdering a baby in the background.",TheComedianGLP,e96w1kc,conservative
Putties are the perfect example of liberals!!! This is awesome.,Phoenix8059,e96w1yr,conservative
The people offended by the joke are the reason it even exists ,juhotuho10,e983ohx,conservative
Even the damn apps on my phone are harassing me. ,Tea_is_unAmerican,e96uu7b,conservative
"""Can I vote Republican?""",the1egend1ives,e971bzp,conservative
"Youtube, Reddit, etc, would not be constantly telling you to vote, if they didn't know their audience is young Democratic voters.

Sorry to be obvious, but it's annoying how many times I've seen this on sites that know their demographic. 

Telling people to vote is not inherently a good thing, if someone has no idea what's going on, they shouldn't vote!",whatisthishere,e96vat9,conservative
"I don’t care who, I’m only condescendingly implying you should vote Democrat.",Skarp1214,e97gh1t,conservative
I certainly voted. I also watched the voting machine change my vote to democratic candidates. Had to change them back.,Theogyrros,e96ycsx,conservative
"More like “Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat, Go vote Democrat” 


I’m basically just shy of socialist liberal and reddit has been irritating the last week. Is the election finally over so I can watch all the liberal tears? I know the democrats lost, for sure. I keep on telling the SJWs that they’re literally the reason the liberals have no chance. Then I get downvoted to hell and called an incel. ",Prawph,e97d7ti,conservative
Thanks for making me laugh out loud in my night class,Astronopolis,e978k2i,conservative
Thanks for laughing along with us! We may disagree but we can agree that some politics is hilarious,awesomemangoes,e97i9oq,conservative
I was figuratively laughing my ass off when I saw this,VaultDweller108,e98375z,conservative
Because 1.6k upvotes make it to front page? And it’s an Election Day so political subs are really active right now.,Nerzana,e97nrbx,conservative
We ARE poor peasants.,Faex_Vitae,e98edde,conservative
"Yuuuuuuup. They’re in here downvoting, too, haha. ",skarface6,e96k3lo,conservative
I’m funny and I found this pretty liberal ,IsLoveTheTruth,e97ftmh,conservative
Unity? Talk to democrats about that. You don't get to call for unity in the last 5 minutes because of Trump when for the past 50 years Democrats have been labeling Republicans as evil racist bigot whatever-ists. Do you think that hasn't been divisive? It has. Not to mention that this is just a joke. It's not rude or offensive. It's a joke. Conservatives are allowed to make jokes. ,noiwontsharemyfries,e96wfgq,conservative
"Funny, when I say things like this in any liberal subreddit, I get called a nazi. ",Jayttt98,e973h7u,conservative
"No hate, but I hope you realize if I went over to r/""politics"" saying what you said (but about Republicans) I would be downvoted, threatened, DM'd threats, and probably deleted. Really unfair you come here preaching civility when we never get that treatment in boards that are meant to be unbiased politics. ",SaddBunni,e972n75,conservative
So pwned that we flipped the House,parapup,e97oy8h,conservative
Libtards rekt epik style 😎,juhotuho10,e983qkj,conservative
ben shapiro wants to know your location,SomeFruit,e98ajzo,conservative
Who was that libtard? As expected happened...,TimeTackle,e97nkcn,conservative
No kidding every time I visit the VA they always have cnn on. Probably to get everyone all worked up. ,glockedup1,e96i79m,conservative
"Airports are a large portion of CNN's viewership. And the still routinely lag behind in ratings, falling below channels like Nickelodeon and History Channel, which is great. I wish the ""news"" networks would all fall way down the list of content we consume. I wish I could go back to the world were I watched History Channel and the like more than I paid attention to the ""news.""",rheajr86,e96vcqc,conservative
They have CNN international? As in an American newservice that streams information about current events in our country to the world?,Steelquill,e97522p,conservative
"I agree.  I travel a bit in the midwest for work to conferences and training meetings and all the hotels, etc., have CNN propaganda on.  People eat up that fake biased garbage.",Conservativeone,e975hd7,conservative
[removed],,e97qluv,conservative
Nothing wrong with this.  Dems don't take guns.,touch0ph,e9744o0,conservative
Where? I haven't seen anything. ,zgh5002,e96v82g,conservative
"They want the orange man to be the one in control of all of the guns, smart.",rheajr86,e96vhz8,conservative
They've been all over r/Christianity too. Bunch get into arguments with myself and others over trivial stuff. ,KumonRoguing,e9700ku,conservative
"Right? There was one thread that was filled with a bunch of leftists that had never posted in that sub before, talking about how the Dems were actually the ones that supported gun rights. It was super bizarre ",LumpyWumpus,e96zuac,conservative
"Now they're saying ""the blue wave was taking the house""

Oh. Really. That's what it was, eh? /JBP",Themusician67,e97kn56,conservative
"I do not think any of you give shit, and furthermore... I don’t care.",Clatsop,e98rkko,conservative
We’re aware you care about nothing but yourselves.,Lustan,e98k0zp,conservative
"you gave a shit by replying to this post negatively .  meaning this pisses you off, meaning your in its demographic, stop being counter intuitive you npc.

&#x200B;",owl_electronics,e98rf8f,conservative
It's Rita repulsive,GottaPewp,e96j7wu,conservative
Yah op is being scorpin-sensitive...,Jbocajs,e96nvdm,conservative
This entire comment chain makes me smile as a lifelong Power Rangers fan.,Steelquill,e9758ek,conservative
" Why don’t you try that out, and see how it works out for you?",Clatsop,e97ziv2,conservative
[removed],,e97e6yd,conservative
See what I mean? This sub is being brigaded. Its obvious. ,Themusician67,e98gdlz,conservative
"Wait....

It isn’t???",kotov9syndrome,e97e21h,conservative
Really seems like this sub is being brigaded because wow....,Themusician67,e98g6ez,conservative
*cough* blue majority *cough*,Issyboy99,e97skzl,conservative
You can probably do this with Sony Vegas and Photoshop ,sulkybee,e98bca0,conservative
Of this ? It's from mighty Morphin power Rangers haha,Familiarwobble17,e96yg5d,conservative
In that case it doesn’t surprise me that the #1 and #2 most controversial posts of all time are apologies from the reddit mods. ,Sentient2X,e9c1w6m,conservative
That makes no sense,ShadeBabez,e97uzi3,conservative
Even reddit. There is no place left on the internet that isn't all about the elections and identity politics.,LazyRefrigerator7,e96v4eg,conservative
“Stop! You’re voting the wrong way!” ,Valashv2,e973vvc,conservative
If they thought people would vote Republican they wouldn't be telling them to vote.,noiwontsharemyfries,e96wq0p,conservative
"Just because someone is younger than you does not make them ignorant.

Frankly, you admitting that you would prefer for some people not vote is abhorrent. 

",lolapops,e977rmc,conservative
And that’s why they’re saying to vote democrat even if you have no idea who they even are ,lamahorseradish,e974370,conservative
[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=07wuZ3EWMAA](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=07wuZ3EWMAA),TheComedianGLP,e96w4dm,conservative
Are there any social media platforms with a predominantly conservative audience?,LavaS_,e97a9hw,conservative
Report that shit.,noiwontsharemyfries,e96znmm,conservative
Wow really? What state?,Grond19,e96yn9e,conservative
"I am not sure my solid political views as of yet, but would you mind defining social justice warrior from your perspective? Out of curiosity.",ambann15,e98atep,conservative
Fr I wish I had made time for Halloween to go as an npc. This shit is like my Yankee Doodle,pup_butt,e98b6vp,conservative
You don’t need to say figuratively it’s really not that important. Just say literally.,Sentient2X,e9c1zg7,conservative
"It’s not just been on Election Day, this subreddit consistently appears on the popular tab for some reason?? Kind of sick of it tbh is there a way to hide certain subreddits? ",Adderex,e97vetn,conservative
I have karma to spare :P,PerrisBueller,e96kej0,conservative
"Mommy is out of hot pockets, they are bored. What kind of loser spends time downvoting on subs they hate?",BenStillerPhaggot72,e96q7qp,conservative
Like everyday as well ,DancingDinos,e96vdq9,conservative
I’m adopted,pearsnic000,e97n1gs,conservative
"Hi, funny.",nobleduck,e97rv8p,conservative
"Hi friend. I call for unity all the time, not just right now. 

I push back against anyone (liberal, conservative, and other) who labels people and calls them names in an effort to dehumanize them and disregard their opinions. 

I understand this post is a joke, and I'm not offended by it. I just hope that after you're done laughing at the joke, you can go shake the hand of the person behind you that voted for the ""other side"" and tell them to have a great day.",Spaghetti__Policy,e96wog0,conservative
"So basically what your saying is that when other people label you something negative they should be held accountable, but when you label others negatively we should all let it slide because it’s just a joke. Gotcha. ",PhilosoR4PT0R,e970swb,conservative
I don't see anything like that in your comment history. ,touch0ph,e973uiz,conservative
The thing is that’s definitely not true ,stevebigpantsjobs,e974bce,conservative
"L: <civility>  
C:  ""But...""",Mattias44,e973d0j,conservative
It takes a strong person to stand up for what they believe in.,touch0ph,e973zi0,conservative
It's a pretty sucky little situation.,CoffeeGopher,e973qn2,conservative
Hahaha you lost the senate.  Where’s that blue wave fam?,Cap1fordays,e97x6bb,conservative
Gotta make sure the older vets have their heart rate up.,skarface6,e96k2pu,conservative
History Channel now days is so sad. ,KumonRoguing,e96zyrj,conservative
"Speaking as a non-American: A lot of us believe CNN to be the American equivalent of the BBC (I.e. state news channel). Recent years have probably seen people move away from that idea if they've heard anything about Trump's feud with CNN/Media, but I certainly grew up with and it didn't seem odd. Three-letter name (BBC, NOS, ZDF, ARD), 'neutral' compared to the 'political' channels (FOX/NBC), and spends a lot of time trying to come across as neutral - although lately that's been less and less true.",MissionBreakfast,e97uv15,conservative
Are you saying you’ve never heard a Dem talk about establishing bans on assault weapons?  Because I’ve heard many Democrat talking heads say they are for preventing the sale of assault weapons like the AR15 to the general public.  Sure Trump mentions we should think about adding restrictions but he doesn’t mention flat out bans that Democrats like Stacy Abrams (who lost) mentioned.  Hillary Clinton even mentioned that programs like the Australian buyback could be something she’d think about in regards to banning types of weapons.  And Dem’s and liberal media bring up assault weapon bans very regularly.,Lustan,e98jxxn,conservative
"Depends on what you mean by “take”. If by take you mean severely restrict, alter, or prohibit the sale of, then they sure as shit take your guns. Try buying any handgun produced after 2010 in California. Also “high capacity” magazines are restricted.

That’s gun grabbing.",Smitty7712,e974w5d,conservative
Yeah I had to unsub from there a while back because I got tired of hearing why God hates orange man. ,Justicar_Vindex,e9722wk,conservative
">Socialists love guns! We need them to overthrow the government and enact our communistic utopia!

-Useful Idiots",DAmbro8,e974kix,conservative
Mueller's not going away now.,thethirdrayvecchio,e97rmu2,conservative
"I mean, yeah, that’s what it always was. I guess I dont really understand your comment, fivethirtyeight and most political commentators have been saying that for a few months now it’s not a new take at all ",tlorey823,e97nxng,conservative
"Since like 2016, that was the plan....get the house. We have known who was up for election for 2 years...",TimeTackle,e97ni5r,conservative
Then you look back at the 2010 election 😂,montairemax,e97oivw,conservative
At least there's no temper tantrum yet,Zeppelin415,e98jvct,conservative
That's some hot tea ,Thatoneguy567576,e98roxp,conservative
Mmmm no ,Thatoneguy567576,e98kfeg,conservative
"I mean I did say it's hilarious, which isn't really negative. And you sound like Katsuki Bakugou calling me an NPC lmao. Also you're* ",Thatoneguy567576,e98rlkh,conservative
If I could give this Goldar I would,haplogreenleaf,e96k4qh,conservative
"So you saw the NPC meme being posted and came in here with ""You post on /r/the_Donald?""",Zeppelin415,e97f6ux,conservative
Wow sick burn.,WhiteeFisk,e97gcin,conservative
Edgy....,Themusician67,e97ko7e,conservative
Abortion ,axdrop12,e985eso,conservative
He says in a sub dedicated to identity politics. Lol.,BrokenByLight,e977ft7,conservative
Fuck identity politics with a 15’ pole. ,Dioroxic,e96ww0k,conservative
"I opened discord and it gave me a damn notification for voting...

IM NOT OLD ENOUGH TO VOTE YET LEAVE ME ALONEEE.",JingyBreadMan,e96wn1m,conservative
i mean i can’t make you love your country ,oneordinaryosprey,e97omf4,conservative
That's why I kinda enjoy them telling me to vote... especially now that my state stayed red. ,Mewster1818,e982arn,conservative
"If someone is ignorant, and they don't even care, why would you try to get them to vote?

Obviously, I shouldn't vote on my own local city council affairs if I'm ignorant, and don't care.  What am I voting on, whether I like the person's name?

Don't vote for someone just because it says, Republican/Democrat John Smith.

Edit: If someone doesn't know who the governor is, who their senators are, etc, don't tell them to vote.

I can think of countless examples where I shouldn't vote, because I'm ignorant.",whatisthishere,e97b6zm,conservative
"If today was when they voted for the local mayor, sheriff, whatever.  I know nothing about that, I shouldn't be told to vote.  It would be the same as taking a 5 year old to the voting booth, and saying it's just important that you vote, and the child is marking things with no comprehension.",whatisthishere,e97c0lp,conservative
"Honestly, I can't think of anything that compares to Facebook, Reddit, Youtube, etc, that is right leaning.

Obviously, Fox News is telling people to vote, like CNN and MSNBC, but that's appropriate, they are news platforms.

This is like if your Nintendo video game system was telling you to vote.  It's obvious what they are doing.  It's a young demographic, and that isn't their business.",whatisthishere,e97d01o,conservative
Already did.,Theogyrros,e96zxh6,conservative
South Carolina,Theogyrros,e96yyzm,conservative
"If I make a joke, that is obviously a joke, and you get offended. You might be an SJW. 


I’m all for equality. However, SJWs don’t want equality. They want white people to have their rights stripped away until they’re on the same level as minorities. They literally want to punish white people. This mindset is what is causing such a backlash and getting regressive republicans voted in. They repress the majority, they shouldn’t be surprised when the majority push back. ",Prawph,e98czqz,conservative
I don’t understand why you seem puzzled about this. It’s appearing on popular tab because it’s popular.,Clatsop,e97zcbs,conservative
hurr durr ,kuddav2,e9863kk,conservative
"I hear that. It’s balancing out a bit, now. ",skarface6,e96mtu1,conservative
I'm saving up Karma in Askreddit specifically so I can tell people what's up for the general election. ,GladysCravesRitz,e971nbq,conservative
Every now and then I will read comments on politics and dislike the ones I really really dislike. But I don’t do it much.,ksferg,e96sgtj,conservative
"You know exactly the kind of loser.

Soyboi, check.

Manbun, check

Che shirt, check

Studing Toxic Masculinity at Dipshit U, check

Cried at Hillary's most recent ass-whipping, check",TheComedianGLP,e96w8cy,conservative
No idea. Probably SJWs.,skarface6,e96vt5x,conservative
Yup. Especially when they’re fired up over something dumb. ,skarface6,e96vu2e,conservative
"Cheers mate. I work with a ton of young folks (I am also young). Almost all my friends are liberals. Those who respect my views are my friends. Those that call me an idiot I shy away from. We need to be able to discuss ideas openly.

That being said, censorship is almost always against my views and not theirs. I’m not willing to voice my opinions at work but they have stickers on their laptops showing their views off to the world. I think that’s definitely unfair but unfortunately it’s the current cultural climate. ",DrudgeBreitbart,e96yl8a,conservative
"Pointing out the reality of what the left is doing is not dehumanizing. 

Disagreeing with an opinion or disapproving of it is not disregarding it.

Ask any conservative on here and I bet we'll all have at least 5 friends/acquaintances we speak with regularly who don't share our political values. Ask someone on r/politics and I bet they won't. ",noiwontsharemyfries,e96ysmf,conservative
[deleted],,e96x042,conservative
"You are comparing being called NPC, to being called racist, nazi, ect... ok, gotcha. ",SaddBunni,e979vey,conservative
Being labeled a character from power rangers isn’t quite the same as being called racist.,kurlybird,e97a1gi,conservative
Go back a little while. It’s there. Also feel free to look at the entire political humor subreddit. They recently made a post portraying republicans as nazis. ,Jayttt98,e975n7o,conservative
Yes it is,ALuckyManNamedTrent,e975shz,conservative
Yes it is. Why brigade our sub? You already have the whole politics sub to post freely in. ,SaddBunni,e974wkf,conservative
What is your point? :/,SaddBunni,e973vv7,conservative
Nobody thought we would win the Senate. The field massively favored Republicans. Things look better for Democrats there in 2020.,tropo,e982z4p,conservative
"Taking over the House and starting to subpoena people soon, fam. ",parapup,e98orvu,conservative
What i meant was I miss the days when I didn't care so much about the day to day bullcrap and scandals and tv was just entertaining and I watched the local nightly news. There is way to much crap that doesn't really matter that both sides drum up everyday and we as a nation are to invested in the mud they sling.,rheajr86,e97hv8w,conservative
No.  I've heard it.  You've heard it.  It's just talk and not policy or actionable law.    That's it.  Dems don't take guns.   I can't put any simpler than that. People can and should have discussions and have it go nowhere actionable.,touch0ph,e98km8i,conservative
"We're going to have a hard time communicating if we can't agree on what words mean.  Dems don't take guns.  Period end of story.  Not happening, hasn't happened and won't happen.   No evidence of a gun grab.  It's a made up fantasy.

You can still get handguns in CA.  

https://www.google.com/search?rlz=1CDGOYI_enUS631US632&hl=en-US&ei=n0DiW-6BH8jejwSjgYfQCA&ins=false&q=grab+definition&oq=grab+def&gs_l=mobile-gws-wiz-serp.1.0.0l4j0i22i30.4666.5197..6003...0.0..2.452.1034.1j1j0j1j1......0....1.........0i71j0i67.Bs6z4QfhnkA",touch0ph,e975ge9,conservative
"Speaking as a Christian, same.",Steelquill,e9756cz,conservative
Why the fuck am I being down voted? Did they follow me? ,KumonRoguing,e976te9,conservative
"Holy downvotes obviously my comment was misunderstood. The polls were suggesting they would win the house. 

Not that ""winning the house is the blue wave"" 

Do you guys really think there was a blue wave last night?",Themusician67,e983bwp,conservative
"So that was the blue wave the whole time...? 

Thats what they were talking about? Or was the ""blue wave"" supposed to be ""flipping both houses""?",Themusician67,e983dvx,conservative
"Don't understand what that has to do with democrats shouted blue wave for a year or so. 


A slim margin in the house does not say ""blue wave"" to me. ",Themusician67,e983g4y,conservative
shit dude im sorry for saying that shit its been a long day and i havent heard sarcasm in awhile.,owl_electronics,e9awn21,conservative
And following Hillary Clinton’s example.,Youdidntbuildthat1,e988j5u,conservative
">  a sub dedicated to identity politics

I think you're lost buddy. This isn't /r/politics.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97zs4p,conservative
pathetic.,oneordinaryosprey,e97on36,conservative
Congrats!,noiwontsharemyfries,e99e14j,conservative
"I got what you're saying, bud. Your words are not lost on those who know how to understand. Preach on, brother...",BlizurdWizerd,e97kltb,conservative
Examples where you SHOULDNT vote. Implying that you did anyways. Yet you’re calling other ignorant and deciding they have no right to vote. ,Prawph,e97dfwe,conservative
"Why you so stupid?

If you need help learning about some important issues, I'm willing to help. It might seem like a challenge to learn more about your local elections, but just being curious and open minded is a start. You don't have to remain ignorant.",lolapops,e97ddrh,conservative
"That’s factually untrue. Both parties have some fairly open platforms. Generally, liberals value funding social programs, more regulation of business and socially forward ideals(lgbt rights). Generally republicans value defunding social programs, decreasing regulation on business and potentially regressive ideals with regards to gay rights and birth control access. 


There’s obviously a huge cross section of people that land in the middle any any one of numerous issues but these are typically the huge talking points right now. Any adult can vote with limited info based on their own moral standing. ",Prawph,e97ds45,conservative
Thanks for your input on your opinion. I’m open to all opinions I’m not offended. There’s too large of a divide I feel and it’s hard to navigate.,ambann15,e98ducs,conservative
"It’s not though, currently there’s 195 current posts with higher “hotter” upvote count 


This shouldn’t be anywhere near top with only 1.7k upvotes ",Loplopool,e988bh4,conservative
[removed],,e96xal5,conservative
"Hmm so let’s see, what are the implications of you calling Democrats NPCs. You’re saying that they are brainwashed by an ideology, can’t think for themselves, and blindly follow orders? Sounds oddly familiar. . . ",PhilosoR4PT0R,e97g4tg,conservative
"Not brigading, just checking it out on election night and feel a need to defend against bullshit. ",stevebigpantsjobs,e97579m,conservative
"Out of curiosity, what do you believe the second amendment was ratified for?",Smitty7712,e975sa9,conservative
"But a lot of handguns are restricted. Some you cannot get at all. And the gun grabbers still want more restrictions.

",memberrysmoothie,e978fzq,conservative
Guess liberal God heard you were talking shit. ,Justicar_Vindex,e97k5ze,conservative
"I think people are reacting to the more general conservative sentiment that “democrats ONLY won the house” as if that’s some kind of unexpected victory for the GOP. I don’t think it was a full wave because a lot of rural areas that were expected to be republican didn’t flip, but it wasn’t a bad night for Democrats at all ",tlorey823,e98arey,conservative
The blie wave was never about the senate. The senate has favoured republicans for a while.,RedstoneJunkyard,e98am0s,conservative
"They talk about a blue wave and all that happened was they won house majority by a few seats. They lost senate seats too. Back in 2010 which was 2 years after obama came to office the democrats lost 63 seats in house, 6 seats in (edit: Senate) and many governorships ",montairemax,e98g4l5,conservative
"You guys are just as bad, confirming what you want to hear.",BrokenByLight,e98aluq,conservative
"No, I said I wouldn't vote on those things I don't know about.  Today I wasn't voting on my local Sheriff or Mayor, I don't even know when those elections would be.

Today I voted on people I've been learning about for months.

Again, it's absurd for you to say, ""no right to vote.""  I clearly said if someone is ignorant and they don't care, don't tell them to vote.

Arguing this makes it sound like you want the ignorant and people who don't care to vote for your side.",whatisthishere,e97duzm,conservative
"> Yet you’re calling other ignorant and deciding they have no right to vote.

Nobody said anything even close to that, you magnificent retard.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97zuxx,conservative
"No argument?

It's a humorous comparison, but commenting when you have nothing to say is probably also a bad idea.

Edit: Guy above me edited his comment.",whatisthishere,e97dmof,conservative
"Lol, it's impossible for what I said to be ""factually untrue,""  I didn't state a fact or anything, but whatever...  

I get what you mean, but in that situation you can just lie.  If someone is completely ignorant, you can just say, you like gay people right?  Yeah, like your cousin, if you don't vote for the person with a (D) next to their name, they are going to hurt your cousin.  Go vote.

The original point was trying to convince people to vote on election day.  If someone is oblivious that this is election day, it's most likely that they don't know what's going on politically.  I don't want to vote on things I know nothing about, it's an obvious principle, it doesn't matter who it is.",whatisthishere,e97fqr4,conservative
"I think the concern is the fact you have to have an account to “push back”,  isn’t  that telling?
I appreciate what you’re trying to do, but the past couple of years there is no attempt at unity, you either are liberal or “have no heart, racist, bigot,  and selfish. I’m honestly tired of having to explain my point to people who have no desire to listen. 

Edit: I appreciate you going out on a limb, however. Have a nice rest of your evening.",non_felon,e96ygvu,conservative
Funny I said the same thing on /r/politics and got down voted like no tomorrow.. Republican propaganda!!,-Nok,e974j74,conservative
">However kindness begets kindness.

It absolutely does not, especially when it comes to the left. You must have noticed that over the past 10 years if not longer. 

I'm glad you're here interacting with people, and I'm glad you voted for one republican, but please, don't act like the majority of incivility hasn't been on the left, because it most certainly has. ",noiwontsharemyfries,e96z1gq,conservative
You prove the point that the left is a bunch of triggered snowflakes offended by a fucking meme. Grow up child. ,SaddBunni,e97ha11,conservative
"It's not bullshit, that sub is one opinion only. I'll give you a example, during the Kavanaugh hearing there was a complete refusal to view the trial with the facts at hand. I was downvoted and insulted for disagreeing with them. Now women are coming forward that they LIED, tons of evidence against Ford... but they are silent on the matter. ",SaddBunni,e977ycx,conservative
https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/second_amendment,touch0ph,e976j12,conservative
"I understand that. But that is self evident is it not? It wasn't a blue wave. But it also wasn't a bad night for them either. 

Its like everyone literally needs to hear some sort of disclaim every time someone says something. 


If i didn't say ""the democrats lost big"", ""the democrats got stomped"", or ""there was a red wave"" 

Then that's not what I mean... I mean exactly what i said. It wasn't a blue wave, and they moved the goal post in regards to what the blue wave actually was taking about. 

The blue wave was about flipping both houses. It was NOT in their minds, winning the house of reps with only a 26 seat majority... 


Do they have subpoena power? Sure. Will they be a little tougher to deal with? Absolutely. 

But their blue wave theory failed...",Themusician67,e98c8qc,conservative
"You really think when they said ""blue wave"" they ment ""flipping the house with a slim majority""?

Is that what the DNC expected internally? Sure. Probably. But when they said ""blue wave"" it of course meant both houses, and a larger majority than they have now in the house. ",Themusician67,e98ci20,conservative
A voice of reason. Thank you so much. ,Themusician67,e98i1uz,conservative
I would prefer people get educated and vote. However. Both parties have fairly clear lines of moral and financial platforms. It’s fairly easy to take a cursory glance at any of these people and decide which party aligns closer to your beliefs. ,Prawph,e97edha,conservative
"He literally said people shouldn’t be allowed to vote if they don’t research the candidates. 


Pretty sure that’s fairly close to the quote. I know reading is difficult since republicans are defunding education and you never learned. However, it’s best to keep your mouth shut in those cases, you magnificent retard. ",Prawph,e981iu7,conservative
"I don't like to argue with people like you. You're narrow minded. You think liberal/conservative are the only two positions.

You actively encourage people not to vote, assuming ignorance when you are the only one in the debate displaying it.

I think you shouldn't vote. I think you are too ignorant to deserve a voice. Your opinion is limited, and your mind small, and we don't want or need you stumbling around a voting booth or a jury box.

",lolapops,e97e5pz,conservative
"I think the majority of incivility as been from those who are uncivil. I've been to rallies, peaceful demonstrations from both sides. Every group has members who are louder and less civil than the rest of the group, and all too often we apply the feelings we have towards those people on everyone else in that group. 
",Spaghetti__Policy,e96ze01,conservative
LMAO thanks for the input,PhilosoR4PT0R,e97i8pd,conservative
Id love a source for the claim that women lied and theres tons of evidence against ford,Mescallan,e97b8wd,conservative
"https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/District_of_Columbia_v._Heller

Yep. We wouldn’t get along on this issue, even if we tried. The collectivists theory ignores or runs counter to everything the founders stood for.",Smitty7712,e9778kx,conservative
"Honestly it’s more complicated than that. I’ve been reading some articles this morning and it seems to me like this is just one of those things that people are reading into based on what they already believed. I agree it wasn’t a huge democratic blowout, but there are people saying it was essentially a victory for republicans. The theory that I heard that seems the most fair to me so far is that the popular vote went for the Democrats, so the blue wave theory wasn’t wrong, but there were all sorts of reasons why that didn’t translate into seats like they had hoped. Idk though, I guess a blue win, but like, a medium-ish sized blue win instead of a blowout seems to be the way to think about it? ",tlorey823,e98dx42,conservative
"Yes, i do believe it was just about the house. I dont think I met anyone who was confident about flipping the senate. Shit, many people werent even sure that the house would flip.",RedstoneJunkyard,e98edkn,conservative
"That's arguable.  If you're in Ohio, pick a state, you probably shouldn't just vote Republican because you like Trump.  If you're in Florida, you don't vote Democrat, because you like Obama.",whatisthishere,e97ew88,conservative
"> He literally said people shouldn’t be allowed to vote if they don’t research the candidates.

No.

> Pretty sure that’s fairly close to the quote.

No. ",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e981ydp,conservative
"You sound very open minded.

That's interesting though, you don't think I should vote.  Hmm... quite a logical conundrum your argument has spun.",whatisthishere,e97eke7,conservative
"You're being dishonest. There are incivility and civility on both sides but there is definitely more incivility on the left. Your refusal to acknowledge this simple fact is disappointing. 

Have a nice day!",noiwontsharemyfries,e96zmam,conservative
"Thanks for the salty tears, yummy. 😚",SaddBunni,e9800ew,conservative
"I'll give a nice summary darling
https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2018/11/05/brett-kavanaugh-allegations-report/1889770002/",SaddBunni,e97i2jf,conservative
[removed],,e97d4o3,conservative
"We don't have to get along on the issue because there is no issue.  You can go to a gun store tomorrow and buy a gun.  It's legal to have firearms.  There are some states where you may have to wait a few days.  

I have no idea what you are trying to argue other than you can get whatever gun you want precisely when you want it.  You provided a link to a supreme Court decision from 2008 but that has nothing to do with why the 2nd amendment was created the first place - which what you asked for.  ",touch0ph,e978pyo,conservative
"That's not what im saying. At all. This lends to my point about my having to have a disclaimer for something couldn't have possibly been my argument.

And yes i agree. The dems flipped a house. They got 7 govs elected. But the blue wave is absolutely a trickle. With as much money as They spent. With the effort they put into it, they were hoping for much better than what they got. ",Themusician67,e98ewzz,conservative
"That's not how they spun it in the media for like 2 years....... Do they (the DNC) know what this actually was? Of course they do. Are they lying when they say ""this is what we meant the whole two years we screamed blue wave?"" Of course they are. ",Themusician67,e98el4e,conservative
Voter suppression doesn't seem like a good idea if it's your voice being silenced. Does it?,lolapops,e97f6v7,conservative
"I hope you have a great night as well, friend :)",Spaghetti__Policy,e96zn9b,conservative
Must be a nice change from gargling daddy Trumps ball brew lol,PhilosoR4PT0R,e986zz8,conservative
"No need to be condescending, i haven't been in the states all year, it's hard to keep up with everything ",Mescallan,e97p8h4,conservative
"You argued the collectivist argument. I gave you a Supreme Court decision saying that it was an individual right.

The difference is that I believe the second amendment is intended to prevent government tyranny by giving the people the means to resist said tyranny in the instance it arises (because the founders knew the republic would be tested eventually). This would mean the tools for resistance should be comparable to that of the federal “regulars”/troops. Therefore, firearm feature restrictions explicitly to “demilitarize” the firearm are restrictive to the objectives of the amendment.",Smitty7712,e979h6r,conservative
"Everyone’s always hoping for more than what they get though. I think it’s silly to try and diminish the gains — this is a game changer in terms of how our politics look going forward, and from the Democrats perspective overall, a w is a w and they got what they paid for here ",tlorey823,e98hjrz,conservative
"I didnt even talk about the DNC. Stop asking questions and answering them yourself, you look silly.",RedstoneJunkyard,e98fbe2,conservative
"Lol, no one is suggesting such a thing, actually only you against me.

If you were telling me to vote for my local sheriff, I would say, ""no, I don't know anything about that.""

No one is stopping me from voting, but I shouldn't be encouraged to ignorantly vote on something.

",whatisthishere,e97gf8h,conservative
"I apologize, I thought you were the original poster talking to me.  ",SaddBunni,e9802b1,conservative
"Yet you vote for a guy that openly states he should retain power over the government...


https://www.google.ca/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2018/03/05/politics/donald-trump-xi-jinping-analysis/index.html


If you’re so worried about tyrannical government. Why do you vote for a guy that openly worships them and flatly says they’re doing it right? Seems a little hypocritical if you ask me. ",Prawph,e97e9bq,conservative
"Im not diminishing the gains. Wow. Ok never mind guys. Blue wave successful, how could republicans have let that happen? The dems won so huge it was amazing. Biggly. ",Themusician67,e98hp7i,conservative
"This whole thing is silly. Seriously. People are assuming my point is something that it isn't. 

People outside of the DNC and pollsters expected both houses to flip when they thought ""blue wave."" That's the bottom line. ",Themusician67,e98fgyf,conservative
"You moron, I'm encouraging you to learn.

Sorry for calling you an idiot. My finger slipped.",lolapops,e97gvl3,conservative
It was obviously a joke.  And he knew and intended to raise eyebrows with npc’s with that comment.,Lustan,e98ibjf,conservative
"You seem pretty upset, I didn’t mean to like attack you or anything. I’ve just been trying to share my perspective :/ ",tlorey823,e98hvxv,conservative
"Wrong. Realistically, people thought that the dems would take the house. They did. They also got control of several governorships and state governments. The reps did better in the senate.

There’s no “bottom line”. Realistically neither of us have survey data to back our claims up.

I personally believe there was a blue wave. The dems took the house and several state governments. I wasnt gonna get my hopes up for much more.",RedstoneJunkyard,e98gx1u,conservative
"I feel no anger from anything you said, and I think you are being more mean and insulting than me.

What often causes anger and name calling is cognitive dissonance.

At this moment I think you wish every American in the country voted, I think it's good that informed people and those who care a lot have more motivation to vote, and that's actually better.  I think it would be less good if it was illegal to not vote, because then people would be forced to vote on things they don't care about, and don't know about.  That's a pretty common argument.  You're just calling me stupid, but intellectuals discuss this all the time.",whatisthishere,e97hhwx,conservative
"I was being sarcastic.... Not upset. 

Although i really can't see how saying ""the blue wave didn't happen"" is the same as ""diminishing their gains"" 


Im not saying they didn't win a house. Im saying it didn't happen like they hyped, and it will be spun like it was... Which is what's happening everywhere. ",Themusician67,e98icme,conservative
"Ok sorry i said some thing. The dems won big last night. Blue wave success. Huge win for dems last night. Referendum on trump successful, and is a major telling as to what will happen in 2020. 

Good job on that blue wave dems. ",Themusician67,e98htne,conservative
Let's just remember that almost 50% of Floridians voted for a capitalist hating candidate for governor.  I would love to know what effect all those transplants fleeing tax and spend north east states actually voted for gilliam in their goal of fucking up another state just like they did up north.,optionhome,e97vij8,conservative
"We may have lost the House, but doing good everywhere else. Optimistic about 2020 now. ",GuitarWizard90,e97hca8,conservative
"as a Floridian all I can say is THANK GOD! but also, why the hell was it so close!? HE WANTED TO INSTITUTE A STATE INCOME TAX FFS.",McBonderson,e988748,conservative
"I am going to say it: Panhandle saved the day again!

Was listening to Mark Levin whip up his listeners in the panhandle to settle this thing (good job Levin surge!). Early results were looking bad, and it all came down to the panhandle.

And you living in the Panhandle delivered. Good job. You did this in spite of hurricane damage.

",Lepew1,e989h6x,conservative
He wasn’t monkeying around.,rojindahar,e97gmai,conservative
Glad I made it out to vote for Desantis today. Very optimistic about 2020. ,xJownage,e97j6r2,conservative
"My girlfriends parents moved from a high tax state to Florida *because* of the reduced cost of living yet supported Gilliam wholeheartedly.  
  
Like what the actual fuck is wrong with you? Why the hell would you move somewhere for relative benefits only to vote them away?  
  
Some people, man. ",OrwellianLiberty,e98hxb8,conservative
Media has brainwashed so many.,abuigues,e980i96,conservative
"This is the biggest threat to conservatives.  Sinema never would have sniffed the AZ seat 10 years ago, and now that race is still undecided.  O'Rourke was too close for comfort as well in Texas.  

Generally speaking, the nicest parts of the country are run by conservatives, and liberals flee the shitholes they've created to move in, but lack the self-awareness to realize the policies they support led to the aforementioned shithole, and they continue to vote the same way in their new state.  ",puddboy,e987jcv,conservative
Don't be too sure. Dems will be doing investigations out the ass now on trump. But trump will at least be able to do additional scotus nominations.,mysql101,e97jbgb,conservative
Let’s just hope the democrats keep putting their crazies out front and center. ,Username4418,e97hm81,conservative
"Cause he's Black,Cool,and speak well like one guy that we know and love",game46312,e988xbe,conservative
I don't know (I'm in in Orlando).  It took like two weeks for me to get my DeSantis yard sign after I ordered it. ,r4d4r_3n5,e98cxol,conservative
I can entirely confirm that. I've lived in Texas my whole life. The influx of California democrats over the past ten years is outstanding. ,Big_Joosh,e98l4yb,conservative
"Ahh yes, the nicest parts of the country are run by conservatives. Places like Alabama, Mississippi, Georgia, Tennessee, Arkansas, Oklahoma, Kansas, etc. Certainly the nicest best states in the country!",,e98suh4,conservative
Like Pelosi and Feinstein? :(,cbzdidit,e97htd0,conservative
Fuck Feinstein. I voted against that goddamn pos,BATTLECATSUPREME,e97raad,conservative
And Maxine Waters,Liberty_Pr1me,e9819h7,conservative
Same here ! She’s a real POS! ,cbzdidit,e97rmgu,conservative
"Play stupid games, win stupid prizes",mnslice,e98x1xm,conservative
Old news.  September special election.,HouseAtomic,e987ra2,conservative
"With Sessions out, I sincerely hope this administration considers rescheduling marijuana, at the very least. I'd prefer wholesale legalization but a step in the right direction (i.e. medical marijuana) would be good for society and the administration. Win-win.",GFZDW,e992aqa,conservative
Good and good. ,ConsistentlyRight,e991xn7,conservative
It was way too broad.,lax714,e98cfdj,conservative
There is hope for California. Republicans just need to focus on common sense economic issues and stay away from the divisive culture war topics,dtlv5813,e98esr5,conservative
"""Stop the Republicans, they're just blindly following Trump!""


*tells everyone to vote straight ticket Democrat without discretion*",JimboJehosephat,e95znrb,conservative
LOL. That's the Washington Post. Can they seriously try to claim they're neutral anymore?,AddictedToGlue,e966ovv,conservative
Don’t worry. r/politics is a place for unbiased discourse of us political events. 100% unbiased people! ,2Cor517,e96b55h,conservative
"Not a voter in the United States, but a conservative of sorts - very concerning to see these sorts of posts before election time. I cannot tell whether these posts get boosted because of whether reddit is left-leaning and it gains traction because of interaction, or whether they are paid for (is that even a possibility? - you'll have to excuse my ignorance on the matter.)

&#x200B;

It would be nice to just have a more balanced forum where people can actually come to conclusions without being told what to think. Yes, I sometimes kill time watching Fox clips and independent commentators on YouTube, but reddit is an absolute shit-show right now.",ATableForOnePlease,e95y75f,conservative
"They're certainly showing that they're the *loving, caring, and understanding* party in those vitriolic comments over there.

edit: I hope this is 2016 all over again. I really, really want to see a meltdown of the Left. They set themselves back so much when they *reeeeeeeeee* after an election doesn't go their way.",GFZDW,e9629cw,conservative
I want to know who gives gold to posts like that. ,Ruger34,e96623m,conservative
"Much like the major news outlets, they aren't even trying to hide the bias anymore.",Kemaro,e962qwg,conservative
"I voted for one Democrat today, but that was for the state auditor position. The current guy was exposed by our local newspaper when he literally didn’t show up for work for more than 2-3 hours per day for over a month. The Democrat’s campaign was basically, “I’ll show up for work and create online records.” Seemed reasonable to me. 🤷🏻‍♀️",kcl086,e96q8zl,conservative
It’s embarrassing that the sub’s name hasn’t been changed yet.,jeremy226,e96cgqp,conservative
Unsubscribed from that subreddit today. This is sickening. How is it even allowed to go on?,TravisKrooks,e95zywx,conservative
It’s disgusting how biased and partisan rpolitics is like Wtf I just want some news.i don’t want to Get  bombarded with reasons why there are 72 genders and  why trump is a racist like wtf.,ton2030,e968jjc,conservative
That’s nothing. I saw an post on r/Politics that said the only way republicans can win is if they cheat.,Carlitos96,e96f6m5,conservative
That bot is easily more reasonable than the entire rest of the sub.,theinfamousjosh,e96jlpb,conservative
Why the name of that sub is r/politics is beyond me. ,1994spaceodyssey,e96t1kz,conservative
aS A ReMiNDeR tHIs SuBRedDiT iS fOr CiViL dISCuSsiOn,Luke15g,e96ox6c,conservative
orange man bad ,kuddav2,e986cev,conservative
"I bet if you were to go in the megathread at /r/politics and post something like ""Get out and vote, everyone! As someone who voted Republican, I'm urging everyone -- Democrat and Republican -- to get out there and vote!"" it would be mass downvoted to -100 in the span of *seconds*.

Civility doesn't exist on /r/politics, and the way they've implemented their comment screening they've insured that only Democrat voices are heard on that sub.",weeaboo_swordsman,e96ibha,conservative
Not even sure I'm a conservative and seeing that and reading that subreddit makes me so exhausted that they don't realise their own echo chamber,mickeynguyen2611,e96jbjj,conservative
"To be fair, we do the same thing; the only difference is that we don't try to pretend that we're an independent sub.",unityrootts,e96lzje,conservative
"I’m getting my mom and sister to vote! Voting all Red! 

But too bad I live in NY. It sucks NYC isn’t separate from the state. ",Jokeri009,e963phe,conservative
"Man, I didn't get that in time, and did the exact opposite.",mlmack,e964sg7,conservative
"No doubt. What a ridiculous sub.
Welcome to Reddit. 😕

That said, what’s everyone thinking for projections? You think the Republicans will hold their ground?",CriticalCulture,e96ek0k,conservative
seems even handed and unambiguously neutral over there just like the sub's name would suggest,greatatdrinking,e96cark,conservative
"I'll actually not be voting straight republican because several positions are being run for by only democrats, a few of which are prolife. I'll be making sure they get my vote over their opponents. ",TaborlinTheGreater,e96neb4,conservative
"What do we do?
VOTE DEMOCRAT!

Why do we do it?
??",blind_mowing,e9796u7,conservative
And they say with 99.9% confidence reddit is not left leaning. HA ,alanpartridge69,e97kc4h,conservative
"But remember, they’re an “unbiased” sub ",AgentSkidMarks,e97sack,conservative
"r/politics is a joke. There is absolutely no civil discussion. Ask a question “how Trump is a racist”, or anything that makes you seem to have a difference in opinion and all the keyboard warriors will downvote you to oblivion.  ",jackthedrunk,e96lvo6,conservative
Orange man bad!,Gbcue,e96cz8p,conservative
Muh bipartisanship ,Lord_Grill,e96o5m5,conservative
"r/politics

As you vote against Republicans, remember to be nice to your Mom. 

Give her a hug when she drops you off at the polling place. 

;)",jade_crayon,e972dwb,conservative
It's always good to see quality and objective journalism coming out of a major Washington D.C. publication such as the Washington Post.,mattyice18,e96oyc2,conservative
"""tHiS sUbReDdIt iS fOr cIvIl dIsCuSsIoN.""",BrainEnema,e96w1nu,conservative
"It’s sad, that for the most part, I need to sort by controversial to find the opinions I agree with there.",MasterDoot,e96wctg,conservative
"Welp, I’ve been instantly convinced.",Floognoodle,e96zq7a,conservative
Watch out for the blue tears. These losers who think Reddit and Twitter actually are a good indicator of the real world. I’m sure they will get more violent after they realize they lost. ,biggestballz,e975flw,conservative
"The most bizarre line of thinking I've seen regarding this mid-term is the Democrats and Never Trumpers saying that conservatives should vote against the Republicans because they aren't holding the executive branch accountable. Why on Earth would I do that? I want the Republican controlled executive and legislative branches to work together to get stuff done (not that they really have much but I digress). ""Checks and balances"" means that our Constitution places specific limits on the powers each branch of government has, it doesn't mean that Congress and the President should be at constant war with each other. ",Trevor_awesome,e96n6b9,conservative
"You forgot to include the 10 stories complaining about Fox News anchors campaigning for Trump. Only the Washington Post, USA Today, etc. are allowed to do that. Fox News isn’t allowed.
",r777m,e96fm4v,conservative
Jesus fuck that's retarded. ,inFINN1te,e96bwaq,conservative
"This time, yes. But next time i'm going back to 3rd party",NuggestSoChrispy,e96yi59,conservative
So what happens when it's all democrats? We need a party system don't we. ,Mike072292,e972pyq,conservative
seems about right,Pro895YT,e97h8sv,conservative
"You know this was written by a conservative writer, right? ",isarealboy772,e97zgrj,conservative
"Just once I'd like to know what it's like to have 90% of the media pushing for my side. Just once I'd like to see what happens. I wonder if general media consumers would sway differently.

Another thing is I have never seen the media predict a big R win ahead of time.  They always make predictions favorable to Democrats and then they're right about 50% of the time. Just once I'd like to see them predict an R win so big that they end up being wrong in that direction. Just for giggles. Just to see what it's like.",aboardthegravyboat,e9833ni,conservative
"Reminder: this subreddit is for ""civil discussion"", it's not like we are polarized to the point where we're told to literally vote against every single candidate in the other party. Yikes.",goldrotmgonly,e98cebb,conservative
"Post any opinion that isn't one appealing to the highly dogmatic hivemind over there (even a moderate and reasonable one) and you get bombarded with personal insults and attacks.

It's actually the most vile sub I've posted to in terms of getting personally hateful replies. 

That mod message is a complete joke.",MenBearsPigs,e98g0ir,conservative
"That's funny, I feel the complete opposite!",NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96aytz,conservative
r/politics = I DELETED THEM,StephenScherer1,e96nb7a,conservative
"It just baffles me how a subreddit labeled “politics” can be so one sided. It’s as if I had a group about Religion, but only Hindus can post on it. And yet reddit refused to acknowledge their own bias. The only place where you can see conservative views are on subreddits dedicated specifically for conservative views. ",Rhexysexy,e96o4jy,conservative
"R/Politics -

Republicans are all evil NAZIs and beat women!

Please remember to be respectful and nice. 

",savedbyscience21,e96pav1,conservative
The usual liberal do as i say not as I do,PlayDatDoge,e96rjg8,conservative
Vote Democrats in to do WHAT exactly? Nothing? That's all they have been doing last 10+ years. ,Dutchtroll5,e96n3iw,conservative
"I did my part and voted republican.

  


Every thread I come across I let them know too.",Patches1313,e96pkj3,conservative
Reddit in general,mcpat21,e96pusc,conservative
I can't believe the logic with this. 10/10. Amazing.,littlecatladybird,e96twkh,conservative
"As a reminder, this subreddit is for *c i v i l d i s c u s s i o n*",PsychoticWalrus1,e96uvn8,conservative
"They're like zombies. Christ almighty.

",ModeratorsAreDouches,e96vkzi,conservative
I gave up trying to argue anymore or make sarcastic comments. Downvote and move on,eccary,e96ypy3,conservative
Just went and started downvoting posts until I couldn’t stand the crap on there. Started getting a headache ,Stalins_Uncle,e9706u3,conservative
"im gonna laugh if we still have a majority in the house and senate after this, democrats always think they have it in the bag, just lile the 2016 primarys they think they are untouchable and then they get beat and throw a temper tentrum screaming ""THE RUSSIANS DID IT WAAHHHHHH!!!😭😭😭😭""",ScreaminUgmoe,e971r5d,conservative
"“Civil discussion”


Most everything in r/politics is vile bigoted hated speech. ",Crawlarado,e9759z3,conservative
The worst of the worst. How are people still reading this drivel?,howdatasstaste,e97hv40,conservative
I've done my duty and went and down voted all liberal posts ,HaywoodJablomiMD,e96u4ts,conservative
Dude conservatives have the elections in a bag. Not worried how much hate the left brings to the table it only weakens them.,StruggleSnug69,e96vr3b,conservative
"But it's right. You traitorous assholes need to be destroyed, not just voted out.",Fascist-Jock-Itch,e97ne99,conservative
Reeeeeee,carrotriver,e96k20y,conservative
"I’ve been seeing a lot of posts both Democrat and republican today on the book of faces that say vote straight ticket and it scares me. Sometimes people run under republican or Democrat but are actually terrible humans like convicted felons, sometimes still incarcerated or pedophiles or something else completely not in line with the party ideals. ",thebop995,e96t7ib,conservative
Pretty sure NYT had the same headline,banebridge,e96w3r6,conservative
With all the eyes on FB maybe there should be more on Reddit’s blatant attempt at election influence.,xrudeboy420x,e96yxjy,conservative
"That’s cool how you get your screen black like that, saves battery. ",AwkardSeadorf,e97gihe,conservative
"They had a top post the other day from daily beast ""if Republicans win, they cheated""
",tehForce,e967236,conservative
"As a registered democrat, r/Politics can be a fucking shitshow. It's so bizzare. ",julianryan,e970hn8,conservative
This exchange just happened to me. ,GladysCravesRitz,e96it8v,conservative
"Well, there’s a difference.

Democrats don’t ‘circle the wagons’.  If a Dem does something reprehensible, the party will grill them and oust them.  Conversely, when a Repub does something shitty, the party will often double down in response to any criticism.

Like, can you imagine a world in which Brett Kavaugnha could have made the same case before the Senate as a Democratic candidate and still be confirmed for appointment to the highest court in the land?

I mean, one of my favorite bits was public sentiment on drone strikes.  When Obama was in office, something like 60% of Dems and 80% of Repubs were against drone strikes — now that Trump is ordering the same, it’s something like 60% of Dems and 20% of Repubs against drone strikes.  *That* sort of behavior is whence the “blind followership” talk arises.  When people hate Obamacare but like the ACA, what else *can* that be but blindness?

The argument isn’t “Blindly vote D so that the party can stop being held accountable”, but “Vote D so that a party that holds its members accountable can be in power.”

It’s not the same.",Introsium,e983a18,conservative
"Not really. Even their ""conservative"" columnist Jen Rubin has basically become a Democrat in the last few years",jaykyew,e96mfax,conservative
"Probably not.  It's weird too, because the leftists despise Bezos.",mlmack,e96a0tx,conservative
Look at the authors name.  You know Max Boot is conservative right? ,isarealboy772,e97zje1,conservative
It's just the opinion page.  ,IamIrene,e96po5l,conservative
"Don't forget ""for civil discussion.""",wrathfulsalt,e96s2nm,conservative
[deleted],,e98lkm3,conservative
Biased but honest. ,stevebigpantsjobs,e974gt8,conservative
"> whether they are paid for (is that even a possibility? - you'll have to excuse my ignorance on the matter.)

* [Reddit For Sale: How We Bought The Top Spot For $200](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6SAkUs3urrg)",DEYoungRepublicans,e9607za,conservative
">I cannot tell whether these posts get boosted because of whether reddit is left-leaning and it gains traction because of interaction, or whether they are paid for 

Reddit demographics lean towards a younger, multi-national crowd. Europeans and younger generations (18-30ish) tend to be more liberal.

So it's less the site itself being more liberal and more that they're users tend to lean more liberal.",Sideswipe0009,e96cett,conservative
I don’t think they claim that anymore. Now they claim “victory at all costs”.,justhere2havefun,e963kil,conservative
"They ***have*** to lose. And they have to ***keep*** losing until they finally look in the mirror and realize they went too far, take responsibility for it, and reinvent themselves with actual bonafide values that put this country first, and stop with the identity politics. That's what would be best for the nation right now.",_SkeletonJelly,e96qx86,conservative
Same. ,8K12,e96hxn1,conservative
"r/politics :

*Blah blah blah Republicans are bad blah blah blah*

*Gold x 15*",9cames03,e968bzk,conservative
Clinton staffers,Smitty7712,e9756az,conservative
That sub should be called r/BluestLeftestRepublicanHaters,JimboJehosephat,e962vxd,conservative
Well.. Half the mods are paid shills sooo....,guitmusic12,e960nk1,conservative
You only unsubbed today?,Zarlog_,e96oxfp,conservative
"When I first joined Reddit, I subbed to it hoping that there would be actual political conversation going on there.  Boy was I wrong... every single post is anti Trump or anti Conservative.  It's sickening how you can call yourself a straight political subreddit but have nothing but far left propaganda.",jshinny1,e96qzq2,conservative
Welcome to Reddit...,the-mighty-kc,e963pz8,conservative
[removed],,e96uwrm,conservative
"just like how they ""cheated"" in 2016 by inventing an ""electoral college"" so that trump would win... so sad </s>",madonna-boy,e96h7ob,conservative
That's gonna be the spin if Rs keep the house.,Terra_green2,e96kkz2,conservative
"Yeah but you guys got #walkaway Russian bots like me, we're the best bots!!! 😄",Terra_green2,e96ki7p,conservative
They're pushing politics?,slotrot,e975vkt,conservative
Sums it up.,Lepew1,e988xll,conservative
"Civility doesn’t exist in a lot of the vocal democrat party. It’s nothing but smear campaign after smear campaign, with insults sprinkled in. It’s sickening, really. I’ve not seen conservatives do this at all, and it’s really pushing me more and more conservative ",get-tilted,e97qoem,conservative
"Yeah but our sub name is not ""politics"" and goes around telling the whole sub we ""encourage civil discussion"". 

&#x200B;

We do encourage civil discussion (at least I hope we do) but our sub name is Conservative. Not ""politics"". ",xu_,e96q5yc,conservative
Don’t vote all red unless you agree wholeheartedly with each individual platform.  Otherwise you’re just as bad. ,panonarian,e971y5s,conservative
"> It sucks NYC isn't separate from the state.

I don't know about NY, but I know here in IL, we would without a doubt be all red if not for Chicago. Huge cities in otherwise rural states really shake things up. Not that Chicago or NYC are bad cities or the people are bad but the culture is just so different, at least here.


",littlecatladybird,e96ufvq,conservative
">You think the Republicans will hold their ground?

Yes. Not only hold the House, but gain in the Senate.

If after 2 years of nothing but REEEEEEEEEEEE from the left and they have anything resembling a victory; this county is lost. But I don't think it is. #walkaway is real. The jobs are real. The blue wave is a myth, manufactured by the media and latched on to by lefties. The way elected democrats and their supporters have acted the last 2 years, I can't imagine they have any support beyond the 18 year old know it all libs on r/politics. ",DaveThe_blank_,e96uuuz,conservative
To keep power in the hands of the Fed? ,Ledcookey,e97duiw,conservative
surely orange man not as bad as purport to be?,fireball3k,e96dp0e,conservative
"r/KillThoseWhoDisagree

But seriously, how exactly am I a traitor?",Man_With_A_Shoe,e97nfbw,conservative
Wow. Talk about hate speech.... and I thought we were supposed to be the bigots. Yikes. ,AgentSkidMarks,e97sbjf,conservative
"Look at this big guy and his huge six pack made entirely of reddit updoots, what a legend! Wish I could be half as tough on the internet as this absolute unit is.",Kryvakryz,e97w3um,conservative
"Really?

It’s just easier for me to read",Man_With_A_Shoe,e97gjp4,conservative
"At least they're admitting the possibility of defeat, though their excuse making is pathetic. ",JimboJehosephat,e967p3k,conservative
"I think most of them have no real conception of conservatism.  All their invocations of fear, phobias, hatred, and ""voter suppression"" tell me they don't understand the rational basis of conservatism.  They never bother to learn our first principles and how we go from there to policy.  Thus they don't believe that a plurality of voters which inevitably includes normal people can go for it.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e96pzyu,conservative
"Oh man I need to see this one.

edit: found it: https://np.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9ucyr2/if_the_republicans_win_tuesday_the_reason_will_be/

jeez that got a lot of upvotes.",egotisticalnoob,e96sjgi,conservative
That’s literally all they think in the Atlanta sub right now if Abrams loses tonight. ,gt4674b,e96rlgp,conservative
"Hey, it's happened over here in the UK with Brexit.  Don't believe them when they try!",sureissummer,e96v161,conservative
RUSSIA.,_SkeletonJelly,e96qkzx,conservative
I thought voter fraud was a myth? 🤔,noiwontsharemyfries,e96wwvy,conservative
"I actually like this.  This means they will not change their strategy or approach,  ",poopsickl3,e96x009,conservative
r/politics should just go ahead and be renamed r/angry. That place is just one massive depressing rage dump.,brubeck5,e97j6v0,conservative
You say that but still support Bob Menendez lmao,polar902,e988tjl,conservative
"They hire left-leaning ""Republican"" columnists to make actual Republicans look insane by comparison. It's a gas-lighting technique.",the1egend1ives,e971nzl,conservative
not that I'm for party loyalty in general but leftists destroy leftists. You can see it happening. They will destroy their own. It's only a matter of time.,greatatdrinking,e96d4q3,conservative
"Nah, only a fraction of them does. Majority doesn't give a damn about worker abuse thing as long as he supports the right causes and gives progressives a platform to spew shit from such as WaPo, just like they don't give a damn about Hollywood celebs being filthy rich, or Soros making big $$$ on pound and baht speculations. They even warmed up to Kochs a little after years of smearing them as evil corporate demons, all because they refused to support Repubs while they're working with Trump.",Kryvakryz,e97vlqo,conservative
Literally *the least* civil sub I’ve ever experienced. ,CarbineGuy,e96vtyo,conservative
It’s a subreddit dedicated to pro trump views. Of course it’s biased. If it was r/democrats I wouldn’t complain bit it is r/politics where it is supposed to be neutral.,2Cor517,e98lny0,conservative
Do we claim to be?,Aech1274,e98mgim,conservative
"Lol I remember a video on the front page of /r/videos a couple years back, it was ~20 seconds long and the dude in the video just said ""wassup reddit... so I'm gonna buy a ton of upvotes on this video and yeah we'll see if it works.""

",Hatewrecked,e96oz72,conservative
Remember the Ron Paul rEVOLution?  Pepridge farm remembers.,OpenBookExam,e96p3lb,conservative
"You can buy the upvotes. I can see Democrats being desperate enough for it, despite this site losing like 66% of its userbase since the redesign began.",SonyXboxNintendo11,e97ygcf,conservative
"Discrimination is wrong unless I disagree with your ideals on how the government should operate, if you disagree you are only worthy of being ridiculed and disrespected.

-- Democrats ",Splickity-Lit,e96f884,conservative
"That would be best for the nation, but they won't ever admit when their ideas don't work.",noiwontsharemyfries,e96wz2m,conservative
"The sad thing is most of /r/politics thinks that Russian bots are getting anything conservative upvoted on reddit, but they blindly follow people buying propaganda ads through gold purchases. ",Ruger34,e968hcp,conservative
ORANGE MAN BAD,deathsythe,e96zhl6,conservative
Just half?,gbimmer,e963emn,conservative
When your full time job is enforcing the echo chamber.,xKommandant,e96eeoy,conservative
"Wait, they really get paid for that?",noiwontsharemyfries,e96x23t,conservative
"Exactly. I don’t even have a problem with hearing the other side, but they should at least admit they couldn’t care less about conservative viewpoints.",benbrm,e96udey,conservative
"Exactly, ""left liberal"" seems to be the default now. Any contrary opinion is sidelined and pigeonholed.",LazyRefrigerator7,e96vb8p,conservative
"he's never claimed to be anything but an opinion journalist. He openly admits his bias, and doesnt pretend to be objective like the liberal sycophants reporting news at CNN, NBC, etc",osamanobama,e96vvxg,conservative
"So, the funny part, after 2016, there was a lot of bluster about the electoral college, probability the least nutty idea i saw float around was proportional ec voting. So, I got curious and fired up excel, essentially I multiplied the states electoral votes by the percentage each candidate received, the best resource for proportional voting. Long story short, trump didn’t reach 270, but Clinton was still pretty far back. When you run off the numbers for independent/libertarian/green candidates, then he reached 270 and won. How could that happen when he lost the popular vote (what the dems were clinging to and hoping would change the results)? Because Hillary’s percentages were all over the place, and trump was generally in the low -mid 40’s, she just had no consistency and ran up totals in safe states, while even in states trump lost, he would have taken 40% or so of the electoral votes, but he won a lot more states.",Freerange1098,e98dxr3,conservative
"As with everything, Conservative bots are the best bots.",theinfamousjosh,e96ktfk,conservative
Partisan politics. You get the point.,1994spaceodyssey,e976k52,conservative
"That’s how it is in NY. Roughly 60% of the state’s population is in NYC. In that tiny little strip. 

Our elected officials tend to be blue in every county with a major city. Cuomo will continue to face opposition from the lesser counties but in the end it doesn’t matter. Haha he just needs to appeal to NYC like he always does. 

The state itself is very rural but NYC’s bad rep basically overshadows that. ",Jokeri009,e98hrfl,conservative
Chicago... Murder Culture... Different.,slotrot,e975u7h,conservative
"You do have a point in that Trump's economic policies are indeed succeeding, and that the left needs to form a coherent opposution instead of just bitching. However, haven't most, if not all of the special elections that've occured in the last year gone to Democrats(feel free to correct me if I'm wrong about this)? To me, that signifies that there is some form of excitement along the left to  go out and vote.

In all honesty, I do say this as a very centrist person, who leans slightly liberal.",Moot251,e9701h9,conservative
Racist.,Publix_Deli,e96ody8,conservative
Orange man ok!!,Terra_green2,e96kmhc,conservative
Yeah that’s why google invented this thing called Blackle it saves power. It hasn’t really caught on tho. ,AwkardSeadorf,e97gyhl,conservative
Posts and stories like that are usually a sign of a lack of confidence in your side's winning.,FallowZebra,e975fls,conservative
"Man, i started going down the rabbit hole reading through that thread. 

Its hilarious to see all the BS claims with no evidence what-so-ever and then watch everyone suck each others PP’s over it. ",bdub561,e96weyy,conservative
Delusional.,tehForce,e96uz72,conservative
"I was about to say the same thing.  I had to just unfollow that sub, it was just insane.  They're already convinced everyone was suppressed and Kemp rigged the machines if he wins.",lizaoreo,e972fvc,conservative
"As much as you’d like to turn it into a “you versus me” thing instead of a “me versus the point” thing, (1) I do not support Bob Mendez and (2) I am not a liberal.",Introsium,e989atw,conservative
"Wait, I’m sorry; I don’t understand.  Can you rephrase that?

It *seems* like you just said “Actual republicans look insane compared to left-leaning columnists” but I sincerely doubt that’s how you meant it.",Introsium,e983fij,conservative
"Well, that’s the whole thing — that’s literally the opposite of “blind followership”.",Introsium,e983hge,conservative
What about r/LateStageCapitalism ,Swampy1741,e96yxwh,conservative
"“discrimination is when people are impolite to you based on the content of your character” 

—cornflakes ",EMP_COREY_AND_TREVOR,e96myjd,conservative
So true,9cames03,e968jsb,conservative
The other saps do it for free.,weetchex,e96a1if,conservative
Perfectly balanced?,9cames03,e9687g0,conservative
To be fair that sound like a pretty fun and easy job,guitmusic12,e96lctq,conservative
"His words “To be clear, I will not be on stage campaigning with the President.”  

Then he does exactly what he says he won’t. 

Then the response from Fox News “Fox News does not condone any talent participating in campaign events. We have an extraordinary team of journalists helming our coverage tonight and we are extremely proud of their work. This was an unfortunate distraction and has been addressed”

So even his own network says what he did was wrong. ",AndrewNathaniel,e96wf5f,conservative
"The big one they point to is the Alabama senate seat, Doug Jones squeaked by a guy who was creeping on teens at the mall. ",Freerange1098,e98e7xj,conservative
"I honestly cannot recall how the special elections panned out. And there is no doubt motivation for leftists based solely on hatred. But that is all it is, HATE. That is not a platform or message that will bring centrists over. Quite the opposite effect is likely. And that again is why I say if dems do win, this country is lost. If they can advance a political ideology based on nothing but hate, then we are truly fucked. ",DaveThe_blank_,e970o44,conservative
"These liberal news outlets hire fake ""conservative"" columnists to shout their leftist views, so that actual conservative  opinions will appear fringe and reactionary by contrast. It's designed to trick moderates into making the left look rational and the right look unhinged.",the1egend1ives,e9888lg,conservative
I honestly don’t go there much. Literally can’t take it seriously. ,CarbineGuy,e972mqf,conservative
Like all things should be.,KingJonStarkgeryan1,e96i4wc,conservative
"You’re. Right.  And I didn’t know Hannity said that, though I did know that fox had admonished him. 

I haven’t liked hannity since he went all in for trump back in 2015. 
I’m still correct in that he doesn’t hide behind a guise of objectivity. 
But he has grown to be insufferable nonetheless. 
And his old statements of “I’m not a Republican, I’m a conservative” is as much laughable as it is untrue. He has abandoned any sense us conservatism since he decided to be a Trump lackey. 

",osamanobama,e96wu0y,conservative
r/unexpectedthanos,AHairyOctopus,e96y2h5,conservative
"You’re right too and make good points. Have a good day, friend. ",AndrewNathaniel,e96xc16,conservative
Indiana didn't forget about Kavanaugh ,WeimarRepublic,e97aml9,conservative
"Another victory for the Right side of history

Keep the Red Tsunami going boys",VoinaYMir,e97gi2j,conservative
"Being from Indiana, some of my friends are trying to apologize to the nation for how Indiana voted lol

Donnelly was worthless",wyattpatrick,e97kmwu,conservative
SEAT GET,LewaLew,e97c0ko,conservative
Senate has always been key. And Republicans are adding to their numbers in the Senate. While house dems drown in their circus. ,FourThrones,e97hwa8,conservative
This race was more like a republican primary.,DedLed,e97lmu2,conservative
I like this guy. His speech was great. ,applejuice898989,e97i451,conservative
It's the primary reason I went and voted.  Joe had to go.,SideTraKd,e97kfki,conservative
"If Tester goes down, every Democrat in a red state that voted against Kavanaugh will have lost, and Joe Manchin, the only one who voted for him, will still be there.

But I’m sure the Democrats will look at the House results and convince themselves that RESIST! is working.",joozian_,e97yjmy,conservative
"No, we fucking did not.",JA155,e981cig,conservative
Yep. And it was my first time voting. Donelly's opponent was pretty weak in 2012 but Braun ran a great campaign.,9cames03,e982qbr,conservative
"Same, its been annoying. So glad to have Joe out. ",ItsMikeUh,e9850ne,conservative
"I read about it on The Federalist I think. I've heard of plenty RINOs riding the progressive bandwagon, but a Democrat appealing to the Trump voters was something new to me.",Kryvakryz,e97tdg8,conservative
One hundred percent agree. I emailed Joe about the Kavanaugh confirmation and got some bullshit response. Motivated me to vote this year. ,commystock,e980cwk,conservative
"Donnelly was giving lip service to Conservatives, but he's no Conservative.  He also voted against Kavanaugh.",joozian_,e97zrn9,conservative
"I think a lot of Dems stayed home because that. Talking with them, they're still posted he voted for the wall.",THE_OBEAST,e98p8ll,conservative
The way he handled it was completely spineless and cowardly.,SideTraKd,e98tdm6,conservative
More proof of who the real anti-semites are.,PerceivedShift,e98h8ah,conservative
Because liberals are inherently anti-American. ,IndefinitePresent,e98a0xl,conservative
Because she's an anti American terrorist sympathizing traitor. ,ConsistentlyRight,e991smy,conservative
Because she's hamas? Idk,Ketydubs,e98644r,conservative
Member of the Democratic socialists... Hates Israel... Hmmm...,TheShakinBacon,e993cth,conservative
Because she hates Israel.,chabanais,e989z66,conservative
"Because she's not an American. Congress is full of non-Americans, hell from 2009 to 2017 we had a non-American as President. ",mayargo7,e98cu5l,conservative
"In other words, even with victories, Dems still find a way to complain.",GeneralELucky,e98qvjn,conservative
Fuck Tony Evers. ,blameitonthetetons1,e98uhns,conservative
I'm moving to Wisconsin in the winter. Seeing this result made me groan.,aivan021,e99bbck,conservative
That definitely wasn’t a red wave tho. We kept Texas by few percentage points. ,InAingeWeTrust,e98tes4,conservative
"Tapper is a weird dude. Sometimes he's the only adult journalist type, others he's a dumb as the rest. ",MaddSim,e99n2ys,conservative
"The media has done a hit job on Trump for two years with 90% negative coverage. Its more negative than any coverage of a president since Nixon during the Watergate crisis.

They are hacks for the Democratic party and they help the democrats win the house. Trump isn't acting like a gangster. He's acting like a lone lawman standing up to a democratic-media complex.",kanhawk,e99pj4p,conservative
Damn it feels good to be a gangsta!,PrawnsAreOk,e99qaat,conservative
CNN's punk called the president a gangster?-Interesting,postonrddt,e99p0gq,conservative
Trump is gangsta 😎,FineGreyLine,e99pjag,conservative
Fuckin' A.  Is that supposed to be a criticism?,BrighamYoung,e99rb2a,conservative
"He's best as a reporter, worse as a commentator. ",DBG1998,e99o8au,conservative
Been a long time since he actually was a reporter. He was better back then. Then he followed the money to CNN of all places. Sad,MaddSim,e99ou4k,conservative
*Fake news media,LobsterWithAnOpinion,e99glc4,conservative
Funny how Politico uses terms like journalist and news media. These people are clowns not reporters. Reporters report the news not become the center of it. Acosta is nothing but a grandstanding dickbag. Trump has every right to go on the offensive against these idiots.,FuriousChef,e99gzdw,conservative
"No, anything cannot happen.",chabanais,e99hu2w,conservative
Supreme Court supremely conservative.,lax714,e99hqml,conservative
This is the real world. Franz Ferdinand died and lit the world on fire. Anything can happen.,Cetingira,e99idue,conservative
"No, anything cannot happen.  ",chabanais,e99io1s,conservative
"If not for Trump the GOP would have lost to Hillary...  sorry but you have to face the facts.

The GOP lost the house because they lied about repeal and replace.  If you are not rich, healthcare is a major concern.  You are going to get populist on both sides of the political spectrum until the problem of health care costs are addressed in a meaningful way.    ",ozric101,e98l9mn,conservative
Populism is growing in the realm. If we are lucky we can retake the House. But Trump must be allowed to lead.,Intimidator94,e98qalj,conservative
"Yeah, the establishment took a huge, unexpected win in 2016 and promptly did nothing with it.  The tax cuts were one the few good things they accomplished, but even those should have been targeted more at individual, middle class citizens.

Immigration reform and the wall was botched.  Healthcare was botched.  They had to be reluctantly dragged along into supporting better trade deals.

It's time for the establishment congress-critters to start governing for Americans first.  Think about the people you serve.",nited_states,e98rdq1,conservative
He appeared to be a corrupt POS.,chabanais,e98bb6f,conservative
">Why losing is historic

Because he's governor and you're not. Now go home.",DogBeersHadOne,e98bnih,conservative
"Because as seen even in California, and the Midwest, the far left ones still have no real footing. The outliers like Cortez could easily be gone in 2 years when a moderate or even standard Democrat runs.",Enzo_SAWFT,e98cy7c,conservative
"Dead vote for  Democrats

Dead win seats for Republicans ",Enzo_SAWFT,e98csh8,conservative
"Actual title:

“Trey Gowdy Predicts Mueller Will Find No Collusion”",mikeygio,e9an2um,conservative
"The headline betrays your title, OP:

> Trey Gowdy *Predicts* Mueller Will Find No Collusion

No “bombshell”.  Nice try tho.",justhere2havefun,e9alpg6,conservative
"Trey ""All hat and no cattle"" Gowdy predicts the obvious.",JMB_was_a_god,e9aoib9,conservative
An overnight absolute BREAKING NEWS BOMBSHELL,gtrdundave2,e9altpm,conservative
Mueller has a NEW BOSS and he is not going to put up with any crap. ,ozric101,e9anaua,conservative
"""Trey Gowdy **CRASHES** a TRUCK full of FACTS into a crowd of left wing **MONGOLOIDS**- Mueller is FUCKING **OBLITERATED** by ***ZERO*** evidence!!!""",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ans54,conservative
"it was the suggested title, not mine, but nice try tho",alc59,e9ama9a,conservative
Then maybe you should have not used the suggested title since it is inaccurate?,justhere2havefun,e9arho3,conservative
I can draw a lot of comparisons between Marijuana and prohibition. You'll never stop people from using something (relatively) harmless. ,JackHazardous,e98zyds,conservative
Decriminalize it federally and let states decide. Personally Im all for legalizing it. ,steampunker13,e996iee,conservative
"Sure-fire way to get dope smoking losers to get out of their parent's basement and to the polls. Republicans didn't learn in CO. 

&#x200B;

Now...what's to happen on the federal level? Will republicans take that voting weapon away from Dems or not? ",Alfa_Alesi,e98zjoz,conservative
"I had a retired racer-- my Daisy was a wonderful, sweet and goofy friend. She lived to be 13 years old, and was the best dog I've ever had. Accident prone and clumsy in the house, but a really, really good dog. 

I can't believe that this amendment passed. I know that the tracks have been less and less profitable, and many places -- looking at you, [Melbourne Greyhound Park](https://mgpark.com/) -- kept the dogs around only so they could have poker. 

I can't believe how misguided people are, thinking that the dogs are mistreated, ""kept in cages"" and abused, without ever having had experience with one. They. Sleep. All. Day. Greyhounds find security and feel safe in their crates. Abused or mistreated dogs won't run, and won't make money. They truly love to run and chase; races are great fun for the dogs. My Daisy was always a show-off, and very proud of how fast she could run. 

It just makes me mad.",r4d4r_3n5,e98m05v,conservative
"You saying this alerts people in touch with rescue agencies. My focus is on Scottish Terriers, but I know how to get in touch with other dog rescues.
Would you mind crossposting your concerns to dog subreddits?",Upnsmoque,e98rddm,conservative
"My district flipped from R to D last night.  This upsets me an order of magnitude more.

If in any way you could find a way to make room in your life for another hound, now would be the time.  If, for no other reason, than in a few years it will be nearly impossible (and very expensive) to own a greyhound.  

It pisses me off that this happened.  It was unnecessary.  The market was taking care of the problem: greyhound racing was going to end because it was no longer financially viable to do it.  

Fuck those guys at Grey2k.",WIlf_Brim,e98obbj,conservative
"I'm not sure if you're meaning to reply to me, or the OP.  

We adopted Daisy though the [GPA](http://www.greyhoundpets.org/) [chapter](https://floridagreyhounds.com/) at the Melbourne Greyhound Park. ",r4d4r_3n5,e98sipn,conservative
"I'm sorry, I was addressing the OP. 
You were speaking of Daisy, so I knew you already knew how about greyhound rescue. You already know they are sweeties. I've come across several adopted greyhounds in Kentucky, and they have such a good disposition.",Upnsmoque,e98v71h,conservative
"The difference being, Obama's too ""presidential"" to tell them that to their faces.",unityrootts,e997tz3,conservative
"I like fox, and it’s the only cable network even trying to report “the news” but they are really just the most right leaning of the lefts propaganda machine. They report so little of what’s really going on in the world it’s scary. They just report the same shit everyone reports but with a right spin. You gotta branch out and start following the new generation of real journalists via YouTube and what not. Of course you have to constantly vet them. But you can get the real news if you dig deep enough. ",sambo2366,e98zdwt,conservative
"I used to like Fox but it's really turned me off. Hannity is just a mouthpiece. When I do watch them it's mostly for personalities I like. I like Gutfield quite a bit. His show is entertaining and the 5 is okay. 

I lean conservative but I just want to hear news sometimes without arguing and an agenda. Even if that agenda lines up with my views. Imo using an outlet that only provides me with an agenda that I agree with will make me ignorant at some point.",Blake-bottles,e990f0z,conservative
Hannity isnt supposed to be a news anchor,ExpensiveMention,e990qtx,conservative
"That's true. I just don't like him. He's just a shill for Trump. 

For how much we shit on the rest of cable news for being Democrat shills, Hannity isn't any better. He's just tolerated by us because we agree with him.",Blake-bottles,e990ysa,conservative
"Meh, I don't mind Hannity being a shill for Trump.  With so many dedicated, unabashed anti-Trump media shills, I guess he deserves his own.",Tea_is_unAmerican,e997v7f,conservative
"True, but that doesn't mean I need to listen to it.",Blake-bottles,e99a7ug,conservative
"I'm a little worried how close FL, AZ, and Texas came out

That and how the Great Lakes are waffling between parties",WeimarRepublic,e99m8k0,conservative
Do it! I dare you!,Willie1Eye,e987892,conservative
Hope she does because she'll have to neuter the socialist wing of her party to do so. The younger voters don't want Democrats they want socialist like Cortez.,postonrddt,e988n2o,conservative
"Please run again, Hillary. I want a good laugh ... and see the shocked faces from the CNN anchors.",aaronholliday,e9878pm,conservative
"I whole heartedly agree, HRC 2020!!

Just DO IT. Nominate her PLEASE. ",Themusician67,e989nbm,conservative
"Oh no, please , no .Not that.",Enzo_SAWFT,e987ub9,conservative
Hillary running again would be the best thing ever.,R-M-Renfield,e98aj9v,conservative
The dems will have to summon her out of the crypt to run again,FeelThePorn,e98idzh,conservative
She is 100% lock to run. How do I know? She still makes appearances all over the place.,trelium06,e98m9a2,conservative
Please run again. Please. ,JustVoicingMyOpinion,e987bzf,conservative
I guess that means they have no chance of winning. ,WiseVaper,e98jlwo,conservative
"We can only dream. Did you see Nancy Pelosi’s presser in response to Trump? All the networks cut away after 15 awkward, painful minutes. Love having these people to run against.",DarthNaseous,e98ttxn,conservative
If that's true and not a satire article it's really sad.,Luke_Flyswatter,e98vicm,conservative
"I want to jump on this wagon, but, to be honest, that cold and calculating serpent scares the crap out of me.  ",RutCry,e99603w,conservative
It will definitely cause a rift. The young 'progressives' hate her as much as Republicans do.,MadLordPunt,e9894c6,conservative
Hold please. The left is rerouting their claim of racism to sexism to avoid this conversation. ,justhere2havefun,e99tlb9,conservative
**Tongue-in-cheek to the max!  I love it!**,guanaco55,e98gmr8,conservative
"We were supposed to be cheating, how did we let this happen?",frozensalad,e97f3xi,conservative
"Sorry, I dropped the ball on this one. Next time I'll be sure to yell at everybody at the polling location if they don't vote republican they're spreading hate. ",xJownage,e97foyq,conservative
No... mostly because it looks like a more favorable mixed decision.,SendixBunny,e97diu2,conservative
Well I have work in the morning. ,TheMongoose101,e97i3ok,conservative
"Why?  We picked up seats in the Senate while replacing Flake and Corker.  The Senate will no longer be held hostage by the RINO wing of the Republican party.
",Yosoff,e97fqzn,conservative
"Well, I thought about getting crazy tonight and just vandalizing various liberal homes and businesses tonight as a coping mechanism for losing. But then it just started to get late and I have to work in the morning and then I remembered I actually don't hate people who aren't like me... So I basically just scratched that idea and was able to come to terms with fact that it's not the end of the world. ",clcameron10,e97jqh1,conservative
**Screeches in NPC**,ShadowTH277,e97mvsh,conservative
No. Just leave that to the dems. We’re the adults of the 2 party political system.,TheTrueIron,e97fqfv,conservative
I swear this happens every time a liberal doesn’t win. They bitch and moan.,213_,e97h12f,conservative
"Unlike the left, I actually have to show up to work tomorrow, and I [didn't get permission to smash any windows](https://newswithviews.com/antifa-documents-reveal-their-plan-for-america-dr-lyle-rapacki/).",DEYoungRepublicans,e97fuk2,conservative
"No, because we have jobs and things to do tomorrow.",psstein,e97hfpp,conservative
"Got Chem in the day, work at night. Someone is gonna have to go complain for me ",Ledcookey,e97t95b,conservative
We have a scream at the tree session this evening.  Hope to see everyone posting their videos on here.  Pick a tree and scream at it damnit.  ,Kinnywayne,e97zq79,conservative
"I can’t riot, I have to go to work.",posidonius_of_rhodes,e984val,conservative
But we have jobs. 😪,blizzardice,e9857ux,conservative
I've got my penis hat and am ready to go protest around my state's capital!,DogBirdLizard,e9888rv,conservative
"Damn, I forgot Putin's number! We could have prevented Democrat's taking the house if only I didn't leave that damn number on a napkin....",weeaboo_swordsman,e988rkx,conservative
#resist or some shit like that ,Penguinswin3,e983rxg,conservative
I just went back to work today. Didn’t burn anything down.,Shotwe11,e985e8m,conservative
I really wanted my turn to walk through main highways and block traffic. I had to go to work though. ,blondemia88,e988clx,conservative
Resist we much.,Mawaukey,e985drp,conservative
"Our candidates didnt lose we picked up in the senate and the house is a dead tie 

thsi is a loss for the DNC by any measure, they should have swept ",Manchurainprez,e98apgs,conservative
We don't act like children when we lose.,LibertyTerp,e98s7an,conservative
Not enough Russian meddling. Hail to the motherland.,sfx6c,e97las4,conservative
"So much for the ""mah gerrymandering"" argument. ",Racheakt,e983bgn,conservative
"I'm not sure if this is allowed, but recently I wondered why they didn't have information booths at all voting locations. I'd love to sit at a voting site all day and talk to people about why I'm voting Republican, conservative ideals, or something akin.",S_D_W_2,e97i2t1,conservative
"> The Senate will no longer be held hostage by the RINO wing of the Republican party

[I want to believe](https://images-na.ssl-images-amazon.com/images/I/71azht1WUpL._SY606_.jpg)",WeimarRepublic,e97guiv,conservative
"We did lose the house.  And, on a personal level, I live in GA6.  As of this writing Karen Handel (R) appears to have lost to a Bernie Sanders democrat.  Fuck me.",WIlf_Brim,e985csp,conservative
все приветствуют зодиака,Slayer_Of_Anubis,e97vc2m,conservative
"Pretty sure that's electioneering, depending on state you can do it a few feet outside the polling place. ",True-Scotsman,e97imjh,conservative
"Actually, there were people outside my voting location with information on amendments, and advertising voting a certain way, and I had a very productive conversation with one of them before going in. ",xJownage,e97izev,conservative
"I do too, but only time will tell...",ozric101,e97hn90,conservative
"McCain is not a senator any more. I respect him as a soldier. Other than that, I hate the man.",ShadowTH277,e97mxnn,conservative
"Hmm, which certain way was that?",noiwontsharemyfries,e97q93f,conservative
"One was to vote yes on amendment 3 (i'm in florida btw), which passed.",xJownage,e97qjsw,conservative
"Most of this article seems agreeable to me. I would add to it, that we have to get illegal voting under control. It’s clear that Democrats are moving to legalize illegals and insure DACAs stay legal. This should be something that Trump and Republicans make a priority before 2020.

- Get federal voter ID laws on the books and bring states like CA that are all in for legalizing illegals inline.
- Get birth right citizenship out. This may require the Supreme Court.",SomeGuysCat,e990gvo,conservative
"A breakdown of the election and how it sets the stage for 2020.

The main takeaway seems to be while we've positioned ourselves well in the senate, we're hurting in suburban area's, especially in the rust belt, which we need for a good 2020 take(keeping the WH and retaking the house). Otherwise we may lose the white house and not be able to retake the house.",Zyrioun,e98zte6,conservative
I’m really worried about AZ. That race way closer than it should be. Thousands of votes left to be counted from blue districts. Not a big gain in Senate if we lost that seat.,the-divine-comedy,e990qmm,conservative
"Eh, is electing a Taliban sympathizer really *that* bad? /s",burtmaklin1,e99am4s,conservative
"I live in AZ, agreed. Hopefully things turn around we should find out tomorrow ",F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e991oe3,conservative
He gets to lose twice? 👍🏼👌🏼,lax714,e98cgvq,conservative
His wife is damn cute. ,Zac1245,e98lwmq,conservative
I really wanna move to Florida,doobsftw,e98msh8,conservative
She works for one of the local news stations here in Jax as a TV host,pdawg43,e99b5fs,conservative
"Ah, well that makes sense then lol. ",Zac1245,e99bqh7,conservative
"As an early voter who cast his ballot by mail, I didn't get a sticker.  Now my life feels so hollow and meaningless.",LonelyMachines,e96lzag,conservative
Am I just gullible or are these headlines really convincing?,TheGeek100,e971sf1,conservative
BUT HOW WILL EVERYONE KNOW YOU'RE A GOOD PERSON IF YOU DON'T TAKE A SELFIE WITH THE STICKER!!??,tohollywoodandback,e96wb1g,conservative
I *just* learned that my sticker could have gotten me free donuts today. Now I am a little sad. ,8K12,e97kuki,conservative
This proposal is racist against minorities.,jade_crayon,e972o89,conservative
I’m getting really tired of the endless selfies of women with perfect hair/makeup and the “cute selfie” head tilt. Leave the posturing to the liberals—conservatives don’t need internet validation. ,zara_lia,e989soc,conservative
"That’s okay.  I posted my sticker picture on Facebook and got no likes, because my friends and family all unfriended me for being a “NAZI”.",Lustan,e96oevi,conservative
"fuckin same dude :(

I only did it because I wanted my first vote at the real polls on election day to be for the GEOTUS ",Iwishiwasachad123,e96ogdm,conservative
"PM me address, I'll send you mine",S_D_W_2,e9754j7,conservative
They asked me if I wanted a sticker. I said “No thank you”. I had no idea how important they were. ,AintThatWill,e9779ct,conservative
It’s actually ageist 🤧,Jabronies96,e979yhw,conservative
Well are you?,ahoose1,e96u7zf,conservative
It's free virtue signaling. ,LonelyMachines,e9798l4,conservative
"Against anyone over the age of 12. ;)

Adults don't use stickers.",jade_crayon,e97dt65,conservative
 Only on the first Tuesday in November on even number years. /s,Lustan,e96uiyo,conservative
That's when it counts,Aech1274,e971adp,conservative
I don’t even care about the House. Senate is what matters.,thrasumachos,e97g22m,conservative
Thank fucking christ,str8dudethrowaway,e97dygy,conservative
to no one's surprise,JMB_was_a_god,e97gsmx,conservative
Is it projected to be a stronger hold or a weaker one than 2016?,Unbalanced_Life,e97e25f,conservative
This is my first time voting so i’m not that immersed in politics. Can you when you say the senate is what matters?,213_,e97gqr2,conservative
"Stronger, gained 2 more seats so far. ",BuckeyeDood,e97ep15,conservative
So far it’s looking like republicans will have a larger majority in the senate in the next Congress.,rwwman50,e97esr8,conservative
"Just know that regarding impeachment talk, the House (now Democrat) can vote to impeach Trump with a simple majority. However the Senate (still Republican) decides whether or not to indict and remove Trump from office. So it won’t happen and if the House tries to do it, they will just be wasting time. I don’t think they will in fear that they will annoy some moderate constituents by not focusing on actual issues, but I can see Pelosi and House leaders making those empty threats after the Mueller investigation results. ",X-Death,e97ikpr,conservative
"Both matter, but in my personal opinion Senate is way more important in the grand scheme of things. ",CITY_F0X,e97h06u,conservative
"For approving presidential nominees. IMO one of the greatest things President Trump is doing is fixing the activist judge problem in the Supreme Court. Gorsuch, Kavanaugh , and possibly a third coming soon, are helping to keep the Constitution safe.",Hntr1,e97h55c,conservative
"I do not agree with him on this one.

Democrats controlling the House can do a lot of harm.  Maxine Waters' threats to the financial sector are particularly disturbing.  Trump's agenda is effectively stalled, because the House is where all legislation originates, and there is no way in hell the Democrats will allow legislation that Trump favors to pass the House and go to the Senate.  Trump will now have to push executive orders, and force them to challenge him in court.

The silver lining here is that we DO still have the Senate, and the Democrats are powerless to stop Trump appointees.  Another plus is that the Democrat hold on the House is so slim, that in 2020, when Trump wins reelection (of which I have no doubt), all we'll need to do is pick up a couple of seats in the House to gain back control, which is almost certain to happen.",SideTraKd,e97lq5f,conservative
"Source ? I can't find anything, except that we still have 51 seats ",SonGoku915,e97p5zz,conservative
"It never would’ve happened, though. Even if the Dems won every senate seat up for election this year, they’d still be short of the 67 votes needed to convict.",thrasumachos,e9832v8,conservative
how so?,213_,e97hef8,conservative
"Kavanaugh and Gorsuch are just part of the story, though. Trump’s been nominating tons of solidly conservative federal and appellate judges, which will leave a huge mark on the judiciary (think about how much has been blocked by overreaching federal judges). It’s getting less attention, but it’s still a big thing, and all of them need senate confirmation.",thrasumachos,e9830lg,conservative
Prison reform is an issue Trump has been working on that I bet he can get house support with and is something that is necessary.,allnamesaretaken45,e97uvgs,conservative
"But how much of Trump’s agenda is actually legislative? We got tax reform. All that’s really left is the wall, which is dead as a result of this. But now, Trump can focus on rewriting regulations coming from executive agencies and nominating solid federal judges. He doesn’t need the House for any of that.",thrasumachos,e9836vr,conservative
"The Senate confirms cabinet picks, SCOTUS nominees, lower court nominees, and can halt any bullshit legislation coming from the House. ",GuitarWizard90,e97nn8o,conservative
"Essentially the house drafts laws, the senate is one of the branches of government who decide if that law passes. That's a very basic premise though. ",CITY_F0X,e97hk1s,conservative
I'm not so sure. Dems seem to oppose him no matter the issue. Their politicking over the last couple of years has mostly centered on being there anti-Trump party.,Grond19,e980opu,conservative
"It is fair to say that Trump can still accomplish a lot without the House, and that the House was never really in his corner, anyway, under Ryan's ""leadership"".

But losing all of those committee leadership positions is a blow.  Several Democrats have been pretty outspoken that they do not have any constructive plans, and only want to cause mayhem.",SideTraKd,e98tk8b,conservative
alright. Should’ve paid attention while we were watching school house rock,213_,e97hp0u,conservative
"Their base does, but in Congress, even Elizabeth Warren has worked with Trump on some issues.",thrasumachos,e983847,conservative
Let them go against him on prison reform. He should come out today or very soon and say it's a priority for him in the next session of congress. Then let the Dems say that are against it.,allnamesaretaken45,e983o53,conservative
"Yeah. Controlling the House is not so important in itself, but the Dems being able to obstruct things with subpoena power is going to be a mess",thrasumachos,e98to9t,conservative
"Fox's description is incorrect. Bills can originate from either the house or senate, can be modified by both, and must be approved by both before being sent to the president for consideration.",r2d2itisyou,e97ncj9,conservative
"I'm 100% sure the liberals will ignore this.
",gbimmer,e96y7ee,conservative
"I personally witnessed a group of special needs people (10-12) being led by two ladies at a polling place being promised a trip to a local theme park after they voted. They gave each of them a paper ballot with names marked. When they got up to vote the lady stepped aside and told the lady to call someone to have the next group ready soon.

I would not be surprised to find out illegals are voting here. ",heyyouwtf,e97b0wm,conservative
Here in communist California the guy checking me in didn't even check my id,Fuzzy_Muscle,e97hv62,conservative
"No Ted won, they'll probably bring it up",top-perro,e97yba4,conservative
"Geez, that’s insane if true.",samurguy990,e97is3c,conservative
"It was my first time voting, do they usually Check Id ?",kingfu_619,e97qz89,conservative
I don't think you need an id to vote in California. I remember just giving my address and signing next to my name. So you need to know your name and address and be registered to vote in california,seadondo,e97zpla,conservative
"This just in from r/politics: Republicans cheated in TX, FLA and everywhere else they lost.

They sound like a bunch of elementary schoolers whining b/c they lost the kickball game during recess, “b-b-b-but they cheated, whaaaaaah” smh",bumpy-meyers,e981ttn,conservative
It is what it is. They were voting age and it's their right. It just came across super sleazy. ,heyyouwtf,e97iwfv,conservative
[removed],,e97rqrf,conservative
"Yes, they should check ID to match you to an address.",GFZDW,e985nqn,conservative
*a name and address that's registered in California,DanReach,e9818od,conservative
r/Politics is claiming Abrams is the rightful winner. And the the Georgia elections are invalid. But somehow Republicans are undermining democracy.,notagooduname,e98ampk,conservative
Its also their right not to be manipulated,lipidsly,e97lmes,conservative
">But churches endorsing candidates it's cool am I rite

What does that have anything to do with anything here you mumbling twit? They tell people how to vote just like Hollywood does, but they don't have addittional ILLEGAL votes to cast.

They can convince people to vote for a specific candidate (ya know, like all those black churches that endorsed Obama?), but so can everyone else - including illegals or foreigners on reddit.",Kryvakryz,e97uv3y,conservative
"Since you were apparently part of that group, how was the local theme park?",soylent_absinthe,e97yu0y,conservative
Hey leave those super political black churches alone!,BeachCruisin22,e981503,conservative
"Are you sure California requires ID to vote?

https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voting-resources/voting-california/what-bring/",seadondo,e98qnfy,conservative
"sure, so if I know someone's name and address, I can go vote for them.  Now, if they also show up and vote, then they will know something is up.",seadondo,e98qjqu,conservative
How would you go about *not* manipulating someone who's severely mentally handicapped? ,Brandwins,e97sd64,conservative
That's nuts. CA deserves every bad misfortune.,GFZDW,e98rmmz,conservative
"Pretty sure you cannot direct someone who is mentally handicapped how to vote.  If they can't do it on their own, they don't get to vote.",BeachCruisin22,e9813wa,conservative
Is there really any evidence of voter fraud occurring in California?,seadondo,e98s3bm,conservative
Define can't do it on their own.,Brandwins,e98b06n,conservative
"I'm pretty sure that is wrong. But my only reference is an Ali Spagnoli youtube video called something like ""i voted twice""

 Basically, iirc, you Can get someone to vote for you, in certain circumstances.",wizardglick412,e98epps,conservative
"Not sure on voter fraud but the system sure has some problems...

https://www.sacbee.com/news/politics-government/capitol-alert/article219699200.html",GFZDW,e98sqcf,conservative
Remember Wendy Davis? Yea,Enzo_SAWFT,e98i2av,conservative
"Yep. 
https://twitter.com/missstifffany/status/1060022024138043392?s=21

Not sure what the source is on her photo but predictable behavior for sure...

Edit: Source was from [CNN](https://www.cnn.com/election/2018/results/texas) out of 2431 respondents. Leave it to CNN to be first to divide by race and gender....",phi11ip,e97hx3q,conservative
"I mean, a white woman causes most of the stress in my life. But hey, she’s my wife so what can I do?  /s",Dmfconrad,e980e1w,conservative
Why would a white person or a man ever vote Democrat? Don't you know they hate you? You're the enemy. They say so publicly.,LibertyTerp,e9890do,conservative
"Literally the most evil misinformation campaign I've seen. You can just google how amazing our school system has become under scott in the last few years, its mind boggling how people actually think it's gotten worse when we are literally ranked WAY higher. I'm so disappointed in my state. All the single moms at my work saying how evil scott Walker is because their kids are failing school even though they aren't parenting their kids. It just makes me so sad that they will somehow convince themselves that things are better for them now.",Tenshi11,e982ism,conservative
I remember watching the teacher union protests way back in 2011. That was one of the craziest circuses I’ve ever seen in non-DC politics. It’s sad to see him go.,DHARMAFREAK12,e984mtp,conservative
"Being a Wisconsinite and a Republican, I still could not stomach Walker. The things that Evers said about the roads and prison system were fairly accurate. We don't know where our money is going because some of the things that we look at the most has been falling into disrepair. I think it was time for a change (preferably not to a Democrat, but most of his crazy stuff like the gas tax hike will never hold up). Hopefully Evers doesn't do much damage and I hope for the best. It's not the end of the world, guys.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e98dttg,conservative
"One of the tough things to do in politics is run for higher office, lose that and go back to running for what you already have. Both Walker and Cruz suffered from this. You take the arrows and those that land hurt you down the road, and it provides fodder for your political foes (Lyin' Ted really hurt, Walker looked feeble and flamed out).",DH5650,e983oi8,conservative
Still have our 'stand with Walker' sign out... sorry to see him go.,MrScrith,e98a91d,conservative
That's what you get when you sacrifice principles for jooorrrbs... taking people's land through eminent domain for use by a private company. Thank Foxconn for the Evers victory. ,Glsbnewt,e987qyr,conservative
I'll be surprised if most of these Dems that voted against Walker knew what a governor did. ,latotokyo123,e983nfs,conservative
How much can Evers undo? Foxconn? Union power?,Lustan,e983rvh,conservative
Parents blaming schools for their failing children?  What a parenting failure!  I’m sure these parents don’t even attend conferences.,Lustan,e983isr,conservative
So true. I’m just not going to fall into the pit that liberals did with the walker terms. I’m going to let Evers. Do his thing....which probably won’t be much. Hopefully he can actually do some good that the numbers will show. I will gladly say he’s doing good if he really is. Something that liberals couldn’t fathom doing. I believe he genuinely did a lot of good for this state. All the construction. All the manufacturing. The schools look very good. ( even though they made up numbers saying they are not). And it’s disappointing. I want to see Wisconsin do great. There are so many positives right now (before yesterday). I just hope Evers can contribute to what walker did. Because I will be proud no matter who is in office. Walker just carried the same principles I carry in life. From what I have researched. Evers does not. ,mwaFloyd,e98a3wi,conservative
"The roads is such a strange argument because I can’t even go down the street without running into road construction.....everywhere. What people don’t realize is hat a lot of road construction is based on utilities. Counties/cities have plans for future sewer/gas/water line replacements. So they don’t fix certain areas because they like to run the new gas mains, than the water and sewer comes in. After that they re do the whole road. So why fix these roads when a year later they are going to tear them up. I work construction on natural gas pipelines and a lot of our management are staunch liberals that concede that walker is fantastic for road construction and construction in general. So I have always tried to show to people that replacing roads is more than just filling pot holes. Or Scott holes.....",mwaFloyd,e98izzt,conservative
Hopefully Republicans learn a lesson from this about crony capitalism and corporate welfare. ,PubliusVA,e98gfum,conservative
Let’s hope that those negatives of the Foxconn deal will contribute to a much broader positive picture for this state. And that it will be a positive overall. Which I believe it will be. Evers can’t let this deal go to waste. ,mwaFloyd,e98a91z,conservative
"He won’t undo Foxconn, and he’s still dealing with a Republican legislature so can’t do too much damage.. it’s more the loss of a figurehead that hurts... he didnt deserve this.",niresangwa,e9840cc,conservative
The road in a town by me has been under construction 4 times in 6 years because the contractors they keep hiring are complete morons...,DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e99a59a,conservative
True. Let’s show our thanks to Walker for what he accomplished. Maybe try to rattle our state sub (though I’d rather not go in there).,Lustan,e9846va,conservative
That’s a pretty big deal.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e96tvye,conservative
This may be the first evidence of the “Blexit”,link_ganon,e96tlir,conservative
Exit polls are notoriously unreliable. ,psstein,e970x2m,conservative
"If true, that's worth like 1.5% of the vote, no small matter in a swing state like Florida where the margin always seems to be tight. ",soxfan90,e96w8pq,conservative
"I'd have preferred at least tree-fiddy, but 14% is good too.",DogBeersHadOne,e96vocx,conservative
"Well, hell, maybe black voters see a need for both police and private ownership of firearms. There may be hope yet.   


Still bracing for the riots in Miami regardless. 

&#x200B;",myerbot5000,e96u74v,conservative
I have been worried about Florida. I hope DeSantis and Scott can pull through.,ConservativeChicano,e971zl8,conservative
This is YUGE if true,Meatball2112,e96xlwv,conservative
"I think there is some serious potential behind the black voters opening their eyes. If the dems are able to somehow open the borders with house control black communities are gonna get hit even more by the influx of migrants.

It might make more if them look around and wisen up to what's happening.

They are being replaced with the token immigrant. ",RansomedAmbassador,e97zzpc,conservative
"This is huge for one reason - DeSantis was running against a black Democrat (well, Commie, but he ran on the D ticket, but I digress...). To take 14% is just fantastic, and hopefully a sign of Blexit taking hold. Trump can build on his success in reaching out more over the next 2 years, that would solidify his prospects for 2020.",DH5650,e982aq8,conservative
"Just wait until 2020 when Trump is running again, and he is in campaign mode telling everyone they need to vote straight red.",GeneticsGuy,e97o8y5,conservative
"To quote creepy Joe Biden: ""This is a big fucking deal.""
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=HHKq9tt50O8",ngoni,e96u4fi,conservative
"I'm not from Florida, and shouldn't care too awful much about who they choose as governor...

But DAMN it was nice to hear that the race-baiting didn't work for Gillum.

Justice!",SideTraKd,e97kcou,conservative
On no you don't Loch Ness Monster,Vrael22,e96yj4j,conservative
The Loch Ness monster isn’t on the ballot this year.,joozian_,e96y2f2,conservative
Hell yeah we did it,ScubaDaniel10,e97kl2m,conservative
But I could have sworn Nelson was running? ,Rytho,e97gp2m,conservative
There is no constitutional crisis. ,StillANNONin,e9adu80,conservative
No it doesn't.,ConsistentlyRight,e9ae17g,conservative
"Uh, nope. He's the head of the executive branch and can fire whomever he wants. We dont even know what the special counsels scope is because they revised it and refuse to show anyone the declassified scope. So we dont even know if Trump is personally a target of the investigation. 

",iwasthebeaver,e9adx79,conservative
Trump has authority to fire Sessions. We’ll see if this changes the investigation at all.,stanleythemanley44,e9adxd3,conservative
[deleted],,e9aebi2,conservative
All the panic about firing Sessions is painfully premature when nothing has changed about the Special Counsel investigation. Doesn’t the media hate the shit out of Sessions? They should be celebrating until something actually changes.,Rex_Wyatt,e9afdgp,conservative
They are already calling for protests moveon.org paid for by sotos is orginazing them ,Delta_25,e9ai4rw,conservative
"Right, people don't understand the difference between ""constitutional crisis"" and ""political controversy"" anymore. ",PubliusVA,e9ahw3n,conservative
But if he technically fired him he can't appoint who he did since he wasn't confirmed by the senate? ,W3NTZ,e9biknj,conservative
Happy cake day ,Rabidraccoon76,e9ag9w0,conservative
Trump would pick his nose and Dems would call for an investigation.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9agdm3,conservative
Beautiful comment,StillANNONin,e9aig8v,conservative
yea he can for 210 days. He's not going to name a replacement until the new Senate is seated. ,iwasthebeaver,e9bj09c,conservative
"thanks, i didn't even realize it was my cake day. Makes me feel special.",iwasthebeaver,e9aggzn,conservative
I’m not overwhelmed by the prospect of hiring someone who thinks they deserve a living just for breathing the f’ing air.,BrighamYoung,e98f8yd,conservative
"Look no further than the az senate race. McSally has this but It is nonetheless disturbing how well her opponent did in Maricopa County, historically a heavily Republican county that used to deliver the highest margin to gop candidates of any county in the country.

This along with the close race for Cruz and the defeats of gop congressional candidates in affluent and formerly reliably Republican suburban districts from PA to GA to TX to CA just goes to show that the party needs to make up grounds in those districts where Trump significantly underperformed past gop national nominees.

",dtlv5813,e98exrn,conservative
"> [DeSantis] ran on a reactionary platform, opposing reproductive rights, gun control, sanctuary cities, and Medicaid expansion.


> The 39-year-old mayor of Tallahassee, Gillum ran an unapologetically progressive campaign, supporting Medicaid expansion, gun control, a corporate tax hike, a higher minimum wage, and the abolition of private prisons.

Notice DeSantis’ platform is listed in terms of opposition, while Gillum’s platform is listed as things he supports. You could easily reverse this by replacing “gun control” with “gun rights”, or replacing “sanctuary cities” with “enforcing immigration law”. Then you could call Gillum reactionary, and you could call DeSantis’ unapologetically conservative.

Not so subtle propaganda from the media.",Anon-Ymous929,e9874vv,conservative
">reproductive rights 

Is that what they’re calling unborn child killing now?",BayernMunich22,e98237n,conservative
In what world is opposing gun control part of a reactionary platform?,BeatlesRays,e981zk8,conservative
Could’ve been a title from the Bee. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9826bw,conservative
Where were these racists in 2008 and 2012?,superdude411,e98cvsj,conservative
A world that doesn't understand words are eventually replaced with actions. ,glockedup1,e9824ha,conservative
">user reports:

> 4: This is spam
> 
> 2: Spam
> 
> 1: Concern Troll
> 
> 1: This is spam
> 
> 1: This proves the electoral college is outdated. Yall don't think before you post
> 
> 1: electoral college exists bc republican party wouldnt exist under an equal-vote system
> 
> 1: you guys are getting dumber by the day
> 
> 1: I'm a troll and this offends me because I'm a wuss
> 
> 1: It threatens violence or physical harm at someone else
> 
> 1: Shitpost
> 
> 1: Kill yourself
> 
> 1: Map is misleading and greatly exaggerates actual distortion. Should be deleted for being false.
> 
> 1: Way toconflate voting with land ownership guys... solid 3/5 for effort
> 

I didn't know so many reddit morons were in support of mob rule. 

Edit: Dat 3/5th tho, lmao.",Spysix,e97e1sf,conservative
"I get the idea of the map, but it’s so wrong. Georgia has half the population of Florida but on this map it’s barely even visible. We’re also the same size as Alabama in the map which has less than half the population.",Pyronot,e95olsf,conservative
"But the thing about this cartoon is that it’s more a reflection of what the electoral college does. Without it, Texas and California no longer vote as one bloc, meaning that the votes of the 30-40% of Republicans in California and Democrats in Texas actually count.",thrasumachos,e960yrf,conservative
"It's not, though. Because of the winner take all style, candidates focus on just the swing States. They all but ignore states that always vote predominantly one color. ",RajinKajin,e95qbn7,conservative
Wyoming is way too fucking big.,super_ag,e95sdbl,conservative
Looks like mexico and canada carry wayy more power than I thought /s,SkellDawg,e95nfvh,conservative
"The EC is here to stay because it is written into the Constitution, and will
Take an amendment to overturn.

We can do away with winner-take-all appropriation of electoral votes so the minority party still has representation in EC votes. Republicans in California and New England would have higher turnout if it meant they actually got something for their efforts. Similarly, Democrats in Texas would be in that same boat.

It would also make the race more contentious as a whole, because there’s no longer safe red and safe blue states, where at most ten states are in play. You can run up the score in enemy territory by campaigning your ass off.",the_guitargeek,e95v1we,conservative
"The US has the Electoral College because we believe(d) that the State is(was) the primary political organ. 

[Check out](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_U.S._states_by_historical_population) the historical population of each State, and pay particular attention to the population of each State upon statehood and over time.

At statehood (1850), California had a population of under 100,000. California's statehood was remarkable, granted to such a distant and underpopulated state. And yet, it was granted in full. By 1900, California had just under 1.5 million people... sharp growth, but still only enough to make it the 21st most populous State (less populous than Minnesota, Iowa or Missouri). By 1920, California was the 8th most populous State, still under Michigan and Ohio. It wasn't until the 1940's that California really started to take off (relative to other States)... thanks in large part to both the [Dust Bowl](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okie) and the [war manufacturing effort](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_California_1900%E2%80%93present#California_naval_bases).
 
Time has a tendency to warp history, particularly when politics is also in the mix.  

",Couldawg,e95uxod,conservative
"I never really got this argument.  Giving states points exactly proportional to their populations means that everyone gets an equal vote. The EC says "" no we can't have that,  cuz it will make the states with the most people more powerful!"" But that's fair right?",wowitspayday,e961icj,conservative
"The problem with the US's election system isn't the electoral college. It is the first-past-the-post, FPTP makes people's votes not count, a candidate can have 49% of the votes in a state and those votes count for nothing. If the electoral college voted proportionally to the votes in each state, the elections would better represent the will of the people.",Updradedsam3000,e9643tz,conservative
Proportional representation would be terrible. Imagine if every citizen's vote was valued equally.,HoddleSt,e95z7tw,conservative
LA County has a bigger population than 41 states ,i_floop_the_pig,e95t7bj,conservative
"Wouldn't this be better since the representation of each state is based of population, therefore  giving each person the same influence?",ExpectedB,e95ztpj,conservative
That’s where 99% of people live lol,Smackdaddy122,e960a3j,conservative
[removed],,e961ko0,conservative
[removed],,e962v8s,conservative
"Without the electoral college, voting is not broken up by state at all.  One person, one vote, all counting equally.",beastcock,e965r7y,conservative
[removed],,e95y525,conservative
"I get what it means, but I still think it sucks that a blue vote in a red state like Texas or that a red vote in a blue state like Cali has absolutely no influence. You're just as well off not voting. Like I said, I kind of get it, but for a lot of people their votes just don't matter, which is not ideal. ",yop666,e95ol2x,conservative
"Just to be clear, we do not have the electoral college to balance state power, or to ensure presidential candidates visit small states; there’s zero discussion of either by the founding fathers relating specifically to the EC.  The founding fathers used other means, the Senate chief among them, to reconcile state power imbalances.  The EC was a debate between elitists and populists, plain and simple.

As far as the EC’s modern day implications, think about it like this: if we moved to a popular vote tomorrow we would see a slight increase in the value of a vote from Texas and a slight decrease in the value of a vote from Vermont, making the votes from those two states equal.  But it’s not as though we would have created a homogeneous block of voters from TX, throwing their weight against a homogeneous block of voters in VT; it’s the move to a winner-take-all faithfully elected system that creates that state homogony in the first place.  Instead, we’ve simply made sure that millions of voters in TX actually have a worthwhile vote, which they didn’t have before.  Additionally changed for the better would be the way candidates campaign for the presidency.  Now you’d see Clinton in TX and Trump in CA, as opposed to NH.  That’s a big, positive change.  You want candidates talking to the most people possible, regardless of what state they’re in.  For instance, you have about 6M Republicans in CA who don’t get to see their candidates and who don’t have a meaningful federal vote.  They’re displaced by 500K Republicans in NH, who receive far, far more attention.  That makes zero sense.",farts_on_boobs,e963b6k,conservative
[removed],,e960fvh,conservative
"What point is this trying to make? The districting for Congress makes sense state to state as in, yes CA and NY should have more reps in the house to accurately represent the population, but how does this apply to a presidential election? 

Are we supposed to believe that everyone in a state votes the exact same way? And even if that is true why would electoral college matter. And the fact that some states are all or nothing and other states divvy up electoral votes based on popular vote ruins the electoral college anyway",sonny_goliath,e965w90,conservative
"California and New York do not only have Democratic voters, just as Texas isn't populated exclusively by Republican voters. By using the Electoral College we give States the right the vote over people. If you are a Republican in California your vote statistically doesn't count. 

&#x200B;

Please explain how that is fair to Republicans living in Democratic majority states.",davethehawaiian,e96beez,conservative
"My states so small, it’s haven’t even seen it on the map (Tennessee) ",Richerlie,e95v9f1,conservative
"I like pie charts better. Accurate pie charts.

https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/e/ea/Pie_chart_of_US_population_by_state.png",Abram_SF,e96c7pe,conservative
I'm an interested Brit and have no idea what's going on here. ELI5 please!,BD1304,e95ufkj,conservative
That's not what the electoral college is for. The electoral college was designed to put some space between the masses and the presidents office. This map demonstrates the reason we have a bicameral legislature with a senate.,jsrduck,e963vwr,conservative
"I'm torn on the electoral college myself, but I think the gaping issue in people's logic against it and the setup of the senate is that the republic is designed to give states equal power. So California can't force Wyoming to have laws it doesn't want. The states have power as much as some people don't want to hear that.


Why? Because when a state has power, it can provide laws and act as a check on the federal government, as a protection for the minority (relative to the rest of the country) in its state. The reason our republic works so well is because of the system of states.


If we did away with the states tomorrow and had one almighty federal government, it'd be the United States of California and New York. People living in rural areas would basically have no say in how they live because of an affluent majority thousands of miles away.",JimmyReagan,e95stws,conservative
You can tell the map is exaggerated because Wyoming is visible.,mrduqo,e95yp7i,conservative
"Hey why have I not seen a lot of republicans up in arms about Republicans purging voters?

This is a legitimate question.  Does it actually serve an honest legitimate purpose? 

Edit: Anyone? ",Reaching2Hard,e966941,conservative
"Well, strictly speaking, no, that is not why we have an electoral college. We have one because of various historical reasons, largely around apportioning votes to slaves.

Practically speaking, the electoral college today increases the voting power of people in less populated states, because electors are apportioned in line with congressional representatives and senators. In less populated states, you have fewer constituents per rep and also per senator. 

Therein lies the rub - with the modern US government, a minority of the country can have control of the executive plus both legislative chambers, whereas it is *arguably* more fair that the less populated states get the Senate while the more populated ones get the House and/or the Presidency. Or really any combination of the majority getting one or two of the three and the minority getting the other. It is perhaps also equally arguable that everything should just be decided by popular vote, since that would maybe be the strictest interpretation of everyone's vote being equal. 

It's not at all how our government works, and if people want to change it they can go ahead and vote to change it, but it is a valid argument, unlike certain other arguments put forth by certain parties. ",GorathThorgath,e95xsk0,conservative
I have a crazy idea how about we dont count votes as entire states and instead as people then it doesnt matter 1 person has 1 vote ,BigDaddyReptar,e95x0gj,conservative
Canada gets all that extra representation it's not fair!!!,vorcazm,e96168v,conservative
And? Let's do it that way.,Cybol117,e96cphe,conservative
"Question, why can’t we collect and count votes as one nation rather than individual states? If (certain) votes were collected as just “citizen” rather than “Florida citizen” would that not protect against populated states taking over elections? ",INTP36,e95z6fd,conservative
If only there were some other major branch of government that skewed heavily towards states rights regardless of population. Like every state should get two votes no matter what.   That’d be cool.  Maybe then we could have the presidential election be more representative.,Elbobosan,e95xuv0,conservative
It's worse. Just a few cities in those large states determine the election for that state.,andos4,e95utbz,conservative
To make some people more equal than others?,Rotau,e95rf9q,conservative
"Sure makes me happy being part of America, knowing that people are actively cheering on my vote being watered down. Certainly doesn't make me feel that those crazies howling for secession have a point, nosiree...

Bitter sarcasm aside, I fail to see the logic in this. My vote as a New Yorker in a national election should have exactly the same weight as someone from Wyoming. The fact that I happen to live on the ""wrong"" section of the country is irrelevant.

It shouldn't be a question of maintaining a ""balance of power"" between states, so much as ensuring that each and every voting *American* - regardless of state origin - gets an equal say in who runs their country.",dal33t,e95yf10,conservative
"Exactly, but instead of Illinois it should just say Chicago",littlecatladybird,e96kz1s,conservative
"Yeah it sure would suck if candidates only gave a shit about say, ten states. Y'know... Exactly how it is right now.

And the idea that you could just campaign in a few states or cities to win is completely mathematically false. [Here's a long post I made about this.](https://www.reddit.com/r/neoliberal/comments/8hnoid/debunking_the_most_common_argument_for_the/?utm_source=reddit-android)

The reality is that it's the opposite of what you guys think. The Electoral College incentivises candidates to only care about a handful of states, while the popular vote requires a candidate to have wide appeal across the country.",Blue9390,e962fyk,conservative
"It shouldn't even be whole states, more like the big blue metropolitan areas. NYC, LA, Seattle, San Francisco, Chicago, etc.",_SkeletonJelly,e95r6gv,conservative
"If anything, that map more resembles the US with the electoral college.

There are two main arguments for removing the EC from my understanding. 

The first is to move power from state representation to populous representation by removing the winner takes all mentality. This means that if 49% of Texas wants A, 47% want B, ...; then their votes go directly to those candidates, instead of all of Texas’s votes going to A. This means state identity really means nothing. Evidence to support this method is due to the growing purpleness of districts whereas in the past it was more red and blue by state. Thus your map should be to 

The issue is that without the weighting power of the EC little states get almost no representation in the Enforcement branch. Thus that’s why many subject keeping the weighting factor (# of congressional electives = number of votes). But scale it out to the populous vote. No winner takes all. So yes a vote from Idaho has more weight the California, but it already does. Now at least a republicans vote in Cali means something. 


The second (which isn’t relevant here), Is that the EC lets the chosen electors to vote against the People’s vote. This is an archaic system that predates a generally educated populous. I cannot see a situation in today’s world where we need to overturn a People elected president outside of the means of impeachment. ",GoldenWillie,e95udiq,conservative
Why should we let every person have an equal vote?  That just sounds ridiculous!,azzahir3,e966rft,conservative
"Arizona and New Mexico are int he wrong spots and why is Arizona the same size of states that have 3 electoral votes when it has 11 soon to be 12 or 13 after 2020 cencus. 

I really hate costal people sometimes. ",Manchurainprez,e95y7yr,conservative
So what.,Blueoyst,e965wgu,conservative
You left out Oklahoma ,Redryder185111,e967efe,conservative
Airizona and Nevada are in the wrong places.,MrEpicDwarf,e96ck84,conservative
"Not 100% to scale, but I like the concept.",Rex_Wyatt,e95qhmm,conservative
And even more so why we have the Senate. ,soxfan90,e95qujq,conservative
[removed],,e95w6qn,conservative
States aren’t homogenous entities.,LieutenantSir,e967nl6,conservative
"People dont realize that each state entered an agreement with the federal government which they traded the benefits of their sovereignty for the benefits of a stronger, united union.

One of the most important guarantees for that agreement was that less populous states would not be stomped by more populous states. To achieve a good balence, the congress is to be a representation of population, the senate is to be a representation of the states, and the president is selected by a process that is a balance between state representation and population representation.

It's an incredible system, and it only seems to be hated by people who don't understand it, or feel that their politics are so important, that they should be able to shove it down everyone's throat. ",waffleezz,e95vn29,conservative
Seriously people act as if the electoral college is like the senate where every state is equally represented when really the largest states still have the most people ,duckfallasbdn,e96107y,conservative
Best part is the majority of the NY area is just NYC.. one city would constitute a ton of power without the Electoral College. ,jcoash,e96ceko,conservative
"The real point is that the president and Congress shouldn't matter that much.  Yet that is where most power, taxation, and spending lies.  Californians should have very little impact on me.  Drain the swamp and return as much power as possible back to the states.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e95qm2c,conservative
"Imagine if the United Nations mattered and literally controlled the world.  Imagine that each country had vote shares that equal their population.  


India and China would be ruling over everyone with the USA only on third.  And every other nation on a mad race to make as many babies as fast as they could.  Wealthy countries opening borders just to up their population resulting in their bankruptcy due to the social welfare they used to entice new immigrants.",markcocjin,e96ccjv,conservative
I see absolutely nothing wrong with this picture. Every vote should be worth the same. Abolish the electoral college yesterday. ,Gigigigaoo0,e967oe1,conservative
"People should vote, not landmass. No shit places with more people get more votes in an actual fucking democracy.",anewdm,e968x0o,conservative
The problem with the electoral college is that you can become president with 22% of total votes,FatMonkey4,e96ch0c,conservative
I don’t agree with the the ec in its current iteration. I think there needs to be more ec’s. It’s 2018 the population is far more diverse and spread out then ever. Most people’s votes have little to no effect on anything. If every state had a few more ec’s maybe divided by region of the state or something it would make every vote that more important. Ny has quite a lot of republicans who have no say because of NYC. Same with Democrats in Texas. Yes I realize the risk of gerrymandering and not saying it’s a perfect solution but think this current system needs to be updated. ,burkie94,e95wvjv,conservative
People forget we are a republic of states as well as a democracy. ,HumorousHeliotrope,e9683oo,conservative
[removed],,e96648e,conservative
"This map makes sense, the states that matter should be the deciding states",BlackYoshi1234,e96av4f,conservative
"It's a hedge against Tyranny of the majority - exactly as the Floundering Fathers conceived it. Works quite well, too. 

Try reading some political philosophy rather than just regurgitating crap you heard on the fake news shows. The Floundering Father's were brilliant political philosophers and learned lessons from history. ",albirdly,e95xe49,conservative
"I don't understand why the electoral college of a state has to vote all-or-nothing for a party. This is something that's bothered me for a while because in Canada, we try to take areas of population that are approximately equal ([image of riding division](http://i.imgur.com/U4mQdv1.png)). 

Each area, or riding, has approximately equal power because they are divided by population. When a particular riding elects a member of parliament (MP), it counts as one vote for the party that MP belongs to. The party with the most MPs elected becomes the ruling party.

Granted, we don't have the election of the executive since we have the Queen through the Governor-General; however, why not use the popular vote for the presidential election? It seems silly not to use the popular vote when the vote count can be transmitted almost instantaneously.",Classic_Appa,e963pj1,conservative
Can we change Illinois into Chicago? Because that’s all that matters in Illinois is Chicago. Almost everything south of Blue Chicago is Red Illinois and it feels like the rest of Illinois has no representation.,minebucky,e965vtu,conservative
Can't the inverse of this map be created with the EC swing States being extra large and all the others tiny?,Kemphis_,e96b4eo,conservative
But doesn’t the electoral college take the imbalance away from the populace states and just hands it to the swing states? Seems like that’s moving the problem rather than solving it. Florida for example holds huge sway in your diagram and with the electoral college. ,Space2Bakersfield,e96bou9,conservative
"We have an Electoral College because the United States isn't a Democracy.

Besides, it's not a forgone conclusion that the Democrats would win in a democratic vote anyway, so I'm not sure why they are pushing for it.  

Hillary would have had to get off her ass and actually campaign, and we all know she wasn't up for that.",mlmack,e96vj1e,conservative
[removed],,e96c6f5,conservative
"What's sad is when Californians vote their state into an unlivable hellhole, they then move on to a Red State and then proceed to transform the local government into another California.  And we know they're leaving California.  Because they've used it all up and need another ""host"".

They can just walk over to the next one and just enjoy a prosperous state the residents have voted and worked hard for.  It's just tragic.  Low populated states have no chance against massive relocation.

Which state was that, that had a bunch of Somali people shipped in and now they're voting for a Somali Democrat?

One guy let's say has 5 wives and each wife has 5 kids.  They don't even have to convince you of Sharia.  They only have to out-populate you.",markcocjin,e95pcry,conservative
"The point is, I think, that the electoral college is imperfect but without it, electing the President would potentially be even less democratic.

People seem to forget that the views of the States as individual entities matter.

Without the compromise of the EC, this country would likely come apart. There’d be far less incentive for a less populous State to stick around because their voices would count even less than they already do.",Marky512,e95uygf,conservative
"It really bothers me how drew AZ & NV, those two should be flipped for accuracy lol",mbarnar,e95vafa,conservative
"They should have used more colors in the map. I mean, it's not like there's only 4 colors in the rainbow.",atlacatl,e962503,conservative
I think Rhode Island actually grew in size. ,Relevant-stuff,e964tln,conservative
"“Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States which may be included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, including those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not taxed, three fifths of all other Persons. The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State shall have at Least one Representative…”
—	U.S. Constitution, Article I, section 2, clause 3",skimansgaming,e964xwg,conservative
"I'm for the college, but I assume a map that showed individual vote weight per person based on state population would be equally disturbing, with places like Iowa and Ohio similarly dwarfing others. ",MurmaidMan,e968d5c,conservative
California T H I C C,JuliusEvolasGhost,e968vsr,conservative
Missouri is way too small. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e96aout,conservative
Where’s TN?,adventuresonweed,e96aqis,conservative
"Every year, I find myself more in awe of the insight and foresight of our Founding Fathers.  ",sockpuppetkc,e963e5l,conservative
oh no how dare the election represent the number of people insteaf of imaginary lines,tvdinner4me,e9687kc,conservative
"Here's the thing that conservatives should know about the EC... a couple talking points to combat the ""rural rednecks get more power"" talking point.

1. There are many reasons we want small states to have that tiny amount of extra power.  It helps prevent the big ones from overrunning the little guys.

2. The only reason the EC gives any more ""power"" to any state is simply because of the additional 3 EC votes on top of those based on population.

3. All the states under the 25th most populous get more ""power"".

4. These states are not all heavily Republican and some aren't even very rural.  Delaware, Rhode Island, Nevada, Vermont, Maine, Hawaii, Connecticut, and Oregon (somewhat in order) all fall under the category of getting more ""power"" through the EC.

5.  The EC helps lower population states maintain a voice and does not favor either party by any great margin.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e95x10z,conservative
"AZ could be a bit bigger, Phoenix is one of the largest us cities.",Ardeiles,e95rc2w,conservative
"Couldn't you say that political policy predominately affects *people* and not *land*, though?",parabolic,e96adf4,conservative
I mean just look how much Canada would influence our elections without it! /s,MrSelfDestruct57,e96lnpj,conservative
"“But empty land doesn’t vote!” - some NPC, probably ",punishedpat76,e95up1c,conservative
Electoral college has become irrelivent in a modern day society where voters have information available to them.  We also don't use electoral votes for any other election process.  This has been the ONLY way the right is able to get a president in office.  ,touch0ph,e9675s3,conservative
so? this is democracy.,Uncommonality,e969gdo,conservative
[deleted],,e95op3m,conservative
Shouldn’t everyone get the same value from their vote? ,Altomckee,e96a2uq,conservative
I don’t understand why people find this so hard to understand. Our founding fathers did this for a reason. ,1994spaceodyssey,e95x6ka,conservative
Because States Rights > Personal Rights,InsiderT,e965b6n,conservative
"I still don't see a problem here. Two liberal states and two conservative states. 
/s",Gammacor,e969tlz,conservative
"Remember when Hillary Clinton wrote that op-ed in The Atlantic entitled ""American Democracy in crisis""? And she said she was for abolishing the electoral college?

Putting American democracy into crisis is the POINT of the electoral college. Democracy is bad.",crashohno,e95xq7o,conservative
"The electoral college was a compromise between those who felt direct elections should occur and those who felt president should be decided by the representatives that were already elected.  The original intent was to avoid the negatives that existed with both sides, and find some middle ground.  There was great concern, for example, that someone would be able to manipulate public opinion and a dictator would come to power (or a tyrant who would then become a dictator).  

  

The main reason cited today is that ""this way the less populous states have a say in our democracy"".  In my state people often say, ""Why should the big city decide what happens in my area?""  I get it, but the answer to your stupid fucking question is simple: because more people live there.  Popular vote is long overdue, and has literally lead to 12 years of conservative rule in the last 20 years.",PerfectPolicy,e96al52,conservative
[removed],,e9694sw,conservative
So what? It would still represent every single persons opinion.,dick_inspector,e969ywq,conservative
This country would be screwed if California elected every president. ,Beandog0829,e963bng,conservative
Where is Tennessee?!?,Lovemesomediscgolf,e95ylnq,conservative
Like it stops gerrymandering..,smokeout3000,e969hsy,conservative
"the scary thing is liberals look at that map and think ""yeah i'm fine with this, if only we could get rid of texas tho""",1wayst80,e95x2t1,conservative
"i would like to state, as an illinoisan, that we have nothing to do with it. it is all chicago ",magelitz88,e95ysjj,conservative
Why does this matter?,megatog615,e969l8e,conservative
"Nebraska’s state code is NE actually. 🤦🏻‍♀️

But I like this graphic. One of the candidates in my state includes getting rid of the electoral college in her campaign promises. THERE IS A REASON IT IS IN THE CONSTITUTION. ",kcl086,e95xxry,conservative
"People really don’t realize that the electoral college makes it so you have to win states and not sheer number of votes. Each state is like its own independent, well, state! Each state has a popular vote in each of its precincts. So to win a presidential election you have to win over more states (or those with the largest representation in the electoral college). But you can’t simply ignore smaller states either. 

We tend to look at those “smaller” states as the Midwest but at least a few  states on the east coast are not nearly as populated as some of their neighbors.",McFreedomWithCheese,e95z240,conservative
Sometimes I think we should have people pass a general intelligence test before allowing  them access to the internet.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97u96r,conservative
"Yeah, this seems like a way [more proportional distribution.](https://laughingsquid.com/map-of-the-united-states-distorted-by-population/) ",anon_in_colorado,e95xj6s,conservative
It took me a solid 2 minutes to even find Ohio lol ,FlankingZen,e95rdzz,conservative
"The map is using exaggeration to scare viewers into thinking that without the EC, their votes won’t count if they live outside a few states.",InsiderT,e9664qt,conservative
"Lol, they don’t even have TN",Raz_A_Gul,e95roky,conservative
That’s because it’s an exaggeration ,SuperMarioKartWinner,e95t4w7,conservative
"[here's one from 2016 that's better](http://election.princeton.edu/wp-content/uploads/autographics/EV_map.png-white)

Also a funny reminder of how far off the polling was",d542east,e95ywar,conservative
"It’s a cartoon, I don’t think OP was trying to show accurate data. He’s just trying to show the underlying concept.",Abram_SF,e96bw65,conservative
"agreed. without the current form of the electoral college these bloated states wouldn't be all one color, and might actually provide representation of both or more parties and encourage the minority party to vote",keekeeshitbox,e966o5v,conservative
"If you take away the “Republic” part of our Government to make a certain portion of the people’s votes count more in a set of states, you’d still be taking away most states entire voice. That’s not worth it. That’s why we’re a Republic and not a Democracy. 

Edit:

For all you triggered people. Please find me in the constitution or Declaration of Independence mentioning of “democracy” ",kotov9syndrome,e97f09m,conservative
"But by getting rid of the electoral college, candidates won't stop focusing on specific areas: they'll just change to the same 15 metropolitan areas every four years.  Ohio and Indiana as states will be ignored, but highly populated areas like Cleveland and the Chicagoland area will be focused on.

It's not that you care about focusing on certain areas: you just want large cities to be the focus.",thatrightwinger,e95sdh0,conservative
"Swing states change. Without the electoral college, the most populous areas will stay the same and that is the only place where candidates would campaign. If you win the 10 largest metropolitan areas, you'll likely win the election (from largest: New York, LA, Chicago, Dallas, Houston, Washington DC, Miami, Philadelphia, Atlanta, Boston). The 10 largest metropolitan areas account for just over a quarter of the US population.

There are some states that are perennial swing states based on the demographics and balance between rural/urban areas, but swing states change over time. Virginia was Red from 1968 to 2004 and has gone blue the last 3 Presidential elections making it only a recent addition to the swing states but might not remain one since it is trending more blue (Obama won by 4-points in 2012, Hillary won by 5-points and the state electorate is growing more blue as well).",-Kerosun-,e95vixc,conservative
"One side effect of our current politics (focused on swing states) is that platforms have to favor those states, and there is often substantial overlap. What’s good for Iowa (thank you, caucus) is good for the rest of the Midwest, plus Missouri and the rural south. ",Call_Me_Clark,e96frs5,conservative
"The reason they're swing states is they have a balance of urban and rural.  With our current system, candidates need to focus on making both happy in order to win swing states.  Without the EC, you only need to make the urban population happy",you_cant_prove_that,e963hy7,conservative
"I know, it's because Wyoming doesn't even exist. ",cole_miner,e969ezl,conservative
Wyoming has 6 times the population of Georgia. ,outinthehills,e95vrfo,conservative
Wait til you see the size of Russia!,Pretendo56,e966eoc,conservative
I think you accidentally added the sarcasm tag,_the_CacKaLacKy_Kid_,e95wn7x,conservative
Im surprised we dont see Russia on the map too.,capnbard,e966dfz,conservative
This was drawn during the days of NAFTA.,OmahaVike,e96870g,conservative
They actually do since 30 million Mexican citizens are in the Us (illegals) that may or may not vote. But they ARE counted in the census and as a result the states they are in get disproportionately more congressional seats that the should. ,Do_u_ev3n_lift,e968c57,conservative
Would lead to less polarizing primaries too.,Increase-Null,e95wxst,conservative
"> It would also make the race more contentious as a whole, because there’s no longer safe red and safe blue states, where at most ten states are in play.

Would be a shame if politicians had to campaign outside of ten states and actually court the votes of people living in ""safe"" states. Real shame.  ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e962ivw,conservative
[removed],,e963rz1,conservative
"> The EC is here to stay because it is written into the Constitution, and will Take an amendment to overturn.

Not if enough states agree to join the electoral compact. then it is nullified. ",JMB_was_a_god,e95xxei,conservative
That's also a better approach than going pure popular vote because it diminishes the possibility of Florida/2000 election fights occurring in multiple locations nation wide.  ,CollateralEstartle,e961er8,conservative
">The EC is here to stay because it is written into the Constitution, and will Take an amendment to overturn.

It's still here because no one has a political mandate to change it, not because it's unchangeable. We'd all be better served by a more comprehensive federal voting regulations to be implemented at the state level.",tanstaafl90,e966sqk,conservative
"I agree, it made sense when the states were more independent and had their own motives during our inception but in more modern times, there's not really as huge a difference between states",AndThenThereWasMeep,e96ajff,conservative
"A republic requires nationalism to function, a democracy requires homogeneity to function. The winner takes all approach protects the country from being occupied by actual radical parties like what happened in weimar republic or now see in Poland and Finland or Brazil and Venezuela. It allows radicals to slowly encroach on the democracy until its overturned. This doesn't happen in a republic.

The real problem is that the US has been getting much less nationalistic after the vietnam war and this in turn has lead to less cultural cohesion and absurd levels of tolerance for open contempt of the government. There is little to no national unity anymore.",Dyeredit,e964ke2,conservative
"> and will Take an amendment to overturn

or through a revolution by people who want a different system, such as Socialism.",OmahaVike,e968cd5,conservative
I wonder how things would have gone differently if California has been approved as two separate states.,TrueBirch,e960oo6,conservative
"We have the electoral college because we live in a Republic, and not a Democracy as many falsely state.

Alexis de Tocqueville wrote that the biggest threat to minority groups is the imposition of a Democracy, and I couldn’t agree more. We have an electoral college to make sure that the loud majority in populous states doesn’t overrun the interests of other smaller groups in middle America.",MY_CAPSLOCK_IS_BROKE,e96alkf,conservative
"no, that's unfair. this is exactly why the founders eschewed democracy for a republic. in a democracy, the majority rules. in a republic, minority interests have weight and frustrate the majority's agenda.",SKWM3000,e968ciu,conservative
Funny thing is if it wasn't FPTP and instead proportional Trump still wins. ,havgin,e96pkwk,conservative
"Why, it would be almost democratic!",ClicksAndASmell,e9690r5,conservative
"good, glad you're getting it.",SKWM3000,e968ef2,conservative
"Fun fact: I visited Estonia a year ago and the entire country had a smaller population than the city of Los Angeles. It was insane.

",JuliusEvolasGhost,e96989z,conservative
It also has more bowel movements in their streets than all 49 states combined in their septic tanks. ,AzzidReign,e95wmjn,conservative
And with that population about a million of them vote Republican in the GA.,rainyforest,e96nxou,conservative
"This map changes area, which is of no relevance to the EC",jamesmunger,e964dqw,conservative
i want the states to vote on who they want for president rather than the individual.,SKWM3000,e9689gl,conservative
"your dichotomy is too simplistic. you characterize states as ""land."" clever rhetorical sleight of hand. each state is a nation unto itself, with its own interests. thus, ""land v people"" is the wrong framing. it's not citizens of the US voting, it's citizens of the state voting.",SKWM3000,e96864o,conservative
that's not our country. we are a union of states.,SKWM3000,e967wlh,conservative
[deleted],,e9658bg,conservative
"As opposed to a blue vote in a blue state? For any *individual* voter, election results are the same as if they didn't vote at all. ",glassjester,e95ozzs,conservative
Vote local where your individual vote makes a more proportionate difference. ,gtslow,e95pydx,conservative
i’m inclined to agree with you however consider how states change over time. If nobody voted blue states would stay blue forever and vice versa,jakesboy2,e95znhs,conservative
Yes. And this is why the total votes across the US for Trump/Hilary don't really mean anything. Plenty of red voters in California knew their vote wouldn't count so they stayed home. Plenty of blue voters in Alabama knew their vote wouldn't count so they stayed home too. So how many people would've voted for trump if they're state was marginal? We will never know. And it doesn't matter because that's not how the elections work. ,SuperiorThor90,e95sdkp,conservative
"This has nothing to do with the Electoral College. Give it a read and show me where it dictates we use a First Past the Post system...

 I can save you some time and simply tell you that it doesn't. States decide how they wish to cast their votes, or more specifically how they choose their electors. There are plenty of ways states could choose to cast their votes while still being completely in line with the EC.",Slashlight,e962xn6,conservative
Being a voter in California my vote is almost always thrown away in the presidential election and I would like to see something along the lines of the Electoral College being awarded via portional amounts and not winner take all.,imtoolazytothinkof1,e9650en,conservative
"You made the choice to live in the state of Texas or the state of California.

These divisions have meaning.

The fact that people are making the argument that the president should be elected purely by popular vote is evidence that too much power has been concentrated at the federal level, and that the concept of state sovereignty has been lost.",dafunkmonster,e95y2e1,conservative
[removed],,e95xwhf,conservative
"Those votes do matter, but probably not the one you are thinking. Every person “votes” with their feet. Where you live is recorded in the census and used to allocate how many electoral college votes that state gets. If all of the republicans just left California, they would lose like 20 votes. Same would happen if Democrats left Texas. Where you choose to live is a vote that strongly affects representatives (electoral college and others). ",HaplessMagician,e96eosm,conservative
So votes only count in swing states?  How did swing states turn into swings states to begin with?  ,PerceivedShift,e96q1n7,conservative
"Yup. The only reason the electoral college was created was so that electors theoretically could overrule the decision of voters in the state if they felt that the voters had made the wrong decision. It was meant to protect against tyranny of the majority not by giving smaller states more power, but by giving this group of elite electors the power to overrule democracy if they felt it was necessary.

So if you genuinely want to defend the electoral college because you think electors should have the power to overrule the majority, I don’t agree but that’s fine. Just realize that what your defending is not democracy, it’s actually the option for elites to overturn democracy.",joshy1227,e96chi0,conservative
[removed],,e968zza,conservative
it wasn't designed to be fair to republicans living in democratic majority states. it was designed to be fair to rhode island.,SKWM3000,e96clkv,conservative
"The electoral college takes the state population and divides it into points. So heavily populated states are worth more points. But no state is less than 1 point. However, there's a limited number of tial points, so what happens is the more heavily populated states end up being less points per person.

For instance, wyoming is 3 point but only has 480,000 people. California is 55 points but has 39,500,000 people. 

So, in Wyoming, 160,000 = 1 point, but in California, 718,000 = 1 point. 

The post is saying that if we were to truly give equal points per the population, there would be over-representation of those most populated states.

However, i think the argument is flawed for a few reasons. First, this is an exaggeration. For instance, MI is 16 points but is about the same size as those 2 or 3 point states. There are several other states with significant populations that are shrunk down here.  Second, the electoral college WAS MEANT TO BE EQUAL, matching the population density. Our government changed it to our current system, precisely for the reasons OP is talking about.

The main problem, is the notion of winner take all. Currently, If a candidate wins in a state, they get all of the points for that state. I think it should be changed so the points are distributed, matching the vote results. This way, a lot more states would go 50/50. It would be a more accurate representation of votes. As it is, a Republican might be discouraged from voting in California, since it is so heavily blue, and vice versa in texas.",NO_FIX_AUTOCORRECT,e960id1,conservative
"It's an exaggerated picture but it roughly scales the various States to match their populations. Each State gets a minimum of 3 members in Congress, and the remaining seats are divided up by State population. So the size of the States in this picture correlates to their influence in Congress.

The Electoral College is only used to elect the President every 4 years (we're at year 2 between presidential elections right now). It's an indrect election. Each State gets the same number of Electors as it has members in Congress. The Electors from each State generally vote for the presidential candidate who received the plurality of votes from citizens within the State. Without the Electoral College, the presidential election would be determined by a national majority vote (or maybe plurality since our Constitution would have to be amended to make this whole change).",RightMillennial,e95v1jq,conservative
Without our system that currently elect our president.  The states that you see that are oversized. Will be the main ones picking the president despite what other states want ,game46312,e95vyf8,conservative
"A pure democracy is two wolves and a sheep voting on what's for dinner.

That is why the founding fathers didn't want a pure democracy and wanted to ensure federalism (which leads to the Electoral College) was a big part of the election process. It protects from the catastrophic effects of a pure democracy and balances away from a pure republic. It really was ingenuous.",-Kerosun-,e95u966,conservative
The Senate is already around to do this though,Cryptic0677,e965qgd,conservative
It's so cute when they come here to cry after reading a headline on the Huffington Blog.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97uw4t,conservative
"So we admit states into the union with the mutual agreement that they are joining a constitutional republic, they get 2 senators, population-based number of congressman, population-based number of electoral votes, and a complete understanding how elections are held.

Then, your idea is that we take that away from the states and make bad on our terms under which they are a state?",DrEntschuldigung,e95xwj9,conservative
"The answer to your question is basically this picture.

You realize that either way, someone's vote is getting snubbed though, right? As it stands, voting red in a deep blue state and vice versa is essentially pointless. But in a direct democracy, voting in ANY state other than New York or California would be essentially pointless because of the population difference.

The EC allows for states like Michigan to have a say in electing someone who has their best interests in mind instead of letting NY or CA decide the election.",MiceTonerAccount,e95zjo3,conservative
You mean ignore the fact that states exist?,dafunkmonster,e95zly3,conservative
"could give it a neat greek name, something like Cratio Demos?",Uncommonality,e969p3b,conservative
"because we're a union of states, designed to try to balance the rights of each state with the authorities of the federal government? this is basic civics.",SKWM3000,e968g2w,conservative
"Votes in a republic aren’t equal. That’s the entire point. 

",kotov9syndrome,e95s2tj,conservative
"Were not equal now, a return to equality would be great, the constitution had this system in place, we abandoned it.",skimansgaming,e965mq2,conservative
It requires politicians to lie to more people. No thanks. ,Rightquercusalba,e96c30s,conservative
"We shouldn't. The dumpster fire that is California shouldn't be allowed to spread fire to all of the other states. 
 ",Rightquercusalba,e96bps6,conservative
"And yet we somehow managed to destroy the Senate by making it a popular vote arena, rather than representatives of the state governments....",imbalanced,e95sj5r,conservative
Too bad the States gave up their power to elect Senators and gave it up to popular vote. Just imagine what we'd get if State legislators chose Senators instead of the people.,super_ag,e95ss5w,conservative
"You understand that this post is an argument *in favor of* the electoral college, right?",dafunkmonster,e95zkqv,conservative
The power of the states arguably lasted very shortly in our history. First with Jackson threatening to invade South Carolina for proposing nullification and then the Civil War cemented that once in the Union there's really no going back. Especially when you consider Texas and California were once full blown nations.,,e95sdgf,conservative
">I see absolutely nothing wrong with this picture.

You can blame your programming for that.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97uria,conservative
That's why I'm thankful that we don't have a Democracy. ,Rightquercusalba,e96bdms,conservative
"and the alternate, focusing on most heavily populated NY/CA/TX/FL to the exclusion of 40+ other states creates a tyranny of the majority.

Larger states get more say in the House and less say in Presidential elections. That is the balance of power.",tmone,e96nyod,conservative
"Electors are already generally chosen by a process like you describe.  I know, because I was a delegate to my state party's convention in 2016, and we chose the electors for our state (whose votes were unfortunately bound by popular vote).

Caucuses are the process by which people can have a direct say over who the president is.  People elect delegates (people who they may very well know personally) to send to their state conventions, and those delegates select the state's electors.

Unfortunately, some states use a primary system to bind the voting of their state's delegates to the winner of the popular primary vote.  I think this is a problem, and I wish every state would use a pure caucus system.",dafunkmonster,e95z4ah,conservative
"oh, but *the land* doesn't vote, *the people* do /s

morons.",SKWM3000,e96cxfk,conservative
we are against democracy. openly so. REPUBLICans -- for a republican system of government.,SKWM3000,e967ty4,conservative
"No they shouldn't. When California steps in human shit they shouldn't be allowed to track it all over the rest of the country just because they have the largest population.
",Rightquercusalba,e96b3ov,conservative
"But your constituencies are also ""all or nothing""",fullname001,e963ybp,conservative
"> I don't understand why the electoral college of a state has to vote all-or-nothing for a party.

They don't have to. Each state decides how to apportion electors, and in fact not all states do winner-takes-all.",hisverbisdictis,e96lko1,conservative
"> Seems like that’s moving the problem rather than solving it.

This issue can never truly be solved. We can only look at it in terms of ""least unfair"".
",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97ui6r,conservative
"But by getting rid of the electoral college, candidates won't stop focusing on specific areas: they'll just change to the same 15 metropolitan areas every four years. Ohio and Indiana as states will be ignored, but highly populated areas like Cleveland and the Chicagoland area will be focused on.

It's not that you care about focusing on certain areas: you just want large cities to be the focus.",tmone,e96o0df,conservative
"California is unlivable because of property prices, which are mostly because so many want to move there and live there...",Cryptic0677,e95s1ay,conservative
"Exactly what’s happening in Colorado, it used to be a real battleground state, now it’ll be blue for a long time ",jwagz1234,e95udt6,conservative
"Sounds like Minnesota. 

Rumor was she married her brother.",Moonthrower,e95so60,conservative
"proposal 2 in Michigan is a nightmare. 

>Ballot Text: This proposed constitutional amendment would: Create a commission of 13 registered voters randomly selected by the Secretary of State: 4 each who self-identify as affiliated with the 2 major political parties; and 5 who self-identify as unaffiliated with major political parties. Prohibit partisan officeholders and candidates, their employees, certain relatives, and lobbyists from serving as commissioners. Establish new redistricting criteria including geographically compact and contiguous districts of equal population, reflecting Michigan’s diverse population and communities of interest. Districts shall not provide disproportionate advantage to political parties or candidates. Require an appropriation of funds for commission operations and commissioner compensation. 

**RECOMMENDATION: Vote NO**.
Traditionally when one party is in power the other complains and vows to work harder next election. These days the party that loses protests and seeks to change the ground rules for the rest of time. We should be very wary of votes that change Michigan's Constitution like this Proposal 2 and Proposal 3 do. This Proposal calls for an  ""Independent"" Commission. There is no such thing as an ""Independent"" commission. Power on this is centralized under the Secretary of State who selects commission members. The only state with a Districting 'commission' like called for in this gerrymandering proposal is California. Not good!",Detroit_Telkepnaya,e95yoqy,conservative
"Can confirm, we are a disaster. California actually lost more residents to other states than it gained last year and the same trend is continuing. California has seen more than 15 consecutive years of net resident losses to other states. Just being taxed to death. Governor Jerry Brown has done nothing but make matters worse. Yet nobody is willing to address it. ",1994spaceodyssey,e95xhtd,conservative
"> populous State to stick around because their voices would count even less than they already do.

Is having equal voting power to every other citizen an issue?? ~~compared to less populous states currently having substantially more voting power?~~

> States as individual entities matter.

They certainly do.  Which is why we have the Senate and the House.",porksandwich9113,e95z9j2,conservative
That's why we elect representatives. Reality is hard for leftists. ,Rightquercusalba,e96bgq8,conservative
[removed],,e965qn9,conservative
"Despite Phoenix, Arizona is the 14th most populated state between Washington and Massachusetts.",super_ag,e95sp39,conservative
That's why the House of Representatives exists. ,Rightquercusalba,e96b6dm,conservative
"yeah, but nobody's talking about ""the land."" we're talking about federal vs. state interests. using ""the land"" literally is just sophistry.",SKWM3000,e96csy9,conservative
What about the rule of 30k though?,skimansgaming,e9651i7,conservative
"here's why you're wrong.

we are a UNION of STATES. the STATES elect the president. the people do not. that is why we do not use the popular vote.

this may also clear up another head-scratcher. why do we have a senate and a house? it was a compromise. in the senate, every state has an equal vote. in the house, the people have equal representation. up until the passage of the 17th amendment, state legislatures elected their state senators, not the people of the state. this was because, again, the senate reflected the state's interests, not the people's.

all part of the compromises necessary to ensure that states would abandon the articles of confederation, under which each state had a lot of control over its own affairs, in favor of the constitutional government.

you may say it's irrelevant because of the wisespread availability of information. perhaps that is true. what is not irrelevant is that our electoral college process reflects the bicameral nature of our government. to change it would be to fundamentally transform our nation from a union of states to a subordination of states to the federal power.
",SKWM3000,e967qyu,conservative
"> This has been the ONLY way the right is able to get a president in office.

\>when an NPC is too young to remember the 2004 election",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97utqu,conservative
“Fanny bandit”? Really?,thegypsymc,e95qu20,conservative
"Yea imagine what they would do to our economy, I’m sure they have no clue with California having the 5th largest in the world lol",MCpothead567,e960ir4,conservative
[deleted],,e95s4up,conservative
no.,SKWM3000,e96ctas,conservative
Shouldn't every state in the United States have some input?,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97uofd,conservative
"good, you're getting it.",SKWM3000,e967x0m,conservative
"For those downvoting: A democratic republic is good. Which is what we f'ing are.

Pure democracy is mob rule. And that is bad.",crashohno,e96da99,conservative
">  Popular vote is long overdue, and has literally lead to 12 years of conservative rule in the last 20 years.

1. fucking good, the rule of law, free markets, and anti-racism. be happy.

2. and if the popular vote had led to progressive leadership all this time, we wouldn't hear a fucking peep out of you.",SKWM3000,e96cq6n,conservative
nope. refer to madison's notes during the constitutional convention or just brush up on basic civics.,SKWM3000,e96cvdu,conservative
"I have no issue with electoral college if we go back to equal representatives in it, the current system is heavily in favor in less populated regions.",skimansgaming,e965etl,conservative
That is why they are desperately trying to turn it blue. A very large chunk of Beto's money came from out of state.,frehop,e964h8i,conservative
That’s the role of the senate representation. The abandonment of the tile of 30k screws the whole system. A vote in California is worth less than a vote in North Dakota ,skimansgaming,e9657ka,conservative
Not so scary like this. ,WonderBlarbleGlarble,e962p5e,conservative
[removed],,e962joo,conservative
"And all of a sudden it seems perfectly reasonable. Much more reasonable, in fact, than voting in several president that the majority of American voters don't want.",pazimpanet,e9631gn,conservative
"Here’s an accurate one of the EC votes.

https://www.3ders.org/images2016/help-kids-make-sense-us-elections-3d-printed-electoral-college-map-1.jpg",Abram_SF,e96bdeo,conservative
Why would you ever want to do that?,Castaway77,e95yl2p,conservative
Purple blob just south of KY. ,SuptGodBotherer,e95s34n,conservative
I’m from TN and I’m kinda bummed about that lol. ,Koolbreeze88,e95whrn,conservative
"Right. It's not a cool concept map, it's literally a cartoon trying to say only 4 states matter.",BrewCrewKevin,e96khhc,conservative
I like this one too. Data is beautiful.,Abram_SF,e96byte,conservative
"Not the OP you’re replying to, but they would focus on large cities because that is where the largest concentration of voters are. It’s simply the most efficient way to reach a wide audience without them having to travel a long distance. ",ramen_poodle_soup,e96877b,conservative
"Whipping votes is pretty easy when you can post a volunteer at the bottom of a high-rise apartment complex and spam everybody that comes or goes with a brochure and a pep talk.

It's much harder when you have to canvas half the county to reach 1000 people.

Even putting aside the argument of equal state sovereignty, this is a strong argument against abolishing the electoral college.",dafunkmonster,e95zibd,conservative
You can't prove that,RajinKajin,e963v1c,conservative
"For anyone interested in reality:
Georgia actually has nearly 20 times the population of Wyoming.

Nashville, TN has more people than Wyoming.
Walmart employees about three Wyoming’s worth of people.",Elbobosan,e95xo19,conservative
Is this a meme or something? Because otherwise you're completely wrong. ,_ThereWasAnAttempt_,e95z3lw,conservative
"Wyoming has fewer people than Vermont, and you can barely see Vermont on the map.",naidim,e95xxdi,conservative
"Just did a quick search:

>Atlanta/Population  
>  
>486,290 (2017)

&#x200B;

>Wyoming/Population  
>  
>579,315 (2017)",ImmutableInscrutable,e964ae0,conservative
(Looks like mexico and canada carry wayy more power than I thought /s) /s,TheKillector,e960lpf,conservative
noice,jrackow,e9604ck,conservative
"""I've never read a basic econ book.""",DEFCON_TWO,e96h54u,conservative
"I think the thing that has hurt primaries more than anything are closed primaries. Moderate voices that say they’re independent get locked out of primaries, but that’s something like 45% of the electorate nowadays.",the_guitargeek,e95y3hm,conservative
Imagine how the ground game for each campaign would change if everything was in play.,the_guitargeek,e963xym,conservative
"Conservative living in WA here, I'm not even registered.",Titofish,e96b1qh,conservative
[removed],,e966oen,conservative
"Just read up on this briefly. I’ve heard this discussed in theory, but didn’t realize states already committed to it.

I know the more states that are on board the better it would be, but I am curious about something. Would something like this work if they just cleared the 270 majority of electoral votes needed regardless of the amount of states on board?",the_guitargeek,e95ywvh,conservative
"If that many states can agree, why wouldn't they have their representatives in Congress vote to amend the Constitution?",TrueBirch,e960k9a,conservative
The national popular vote is the one of dumbest idea I’ve ever heard ,QuartermasterShekel,e95zkjx,conservative
That would make sense if minority interests alligned with state borders.,sh1tpost1nsh1t,e96c3p6,conservative
">Only if we actually were represented

By the logic of your utterly moronic no true scotsman only direct democracy could ever be considered democracy, because the moment a politician you voted for loses you no longer have representation. Wouldn't expect any less from you mouthbreathers.

>Votes are not counted properly

Except they are :)

> It doesn't matter if it's working as intended

It doesn't matter to you, but nobody gives a shit about what you consider important.

>if it was intended to work in a way that didn't make any sense

Except it does, because the Union was and still is a collection of different states with different interests and needs; your inability to comprehend this fact has no bearing on the validity of the concept sweetie.

>The bigger states are part of that Union, and the people in them shouldn't be dominated by the people in the smaller states

And they aren't, big states still have more electoral votes, genius! That's not ""domination"", unlike what would happen to smaller states if electoral college was abolished. Have you ever been introduced to the novel concept of weight function at your obviously terrible school? But that's beside the point; this system is part of a consensus that was reached between the Union states and is one of the factors keeping it intact. Some states would have no reason to join the Union if they were to be subjected to the simple majority rule. Electoral college was the correct choice and it's here to stay, so cry me a river bby!",Kryvakryz,e99eu2d,conservative
"It's almost as if US was a constitutional republic, and not a democracy 🤔",Kryvakryz,e97twxj,conservative
"Well if you're going to be obtuse and so pedantic about it, then I regret to inform you that the current system also falls under the definition of ""democratic"" regardless of your personal feelings on the matter. Sorry to burst your little bubble hun.

>that's not a good excuse

It's not an ""excuse"" silly boy, you flatter yourself if you think someone is going to apologize to you for electoral college; the system works as it was intended, preventing the bigger states from dominating the Union. Suck on it.",Kryvakryz,e999apl,conservative
"You misspelled New Orleans, Gatlinburg, and Myrtle Beach ",aikenator,e967sb0,conservative
https://m.sfgate.com/local/article/map-street-sidewalk-poop-feces-311-report-waste-13278828.php,BJUmholtz,e95x5pe,conservative
"I am almost positive SF has more street shits than LA

we need DESIGNATED streets for that kind of thing like India /s",Baptism-Of-Fire,e962coa,conservative
Is it not a change based off of population?,ExpectedB,e96brsc,conservative
[removed],,e969kyj,conservative
How would that work? Like the governor/state legislators are the only ones who cast a vote?,SpaceChimera,e96azm1,conservative
"So of course the flip side under the current system is that the people in Kentucky have more political influence per person than the people in California. So by your words the couple of rural folks in Kentucky have power over all the people in California. Which is okay, while the other way around is not, because...? 🤔",RobosaurusRex2000,e96c8or,conservative
"Yeah, it doesn't matter how you vote. If you're in California or Texas, your vote really doesn't count. It's why I refused to vote in the 2000 and 2004 elections. What's the point? Bush was gonna win Texas by a huge margin.

Hell, I even threw away my Presidential vote in 2016 because I knew Trump would carry Texas easily. So I wrote in Ted Cruz because I couldn't bring myself to vote for Trump.

PSA though: Vote even if your Presidential vote doesn't count. There are always down-ballot candidates who need your help.",super_ag,e95sm93,conservative
"Also how parties change over time. If a candidate wins but by a smaller margin, they'll notice and adjust their platform.",joshlittle333,e962x9o,conservative
"Also, plenty of red voters in Texas knew that their vote wasn't critical, and the same was true of blue voters in NY.",dafunkmonster,e95ydor,conservative
Total votes still means plenty. Especially when you look at voter demographics and what percentage of people are more likely to come out to vote. Trump had fewer votes with a high rate of (likely to vote Republican) Boomer turnout and low rate of (likely to vote Democrat) Millennial turnout. You can get plenty of information out of total votes.,ImmutableInscrutable,e9657y9,conservative
"State sovereignty was lost in 1861, and to be honest I think it's better that way. With the ease of communication and transportation today, state sovereignty has a fraction of the relevance it had 250 years ago. ",ManBMitt,e96040p,conservative
"The counter argument being that we need to put our finger on the scales in order to enfranchise voters based solely on the criteria of ""where they live"". 

In any other scenario of political consequence, Republicans, classic liberals, whatever, that entire side of the political aisle would convulse in horror at the thought of using a weighting system that makes votes worth more than other votes.

It is legit shocking to me how casually one vote = one vote is dismissed.

Edit: don't just downvote. Make your case. ",Im_Just_Pretending,e962mt0,conservative
"> it's ****ing unconstitutional.

I don't think that means what you think it means. The Electoral College is definitively constitutional because it's in the U.S. Constitution. Now, one could argue it's unfair to voters in populous States. However, I think it's fine as is to curb the influence of the large States to give the sparse ones some say.",RightMillennial,e95yyyf,conservative
"You fundamentally misunderstand the form of government we have. We do not have a Direct Democracy. We have an INDIRECT or REPRESENTATIVE Democracy in which the State’s are party to the Constitution, the STATE votes on the president. The electoral college is the methodology by the people in the state’s are represented in proportion to their population vs the population of the whole country. 

Nothing in the constitution gives the individual the right to cast a vote for President, the electoral college is set up to provide the state’s the right to vote for President, in fact, the people didn’t originally have the right to vote for Senators, they were state legislator appointees and it was the 17th amendment that made them an elected position by the populace.

If you want to complain about the electoral college the complaint should be that many of the largest voters in the Electoral College are under represented.

California percent of US pop. 12.14%, percent of electoral votes 10.22%

Texas 8.69% vs 7.06%

New York 6.09% vs 5.39%

Florida 6.44% vs 5.39%

Illinois 3.93% vs 3.72%

If we were to adjust the EC votes to make these 5 states better match their population California would get 10 more votes, Texas 9, NY 4, Florida 6 and Illinois 1.

So in reality a vote in California is discounted by about 18% vs smaller state’s while a vote in Texas is discounted 23% etc.",BigAggie06,e961gf8,conservative
"Well, your vote still counts. It's not like your vote or mine literally doesn't count. That phrase is just hyperbole.",HuskarDc,e95zudj,conservative
My head hurts. Politics is confusing ,BD1304,e966w64,conservative
Cool. Thanks!!,BD1304,e95xxhk,conservative
Right. Because California has 35M people whereas Montana has 17 people and some sheep?,BD1304,e95w29s,conservative
"Deciding a president via popular vote isn't pure democracy. It's representative democracy. A pure democracy would be the people voting on every government decision.

We will still have a constitution and three branches of government with checks and balances on eachother if we decide the president via popular vote.",Blue9390,e960rav,conservative
"Please fill me in then.  Because what I’ve been reading - 10,000+ voters have been purged.  I have nothing but news to go off of, so I have no clue if it’s true or not.  

I didn’t make this statement to prod at republicans - I’m simply asking for an honest answer because I am uninformed.   Or are you still stuck in the whole “DEMS BAD - ORANGE MAN GOD!!” mentality?  ",Reaching2Hard,e9823nj,conservative
Please answer me.  It’s a legitimate question.  I’ve searched it - and I have yet come across an honest legitimate reason they would do this.  It honestly sounds like they’re purging voters who’d vote democrat.  Which is fucked up. ,Reaching2Hard,e994pue,conservative
"States get plenty of influence and power through their senators and house reps, the argument against the electoral college is that it disenfranchises voters who are the minority in a state that doesn't allow proportional distribution. If an election is consistently a 45/55 split, that's 45% of the population being told to go pound sand every election, their vote literally didn't matter.

If something is broken you fix it, that us why the constitution is amendable, it isn't perfect and the founders knew that.",Chirox82,e960cul,conservative
Yeah sure Congressman and senators who directly represent and lead the state are voted on by the population of a state and everyone in the state gets 1 vote no smaller electoral college so keep that then for the president who represent and leads the nation everyone in the nation gets 1 vote,BigDaddyReptar,e95zb1q,conservative
Except it wouldn't be NY or CA it would be the people the state shouldn't matter sure those people live in NY and CA but the stage shouldn't matter only what each individual person votes,BigDaddyReptar,e95zrxv,conservative
"No one's vote would get snubbed, they would all get counted equally",djangoman2k,e969dt6,conservative
For national elections? Yes it should be voted on as the people of the nation not the people of some state,BigDaddyReptar,e95ztua,conservative
So what is it then? Equity?,Zetesofos,e95xdhh,conservative
"Oh, what are you referring to? Spell it out please.",Rotau,e969z00,conservative
More corruption? ,kylesibert,e95wh2v,conservative
That sounds like the myth of progress: the fatalistic belief that all changes are permanent and good.  This isn't a digital process or a permanent one.  We just generally need to divest power away from DC and put it back into the states.  Cut federal spending and give the responsibility as well as the funds to the states.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e95uxeg,conservative
The core issue is that America abandoned the rule of 30k which screws r true representation.,skimansgaming,e965j6e,conservative
"Texas also has a large population. Cali, Texas, FL, NY are by far the biggest, most important states, the current system doesn’t reflect that power.",BlackYoshi1234,e96b747,conservative
"That is true, but each area has an equal voice. It's not like a vote in Texas or California vs. Montana or Idaho.

First past the post is a problem but I'm not nearly qualified enough to suggest solutions. I'm not trying to offer solutions or make suggestions, just express where I'm coming from when I see this system.

Mainly, I want to know why the electoral votes of a state must be all red or blue. Why can't they be split like Maine or Nebraska? Is it because the states have to enact legislation to change this?",Classic_Appa,e9654bm,conservative
"And provinces like Alberta don’t get a say, as the election is over before we even get to vote. I envy your electoral college America.",Cadd19,e964h3a,conservative
And strict zoning laws make it really difficult to add supply to that demand.,super_ag,e95sf64,conservative
So many rich people want to live there*,kotov9syndrome,e95s9bt,conservative
No.  It's because cities like San Francisco make it impossible to build adequate housing.,dafunkmonster,e95z7vc,conservative
"this is the dumbest thing i have ever heard. you leftists need basic remedial lessons in economics.

hint: think of the supply side, not just myopically focus on demand.",dtlv5813,e95xlxy,conservative
LOL.  Give me that math and let me destroy it.,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e965tow,conservative
:'(,SKWM3000,e968o2h,conservative
"That's a great copy paste of what we have now and how we got here.  Does the state decide on the president?  Who votes for that?  

It's the people.  The electoral college is just a middle man.",touch0ph,e96dbhl,conservative
[deleted],,e95qx7j,conservative
Why,Altomckee,e96cw62,conservative
"Who you callin they, buddy?!",GoodWillPower,e964z9a,conservative
"The founding fathers were eminently concerned with protecting the minority. And not minority in the sense that people think of today, but *political* minorities. After all being the political minority under the crown hadn't worked out so well for them, and they saw political minorities being repressed all over Europe. So they created a system that gave disproportionate power to the 49%. This was done on purpose. It's not an accident. Folks like Samuel Adams were also DEEPLY suspicious of Federalism, and it was the only way to get the Anti-Federalist to agree to sign onto the new Constitution.

EDIT: Couple of typos.",sonofsmog,e96darm,conservative
"If we elected presidents via popular vote then that would void the contract the states made when they formed the union.

It would be grounds for secession.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9695t0,conservative
"You should tag that sarcasm before someone gets hurt!

Do you think that the founder's fears of the tyranny of the majority were overblown? If so, how?",RadioRoscoe,e966mxw,conservative
For Cedar Point!,yourzero,e95zh8v,conservative
"Your right, my phone can load enough of the pixels to make out the TN.",Raz_A_Gul,e95st7u,conservative
That’s Indiana IN,Koolbreeze88,e95wni7,conservative
"But the Constitution was *literally written* to avoid catering only the the largest cities.  It's *exactly why* we have a bicameral legislature and the electoral college.  The founding fathers struck a balance so that all the balloting power *would not be entirely based in the large cities.*  You're literally admitting that you want to effectively disenfranchise everywhere but the largest cities because there's no reason to go anywhere else.

Nuts to that.",thatrightwinger,e974t8s,conservative
"We don’t want to focus on voters. We want to focus on *states.* We’re a union of equals. To focus on NY/CA/TX/FL to the exclusion of 40+ other states creates a tyranny of the majority. 

Larger states get more say in the House and less say in Presidential elections. That is the balance of power. ",_TheConsumer_,e96i8wk,conservative
That's kind of a garbage argument in the era of mass communication. You know what's easier than posting someone in a high rise apartment complex? Tweeting. Using facebook. Or email. Or texting. Or a phone call. Or *any other form of communication*. ,SongOfUpAndDownVotes,e965lzr,conservative
Georgia has 4 counties (and we have a lot of small counties) with a greater population than Wyoming!,outinthehills,e95y980,conservative
"I was interested and looked it up:

[Georgia Population](https://www.google.com/search?q=georgia+population):

> 10.43 million (2017)

[Wyoming Population](https://www.google.com/search?q=wyoming+population):

> 579,315 (2017)

So really it's pretty close to 18x the population.  Facts are so much better than just saying numbers and what multiple of population it is.",Zudane,e961ijc,conservative
I think he's counting antelope.,rf-engineer,e95z8i5,conservative
"Apparently sarcasm doesn't translate well, no matter how obvious, here.

Wyoming is about 6 times as large as Georgia on the poorly drawn map.",outinthehills,e9638zl,conservative
"That's a misleading number too because Atlanta is divided into a lot of different municipalities. The metro area figure is 5,789,700. ",hisverbisdictis,e969o74,conservative
Does /s*/s cancel our like negatives? Or does it equal 2(/s)?,MrPitman123,e965921,conservative
It also keeps opposing party members from just voting for the candidate on the other side they see as being the most beatable. It's a trade off. ,_ThereWasAnAttempt_,e95z6a4,conservative
Honestly though it’s really just the diehards in both parties who bother to show up to the primaries anyways. Until that changes primaries will reward the more extreme and passionate sides of both parties.,Who-did-that-to-you,e964vcb,conservative
Its because it's the party deciding who their candidate will be for an election. Its supposed to be closed to party members only.,Robert_The_Tire,e967cac,conservative
">Moderate voices that say they’re independent get locked out of primaries

No one is locked out. Affiliate with a party, you can vote in their primary if it's closed. ",dtiftw,e962pod,conservative
[removed],,e964nnn,conservative
This kind of thinking is *why* Texas will always be red.,Marcheesio,e967qtv,conservative
Yes,DeltaDragonxx,e95zjg7,conservative
"If they get 270 votes pledged, the DNC wins every election from here on out. ",JMB_was_a_god,e95zrzq,conservative
"you need 2/3 of the house, 2/3 of the senate and 3/4 of the states. constitutional amendments are impossible with this political division.",JMB_was_a_god,e961uzz,conservative
"Because they'd never get the majority of Senators or states to agree to it. They can, however, try and use their superior population numbers to circumvent the constitution entirely. It's textbook tyranny of the majority.",Publix_Deli,e966cuv,conservative
Why? Genuinely curious why that sort of representation would be dumb. ,WonderBlarbleGlarble,e962lxv,conservative
"Genuine question, why? Shouldn't 1 persons vote count as much as another's? Why do the majority of people have to be ignored? Why not do it like some other countries and give the party with 40% of the vote 40% control of the government, 20% of the vote 20% control, etc? 


I mean, everyone points to California and says they have too much power, well they also have a bigger economy than almost every other state combined. They should have more power, because a small state like Utah shouldn't have any say in what an economic superpower like California does. That's like a third string quarterback forcing the coach to bench the League MVP first string quarterback because the third stringer feels like he's not getting enough playtime. Quit complaining and do what's best for the team. 


I feel everybody should have some way of supporting what they feel is in their families best interests and right now, whether I agree with them or not, many people are just ignored. There's no way that's fair. ",neogod,e963t4y,conservative
[removed],,e964d3w,conservative
the interests of smaller states *are* minority interests in the system you desire.,SKWM3000,e96cawn,conservative
"That’s some Bay Area shit, don’t put that on LA",TheMaguffin,e95xb1k,conservative
"we're a union of states. the people in the state vote. the person with the most votes is the person the state is voting for. that person gets awarded a sum of electoral votes dependent upon the population of that state. thus the state votes, not the individual.",SKWM3000,e96bp43,conservative
"That's why the electoral college exists, I CAN believe you don't understand that. ",Rightquercusalba,e96c4y2,conservative
"Living in Florida gives you a lot of stress, but at least you know your vote counts.",YaBoiRexTillerson,e95teaa,conservative
"Haha, my North Dakota vote counts for more than all y’all’s. ",nomoresneezeplz,e961q9h,conservative
"When somebody robs you, what court do you end up in?  When you buy real estate, where do you get a new title?  When somebody violates a contract with you, where do you sue them?

The idea that it's better to amass power in the federal government is a foolish one that I don't have time to dismantle here.",dafunkmonster,e962o31,conservative
"It's irritating how quickly people discount state sovereignty.

It's also irritating how hard people worship notions of direct democracy.

The electoral college balances popular representation against state representation.  It's the same reason we have a House of Representatives and a Senate.  Because state sovereignty matters.",dafunkmonster,e963lmd,conservative
"The people complaining it's unfair to people in big states like CA and TX are the same ones who call the Midwest ""flyover states."" The electoral college exists because people who live in North Dakota or Montana wouldn't have any control over their federal government because even if every resident of those states voted the same way, it wouldn't make a dent against the votes from larger states. The EC is an artificial method to normalize that difference and ensure that everyone counts, not just the urbanites in NYC or San Francisco.",dicaparly,e961u69,conservative
Exactly. It would be based on the desires of the voting population of the country rather than the voting population of each state deciding how each state will vote. ,LordLongbeard,e95wbfl,conservative
"But of that 35M, at least 15M are unrepresented republicans. There has to be a sweet spot where we can say “yes, the states are kept in check” and “yes, all votes truly matter”. ",Whiskey_Dry,e95wuat,conservative
"Basically. The whole point was that President's couldn't just appeal to states with the most population, which would be urban or metropolitan and all think mostly alike. They would have to consider flyover states as well",linklight127,e95w9hy,conservative
Then why are people trying to get Trump impeached and calling him a fascist that will take control of America's future? We still have checks and balances and three branches of gov.,nellis_island,e96359f,conservative
">Except it wouldn't be NY or CA

>sure those people live in NY and CA 

I get your point, but this is mine. The founding fathers put this system in place for *more* representation than we would have in a direct democracy. As someone in Louisiana, I want a say in who becomes president, because New York doesn't have the same problems as Louisiana. We won't vote for the same issues.

Also, there's the problem of factions. Imagine if Antifa or (actual) Nazis had the numbers to decide the election, who they might elect. If there is no check or balance, then a dictator could be elected and disassemble the system as we know it. If you're not in that majority faction, you'd have no say.

Is the electoral college messed up? Yes. But getting rid of it altogether will open 10 other cans of worms. ",MiceTonerAccount,e961glj,conservative
"But the nation is comprised of states.  It isn't one giant monolithic entity.  It's 50 separate state governments that are joined together through a mutual agreement.

Here's a novel idea: What if the president's job was inconsequential in our daily lives?  What if the president's power was constrained such that, aside from matters of national security, the choice of president really didn't affect individual citizens?",dafunkmonster,e960ona,conservative
"That's why Democrats keep trying to turn Texas purple, because the next color is blue. And if that happens then you have two of the largest states tracking human shit all over the country. The electoral college provides people a means to escape the tyranny of the majority. Texas is a refugee state, California refugees. ",Rightquercusalba,e96cncq,conservative
"Yes each state decides how to appoint their electoral votes, and its a statewide election because its supposed to represent all of the state not subdivisions of it",fullname001,e965el1,conservative
"The supply is a huge problem in SF, and a lot of people on the left actually want to fix that. There's just an entrenched class of citizens that lobby hard to prevent it. Most of the rest of California doesn't have the same kind of government choked supply issues. LA for instance is super sprawled and super dense all at the same time. Supply isn't the limiting factor there that is driving up prices.

 It turns out a lot of people like living where the climate is nice, where there's an ocean, mountains, and good jobs, more than they hate high tax burdens",Cryptic0677,e95y4gd,conservative
"no, it's not the people. it's the states. the states represent the people in the election. states decide how they will poll the people within their borders in order to determine what the state will say in the actual election, the same way that a state gets 2 senators to represent it.",SKWM3000,e96dt74,conservative
"It’s outdated and distasteful slang for a gay person, so feel free to continue using it but expect negative responses like mine",thegypsymc,e95ttel,conservative
because.,SKWM3000,e96d17r,conservative
"You didn’t know? 

If you use broad strokes and general statements, you can make almost anyone look like a bad guy!",The_Ultimate_Hope_,e965bgy,conservative
"As they rightfully should have been.  It is no less than amazing foresight that they realized this when living in just one little corner of what would eventually become the modern US, but Possum Grape, Arkansas shouldn't and can't be governed exactly the same as New York, New York. That's also why they gave the states some rights that were largely taken away by Woodrow Wilson. ",jhnmiller84,e96gmwd,conservative
"Electoral college only elects the president. Even if  we did away with the electoral college and the majority of Americans elected the president every time, how is that tyranny of the majority? Did you forget that we have two other branches of government? ",larrylevan,e9690yd,conservative
"I didn't see their point before but now I Cedar Point!

... I'll show myself to the door.",GoodWillPower,e964xgq,conservative
NJ should be 1/2 the size of NY. This map is stupid. ,,e95w4l6,conservative
"That’s what I thought, then I found IN in the North.",Raz_A_Gul,e95wzdp,conservative
Indiana IN is to the west of Ohio on the map. ,SuptGodBotherer,e95ws9s,conservative
"Basically this. Or having a message that isn't very polarizing such that people on the other side are more likely to vote for you.
Democrats would be more likely to talk less about gun control, because liberal voters aren't as passionate about gun control as conservative voters are passionate about guns. 

",LincolnTransit,e968jft,conservative
The fact that you're advocating a system of government that presupposes the existence of a communication medium that has only existed for 10 years is the most absurd thing of all in this thread.,dafunkmonster,e96nlor,conservative
"Twitter and FB...  you miss everyone who either doesn't use them (like yours truly) and the people who filter out / ignore political posts. I'm sure it will still be effective to a point, but I wouldn't hinge and election on it.

Email & text messages - yeah, we all love SPAM, especially when it's a text msg.

Phone call? If I don't know you, I don't answer the phone. 

Perhaps I'm in the minority on this one but both my wife and I both got hit up at the door by a campaign volunteer recently, a D and an R both. The canvassers didn't bother us a bit. They don't keep pestering us like their SPAM.",scottbomb,e96c2jj,conservative
"Thanks for the numbers.  I’m comfortable with 18 being “nearly 20” when correcting an approx. 120x error.
",Elbobosan,e965bfx,conservative
Yeah it read as if you were explaining why Wyoming was drawn bigger. ,_ThereWasAnAttempt_,e965u72,conservative
"If its possible to be sarcastic about being sarcastic then I think that is what I said meant.

This is a new idea, termed meta-sarcasm.",TheKillector,e9677t7,conservative
(/s)^2,JDRuzkin,e96a1va,conservative
I don’t know that this would be as much an issue as people make it out to be. I can only speak for myself but my love for my country far exceeds any love I have for any political party. I think I would rather choose between two or three excellent options rather than two or three dog turds that might get served up. ,Killersavage,e9634na,conservative
I assume more people would see it as an opportunity to vote for a moderate candidate (or least evil in today's polarized terms) on the other side.  I'd love to be able to vote for the candidates that are closest to my interests on both sides then pick the best at the ballot.,BatteryLicker,e963b61,conservative
You could already do that by switching your registration from repub to Dem or vice versa now though. Sure it'd be easier with open primaries but it's not exactly hard now,SpaceChimera,e96ai3w,conservative
"People already do that though, if you know who the incumbent will be you just switch parties when you register. ",DonnieMoscowIsGuilty,e96bygw,conservative
So Independents...Independents are locked out,patkavv,e966rwm,conservative
the smugness of the Ohio voters during their presidential debate was annoying AF. my vote should count as much as theirs (spoiler alert: it unfortunately doesn't).,madonna-boy,e96799l,conservative
Why?,Im_Just_Pretending,e961oop,conservative
"It is because of [the tyranny of the majority](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tyranny_of_the_majority).

>The tyranny of the majority (or tyranny of the masses) is an inherent weakness of majority rule in which the majority of an electorate can and does place its own interests above, and at the expense of, those in the minority. This results in oppression of minority groups comparable to that of a tyrant or despot, argued John Stuart Mill in his 1859 book On Liberty.

I would also suggest reading Madison's [Federalist #10](https://www.congress.gov/resources/display/content/The+Federalist+Papers#TheFederalistPapers-10)",RadioRoscoe,e967m5x,conservative
"So the rural farmer in Iowa should have his life dictated by the whims of the populations of San Francisco and New York City? What happens to the Alaskan when those same populations decide on ""an Australian-style mandatory gun buyback"" (confiscation)? The point of the electoral college is to prevent tyranny of the majority, where 55% of the people run roughshod over the other 45%. Our current system isn't perfect, but it's better than the above scenario by miles.",SovietUrsa,e964q1t,conservative
"You only need good ideas for city dwellers if you get rid of the electoral college, and on top of that, it loses the fact that we are a collection of states, each with their own laws and cultures. We are a union of states, not just one big state. Just imagine for a moment that the government has trouble governing places that are geographically far away (it does) and you'll see why it's a bad idea for someone in New York to make policy for someone in Hawaii. The second you say ""well we would have both"" you start down the rabbit hole that got us to our current system. Very smart people who lived under tyrannies designed our system to be the least abusable by those in power. The closer we can stick to that the better off we are. ",Treavor,e965s2k,conservative
"States don't have interests, their citizens do.",sh1tpost1nsh1t,e96cg49,conservative
"plenty of human feces all over downtown la, fairfax and other parts of the city.",dtlv5813,e95xjdu,conservative
I live in OC and went to Hollywood a few months back. Trust me LA is definitely in the mentions ,blkbillclint,e95ymr4,conservative
"Bay area shit?

Pun intended??",the_guitargeek,e95z20e,conservative
"https://patch.com/california/los-angeles/feces-found-bootleg-makeup-sold-los-angeles  

https://legalinsurrection.com/2018/07/kosher-cafe-in-los-angeles-protested-because-owner-supports-trump-immigration-policy/  

https://www.firehouse.com/careers-education/news/21017039/los-angeles-firefighter-finds-feces-smeared-on-gear-suit-says  ",BJUmholtz,e95z37c,conservative
[removed],,e96e1k3,conservative
"Stress about what?

I live in South Florida and I can't say I'm ""stressed"" about much of anything.",Cronus6,e95wejf,conservative
"Yeah but you live in North Dakota. 

",Mescallan,e963l7g,conservative
"Pump the breaks, bud. I don't see where anyone said ""get rid of states entirely."" States ought to be to the Federal government as Counties are to State government. The way it's set up in the constitution, states are more like their own mini country, but clearly that's not how it works anymore.",ImmutableInscrutable,e965jot,conservative
"States are great for administrative purposes (similar to counties), which is what your post is referencing and I agree with completely. However it makes zero sense why major laws differ so much state-to-state. ",ManBMitt,e966yzj,conservative
"Let's abstract this to see how irritated we feel about this.

""We need a system to balance representation. This system will weight in favor of X and the method of weighting to insure enfranchisement will be discounting some voters and overweighting others. ""

And everyone vomits at the thought and rues how the distortion will damage the system. Imagine if any other criteria was used to enfranchise.

The House and Senate are both similarly polluted by this phenomena. Each and every system designed to raise up a subset at the expense of everyone else who's only crime is living on one side or the other of an arbitrary line. Perhaps one of the 3 of president, Senate and House could not be distorted? I would argue that President is the clear choice if we were going to change one because obviously it's a straight national race affecting everyone equally.  You would still have over representation in... every other election of consequence. Isn't that enough?

If this did not exist and we proposed it today, it would be wholly, utterly, completely disregarded by conservatism.

",Im_Just_Pretending,e969fp3,conservative
This picture really dictates why we have to have the electoral college. Whoever carries 3/4 of those states wins the election every time. There is no reason to prevent 47 other states from getting a say in a nationwide vote. ,imtoolazytothinkof1,e9659zu,conservative
I think I know about the US government now than my own.,BD1304,e95wf7o,conservative
Sounds confusing. ,BD1304,e95ye5e,conservative
That makes a lot of sense. Otherwise if you get California and New York on your side you're basically golden.,BD1304,e95wc2p,conservative
"This is not why the electoral college was created. The electoral college was created because the southern states didn't get as many votes because a large amount of their population was made up of slaves, who couldn't vote, unlike the north's slaves. The electoral college was created so that slaves could count towards their populations as 3/5th of a person and increase their voting power. 

http://time.com/4558510/electoral-college-history-slavery/",postmodernchicken,e966gmb,conservative
[removed],,e963uor,conservative
"they either don't know basic civics, or they do and they are simply unhappy that they can't lord power over everyone who disagrees with them the way a direct democracy would allow them to.",SKWM3000,e968s03,conservative
"L.A.is nimbyism central,dipshit!


",dtlv5813,e961faj,conservative
[deleted],,e95u4ne,conservative
Oh okay ,Altomckee,e96iqbn,conservative
[removed],,e969la9,conservative
The idea behind the electoral college is the same idea behind electing representatives (less so) and senators (more so). All of these systems were designed with the intent to sacrifice a little fairness in exchange for a protection from a greater evil ([Tyranny of the majority](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tyranny_of_the_majority)).,RadioRoscoe,e96a5gq,conservative
"> ... I'll show myself to the door.

Get back in here and take your up vote",digoryk,e966rfw,conservative
Werd ,Koolbreeze88,e95xcxx,conservative
Did you forget about Operation Chaos?,gbimmer,e9682t7,conservative
"You're correct, you can only speak for yourself. Unfortunately not everyone feels that way. There's a LOT more partisans these days than there used to be. ",_ThereWasAnAttempt_,e965rqf,conservative
That means you can't vote in your own primary though. Much less likely to happen in closed primaries. ,_ThereWasAnAttempt_,e96co88,conservative
"No one is locked out. Affiliate with a party, you can vote in their primary if it's closed. 

It's a really, really simple concept. ",dtiftw,e968va7,conservative
Because the Democrats will always win the popular vote.,JMB_was_a_god,e961rz4,conservative
"Lol. If you can't please everybody, shouldn't you at least try to please the majority over the minority? If the minority wants to reap the benefits of being the majority they should do some work and convince the majority they are wrong, not create ways to cheat their way to the top. That's some lazy, bass ackwords thinking. ",neogod,e96ao4l,conservative
"That's why you have a local government. Federal government dictates foreign trade and whatnot, local government dictates what effects you in particular. The soybean farmer in Iowa should not be able to effect what Silicon Valley does in relation to China. Right now they do. That's B.S. and stupid. ",neogod,e9655eb,conservative
"That is more of an argument for keeping power at a state level. It doesn't make sense for federal power to prioritize the artificial structure of states over the will of the people. Just like Rural Iowans shouldn't have their life dictated by san franciscans, neither should san franciscans have their lives dictated by rural farmers. Neither should be ruled by the other, that is why we have state governments. But we are *One* nation under God; There is a necessity for power at the federal level, and as it stands now each person in a rural community has more of a say in the federal government than each person in a city or suburb. There is no reason for that, If the federal government applies to all Americans then shouldn't all Americans have equal say?

I totally agree that states should be able to legislate and defend their best interests, but the whole point of the federal superstructure on-top of the state-structure is that states should have to be subject to certain laws that the state itself wouldn't pass on its own. The idea of the state cannot supersede the idea of the nation.",noleft,e966a2c,conservative
[removed],,e964yg0,conservative
"so i guess nations don't have interests, correct?

not with the sin fronteras crowd. states are distinct entities, with their own constitutions and their own powers -- specifically, the ones not taken by the federal government (see the 10th amendment). it's pretty common to talk about a nation or a state as an entity with interests. those interests are protected because that was originally how the people of each state were convinced to leave the articles of confederation for the new union of states. and states do have interests -- the interests of california are different than those of washington or new mexico. differences in population, resources, geography, etc all make a difference. it's unfathomable how you could sincerely say ""states don't have interests."" but this is part of the canard with your side: ""the land doesn't vote, the people do."" as if we literally mean ""the land."" as for interests, if you don't understand this framework for approaching politics, take a poli sci course and maybe it'll make more sense.",SKWM3000,e96d0sx,conservative
We aren't a democracy. We are a republic. ,LumpyWumpus,e96f7vj,conservative
Stressed about elections. “Florida predicts 2020”,YaBoiRexTillerson,e95x2xf,conservative
"Floridaman, perhaps",RawketPropelled,e963pfo,conservative
"If states are just administrative subdivisions enforcing one monolithic set of federal laws, then what's the point?  Just divide up the country into federal districts and get rid of the farce of states.",dafunkmonster,e96nptp,conservative
"It makes perfect sense why major laws differ state-to-state, if you consider the fact that residents of different states have different desires as to what laws they want to live under.

Why do we need to have one monolithic set of laws that every single one of the 300 million residents of this country have to abide by?  Why can't New York have different laws from Arizona?  Why must Florida statutes match those of South Dakota exactly?

Federalism is the whole reason why such a large and diverse country has been able to stick together for so long.  If you obliterate federalism and make the entire country legally monolithic, it won't stick together for long.",dafunkmonster,e96nfd7,conservative
"Its purpose isn't to disenfranchise voters of populous states.  Its purpose is to protect the sovereignty of less populous states.

Our entire system is designed around putting checks on the majority to protect the minority.  The smallest minority is the minority of one, for whom the Bill of Rights was created.  We have checks against populous states running roughshod over smaller states.",dafunkmonster,e96ibpk,conservative
"Assuming everyone in California or Texas has the same views.  Right now, if you get 51% of the state''s population to back you, you get the voting power of its whole population even if 49% of the population hates you.  

The current system doesn't give influence to big states or small states - no one campaigns in either California or Wyoming.  It gives influence to close states, which is why everyone campaigns in Ohio and Florida.  ",CollateralEstartle,e961wnl,conservative
"Except you really aren't at all. Why do people just spout this bullshit without doing basic math?

Even if you won both states by 100% (which has never even come close to happening, both states have plenty of conservatives despite being very liberal-leaning) you would still only have 18% of the population on your side.

The same goes for the claim that candidates could just focus on a few metropolitan areas. Again, the math just doesn't hold up. Add them all up yourself if you don't believe me. You would have to campaign in and win 100% of the vote in dozens of metropolitan areas to come out on top.

The *current* system incentivises candidates only caring about a few areas, not the popular vote system. A popular vote system would require mass appeal throughout the country.

[Here's a long post I made about this.](https://www.reddit.com/r/neoliberal/comments/8hnoid/debunking_the_most_common_argument_for_the/?utm_source=reddit-android)",Blue9390,e961nhr,conservative
Yep and who downvoted me lol,game46312,e95wr4a,conservative
"That may be a byproduct, but federalist paper 10 makes it clear. The original intent was to force many smaller factions to band together to prevent mob rule, as many different factions would need to find common ground. 

So mob rule won't elect a President. In theory, he/she would have to appeal to many people of many backgrounds which in turn would hopefully moderate the actions of the President

Also your point doesn't make any sense. Virginia, a slave state, was one of the more populous states IIRC",linklight127,e967789,conservative
"From what I've read, the largest accusation of violation of the emoluments clause is foreign officials staying in the Trump hotel when visiting the White House. He isn't running the operations of the Trump Organization right now, so how is he supposed to stop people from staying in a hotel that is 3 blocks away and within walking distance?",nellis_island,e964peq,conservative
"I live in Austin, NIMBYism is worse here than just about anywhere. It ain't a California unique problem",Cryptic0677,e965is8,conservative
"I respect that, and I understand that that’s the importance of free speech; but I have to ask, why? Why bother when there are words that would do just as well but don’t demean gay people?",thegypsymc,e964nel,conservative
"And to go a step further, senators were never voted on by the people until the 17th Amendment was ratified.  The state legislators were the ones who picked senators.  The founding fathers never intended both the House and Senate to be voted in office by popular vote.",flippy76,e9763il,conservative
"Ah you beat me to it! Definitely look up Rush Limbaugh's ""Operation Chaos"" in 2008. There's debate on whether Republicans driving in and voting for Clinton to help prevent Obama from securing Pennsylvania actually had a significant impact on the election overall, but I think it's a case in point for what you're discussing. People will totally do this wherever it can be done.",erikthereddest,e96c5fi,conservative
"Agreed. I’m a very liberal person but I will never consider myself a Democrat or vote solely based on the party. There is no excuse to not do your research on each candidate, you can find all the information about them with a very quick Google search. Just voting on party lines is how we’ve gotten to a point where people don’t feel represented anymore and fringe groups take over both major parties.",dannighe,e96anrr,conservative
Bush won the popular vote in 2004. ,SongOfUpAndDownVotes,e964rqk,conservative
"That's not true, it's just been a while.",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e962lbb,conservative
[removed],,e966hbx,conservative
"You are right, of course. You are far more philosophical than Thomas Jefferson and James Madison. When can we read your book?",RadioRoscoe,e96asn4,conservative
"It is because you will never have a tyranny of the minority with this system. I look at it this way: we sacrifice a little fairness in exchange for a measure of protection against a greater evil.   Our colony, and then our country, was founded by tyrannized minorities. These protections of minority factions run through our constitution and are a direct result of the founder's explicit intent.",RadioRoscoe,e969isc,conservative
"It's an election man. It's really not worth getting stressed out over.

The sun will rise tomorrow regardless.",Cronus6,e95z34u,conservative
Getting the voting power over what amounts to a 50/50 seems a bit wrong to me!,BD1304,e9674oy,conservative
"I asked a simple question because I don't understand how it works, so I don't really appreciate your cuntish patronising. Amazingly I asked a genuine question because I don't get it. I'm not from the US and don't even understand how my own fucking government works.",BD1304,e96725w,conservative
Dunno. Wasn't me!!,BD1304,e95wsx4,conservative
The brigading starts,linklight127,e95wycd,conservative
">Virginia emerged as the big winner—the California of the Founding era—with 12 out of a total of 91 electoral votes allocated by the Philadelphia Constitution, more than a quarter of the 46 needed to win an election in the first round. After the 1800 census, Wilson’s free state of Pennsylvania had 10% more free persons than Virginia, but got 20% fewer electoral votes. Perversely, the more slaves Virginia (or any other slave state) bought or bred, the more electoral votes it would receive. Were a slave state to free any blacks who then moved North, the state could actually lose electoral votes.

",postmodernchicken,e967xgp,conservative
[removed],,e965c79,conservative
"and white population as a percentage has gone down 10% in that time. It's impossible for Republicans to win, America is not a European country anymore.",mayocide-when,e96bafj,conservative
"Demographics have changed.

A Republican isn't going to win the popular vote again. Those days are over.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e968z2r,conservative
move further to the left and abandon conservatism you mean.,JMB_was_a_god,e968jxo,conservative
"I haven't written one, obviously. But if you go outside you'll find out that its 2018, just about everyone has more knowledge than Thomas Jefferson and James Madison... but hey, if you want to live in the past and ignore everything that's happened in the past 242 years please do. Just stay off the internet, in 1776 it would be considered witchcraft and you should burn every tie you have to it. ",neogod,e96ctmm,conservative
[removed],,e96a2vt,conservative
Disagree. Imagine if Hillary won in 2016. ,WhatMixedFeelings,e973wpv,conservative
"I assume you're quoting from the article? Doesn't matter. You can interpret the actions in whatever lens you want today. Doesn't change the fact that my point is the **ORIGINAL INTENT** of the Founding Fathers. Again, you see the byproduct, not the main reason

Also, the smaller states had more incentive to sign up for the electoral college like Vermont, New Hampshire, Maine, Rhode island, Delaware. Notice how their voting population is less than half of the larger states like Pennsylvania, Massachusetts, NY, or Virginia. ",linklight127,e9698m5,conservative
So why shouldn't the government (or at least political parties) change to be representative of that? Do you think representative democracy is not worthwhile if you're not the majority? Libertarians have never had power and I don't see many of them arguing against democracy (with obvious legal checks and balances). ,WonderBlarbleGlarble,e96bhfk,conservative
Pretty sure that the GOP has abandoned conservatism. ,mfkap,e96ctoh,conservative
">just about everyone has more knowledge than Thomas Jefferson and James Madison

And yet our practical ideas about human nature have not changed so much. You are only looking at one variable; fairness. You ignore the danger of tyrannical majorities. I doubt you even bothered to pursue the link I offered. And you accuse me of lazy thinking.",RadioRoscoe,e96f8fy,conservative
"Just because a majority does not run roughshod over a minority from time to time, does not make it a *tyranny*. In a direct democracy, the minority factions lose every time, hence the name ""tyranny"".",RadioRoscoe,e96aksp,conservative
"If you want me to be completely honest I will be. The parties will change, they have to. Essentially, the modern Republican party will die. The Democratic party will split off into two parties. The current Democratic party will be the moderate ""right wing party."" And then the new blood will split off to become the Democratic Socialist party. Those will soon be our only choices.

The majority of African American will never vote for smaller government.

The majority of Hispanic-Americans will never vote for smaller government.

The majority of Asian-Americans will never vote for smaller government

The majority of Arab-Americans will never vote for smaller government.

I'm sorry if these things upset some people but they're the truth.

Our government *will* change to represent our changing demographics, I've never said they won't.

It just isn't going to be an enjoyable experience.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e991lyw,conservative
[removed],,e96etli,conservative
Wow ,xPineappless,e96u0wl,conservative
"When you allow things like still being able to vote without ID, how can you not expect shit like this to happen.

What needs to happen is in all the states where voting doesn't require an ID, whoever is able to order a recount or court order must, so we all can see how many non ID people voted. ",Clownshow21,e96y6fb,conservative
Now the investigation can continue to look into it and see if those citizen's did vote or not.,MinimumMonitor7,e97g2ad,conservative
That will swing an election. Investigating this stuff should be a priority before 2020.,HiGloss,e97qiaa,conservative
I’m not surprised by this anymore ,kotov9syndrome,e97efv6,conservative
I wonder how different results would be without the non-ID voters,Trav_X,e97hesx,conservative
If a recount is ordered you can see all the votes from people who didn't have an ID,Clownshow21,e97je76,conservative
[FoxNews Live Stream](https://youtu.be/nzmXYf8qbTk),tehForce,e973u2c,conservative
Watching the Young Turks now call Floridians racist for electing DeSantis. Stay Classy TYT,jwt155,e97hmq9,conservative
I am kind of glad the GOP lost the governership in illinois.  Let the dems own that clusterfuck of a state.  ,stoffel_bristov,e97lpbi,conservative
Dems should have spent that money in other places than Texas. They never had a chance there. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97cpds,conservative
Manchin voting for Kavanaugh saved his ass,ltdshred,e97i6v6,conservative
"Senate is looking good for GOP and tonight could have been much worse, but overall it's a pretty meh midterm. Losing the House and a handful of governerships is never a successful election. 

The good news is Florida and Texas stayed on the board.",-Shank-,e97hnfi,conservative
" Florida Senate race called. R wins again. +4 right now, 52-44. 3 to go. ",NeedzRehab,e97jjzf,conservative
Super happy about voter ID in NC!,zeldaisaprude,e97jsos,conservative
"""Beto’s chances were swerving so hard tonight it was almost like he was driving home on a Friday night""

Politics ain't so bad after all!",jdawgisyodaddy,e97db9m,conservative
Romney just won in Utah lol,NCSUGrad2012,e97blv6,conservative
House was expected. But im pretty happy at the governor races and senate gain so far.,armyboy941,e979x6e,conservative
DeSantis now pulling slightly ahead of Gillum. Come on Florida!,Pyronot,e974aaf,conservative
"Electing a billionaire when your party hates the ""1%"" lol ",inconspicuoujavert,e973mpi,conservative
With the Senate majority (hopefully) increasing the R's don't have to rely on Collins/Murkowski anymore. And with Corker and Flake gone the snivelling weasel caucus loses 2 members,Marko_Ramius1,e97c8m0,conservative
Damn Scott Walkers only down by less than 1000 votes! ,Marko_Ramius1,e97k6af,conservative
Lots of GOP areas still not reporting in Texas. I am not worried about Cruz losing.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e979cl5,conservative
"Man, just voted in Washington state and loving the red love the nation is showing right now. ",NavySasquatch,e97ab8q,conservative
"Does this seem right to you?

https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-oregon-elections.html

Look at that electoral map. Only 2 cities went blue and that determined out governor and our ballot measures. 

\#stateofjefferson",Vrael22,e97lde7,conservative
">Can anyone recommend any counseling courses to help deal with these nazi victories? I just don't want to believe the world is like this.

GOOD SALT FROM POLITICS LOL",IvankasFutureHusband,e97a3ct,conservative
Ocasio-Cortez wins NY-14.  How will Trump ever recover? ,LonelyMachines,e97bavi,conservative
"Fox news projects Debbie Stebenow (D) will, unfortuanately, defeat John James. Had high hopes for him. Oh well.",Zyrioun,e97hlsm,conservative
GOP has a chance to win governors seat in CT. One to keep an eye on,Marko_Ramius1,e97hun3,conservative
I am just waiting on the Georgia governors race at this point. ,TheMongoose101,e97k49l,conservative
"538 gives GOP 47% chance to hold the house...wow... It was 20% at the start of the night

Now 60% damn",Jusuf_Nurkic,e974nf0,conservative
"I love watching Van Jones whine about how the results are ""heartbreaking.""",gprime,e978xck,conservative
"I'm pleased with tonight.  I was in my late 20's when the R's took the House for the first time during my life.  No one party is going to control the Federal Government forever--they always re-align before it gets there.  

If the R's get to 54-55 in the Senate, this bodes very well for R's holding the Senate past 2020, on top of two more years of Trump's judicial appointments being passed.  And probably with less drama. It's been a very good night.  ",Roez,e97gfvc,conservative
"If I was Trump before the vote on speaker, “I can work with pelosi on infrastructure, immigration, and jobs, I’ve spoken to her and we’re ready to put our differences aside and work for the good of the country, thank you very much” 


Say that about 50 times, she’ll lose her vote for speaker.",recentlyunearthed,e97hqh9,conservative
Cruz up ahead by 142k votes now per CNN.,gprime,e97cf7e,conservative
"Maybe this is me trying to make chicken salad out of the situation, but if you told me going in that I would lose the House but pick up seats in the Senate, *and* watch as every media darling the Dems were trying to push the past few months (Beto, Gillum, Breseden, Sinema) all crash and burn, I think I could live with that.",GameShowWerewolf,e97hswz,conservative
Is the guy reporting the Nevada vote stuck at the craps table?,-Shank-,e97icci,conservative
I don’t understand why they haven’t called it for Scott yet. ,punishedpat76,e97ijyq,conservative
[Nevada](https://media.giphy.com/media/ToMjGpz81S7usvTIM8w/giphy.gif),DJ_GiantMidget,e97lj77,conservative
CNN must have brought up Tax Returns about 50 times so far.,kevinlord190,e97lrw9,conservative
Dont sleep on John James. If Stabenow is only getting 51% in Oakland county that does not bode well for her,mbarnar,e975s1u,conservative
bahahah Van Jones in melt down whitelash mode.,IvankasFutureHusband,e978vjp,conservative
"It's official, we keep the senate.  ",NCSUGrad2012,e97d0eq,conservative
"Chicago suburbs got slaughtered, whatever congressional districts that leaned conservative were left, they didn't put up a fight. 

No more Republicans in the surrounding Chicagoland area. Help. ",Nightshade37,e97etjt,conservative
"Fucking Feinstein lol, she's been a senator since I was six, I'm 32 now.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97hmcv,conservative
It's a very early night everyone!  Let's not celebrate nor concede as there's a lot more votes to count!,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e973v6y,conservative
ABC [just called IN for Braun](https://twitter.com/ThisWeekABC/status/1059984781436469249?ref_src=twsrc%5Etfw%7Ctwcamp%5Etweetembed%7Ctwterm%5E1059984781436469249&ref_url=https%3A%2F%2Ftownhall.com%2Fliveblog%2F2018%2F11%2F05%2F2018-midterm-elections-live-results-and-coverage--live-blog-n37). Go home in your RV Donnelly.,aCreditGuru,e976f8a,conservative
How could fox call the house already?,shatter321,e979zz4,conservative
LION TED!,recentlyunearthed,e97cepf,conservative
CBS just called texas for Cruz!,freedomhertz,e97cl7q,conservative
"Yeet my Congressman won! Beat the grandson of one of the biggest idiots in US history, Henry Wallace ",Marko_Ramius1,e97i94w,conservative
"On the bright side, it looks like we're picking up seats in the Senate. That means SCOTUS and other nominations should be much easier from now on. ",GuitarWizard90,e97bczl,conservative
"Good to see Mitt representing Utah, the smears people threw at him in 2012 were vile.",jwt155,e97bog2,conservative
normally you lose the house after you win the presidency. this wasn't a bad night.,DJ_GiantMidget,e97l6xf,conservative
"Reminder to everyone not to panic or celebrate too early, someone can be ahead or down by 2% and then it flips when more districts report in. It depends entirely on which districts are reporting and by what percentage (for instance, the panhandle comes in late in Florida, which is heavy R)",Zyrioun,e971sru,conservative
Nominate all the Constitutionalists to the Supreme Court ,JewishJonny,e97d58m,conservative
"Tim Kaine keeps his senate seat. Why the fuck was Cory Stewart seen as a good idea?
",combrade,e976rl8,conservative
We just flipped PA-13.,DogBeersHadOne,e979cfw,conservative
some are withdrawing their calls now. wtf is going on?,JMB_was_a_god,e97b3iz,conservative
Here's how Beto can still win.,Hatewrecked,e97fq3o,conservative
How long is it gonna take Florida to finish counting lol,Jusuf_Nurkic,e97igwg,conservative
Gianforte is hoping he can bodyslam his way into reelection in Montana,-Shank-,e97imk9,conservative
Iowa and Wisconsin governor races are incredibly close,-Shank-,e97jly4,conservative
Florida needs to call Scott already.,BirchSquid789,e97klfj,conservative
Walker got the lead,game46312,e97ks2l,conservative
"Not even lying, CNN is way better than Fox News right now, if you are watching TV coverage.  ",IvankasFutureHusband,e973xt7,conservative
"Fox news is straight up retarded, I'm done with their shit.  Seriously gonna go Full CNN on this one and you never go Full CNN.

Edit: Except at the end results when I switch to MSNPC so I can see Maddow meltdown.",IvankasFutureHusband,e977rah,conservative
MY STATE IS SAVED!!!!!!!!,florida4_life,e97hqot,conservative
This Texas race is fucking stupid. It should not be this close.,uniquecannon,e97asxh,conservative
Lol at r/politics walking back the blue wave and settling for what they are going to get. They still think they're going to get Texas LMAO,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e976hf3,conservative
Van Jones is already saying this is heartbreaking.  I'm fucking ready for the salt.,kevinlord190,e978xc2,conservative
"I just got my flair! I get to post here now.  Yay! 

I'm from North Dakota.  If Heidi loses by 10%+ like what the numbers are showing right now, holy crap does that show the state Dems something.  Which is: keep the politics local and don't go with the national party.  Heidi put the final nail in her coffin after voting no on Kavanah.",Nats_Enough,e979dnf,conservative
Prepare yourself for endless investigations and such. ,JMB_was_a_god,e97dyju,conservative
Surprisingly Michigan looks pretty good at the state level. I'm honestly surprised.,DogBeersHadOne,e9778rq,conservative
Good news in TN,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e977kfr,conservative
Lindsey Graham on NBC right now.,IvankasFutureHusband,e979mtw,conservative
"If the Republicans tried in the OH Senate, they may have won it. It's only 52/48 Brown with 80% in",Marko_Ramius1,e97d06p,conservative
"GA-13 flipped D to R. 11-3 D flips, 6-1 outside of PA redistricting.",DogBeersHadOne,e97f2j6,conservative
Nevada's been pretty quiet...,BirchSquid789,e97i2uk,conservative
Man my state hasn't gotten an ounce of coverage from what I've seen. Everyone just expects Idaho to vote red lol,inconspicuoujavert,e97kmk5,conservative
So crazy how fast fivethirtyeight changed. Getting very exciting.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e975aww,conservative
 Beto's lead is down to less than 4000 votes. And that is with a reporting cycle that has been favorable to him. He'll be trailing shortly.,gprime,e977gd7,conservative
Fox is reporting dems win the house. That seems crazy early though.,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97a1jj,conservative
"Cruz has pulled ahead in Texas!

&#x200B;

Edit: Francis is ahead again just slightly.",Pyronot,e97a2ty,conservative
"If the Dems barely win the house will they still consider that a ""blue wave""?",kevinlord190,e97aquc,conservative
John James up with 17% in. Oh man!,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97aucq,conservative
Best case scenario is that Dems winning the house empowers them to try some crazy shit and either impeach or just totally obstruct and double down on doomsday and intersectional screaming.  That all but ensures 2020 for the White House and probably the House again plus some senate seats,mm1255,e97i77f,conservative
"Posted in r/politics "" beto crashed and burned just like tried to do with his car when he had a DUI"" I have never gotten so much hate in seconds 


Edit: people were acting as if I was white when I'm definitely brown (guatemalan) not that race should matter ",MeagerCycle,e97fg57,conservative
Press F to pay respects to our former House majority.   ,TBSportsFan1254,e97e365,conservative
Here comes to panhandle!!,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e9748r3,conservative
The AP has called the Kentucky 6th District for Republican Rep. Andy Barr. ,gprime,e976swb,conservative
"Losing the House will suck but we appear to be on the verge of expanding our control of the Senate which is great to see for the continued re-shaping of the courts in the shape of a Constituational Court system, not this bullshit progressive crap.",notathrowaway_5150,e97c4pe,conservative
FL Desantis Won!!!,Opienus,e97ghqj,conservative
"CNN is already claiming Gillum's loss is really a moral victory.

&#x200B;

Edit: Now Beto is a moral victory too.",kevinlord190,e97kvwq,conservative
"Crossing my fingers, hopefully we can hold the House. 

",Nightshade37,e970jde,conservative
Is there any situation aside from EOs where the Dems win the house and literally any anything gets done?,curlbaumann,e970tn6,conservative
"https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/?ex_cid=extra_banner

538 saying republicans have 60% chance of keeping house. Not that it's reliable... it is exciting!",Colinm478,e974t6v,conservative
"https://twitter.com/PpollingNumbers/status/1059979957601030144

> 98% that GOP wins the SENATE 70% that GOP wins the HOUSE

Don't know the credibility of this but here it is.",JMB_was_a_god,e97636n,conservative
So long Joe we hardly knew ye,Marko_Ramius1,e976jrx,conservative
"With trends shifting in our favor, are we expected to flip any districts, or is it more that we are simply looking more likely to hold those ones that were toss-ups? ",SirRollsaSpliff,e976mld,conservative
Here we go Teddy! ,IvankasFutureHusband,e977e2t,conservative
GO JOHN JAMES!!!,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e978pi4,conservative
Any else watching the Daily Wire on Youtube?,SinisterPaige,e9792sl,conservative
"Mark Harris (R) pulls slightly ahead in NC's 9th district, considered a tossup",kroatone,e979xpf,conservative
CBS projects Ted Cruz win!,tehForce,e97cilk,conservative
"Oh, and Sanders and Warren held their seats.  That counts as victory, right? ",LonelyMachines,e97evfx,conservative
"Regarding the GOP and the House, them still getting seats has me clinging on to a tiny scrap of hope.",BirchSquid789,e97idt5,conservative
AZ took its Goddamn time.,DogBeersHadOne,e97j9jt,conservative
How have we not gotten a single house seat? Like not one?,DJ_GiantMidget,e97jxti,conservative
Nelson concedes!,Marko_Ramius1,e97kzzg,conservative
What is the deal with nevada,stoffel_bristov,e97l9qi,conservative
@Nevada I'd like to go to bed soon,Marko_Ramius1,e97le1a,conservative
"As of now, DeSantis leads FL with 1.2% and 76% in. Scott leads FL .8% with 82% in.",AyyyGreens,e976eo0,conservative
"Holy shit, John James might actually pull this off. Dude has ""future presidential candidate"" written all over him ",cmanson,e97bg47,conservative
"It seems that they beat us on the healthcare issue, i don’t want to speak ill of the dead but it seems the spectre of the healthcare reform that was killed by a trump hating senator has bit us in the ass. 
",Racheakt,e97dlcb,conservative
"GOP is getting more and more likely to keep the house!

Fucking knew it.",JMB_was_a_god,e9750lk,conservative
Ted Cruz now ahead with 55% of the vote in.,gprime,e9783if,conservative
"Ben just made a really good observation on their Livestream ( [link](https://youtu.be/kbnLuv5H41Y) ).Dems are doing really well with moderate candidates, and very poorly with radical ones. Now, this should be obvious to everyone. Of course a radical will do worse because they push away the moderate votes. But the left has been doubling down on radical candidates since 2016. If they continue this trend and run a radical in 2020 against Trump, they will get slaughtered. However, if they get smart and run a moderate democrat they will put up a very good fight. But this all depends on them learning from their mistakes and adapting. ",LumpyWumpus,e97da3x,conservative
"Looks like wins for Kemp, DeSantis and Scott!",Marko_Ramius1,e97ef03,conservative
"This isn't awful tonight.  What do y'all think, with demographics changing so quickly, maybe Trump can deliver us from some evil, but in 20 / 30 years I don't see how this country doesn't become a leftist shithole.  Just the pessimist in me.  Is this all just delaying the inevitability.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97cj2j,conservative
ABC just called desantis a racist lol... So salty,freedomhertz,e97e89q,conservative
Lmao Dennis Hof wins an assembly seat in NV.  He's dead.,tja_1478,e97nw82,conservative
"Fox just called Texas for Cruz. 

Tennessee, Indiana, and Texas were supposed to be the big races for Democrats.  They've lost all 3.  I'm sure they'll qualify it as *almost winning.*

I'd turn on CNN for the schadenfreude, but I've got to be off to bed soon. ",LonelyMachines,e97ddk5,conservative
Illinois is so fucked with JB as governor...,WenchSlayer,e9774mz,conservative
" Interesting Fox News calls the House for the Democrats this early, while 538 still has a 45% chance for Republicans to keep control. We'll see what happens ",ecfreeman,e979wm1,conservative
Why would fox call this so early? ,iwasthebeaver,e97a8i7,conservative
Cruz takes it home according to CNN.... now time for some serious reflection..,richardguy,e97ctuj,conservative
Gillum concedes.,DogBeersHadOne,e97fady,conservative
Its too bad the vote maps cant say what they went last election to get a barring on the counties left to count. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e972bhx,conservative
What is the deal with Florida and their schizophrenic voting?,thx_II38,e975arx,conservative
"I believe in John Joyce. And Harvey Dent.

But mostly John Joyce.",DogBeersHadOne,e976z3j,conservative
"I don't trust so many of these which have been ""called."" There are way too few districts in and the races are too close in too many of them.",diamondeyes18,e977o9l,conservative
CNN has Beto up 79 votes as of now.,gprime,e978r63,conservative
Because its Mississippi for gods sake lol,inconspicuoujavert,e97a017,conservative
We just won in North Dakota.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e97btnu,conservative
"Not surprising at all, and others already did it, but CNN has now called the Senate for the GOP.",gprime,e97dk2r,conservative
"Looks like the republicans keep the governor of Florida, let's hope for the senate too.",NCSUGrad2012,e97fr4l,conservative
Josh Hawley wins in Missouri!!!!!,NCSUGrad2012,e97g7o0,conservative
Go fuck yourself McCaskill,Marko_Ramius1,e97gewa,conservative
RIP Kansas.,BirchSquid789,e97he8y,conservative
"Hope you guys like Justice Barrett, because it’s happening.",rollingstone76,e97i2ib,conservative
"I'm going to sleep, night yall tonight was fun.  ",IvankasFutureHusband,e97i7qr,conservative
"Down 10-4 while holding a lead in 6 of 7 battleground districts in CA?

Challenge accepted.",DogBeersHadOne,e97i914,conservative
"How are the gubernatorial races going? Fox just seems focused on Congress?
",Briguy28,e97l4yt,conservative
"I voted straight ticket Republican in NJ-1 and NO on the ballot question to borrow $500m for “our children’s future”. 

My wife didn’t vote. She’s a Lefty. ",mikeygio,e972j0u,conservative
"Incredibly early, but encouraging data out of Indiana, Florida, and Kentucky. ",Bhangus,e970phs,conservative
Well so far holding the senate which was goal #1. Just have to hope republicans can hold house or at least keep the seats close enough where dems can't just do what ever they want. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e975c9i,conservative
"Worth noting: 538 real-time forecast, GOP has a 4 in 9 chance of keeping the House, far better than projected this morning. ",gprime,e975gnj,conservative
We could pick up 4 seats in the senate. That is huge.,kevinlord190,e97fhi4,conservative
"The most irritating / frightening part of a probable Dem House takeover will be watching their 'leaders' crow about how now they're going to impeach Trump, punish Republicans, and otherwise do their utmost to grind to a halt economic progress and sane foreign policy.",Colonize_The_Moon,e973xqa,conservative
"Libertarian cost us the Virginia 7th.  Less than 1,000 votes, the Libertarian candidate got 1500 reason we said if you ever go full red ticket this is the time.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97afcp,conservative
Red Pilled Lindsey Graham,JewishJonny,e97e4zz,conservative
"CNN is proclaiming this a wave for democrats just because they took the house. 

&#x200B;

GOP is winning huge in the senate and governors. ",kevinlord190,e97gbio,conservative
Pelosi is acting like this is the biggest win in American history. I can't even imagine if any of their big candidates won.,kevinlord190,e97iey9,conservative
"Cruz won by 3% over o'rourke?  Whew, that was close.  It looks like Texas **is** being affected by California transplants",ltdshred,e97f739,conservative
"If the D's get the house it will be interesting to see if they pull a Kavanaugh repeat over the next two years and over play their hand.  I have to think there will be a temptation to flirt with impeachment without real evidence. 

Hopefully, R's retain the Senate and can keep pushing judicial nominees through.",Roez,e97129b,conservative
"Rick Scott is 4731 votes ahead, 89% reporting.",gprime,e974efo,conservative
"OK, Here's some interesting news.  538 (Nate Silver's site) now has D's chance of taking the House at 4 in 7 (57.2%) and R's at 3 in 7 to hold.  This was 4 chances in 5 (over 80%) for D's this morning.

The Senate model is now 29/30 (96.7%) R's hold the Senate.  This was about 89% this morning, but moved closer to R as the results are coming in.

I have no idea what's going on.  This is at odds with a lot of stuff I was seeing 45-60 minutes ago.  

",Roez,e97545e,conservative
"Every democrat in a competitive race that voted against Kavanaugh is now out of a job. The one that voted for, lives on.",ngoni,e97h0aa,conservative
"Not a bad night nationally, but brutal for my conservative New York bretheren. Believe it or not, NY had a split state legislature. Republicans held the Senate and it helped mitigate taxes. They lost it tonight.

I'm 26, with six figure debt working in law. I make good money but with rent and student loans I have to work my ass off to keep afloat. These fuckers are going to want half my damn salary because I make more than the median national salary.

Meanwhile, they invent ridiculous zoning laws limiting the supply of apartments so that rents through the roof and use my tax dollars so that NYC can pay the bureaucrat at the department of LGBT affairs to put up ads on the subway saying I can't call them by the wrong pronoun. Fuck this state.

I'm looking to transfer my bar exam scores to a state that doesn't suck. I hope the finance industry leaves and this shit hole returns to what it was in the 1970s. Fuck NYC. They are a perpetual burden on the success of this state",Bananimal_Hammock,e97mcln,conservative
"For those wanting to get up to date results without watching TV, The New York Times (i know, i know...) has a really good site that has live coverage and individual  precinct results. [https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-senate-elections.html](https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-senate-elections.html)",Pyronot,e970l6j,conservative
"Here's the 538 return page if anyone wants to watch yet another needle of sorts.  It's currently at 65% for D's taking the House, but it's been bouncing around a lot. 

https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/


Edit:

Nate Silver ‏@NateSilver538
 9m9 minutes ago
More
With that said, Democrats have to flip some seats at some point -- the Comstock-type districts won't quite be enough. They aren't losing many tossups yet, but they aren't winning them either.",Roez,e9764x5,conservative
Braun won Indiana... about a year ago lol,redneckwhiteass,e978m5a,conservative
Holy hell Texas. ,inconspicuoujavert,e978pvx,conservative
Bye bye Heidi,Marko_Ramius1,e97bupu,conservative
Jon James looking good!,eeeinator,e97cikz,conservative
How many house seats can we lose and still hold the majority ?,teddyrooseveltsfist,e97cmjx,conservative
Any news for Florida?,BirchSquid789,e97cnnq,conservative
Mike Dewine wins,GoofyUmbrella,e97f9nr,conservative
Looks like the democrats are gonna take the house,phantomcut3,e97fo4m,conservative
"https://twitter.com/BillKristol/status/1060006717239496705?ref_src=twsrc%5Etfw

I've always disliked the phrase ""demography is destiny,"" as it seems to minimize the capacity for deliberation and self-government, for reflection and choice. But looking at tonight's results in detail, one has to say that today, in America, demography sure seems to be destiny.

-bill kristol. 

Fuck him and his Neo-con leftist buddies. hopefully they go back to the left from whence they came.",JMB_was_a_god,e97g65m,conservative
"I'm watching from the other side of the world right now. And I'm just frustrated about the incoming split congress, because the country is probably headed for two years of wasted time.

Also, my RSS feed is showing articles of the Democrats retaking the House ""in a major repudiation of Trump"". But in the way I see it, they're probably going to do just that with the ball's tip barely crossing the goal line.",AvdaxNaviganti,e97gc17,conservative
"I’m in WA where west coast numbers are just coming out.

Not good for GOP.

They’ll probably lose 2 seats in WA.

CA will be pretty bad. ",highonstress,e97haty,conservative
"As a Floridan I was mostly concerned about the Governors race. Glad it looks like DeSantis pulled it out.

Pretty surprised that Rick Scott is up",Menhadien,e97e4cm,conservative
"I accept we will lose the house, but the senate is ours. Keep stacking the federal courts McConnell.",Colinm478,e970gbr,conservative
"I did all I could do,,,  now I just set back and see. ",ozric101,e970n18,conservative
There are still so many republican counties in the texas race that haven't been counted.,kevinlord190,e975q8w,conservative
Pretty upset walker is going to lose. I really dont like tony evers. Can't wait for those tax increases.,dayman35,e97dn9b,conservative
TYT AT 22K DISLIKES / 20K LIKES LMFAOOOOOOOOOOO,Pro895YT,e97drb4,conservative
R's getting fucked in PA/IL because of weak top of the tickets (PA redistricting also played a role),Marko_Ramius1,e97g0h2,conservative
I’m ashamed at my fellow Montanans voting for Tester. ,Mumakata,e97jxq6,conservative
I guess things were going too well in America that voters needed to fall back to the days of Dem control of part of government. ,YankeeBlues21,e97a3i7,conservative
TX 32 flipped Blue. The outer portions of that district are home to a bunch of California transplants that drove home prices up 1000% and just as I was getting my career going killed my chances of buying a decent house in the Dallas metro area during the Texas economic boom. ,tiger81775149,e97edgq,conservative
Keith Ellison somehow won in Minnesota. Quickly realizing that Minnesota is almost as bad as Illinois. ,AMollenhauer,e97m697,conservative
FOX  Projects:  Kim Reynolds (R) Projected to win *Iowa* Governorship.,Zyrioun,e97k6xx,conservative
"I am so glad Beto lost, there is no way in hell he would’ve come even close to 50 if the media hadn’t been dick-riding him as the next Obama for half a year.  Good lord, single lost astroturfed campaign in a long time.  ",mm1255,e97lc4r,conservative
"Well, Cruz won in Texas but Beto still cost us some major down ballot races.  Some significant conservative voices in our state legislature lost their race because they were in urban counties that had Beto-Mania run through it.   Still processing it and how Conservatives will need to campaign going forward. ",blackaddermrbean,e97mikn,conservative
"Please say a prayer for Florida, for Rick Scott and for Ron DeSantis. That they maintain their leads, deliver on their promises, and serve God in their daily lives.",SendixBunny,e976kzg,conservative
LOL at Taylor Swift!! ,NCSUGrad2012,e977o7k,conservative
So glad Beto is officially the next Jon Ossof,-Shank-,e97fi5g,conservative
"Fox news Projects Kate Brown wins Governorship in Oregon.. There are no words to describe my rage at Kate brown winning in Oregon. Even Salem went Red. Just Eugene and Portland were blue. They rule the entire fucking state. 

Edit: Also, every single fucking ballot measure i voted yes on was rejected. People voted NO on banning additional grocery taxes?! No...Portland voted no, everyone else' votes didn't matter.

",Zyrioun,e97jo6i,conservative
Being in Canada i couldn't vote(Obviously) but Good luck down there lads!,geneeva71,e97318i,conservative
"DeSantis leads in Florida by 1.1% (87, 303 votes) with 92.8% precincts in. Scott leads in Florida by 0.8% (66, 430 votes) with 93.1% in.",AyyyGreens,e979s1s,conservative
God for my paychecks sake come on Scott Walker,mm1255,e97knz8,conservative
"Fox calls IL Gov for the Democrats, no surprise.",gprime,e973h9g,conservative
If brat holds on that would be a positive sign ,game46312,e975anh,conservative
Don't look now but MS-1 has a third-party candidate leading.,DogBeersHadOne,e978mgg,conservative
How's Cruz looking?,Marko_Ramius1,e978rpq,conservative
Missouri let’s gooo Hawley ,JewishJonny,e97g8kw,conservative
Let's hope the GOP keeps their ten-nine point lead over the Democrats.,BirchSquid789,e97getl,conservative
Did the guy in Michigan lose? Havent seen it in awhile ,inconspicuoujavert,e97hapi,conservative
Where is Nevada results? Is everything okay over there??,pk3maross,e97jwym,conservative
Has anyone been paying attention to Montana?  Seems like results have been coming in slowly but Rosendale has been inching closer...,mm1255,e97kupa,conservative
"Remember the funny from 2 years ago?
Democrats take early lead, then the republicans get off of work and win the election.",man987123,e974fjt,conservative
So happy that Rick Scott won. My cousin's worked security for him on a few occasions and said he's an all around great guy. ,RPwhitefrost,e97ixzg,conservative
You folks in Utah better hold Romney's feet to the fire if he starts becoming the new John McCain. ,GuitarWizard90,e97jrk4,conservative
Lets go Florida panhandle coming in.,IvankasFutureHusband,e973oj3,conservative
"GOP ahead 14,202 votes in OH governors race.",gprime,e976oii,conservative
"And again in Georgia, wishful predictions from Democrats fall through.  I don't see Abrams making up 36% with mostly rural areas unreported. ",LonelyMachines,e977n1n,conservative
"CNN calls TN Senate for the GOP. Not surprising, still nice.",gprime,e978ix5,conservative
Cruz now within 50k votes folks,kroatone,e979vg8,conservative
Disappointed in Iowa ,KillaB33z,e97eh4m,conservative
"IT'S OFFICIAL, GOP KEEPS THE SENATE!",BirchSquid789,e97g46t,conservative
DeSantis wins officially! Yes!,BirchSquid789,e97hkhe,conservative
RIP Michigan. ,Apollo1717,e97kqwf,conservative
"**#believeallwomen***

Except Karen Monahan. Fuck my blue ass snowflake state for electing this anti-semite wife beating cop-killer loving piece of trash to the AG Office. ",Moonthrower,e97ddhq,conservative
"Trying to confirm.  Am told CBS just called Texas for Beto.  

Edit:  Laugh, CBS took it back and said it was a bad call.  ",Roez,e97apyu,conservative
"I got downvoted into oblivion for asking a hypothetical question over at T_D...hopefully you guys will be a little more rational. 

So, let’s say the Dems do take the House. Now what? I know the blue wave didn’t happen, but what should we expect the next 2 years? This kind of worries me. No more FISA investigations, bogus investigations instead, etc. ",LegionOfDeplorables,e97br1b,conservative
These results clearly show the media are out of touch with the general public.,tenshon,e97gqxe,conservative
Real shocker in NJ: [https://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/415384-juror-from-menendezs-corruption-trial-attends-his-victory-party?\_\_twitter\_impression=true&\_\_twitter\_impression=true](https://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/415384-juror-from-menendezs-corruption-trial-attends-his-victory-party?__twitter_impression=true&__twitter_impression=true),Marko_Ramius1,e97h5xx,conservative
Holy fucking shit Arizona.  So damn slow,tja_1478,e97momu,conservative
"The Dems shouldn’t have been rewarded for their behavior. They should have straight up lost seats regardless of historical precedent. These are abnormal times, they’re going to become more extreme and nuts as a result of taking the House. ",YankeeBlues21,e97fzql,conservative
"Not thrilled about losing the House, but we expanded our control in the Senate, which is important. Murkowski and Collins won't matter as much now, and the Senate should be able to stop any bullshit legislation from the House. I voted, and I made sure all my family and friends voted. That's all you can do. I'm not going to scream at the sky, cry, assault people, or destroy property because the election didn't completely go the way I wanted. ",GuitarWizard90,e97r89k,conservative
"But muh blue wave!!!! 

L M A O

This is almost as much fun as the 2016 election. Not quite as much, but it's so damn fun. I can't wait to see the meltdown all over Reddit as their big imaginary blue wave evaporates before their eyes. ",LumpyWumpus,e9782fh,conservative
"If Cruz keeps Texas tonight, he’s gonna have to do some serious self-evaluating.",HappyGunner,e97arzn,conservative
"If the Dems regain the House, like it looks like they are going to, hopefully everyone can put together a good bipartisan infrastructure bill. ",oceanplum,e97b4az,conservative
"Interesting data.  If the D's take the House tonight it's anything but a referendum against Trump.  Only two Presidents saw their party pick up House seats during their first mid-term election since Hoover. One of those was Bush following 9/11 one year prior.  

Since Hoover, the 1st midterm results (House/Sen):
*Hoover: (-52/-6)
*Roosevelt: (+9/+9)
*Truman (-54/-10)
*Eisenhower (-18/-2)
*Kennedy (-4/+4)
*Johnson (-47/-3)
*Nixon (-12/+2)
*Ford (-48/-4)
*Carter (-15/-2)
*Reagan (-26/-0)
*HW Bush (-8/-1)
*Clinton (-54/-9)
*Bush (+8/+1)
*Obama (-63/-6)",Roez,e973rbc,conservative
"If we take/keep the senate and lost 30 seats in the house , although it sounds like a loss it’s more of a win. Was there a blue wave no- nothing out of the ordinary from any other year except races being tighter and way less margins of winning for the opposition party of the president. Now the question is how angry or happy is the other side of the aisle ?",Derp2638,e97ilvt,conservative
I MADE THE CUT! ,Moonthrower,e970cy5,conservative
Man it's a huge bummer that Daily Wire decided to make their election live stream subscriber only this year. They've never done that before. ,ConsistentlyRight,e97363p,conservative
"It's 2016 all over again and I couldn't be happier. Democrats, so far, are getting blown the fuck out. Again.",allsystemscrash,e977ueh,conservative
Man. Manchin wins again,GoofyUmbrella,e977ws4,conservative
"Still very early....

Michigan

Debbie Stabenow 49.4%

John James 48.4%

7% reporting.",SinisterPaige,e978gal,conservative
5-2 D in terms of flips so far. We need to step it up. Both of our flips and 3 of the Dems' flips were in PA post-redrawing the map.,DogBeersHadOne,e97a9ip,conservative
:( Bob Menedez,IvankasFutureHusband,e97aky6,conservative
[removed],,e97c8f5,conservative
"we should be prepared, mentally and emotionally, to lose the house.",SKWM3000,e970ce7,conservative
Those of you on the east coast. Be sure to stay up to watch the oregon governor race. It could be very close and we might actually elect a Republican. ,kshebdhdbr,e9718on,conservative
Let's tally up them votes.,Valcgo,e971l5u,conservative
What election trackers are you all using?  NYT election tracker seems to be stalling out for me almost.,notathrowaway_5150,e976p2c,conservative
7 minutes to the reckoning ,Colinm478,e976rzx,conservative
Manchin and Blackburn both win,Marko_Ramius1,e977nuq,conservative
Dave Brat is neck and neck with Spanberger...,GoofyUmbrella,e978mtd,conservative
Fuuuuuuuuuuuuck...CNN calls Kansas governor's race for Dems.,gprime,e97bt1e,conservative
"Flips 9-2 D, 4 outside of the PA redistricting.",DogBeersHadOne,e97ctuv,conservative
Noem ahead by 3 in SD for Gov. House seat stayed R. ,TipoBajito,e97eo1b,conservative
Im holding out hope that the race in MI could still swing James way.,mike50333,e97gdwn,conservative
"anyone think if texas goes blue by the smallest of margins, it's anchor babies finally getting their first vote?

This is gonna make me hard hell no on DACA.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9795yt,conservative
"Even though we probably lose the house, this is still a VERY good night for the GOP",kevinlord190,e97bx5a,conservative
"Probably gonna make ""the list"" for this comment, but is anyone expecting multiple violent attacks against the President and Vice President, as the new speaker (please not pelosi) would become President.  Just a thought.  I hope they stay safe.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97dwlh,conservative
"Sucks to lose the house but on the bright side, it's Dem primary season. They're gonna tear each other apart just like the 2016 rep primary. ",Phinaeus,e97r3u6,conservative
"CBS just said ""where is the blue wave?""


kek",why-this,e97b9hk,conservative
Had to post a couple of positives for the GOP in r/politics since it’s a blue wave of hot garbage. Cracks me up that they were strutting like peacocks thinking they were going to take both sides of Congress and are now in damage control after losing seats in the Senate and focusing solely on taking back the House. ,gtchuckd,e97ho5h,conservative
"Looks like it's over for Walker- almost 40,000 down with only a handful of precincts left.",psstein,e97pvtv,conservative
RIP any chance we had of keeping the House.,BirchSquid789,e97mnmm,conservative
"This is a little more tame than T_D tonight, think I'll chill here with my fellow conservatives what's up?",IvankasFutureHusband,e971duf,conservative
Braun is looking really good! This would be a great pickup.,1wjl1,e970baf,conservative
Come on fellow Floridians,Menhadien,e9750gt,conservative
"Ted Cruz called to win by ABC.

Let that sink in.

A man Trump smothered in the Presidential election.

A man who's been smeared in the media, who's dislikeable character hasn't improved one shred.

A man who ran against him using the name *Beto* to virtue signal instead of Robert (Cruz is guilty of the same).

A man who was outspent 10:1 by the Political party who hates money in politics.

I know Texas leans to the right, but the Democrats threw everything in the kitchen and the sink at Ted Cruz, a heavilly flawed candidate in the public eye and he came out on top.

Props to Ted Cruz.",jwt155,e97cjtm,conservative
Florida here! Let’s see if Florida man pulled another one.,AyyyGreens,e970zux,conservative
"ABC has just retracted their call of GA7 and GA6, Republican candidate has just moved ahead in GA7 with 97% reporting.",Crazey4wwe,e97n0yg,conservative
Nevada finally reporting some numbers. So damn slow,Phinaeus,e97ndwz,conservative
I'm okay with the results last night.  We were expected to lose the house but this was no clue wave the dems were promising.  If anything last night showed the dems still haven't gained any real momentum since 2016.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e97ur7g,conservative
"I am so proud of my state tonight. We lost some house seats, but we were counted out for the Governors mansion and the Senate... and we took them. There are now zero statewide elected Democrats in Florida.

I hope this becomes a trend.",SendixBunny,e97jts1,conservative
"People complaining about transplants ruining Cruz’s night, look at Abbot. It’s clearly a red state. People just have a problem with Cruz. ",SpaghettiSweater,e97b3kb,conservative
"Losing the House stings,but the sun will rise in the morning and my Bears are in first place. God is good",game46312,e97jfun,conservative
"ehhhh. Not to surprised by the results. We did very well in the senate and as predicted in the house. Overall not looking forward to the upcoming gridlock, but happy with the senate results ",Nail_Whale,e97pgdu,conservative
"You can really tell how many first time voters are on Reddit from all the headlines on r/all.

News flash, government ran events never go smoothly. No the Russians aren't the reason why you waited so long in line, it's been like this forever!!!! ",matts290,e9714bu,conservative
Over/under when Trump fires that useless keebler elf Jeff Sessions? I'm putting the line at 5 days,Marko_Ramius1,e97equm,conservative
"Welp, CO's F$%#ed",infinitycore,e97jvmw,conservative
"CNN is going head over heels about Rosen.

&#x200B;

Trying to find any way to lessen the blow that the Senate was tonight.",kevinlord190,e97qap8,conservative
I’m seeing some red. Let’s hope late reporting doesn’t fuck this over. ,gizayabasu,e970fhr,conservative
"My wife and I proudly voted today straight R, and my wife even volunteered to hold signs. Now we're anxiously waiting the results. ",ConservativeChicano,e972bgq,conservative
"DeSantis leads the Florida race by 0.5%(36, 436) at 70% in",AyyyGreens,e974u94,conservative
I can live with losing the house as long as we keep the Senate with a good margin,eeeinator,e97b85z,conservative
"Dumb question: Do we need the House for any future Supreme Court appointments?

Edit: Just Senate. :) ",uniquecannon,e97bg9l,conservative
Is there any chance Republicans can still retain the house?,jacobwilliamhillard,e97elik,conservative
"https://youtu.be/sYvEnYlxj9g

Don't watch if you don't like cringing and bad singing",Phinaeus,e97elz3,conservative
"Here’s to two absolutely insufferable years, full of Democrat led house committees and the non passage of even the most bipartisan common-sense legislation. Come on 2020",AcornToOak,e97fh4g,conservative
I think the NYT broke; I can't tell what's happening in Oregon and there's been no update for nearly 15 minute since early results have been revealed ,Vrael22,e97gz41,conservative
"I feel torn about the results. Florida voted yes on everything, including some really awful shit. Scott was elected to the Senate, and I'm pretty sure that's in spite of the gun control shit he passed, though if the ballot wins tell me anything its because Florida is slowly turning into New York and Cali. DeSantis won the governorship, which is great. He went up on Fox to say he would veto the new laws, so here's hoping we actually get some of the crap overturned. Gillum would have been a disaster. Just begging for another AWB. ",richardguy,e97j4v8,conservative
Idaho bby wat is u doin?,DogBeersHadOne,e97jhx9,conservative
California is going to kill any chance of the GOP keeping the House.,BirchSquid789,e97jshd,conservative
CNN isn't terrible tonight,DJ_GiantMidget,e97n5kg,conservative
">The definition of insanity is doing the same thing over and over again and expecting a different result.

Why in God's name did Democrats think repeating the mistakes of 2016 would result in different results?

With the rhetoric from the left and on r/politics, with Trump and the Republicans being bludgeoned for two years now, one would think that the Democrats should take this election tonight without even trying, and yet their blue wave has become nothing but a light drizzle.

Why?

When will Democrats realize that for most Americans, making politics about hate and demonizing your fellow Americans who think differently is not a good strategy to win voters, in fact it does the opposite.",jwt155,e97b2js,conservative
"It looks like Minnesota's  house went Red, I'm thinking John James is gonna win.

Edit Jon",IvankasFutureHusband,e97cpvf,conservative
"I, for one, am happy to see we are going to get more appellate judges who may have actually once read the constitution. ",recentlyunearthed,e97kgyr,conservative
Testers only up by 1.7%. Gonna be a close one,Marko_Ramius1,e97m2bf,conservative
"Did we actually pick up seats in the senate? If so, given 6 more years of Trump won't it be even more likely to see deeply conservative appointments of his to SCOTUS? 

No more ""every R has to confirm"" appointments. Trump can afford to lose a couple Rep vote's and still get the person he wants in.",synn89,e97my0b,conservative
Not looking good for DeSantis. He is down 2%,pdawg43,e971i6u,conservative
CRTV is doing live coverage on youtune for anyone interested https://youtu.be/NSrTYBO7Z4Y,The_Mighty_Rex,e974npr,conservative
"Welcome back as our governor of Arkansas, Asa Hutchinson!",imbalanced,e975rb3,conservative
"https://mobile.twitter.com/NumbersMuncher/status/1059979491374718981/photo/1

538 updates to 60% chance REPUBLICANS hold the house ",guitmusic12,e975umo,conservative
Need to pick up seats in PA. My old district isn't looking too hot but Joyce is looking pretty decent.,DogBeersHadOne,e976lbr,conservative
If Scott Wallace loses Philly will get the representative it needs. If Scott Wallace wins Philly will get the representative it deserves.,DogBeersHadOne,e977hak,conservative
"18 precincts in for Oakland County, Stabecow now at 55.7 to 42.7% over James.

Dammit, hope this isn't the start of her pulling away.",notathrowaway_5150,e977pg7,conservative
My guy (Ken Buck) is cruising to reelection but it looks like Colorado Springs might go blue. That’s a shocker.,Piestrio,e979kfd,conservative
"As a citizen of Kansas's 3rd district, it sucks seeing Yoder and Kobach lose, but at least the GOP is going to make some gains in the US Senate...",ecfreeman,e97bsrq,conservative
Still so upset about losing New Jersey Senate. Here’s hoping that MacArthur wins my district!,Drang52,e97c7m9,conservative
[Sploosh](https://twitter.com/guypbenson/status/1060007792151552001),Marko_Ramius1,e97cmw3,conservative
I've seen RINO and DINO posted for a while the past few months. What do they mean? ,NavySasquatch,e97frmr,conservative
Back to within 15. 121-108 D according to Decision Desk.,DogBeersHadOne,e97gqs0,conservative
124-113 D. Was within 10 at one point within the past 10 minutes.,DogBeersHadOne,e97h648,conservative
Welp Iowa fucked up.,xKommandant,e97j4op,conservative
Mia Love looks like she's out,game46312,e97lwic,conservative
"[Reuters projects that the Democrats will gain 24 seats in the House](https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-election-house-factbox/factbox-democrats-to-pick-up-net-24-seats-in-u-s-house-media-data-provider-ddhq-idUSKCN1NC01S?feedType=RSS&feedName=topNews), which will give them a three-seat majority there. Was that enough of a Blue Wave?",AvdaxNaviganti,e97jziw,conservative
"We lost TX-32 and VA-02, we're officially dead in the House.",gprime,e97dtn2,conservative
"Looks like we're gonna have McSally on our side too. Although it's hilarious, the green party candidate literally cost Dems this election lol

That is why I will not support a Libertarian candidate. As much as I may be a Libertarian or many issues I am not willing to vote for a party that will fracture our base.",-Skinwalker-,e97sy1q,conservative
Well my state went full blue so this sucks. ,smashzer02,e97tf2m,conservative
Goddamn nothing but fucking bullshit investigations for the next 2 years and you’re all delusional if you think the 3 letter agencies won’t help them out. We’ll also never see justice for all of the bullshit Obama pulled in 2016.,rjohnson99,e97o2xv,conservative
Decision Desk HQ called us flipping PA-14.,DogBeersHadOne,e9786q0,conservative
I need you to win Lion Ted!,recentlyunearthed,e9795fp,conservative
Fitzpatrick is leading in BucksCo. Come on PA-01.,DogBeersHadOne,e97d4mi,conservative
Does anyone know why Nevada is still showing 0% reporting?  ,NCSUGrad2012,e97gw4i,conservative
Any chance Walker comes back in Wisconsin?,cookster123,e97gz86,conservative
"Come on Nevada, get your shit together and start reporting.

I'm going to be pissed if Laxalt doesn't crush Sisolak.",LoneBurro,e97kv4v,conservative
Tester's lead narrowing more and more... ffs i can't go to sleep,nowaycopay,e97mt59,conservative
Blue wave is a wash.,Iwanttobedelivered,e974w2n,conservative
But it was Beto's turn!,Hatewrecked,e97clv2,conservative
Walker only up by 76 votes gatdamn,game46312,e97miux,conservative
"Curious to see what that one precinct left in Dane County (Madison) does for Evers. There are some precincts left in La Crosse which should favor Evers but the remaining rural precincts should favor Walker. It's anyone's guess who will win; it might be within 1,000 votes which can go either way. ",Bhangus,e97nhop,conservative
"What a bummer, the progs finally got Scott Walker.  But, not before Walker was able to destroy the labor unions in Wisconsin, so there's that. :)",mahinka,e97ctmg,conservative
Fox called the house for the Democrats ,game46312,e979n5r,conservative
We lost NY-11. At this point I have lost confidence in our ability to keep the House.,gprime,e97c5oy,conservative
Gahhhh Arizona is a nailbiter,-Skinwalker-,e97e238,conservative
"Political Polls
‏
 
@PpollingNumbers
 1m1 minute ago
More
BREAKING NEWS!!!
GOP WINS THE SENATE",Roez,e976wmi,conservative
With only 45% of Brown County in no way Walker loses,tja_1478,e97mh9x,conservative
"Montana Secretary of State website showing Rosendale ahead by 2k votes.  Will it hold?

Edit: up to 4k votes now.",rf-engineer,e97nscm,conservative
"I think Cruz may lose. Houston got an hour extension to vote, mostly the blue districts. Not looking good. ",uniquecannon,e978u6z,conservative
"these networks calling it now is a form of voter suppression. the democrats path to the house is through CA. by calling it now, they are suppressing possible voters. possible election interference.

This is 2000 all over again. ",JMB_was_a_god,e97ao0j,conservative
[Google live election results](https://www.google.com/search?rlz=1C1CHBF_enUS799US799&ei=m0HiW_SeEaaw_QaE6IeACA&q=midterm+elections+2018&oq=midterm&gs_l=psy-ab.3.2.35i39j0i67l3j0j0i67j0j0i67j0l2.376788.377447..379545...0.0..0.114.650.6j1),Orbtecc,e9766ri,conservative
any news on TX?,DL-Refugee,e97c1k9,conservative
Everyone in the Politics sub is celebrating that they can subpoena Trump's tax returns and prevent him from doing anything else. What a sad place. ,jdawgisyodaddy,e97dot8,conservative
Brogdon is laying a turd jesus,cookster123,e97h9t4,conservative
"Those results in Florida *should* scare off the hardest left impulses from 2020 candidates.

Let’s pray they don’t.

Also Lion Ted!!!!!!!!!!!!",recentlyunearthed,e97h2si,conservative
"Yo Fox is showing an 80% chance of Democrats taking the house.

Am I justified in freaking out right now?",JuliusEvolasGhost,e971yoc,conservative
Fox is such shit. Outside of Hannity and Tucker it's a fucking joke.,diamondeyes18,e97ccom,conservative
Fox just called the house for the Dems,pdawg43,e979m44,conservative
A lot of people fell for voting for phony moderate Dems for the house. Gave loons like Maxine way too much power. Going to stall out economy. Idiots,the-divine-comedy,e97a4us,conservative
Clawing back a bit. 82-69 (nice) D.,DogBeersHadOne,e97bvri,conservative
121-111 D.,DogBeersHadOne,e97gwrg,conservative
Fuck the Libertarian Party. They're costing us important seats. They accomplish nothing but helping elect progressives. ,GuitarWizard90,e97alqe,conservative
"This could be good. 2020 is gonna be the reckoning. All the Trump supporters that were democrats/independents that voted for moderate dems, will see they are beholdin to Pelosi and Schumer. We will have our 3/4 majority in the senate. We will pass amendments, we will stop the lefts lunacy.  And that's the optimist in me.  I think we are in for one hell of dog fight.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97gbmw,conservative
"help me out folks, cheer on my state wisconsin.  we've got a governor to reelect!",peeves91,e97m0rs,conservative
Fuck Boulder and fuck Denver! So tired of fucking Democrat governors in Colorado ,_JackieBoy_,e97m4jm,conservative
Fox gives dems 84% chance of winning the House ,GoofyUmbrella,e9796j8,conservative
[deleted],,e970vpu,conservative
"Demographics are destiny. if immigration continues unabated, birthright citizenship doesn't end and voter ID is passed, the GOP is fucked.",JMB_was_a_god,e97l33h,conservative
"We're probably boned, and it's not even related to Congress. The GOP has a far worse map for gubernatorial races than they do Senate ones, and they're going to lose a lot of them. Get ready for a bunch of new sanctuary states.",AMWarfield,e97368t,conservative
Anyone have a link to good coverage? I though Daily Wire was doing something but I can’t find it.,xKommandant,e9714fn,conservative
Come on PA-4. I know you can do this.,DogBeersHadOne,e978fmh,conservative
Lol is nobody watching Fox tonight? ,GoofyUmbrella,e978tih,conservative
Dems are catching up in the House...,BirchSquid789,e97h4bp,conservative
Why is no one talking about Georgia?!?!?,nekkomori,e97cyud,conservative
Please win Reynolds!,InAingeWeTrust,e97gzfg,conservative
Walker is going to pull this off... *Knocks on wood*,mouser58907,e97m018,conservative
Shock the world!!!!!,mikebets,e970cey,conservative
Fox just called the house for Dems. Seems premature. ,Ruckus45,e979o6m,conservative
Where should I check the results tomorrow when I woke up? Im not from the US and I don't want to be fumbling about trying to find a reliable source to see the replicans victory. Thanks,johnny_crow21,e97133t,conservative
http://i.4cdn.org/pol/1541556033528.png,richardguy,e977wvd,conservative
"Evers took the lead back and they are touting that Milwaukee has 45000 absentee ballots 
",game46312,e97oaym,conservative
So far so good. 2 Tossups seem like they're ours.,OrwellianLiberty,e970gb4,conservative
Anyone know why fox is calling Kaine when he's currently down?,IvankasFutureHusband,e971roc,conservative
"The system is still kind of a joke, and rigged against the right. For instance: https://www.270towin.com/2018-house-election/2018-house-battleground-map. And that's a standard result: like 80% of the landmass went Republican, these races should not even be close, but we allow a bunch of city slickers to try and dictate policy for everyone else, it's frankly obscene.",mask_and_knife,e980l85,conservative
"Sooooo what happened to that walk away ""movement"" that this sub was hyping up?

Edit: was expecting downvotes but still lol, I never understood the people who actually thought some Reddit posts about some random democrats would do anything. It's been a good night in the senate, and we seem to be generally surviving a real ""blue wave"", but the whole walk away thing was a joke, downvoting anyone who questioned it was stupid",Jusuf_Nurkic,e97cysf,conservative
Looks like Fl-26 and VA-7 are going to flip. Blue wave is still on the menu :(,mkgandkembafan,e976vck,conservative
"I'm seeing multiple news outlets saying that Gillum has won.

RIP Florida.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e973m31,conservative
"Guys my mom voted for Elizabeth Warren and I could not be more ashamed. I tried to convince her to leave it blank, but that did not work. I’m sorry I let you all down.",Willdabeast1022,e97gezk,conservative
Back down to 1 and 3 chance on 538.  Buh bye House :-(,TBSportsFan1254,e975wu3,conservative
Nobody can decide how much of the vote is in with Cruz keeps going up and down. Terrible reporting tonight.,the-divine-comedy,e97bapn,conservative
[removed],,e97e7nj,conservative
[Daily Wire Live Stream](https://youtu.be/kbnLuv5H41Y) ,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e973zjw,conservative
Don't you know 50% of America hates minorities and women? ,JumpyPorcupine,e97hzfr,conservative
"Says the show named after the people who committed the Armenian genocide, whose founder denies that it actually happened",mm1255,e97ian0,conservative
Not even sure how their over achieving to make it close paints a picture going forward. Total waste of money and energy.,Chr7,e97cun7,conservative
Seemed like an odd strategy for sure.,bearcatjoe,e97d5ne,conservative
"I think it's a very mixed bag. Important seats remained GOP, and the Dems may have taken the house but it's not the wave everyone predicted.

It did show one thing IMO. The darlings that ran hard left, failed. Like always the media poured their hopes and dreams into Beto, Gillum, Bredesen, Abrams and the voters said no. 

You would think the left would learn but fortunately for the GOP, they don't.",MajesticMulva,e97jdt0,conservative
"The GOP held NEARLY ALL of swing districts going in AND with the redraw of PA, it wasn’t going to be good. 

A dice roll on those close districts would see us lose the house. 

It happens especially two years after a presidential win.",recentlyunearthed,e97i1x3,conservative
another dem bites the dust!,dtlv5813,e97jkv2,conservative
That and the income tax cap! ,NCSUGrad2012,e97jxi5,conservative
Where did you hear that?,tenshon,e97dori,conservative
"Oh great, now he gets to be the new McCain.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97bygm,conservative
Only race I care about!!! Lol,eeeinator,e97bnki,conservative
Cool beans.,DogBeersHadOne,e97bn47,conservative
[deleted],,e979zss,conservative
I sacrificed my right femur for a Scott DeSantis win. Hope it was worth it.,pdawg43,e974sge,conservative
Florida is definitely going to come down to a tiny margin for whoever ends up winning.,Pyronot,e974gxv,conservative
MAGA,5937539859582754,e974mha,conservative
My butthole is really puckered,Menhadien,e974eon,conservative
Dammit now my hopes are up if we lose lol,TBSportsFan1254,e9755c7,conservative
"Feel bad for Rauner. Everything he did was fucked by unions and Madigan and now the voters in IL are absolutely screwed. Good riddance, it's their own fucking fault.",1wjl1,e97fnk8,conservative
Who got elected? What? Did I miss something?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e973zqn,conservative
My district just did the same thing.,zwiebelsaft,e97h1na,conservative
He's done so much good for that state I'm not sure how they can vote him out. ,AMollenhauer,e97kcvu,conservative
Hope you're right,eeeinator,e979iq5,conservative
Ditto in Oregon ,Vrael22,e97ahwj,conservative
"Yes, most of the population is in or near those cities, correct?",NotBryzgoalie30,e97lgsn,conservative
I bet Cali will look like that too. Coastal v. Inland.,Terra_green2,e97lwv0,conservative
"As a northern oregon resident, I'd rather kick portland out",kshebdhdbr,e97ll7u,conservative
"r/politics is a lot of fun to read right now.  I saw a guy complain that it was hard to have a pro dem discussion on it right now because too many conservatives were invading the sub.... 

EDIT:  I also saw a post where someone was blaming the lack of blue wave on white women betraying the Democratic Party.",bmack083,e97aiev,conservative
"Play-Doh and coloring books for everyone!!!!
",MooMooCudChew,e97ab27,conservative
A psychiatrist would help,ShillinTheVillain,e97a67h,conservative
Van Jones needs a serving of tendies. ,LonelyMachines,e97bh46,conservative
[Ummm like I don't know.](https://encrypted-tbn0.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcQYvx31tdC76hPItyYnDm29si_yEOXCvYcQQYVRstRRt_WYtzJv),jwt155,e97bfj3,conservative
How someone so dumb can be voted in so easily. NY is pathetic. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97bdgp,conservative
Can't wait for the memes to come from her. ,AMollenhauer,e97bc0n,conservative
Lmfao no way,Hplayer18,e97bzxl,conservative
Would've loved to see him win. Still think he's got a bright future ahead of him in the GOP though.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97hzgj,conservative
"Largely because of horrible Democratic mismanagement. NR had something encouraging him to privatize the DMV. Hell, I'd vote for anyone who wanted to do that. ",psstein,e97iztv,conservative
Kemp is up by 6 points with 93% counted.,-Shank-,e97ki47,conservative
"Same. Am sick today so I probably should be sleeping, but I really need to see this one called first.",Pyronot,e97kals,conservative
At 60 now holy shit,dansmith_byu,e974tl1,conservative
"I like hearing him refer to democrats as ""we"". Sheesh",jdawgisyodaddy,e97982e,conservative
"Its a WHITELASH!

you know what would be heartbreaking?  Ted Cruz losing texas to that faux Mexican.",stoffel_bristov,e9790jd,conservative
Why? Dems Arent doing terrible ,eeeinator,e9793jk,conservative
"But the Dems *didn’t* realign. That’s what scares me. 

They were rewarded for being radical, violent, and extreme. It would’ve been one thing if they’d gone back to the party of Kennedy in the wake of 2016, but they went right off the Overton Window entirely. 
",YankeeBlues21,e97hsle,conservative
Dont forget Stacy Abrams for GA gov lost by 8 points or more than 300k votes... Wonder if well see retractions over being accused of stealing elections,freedomhertz,e97iuoq,conservative
"I think there are still people in line to vote, and they can't release data till the lines end",Marko_Ramius1,e97io1d,conservative
"Seriously, it is getting to the point of being hard to justify keeping on over Fox, which has done such a poor job of reporting that many of us reluctantly chose CNN for the night in the first place.",gprime,e97m7zl,conservative
Here's hoping! James is the future.,pimpinassorlando,e975vy9,conservative
"Isn't that with just 3 of the precincts reporting in though?  Might change things a bit.

But I hope Stabecow doesn't get that big lead in Oakland County that she's been banking on.  And Macomb County helps flip MI again.",notathrowaway_5150,e97610a,conservative
"""Blue war"" lol",inconspicuoujavert,e978xrv,conservative
Source please?,BirchSquid789,e97d19m,conservative
">it's official

X doubt",kharper4289,e97d7lh,conservative
Same with philly suburbs. :(,mycathasoneeye,e97ezvm,conservative
All the Republicans left. ,molon-labe7,e97f13q,conservative
Are you... surprised?,GorathThorgath,e97eyno,conservative
Same with Twin Cities suburbs.,zwiebelsaft,e97fntd,conservative
"They are likely going by their exit polling.  If they are calling it, have to just hope for some of the other pickups to hold.    ",TBSportsFan1254,e97a6bu,conservative
What did they call it for,Phinaeus,e97aida,conservative
"I have prediction right here.  

Beto will be the 2020 dem presidential nominee.   ",stoffel_bristov,e97cin7,conservative
"nice, time to go on r/politics and mine some salt.",ItWasLikeWhite,e97cwqu,conservative
"Fitzpatrick won in PA, and MacArthur held on in South Jersey. There's still some common sense left in the Philly metro!",RPwhitefrost,e97j4es,conservative
Philly boy eh?,DogBeersHadOne,e97iaug,conservative
Democrats get the house by a slim margin and we get to replace Ginsburg's corpse. ,thx_II38,e97bqyq,conservative
"For two years, anyway.",AyyyGreens,e97bor0,conservative
"Whenever I hear Biden talking about civility, I think back to how he said Romney would put blacks back in chains. Mitt had to deal with a lot of unnecessary bullshit. 


I'm happy to see him in a prominent role again. I think he'll be a good voice in the senate. ",RPwhitefrost,e97bvnx,conservative
he will replace McCain as the resident anti-trumpist.,JMB_was_a_god,e97bzj2,conservative
R/politics is saying they dont mind him that much compared to other Rs. The fucking nerve,doobsftw,e97e7k2,conservative
At least we didn't lose the Senate. Typically you lose them together. Senate Dems in 2020 have a rough map.,Phinaeus,e97lf9k,conservative
"Honestly it's been the same since Bush II. I was hopeful to keep the house, but realistically when you're losing the national vote by 7 points its bound to happen.",richardguy,e97lc5q,conservative
"The panhandle is mostly an hour behind is why. 

For those curious, only 7% of precincts are reporting as of now, so there’s plenty of time left. I think we’ll have a better idea at 10",AyyyGreens,e971wcs,conservative
Associate Justice Amy Coney Barrett has a nice ring to it.,DogBeersHadOne,e97d9a4,conservative
"He’s not a bad candidate and appealed for far more of the counties in Virginia then Kaine, but NoVa is too populous. It’s like upstate NY trying to outvote NYC and Buffalo. Northern VA has just gotten too populated by liberals working in and around DC. They put vote everyone else.",War-Damn-America,e9772we,conservative
Someone had to be the sacrificial lamb,game46312,e976woy,conservative
"Like, solid flip or just for a minute flipped?",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97azck,conservative
What do you mean? ,molon-labe7,e97b9sg,conservative
huh?,NuclearMisogynyist,e97b8ht,conservative
"Beto lost, but here is why that's a good thing!",DogBirdLizard,e97gkdu,conservative
When Marlins Man awakens from his wintry stupor.,DogBeersHadOne,e97ij13,conservative
They still haven’t counted the dead vote yet. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e97iy38,conservative
Grapplin' Greg Gianforte!,GuitarWizard90,e97isek,conservative
"""WATCH OUT WATCH OUT WATCH OUT""",inconspicuoujavert,e97iogc,conservative
They have ,NCSUGrad2012,e97kp6l,conservative
"I hate to say this too, when it comes to live breaking news events, CNN is better than Fox, can't stand Shepherd Smith out there running his jaws non stop.",dapcook,e974fds,conservative
UNPOSSIBLE!,Moonthrower,e97406z,conservative
"Glad you mentioned that, because I gave it a try and thus far I agree. For the time being, CNN it is.",gprime,e974k4i,conservative
Yeah this is hard to follow lol. Reddit is helping more than Fox. ,inconspicuoujavert,e977stx,conservative
Why's that?,notathrowaway_5150,e977se5,conservative
"Hi there, fellow Floridian! I'm a happy man tonight because of this.",BirchSquid789,e97hwbh,conservative
"We did it!

(And it’s only small fries, but the campaign I worked on held the last red spot in Broward!)
",YankeeBlues21,e97i3ti,conservative
I live in TX. Ted Cruz barely ran a campaign. ,DJ_GiantMidget,e97aydd,conservative
Its mostly Huston and Dallas reporting. Just give it time. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97ayje,conservative
"You're right, it shouldn't.

Cruz got leveled by Trump, has had his reputation smeared and he was out spent 10:1 by the Democrats who **hate** money in politics to elect Beto. The fact he's hanging in there still shows how bad the Democrats are at winning voters.",jwt155,e97b54t,conservative
It’s all the transplanted Californians trying to ruin Texas. ,justhere2havefun,e97awm2,conservative
its all the illegals and Californians.,JMB_was_a_god,e97ayfz,conservative
[my response to the fine folks at r/politics](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M5QGkOGZubQ),aCreditGuru,e976jis,conservative
Don’t sneer. They might. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e976z59,conservative
"She locked up her future as a lobbyist though, so she looked out for herself.",notathrowaway_5150,e979ios,conservative
welcome.,IvankasFutureHusband,e979j7s,conservative
If they spend the next two years doing nothing but that they will get crushed in 2020 ,GoTigers07,e97e3ac,conservative
I hope they try... Seing as the Blue wave has fizzled it will be tough to keep the momentum for pointless investigations going,freedomhertz,e97ee4z,conservative
Dingbat Pelosi as Speaker of the House is going to be the greatest gift ever.,apex_editor,e97efmv,conservative
Poor T Swift broke her no-politics rule only to lose anyway. ,thx_II38,e978os1,conservative
Did my part :/,diamondeyes18,e97d3yw,conservative
I tried :(,Detective_57,e97drtf,conservative
"Brown's gonna run for POTUS in 2020. He can win as a D in Trump country and isn't an insane person. He's a lefty, yes, but he's not a shrieking harpy like anyone else they'd trot out.",The_Night-Man_Cometh,e97d4t4,conservative
0% reporting lol,NCSUGrad2012,e97i8cg,conservative
They didn't pay attention to the Cali folks sneaking into your state in the past few years ,game46312,e97l0e3,conservative
If we keep the house.....I will enjoy the crying libtards.  Might even browse /r/politics to see them whine,SteelerSuperFan,e975tr2,conservative
https://i.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/001/151/310/2d8.jpg,thx_II38,e977o9f,conservative
What needle are you watching?,coexistwiththechill,e977lho,conservative
[deleted],,e97a6ff,conservative
I can't believe that is so close.   Ugh.,NCSUGrad2012,e97abo0,conservative
"I've been telling people for months, even if they win the most pyrrhic of victories, they will make it the biggest deal ever. ",Aaron_is_cool,e97ax61,conservative
CNN said “this is not a blue wave” ,SpaghettiSweater,e97b4pw,conservative
"Won't stop them from call it one.  Hell, they'll probably claim this gives them a 'mandate'",lastbastion,e97bdib,conservative
"Chuck Todd has said ""No blue wave"" a couple times already. Though he is more technical about the definition of a wave.",recentlyunearthed,e97av20,conservative
"Yes, and nothing good will get done.  ",NCSUGrad2012,e97avq1,conservative
In an off year election for them to not win the house in a land slide is a huge setback for them.,NuclearMisogynyist,e97bbq5,conservative
"where are you seeing that?

&#x200B;",molon-labe7,e97b1q9,conservative
"Yup. Congress is gonna be a fucking dumpster fire of obstruction, screeching, and bullshit for the next two years. ",d_grizzle,e97iycd,conservative
The REEEEsistance ,JewishJonny,e97fksw,conservative
Time for Ryan to do some soul searching.,DogBeersHadOne,e97e5ac,conservative
florida is always a roller coster,stoffel_bristov,e974bm0,conservative
"Someone please help me out here. Fox is showing a 14 seat lead in house, gop ahead. Eveyone is calling the house a win for d. What am I missing.",tmone,e97c8ru,conservative
">CNN is already claiming Gillum's loss is really a moral victory.

>Edit: Now Beto is a moral victory too.

How do they get away with this stuff? Oh, they just wanted their Obama 2.0",richardguy,e97l0v9,conservative
Government shutdowns until they cut a deal.,PhilosoGuido,e970xx1,conservative
It dropped back down to 43%,-Shank-,e97526x,conservative
I'm getting 42.8% using that link.,TBSportsFan1254,e974znl,conservative
What's funny is that Nate Silver is already trying to say that the analytics are being too aggressively in favor of the GOP.,notathrowaway_5150,e9758of,conservative
Lmao ,Hplayer18,e974wq4,conservative
I'm doubting those numbers on the House but as long as we can maintain the Rust Belt we should be good.,DogBeersHadOne,e976avp,conservative
Joe who?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e976l2q,conservative
Has that been called?!,NCSUGrad2012,e976qzr,conservative
"I want to see James win and then the salt from my friends who are leftists.  I mean how can you hate the idea of a diverse Senate?

Oh, you can hate by hating Republicans.",notathrowaway_5150,e9794go,conservative
It's gonna be close. It just sucks that Whitmer is gonna win.,ShillinTheVillain,e979yqj,conservative
Watching Fox News w/my mum.  Politics is a family affair here.,notathrowaway_5150,e9797in,conservative
hows the coverage?,IvankasFutureHusband,e979cvr,conservative
Got a link?,exigence,e979i14,conservative
That's my parents district.  Let's hope he wins.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e97ad8e,conservative
Warren won? I don't see the smoke signals just yet from here...,jwt155,e97f4ry,conservative
Ocasio-Cortez won as well.  There will be plenty of crazy and stupid embarrassing the Democrats for the next 2 years.,Yosoff,e97gn7b,conservative
looks very close mcsally leading by less than 1% thus far. still don't see az voting for an actual pinko over a decorated fighter jet pilot. ,dtlv5813,e97ji3l,conservative
We won my house seat PA-01... The house is difficult to keep due to the elections every 2 years.,lion27,e97k2ea,conservative
My sacrifice is working!,pdawg43,e976g78,conservative
Pucker factor at 90% and steadily climbing.,DogBeersHadOne,e976p0a,conservative
The butt hurt is going to be unreal for me if they lose now.  My hopes are officially up    ,TBSportsFan1254,e976uv8,conservative
James 2024.,AMollenhauer,e97byhd,conservative
"I've loved James for months. I can't believe he's made it even this close. Even if he loses, we need to keep him in the spotlight. ",RPwhitefrost,e97bxb2,conservative
Wish MI would get some more coverage. I really want him to win!,Rehnquist11,e97c2jk,conservative
"Nah.  Party out of power is in an easy position.  The part in control of the White House loses seats in the House so much historically in these off year elections, it's a testament to the dynamics, not the issues.  

In fact, I would say the D's not doing as well in state races and the Senate is probably proof the R's are in a solid spot going forward (though no telling what event might happen and upend things).  ",Roez,e97ejwb,conservative
"Yep, Fuck McCain, the Democrat gift that keeps on giving. ",Dutchtroll5,e97dyku,conservative
The “they are killing pre-existing conditions” lie was a powerful talking point that we never rebutted. Also why is everyone concerned about healthcare I thought Obama care was supposed to fix it,the-divine-comedy,e97ebea,conservative
McCain can go fuck himself.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97ekxc,conservative
"The night is still young, and shit can go south real quick",Dank_Cartographer,e9759f0,conservative
Where are you seeing this? ,AMollenhauer,e97866d,conservative
Whew. I might have to flip to CNN. Hard to follow the fox coverage ,inconspicuoujavert,e9785ow,conservative
Where are people seeing these results? Every online tracker has Beto up. ,uniquecannon,e978d0k,conservative
The Texas race is all over the place. It seems like every website is saying something different. ,spar101,e978m36,conservative
Whoever breaks 4 million votes will win that race,mbarnar,e978pxd,conservative
He's been saying for a while that Biden is the most dangerous person that could run against Trump since he could lock down moderates and is for some odd reason favorably well liked.,SirRollsaSpliff,e97dffg,conservative
They should run Beto.  I'm dead serious.  This is as close to a moral victory they will get in the Senate.  He isn't seen  as  a loom and the media will slurp him up.        ,TBSportsFan1254,e97e990,conservative
"Moderate Democrat has become an oxymoron though. The center sits so firmly inside the GOP that it’s bizarre that Dems can keep running people who act reasonable but vote with the nuts. 
",YankeeBlues21,e97dsba,conservative
"Kemp: Don't like him, also don't like Abrams, Georgia is fucked either way

DeSantis: Slimy but smart, Ted Cruz vibes, am cautiously optimistic

Rick Scott: Great kinda-rags to solid-riches story, and I do love me a man who ain't one of those high-falutin' officer types. Still, Bill Nelson was kinda a DINO anyway so it probably won't really change much.",GorathThorgath,e97fd3f,conservative
YES!,BirchSquid789,e97ehwb,conservative
"I think D's will end up with 15-20+ margin in the House--a lot of close races have gone D's in the last hour.  I really don't have a problem with that--no party is going to have power forever.  It's easier to be the party out of power.  The D's will ramp up a lot of hearings on Trump and we'll probably have two years of a lot of Kavanaugh type leftist moments.  If they go for impeachment, it's out of spite.  It seems like they will overstep their hand.  

The real big news is the R's might end up with 54-55 senate seats, which should help them hold the Senate in 2020.  It also lets them push through a lot more judicial appointments over the next two years.  ",Roez,e97czfk,conservative
The biggest way this country doesn't become a leftist shithole is the native-born population increasing its birthrate and removing that incentive to keep illegals.,DogBeersHadOne,e97cqbh,conservative
It’s pretty inevitable because we can’t do anything with immigration.,the-divine-comedy,e97cp44,conservative
"I mean, he *did* beat a black man... /s",PM_ME_YOUR_SPICIEST,e97gfy6,conservative
So who actually gets his seat if he’s dead ?,teddyrooseveltsfist,e97o0ag,conservative
Has this ever happened before? I can't stop thinking about West Wing now lol,TheEsophagus,e97p1ls,conservative
"No, they’ll just start screeching about voter suppression, gerrymandering, and racism, then say republicans stole the seats.",averydoggo,e97dhb0,conservative
It's a moral victory! /s,lastbastion,e97dfaw,conservative
As long as they almost win in 2 years,StJohnTheSwift,e97dfsb,conservative
We've been fucked for a long time brother...,alienvalentine,e977mjr,conservative
">Illinois is so fucked 

Fixed

",vorpalsword92,e977caw,conservative
RIP your taxes those who live in IL and already are dealing with paying too much in taxes for that poorly run state.,aCreditGuru,e977cp2,conservative
"JB is just gonna do whatever Michael Madigan wants him to do. 

We are fucked. Gonna start looking for a house to get out of here. ",Nightshade37,e977gqa,conservative
Yea I'm a bit confused by this. ,S_D_W_2,e97a2dp,conservative
"because they are not sane. its too early
",JMB_was_a_god,e97aj4o,conservative
Probably lost viewers due to their shit coverage and trying to get people back.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e97afuc,conservative
It's easy we just need outsiders to pour $62 million into Cruz's next campaign!,tiger81775149,e97d3js,conservative
Like not snubbing the Republican nominee at the convention?,eeeinator,e97cyaf,conservative
Source please?,BirchSquid789,e97fdwh,conservative
"The panhandle results come in later because they are in a different time zone. Look at a 2016 presidential county  result map for Florida and it is almost the exact same results. 

https://pt.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ficheiro:2012_Presidential_Election_by_County.svg",teddyrooseveltsfist,e975rme,conservative
Yes.,Menhadien,e975evh,conservative
Damn snowbirds and brained washed kids,pdawg43,e975e98,conservative
"Hahah, I love this sub.  ",Roez,e975lf4,conservative
Florida is a state with a very diverse populace.,AyyyGreens,e975kvm,conservative
Wyoming has been called red with 0% precincts reporting in. So I think you’re onto something. The race is over once all the votes are in.,AyyyGreens,e977wyd,conservative
"There's like 3% reporting in, I think...Don't freak out yet. ",TBSportsFan1254,e978x5b,conservative
Result of anger at Brownback's total ineptitude and that Kobach was less than an ideal candidate.,psstein,e97j2dy,conservative
Mixed bag. Republicans have lost 4 or 5 but have a chance at flipping Connecticut.,-Shank-,e97luyg,conservative
Wisconsin is within only a few thousand votes and still a few hours of counting. Leads keep getting leapfrogged.  Well within recount margins.,Lustan,e97m8wn,conservative
"My wife voted straight R in NJ, but she voted yes for Question 1 and for us Question 2(raising taxes to have armed guards in schools)

",thorvard,e972tbe,conservative
Why’d she not vote?,Splickity-Lit,e9734p9,conservative
If only we didn't lose Alabama. ,Zero_x_Shinobi,e97fm1i,conservative
well they aren't very heavy we should have no problem doing that,diamondeyes18,e97fjp0,conservative
We need to have more green party candidates run.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e97ahlp,conservative
He's so awesome now lol,NCSUGrad2012,e97eca6,conservative
That means we are going to pack the courts to the brim with conservatives.,-Skinwalker-,e97gy88,conservative
"I'm also seeing Pelosi saying that Americans have had enough division, and will want Congress to work towards bipartisanship. I'd like to see her convince the large anti-Trump wing of the Democrats to work on that bipartisanship.",AvdaxNaviganti,e97im63,conservative
"Funny enough, Beto got nearly as many votes as the last guy who ran against Cruz got back in 2012. The reason it was close was because less people turned out for Cruz this time. He had nearly a million fewer votes this year than 2012.",uniquecannon,e97faqt,conservative
Dems spent sooooo much money on that race. I wouldn't take too much from it. ,an0nymous_bosch,e97fb9c,conservative
"While I think it is best if they don’t win the house, if they do there is no way they can be civil for 2 years, and in the presidential year we will win it back. 

We need to keep the senate to keep the judicial appointees flowing.",Racheakt,e971wlj,conservative
"Scott could win with Gillum losing.  Ow Florida, you are so confusing.  ",stoffel_bristov,e974kh3,conservative
"If you checked the model 10 minutes ago it would have said 60% R for the house. I imagine there was a small hiccup somewhere, but it might stabilize at 57%D or 60%R until the next polls close. ",glacierguy1,e9757l2,conservative
The Dems really got nothing at all out of the Kavanaugh drama. What a terrible play that was.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97i4bx,conservative
Tester? ,Rytho,e97h3cz,conservative
Rep flipped a dem assembly seat where I am in the north country.,tja_1478,e97msdv,conservative
Fellow New Yorker here. I feel you. I’m sitting here waiting for Amazon to announce if HQ2 is coming to LIC. I work in tech so the opportunity to play the field due to tightening in the software engineer job market could do wonders for my career. If they officially don’t come to New York I’m gonna request a transfer to another office.,superAL1394,e985k3x,conservative
You should start a petition to make them become a part of New Jersey.  ,s0briquet,e9846zt,conservative
Their is the best by far,notviolence,e970qru,conservative
NYT was good on 2016 election day as well. ,thorvard,e971bbl,conservative
Depending on his stance on gun rights I wanna vote for that man for president.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97ddx7,conservative
How much of Wayne County is in?,ShillinTheVillain,e97f9m8,conservative
23,eeeinator,e97cqre,conservative
Rs lost the house already.,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97cr32,conservative
22,pdawg43,e97cpyu,conservative
11,Piestrio,e97cqop,conservative
Both Scott and DeSantis are looking like like probable winners,-Shank-,e97coyg,conservative
"Still really close, but most sites have Scott and DeSantis winning",Menhadien,e97cu7i,conservative
[https://twitter.com/guypbenson/status/1060007792151552001](https://twitter.com/guypbenson/status/1060007792151552001),Marko_Ramius1,e97coxf,conservative
"DeSantis still leads by 1% (85, 301) with 98.2% in, Scott still leads by 0.8% (64, 421) with 98.2% in.",AyyyGreens,e97cw0z,conservative
Really glad issue 1 failed too. Would have bankrupted local governments. ,atomicdiarrhea4000,e97g7gg,conservative
"Maybe, maybe not.",BirchSquid789,e97ft8d,conservative
"I understand the sentiment, but it isn't as if the Congress has been some big policy factory anyway.  The bigger concern is that the new House will use their investigative powers to subpoena every last shred of paper with the President's name on it.            ",TBSportsFan1254,e97gmt0,conservative
2 years are better than 6,DJ_GiantMidget,e97gp1k,conservative
"As someone who hates the federal government, a gridlock is something i am happy to see",beachmedic23,e97icze,conservative
"CA's decent so far, then again not much is in.",DogBeersHadOne,e97hdsf,conservative
"For real - the Lefties hate Rick Scott so much, and Nelson has been unstoppable for so long.  Guess Republicans here in Florida were just fired up!",robotoverlordz,e97ecr2,conservative
Scott is up .8% with 99% reporting. He pretty much won it,-Shank-,e97eac6,conservative
Same. I voted here in WV this morning and am hoping for the best. ,skarface6,e971qtl,conservative
"I loved Walker, that's a shame.",NCSUGrad2012,e97dqwx,conservative
He had a good run though ,eeeinator,e97dsu3,conservative
"$15 minimum wage here we come... time to start the job hunt again. I make more than $15, but if Evers actually gets that through RIP my pay when factoring in cost of living...",DogBirdLizard,e97f00x,conservative
"Sadly, I'm not surprised. He's not as popular as people think in Wisconsin. He's despised in Madison. When I've been out of the city limits,  I've seen a lot more Evers signs than I was expecting.",SinisterPaige,e97dxw1,conservative
I'm 95% sure people voted for Walz across the border because he reminds them of Garrison Keillor but maybe we won't get Diet Jerry Brown out of the mix.,zwiebelsaft,e97g689,conservative
"> (PA redistricting also played a role)

But I thought only the evil Republicans did gerrymandering /s

",mbarnar,e97g31i,conservative
"the flip side is , when trump is on the ticket in 2020, these districts will flip right back to gop and a majority along with them. same with that staten island house seat and many others throughout the country. ",dtlv5813,e97htkv,conservative
"Yeah, why is he a thing there? Montana is one state I would expect to be firmly red.",SovietUrsa,e97l4uj,conservative
The incumbent Presidential party has lost seats every single time but twice since the beginning of the 20th century.  It was bound to happen.       ,TBSportsFan1254,e97b2sm,conservative
"People are quick to forget, and the emotional appeal of Democrats is strong",Menhadien,e97afns,conservative
It baffles me,pdawg43,e97a6w2,conservative
The nonstop republican smear campaign by msm doesnt help much,windstarke,e97a91a,conservative
They flee the hammer and sickle policies yet bring the same poisonous liberalism with them and ruin it for the rest of us. Very low IQ of them ,JewishJonny,e97ekw1,conservative
"I don't think it's ca, it's the new immigrants and h1b's
",notviolence,e97fxje,conservative
I'm dissapointed in our state for voting in Keith Ellison even with all his acusastions against him. Goes to show how blind voters are in MN and that they want free hand outs in life from the Dems. ,MusicApollo93,e97nmei,conservative
Garbage fucking state deserves a garbage fucking human for wifebeater general.,Moonthrower,e97s86i,conservative
">Almost

Oh you sweet summer child",zwiebelsaft,e97pmc3,conservative
Don't forget Osoff. ,richardguy,e97lghv,conservative
It was an idiotic strategic move. Throwing $80 million at Robert Francis O'Rourke meant $80 million that couldn't go to Donnelly or Nelson. ,psstein,e97n56n,conservative
Also Peter sessions who didn't even have a dem challenger in 2016,dtlv5813,e97mz51,conservative
"Amen, brother.",SirRollsaSpliff,e976pqo,conservative
Looks like God answered.,1wjl1,e97flyb,conservative
amen. ,k1kthree,e97g6jv,conservative
"That's the Blackburn (R) win in Tenn Senate right?  I'm guessing from twitter, no one has said it out right yet. ",Roez,e977zui,conservative
 Who? ,NeedzRehab,e97fjpz,conservative
Portland should just be sawed off. ,AMollenhauer,e97jy7a,conservative
"https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-oregon-elections.html

I fucking hate this state; really can't wait to move. ",Vrael22,e97lhrh,conservative
"You should have tried, I know some people from Mexico are trying.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97415h,conservative
"Wow, tight.",Terra_green2,e979we5,conservative
My taxes are going up (work in ILLINOIS),game46312,e973jif,conservative
Only like 3% in so numbers are meaningless.,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e978tnm,conservative
70% in and he's down quite a bit. Not looking good. ,AMollenhauer,e9799mc,conservative
"Yep, the incumbent Democrat won. ",NCSUGrad2012,e97hdtr,conservative
Which makes no sense because 70+% if Nevadans vote early...,Taylor814,e97kq4b,conservative
"Been wondering the same thing. Oregon already called the governor race, right?",8K12,e97kdvg,conservative
Still waiting to see Scott get confirmed in The Guardian's live midterm report.,BirchSquid789,e97j0y8,conservative
Read my post above. Not pleased with his gun control business.,richardguy,e97j5um,conservative
"Where are you seeing that? It looks to me like mostly urban Atlanta counties are left (ie, Fulton). I'm definitely optimistic about Kemp winning, but anything can happen.",Pyronot,e977s9t,conservative
"Nashville news stations have been telling us for weeks that Blackburn/Bredesen was polling extremely close. Yes, guys, 60/35/<5%I is so very close... ",somegaijin42,e979lw4,conservative
Cruz now ahead in Texas.,Pyronot,e979zvw,conservative
Not a total loss if we ditch Loebsack. Still tabulating...,DEYoungRepublicans,e97ek67,conservative
That Flint water crisis has been a abertross around the MIGOP neck for a while ,game46312,e97ky61,conservative
"Oh my god, ~~this state~~ Hennepin County actually elected him.",zwiebelsaft,e97gcmg,conservative
"Don't hold back, tell us how you really feel.",DogBeersHadOne,e97dggm,conservative
"Well, Cruz is actually leading votes, so that’s an interesting call",AyyyGreens,e97as0m,conservative
I doubt it. Fox has Cruz in the lead now. ,justhere2havefun,e97as5f,conservative
No.  The just said that he's not on track to catch up.,tehForce,e97b47t,conservative
That's a bit early? ,remybob78,e97b1lt,conservative
A bunch of girdlock but we still get all the judges we want in the senate.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e97buka,conservative
"Dueling Senate and House investigations - Nancy and Maxine making the Dem party into even more of a laughingstock - a complete end to the ""you control all the branches of government"" complaints and a shift to blaming the Dems for obstruction and having it stick. 2020 Red Tsunami.",kaioto,e97bzqi,conservative
"yep, pretty much a complete stalemate.  Nothing will get down except through EO's.  All the more reason for them to call us fascists.  

Although Maxine becoming the finance chair is laughable, I'm sure she will get caught up in some scandal.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97c1qi,conservative
They will probably try to impeach but it will just be for show. Then a lot of gridlock. But who knows they might work it out. Gotta just hope for the best. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97c0u7,conservative
And r/politics and other online echo chanbers.,jwt155,e97gvrh,conservative
They are just starting to count the suburban parts of Maricopa County which is heavily Republican. McSally will win on the strength of this alone. It will likely be close like Cruz though.,dtlv5813,e97mxbv,conservative
yeah really.  As far as the majority goes it doesn't really make a difference but I kind of want to gloat on /r/politics about Sinema losing before bed.,Arm-the-homeless,e97mu6j,conservative
Good. Let them show their colors for 2020 so that the moderates see there is no moderate Democrats.,notathrowaway_5150,e97gkc8,conservative
[deleted],,e97gpqi,conservative
The House is still looking like its heading toward flip territory.  ,TBSportsFan1254,e9786g0,conservative
"The Dems sunk lots of money into this race.  Tons of money.  Without that, Beto wouldn't even be this close.  Also, he is not showing any sign of catching up...",tehForce,e97b2cn,conservative
there is never going to be a bipartisan anything. the country is too divided. ,JMB_was_a_god,e97bhh6,conservative
"Dont expect any goodwill.

Their plan is to launch probe after probe to find something that can take down Trump.",RoundSimbacca,e97bapu,conservative
Nope. They will be too busy screeching about impeachment. ,amjourdan,e97b87j,conservative
"The answer is brutally simple: We get a fully-funded wall, Schumer gets the Hudson River tunnels fixed. No wall, take the fucking ferry.",DogBeersHadOne,e97bbrj,conservative
Never gonna happen. Expect 2 years of gridlock. Not that that's necessarily a bad thing. ,_Gardien,e97brbn,conservative
Not only that but good chuck of them are from red districts if they start rolling with Nancy they gone,game46312,e97j6il,conservative
Did they? I read it was on YouTube too,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e973inx,conservative
Its not quite 2016 yet as the house is still up in air (Probably a 50/50 chance of keeping control in the house right now).  But there are some really good signs.  Florida GOP is outperforming without a doubt.  Dems have virtually no chance of taking control of the senate.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9786ze,conservative
"For what it's worth, Manchin seems at least reasonable ",Vrael22,e977ydf,conservative
"Least terrible Democrat in the Senate, so it isn't the end of the world, but it is a shame given how red WV has become.",gprime,e9785fm,conservative
"Anyone here think Manchin might flip to the Republicans if the majority is big enough? There was word he might have caucused with the Republicans after the 2016 election if the Senate had been split 50/50.

In any event, thanks for the Kavanaugh vote, at least.",GameShowWerewolf,e9784n0,conservative
Morrisey never had a realistic chance against him.,rjohnson99,e977zn5,conservative
50-47.8 for James👀,mm1255,e978w2z,conservative
Sauce?,notathrowaway_5150,e978ikk,conservative
"Yeah, this was weird that he got re-elected after all that crap. ",justhere2havefun,e97atqs,conservative
You mean LION Ted.,GuitarWizard90,e97ca3q,conservative
Thank God lol,eeeinator,e97capz,conservative
Yes!!!! Thank God!!,NCSUGrad2012,e97cagd,conservative
[YAY!!!!!!!!](https://media1.tenor.com/images/759f4179c9318e8c1e50e5dbad4e0006/tenor.gif?itemid=3931521),Marko_Ramius1,e97caty,conservative
Unclench? Unclench.,DogBeersHadOne,e97cbc7,conservative
Ya.  Texas shouldn't be this close.  Ted needs a little more authenticity and less southern preacher. ,stoffel_bristov,e97ceks,conservative
What a win.,jwt155,e97c9cq,conservative
"If that happens, I have 3 little words to keep us going:

#Hillary isn't president",peeves91,e974s4m,conservative
If we lose or win do it with dignity. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e971f6o,conservative
And if we do(as I think we will) we should not lose our minds and go on whatever social media platform and whine about it. ,thorvard,e9718d3,conservative
UNPOSSIBLE!!,Moonthrower,e974xup,conservative
https://graphics.axios.com/2018-11-06-midterm-election/index.html?view=G,JMB_was_a_god,e976y07,conservative
Decision Desk HQ.,DogBeersHadOne,e976q0y,conservative
What happens in 2 minutes? ,KrimsonStorm,e9777om,conservative
"I agree.

* Gridlock is good for the economy
* Trump can still get solid, originalist judges approved
* Dems will make fools of themselves in the House with their witch hunts.  Obstructionism won't play well in 2020 and Trump will pound them on it.

Think long game.",bearcatjoe,e97c6it,conservative
"It not only was expected, to not have that haoppen is unprecendented.

Hearing the left switch gears and justify that a blue wave happened if they take the house hsows how delusional they are with their message. Taking the house away from the opposing party 2 years after a presidential election is not a blue wave, it's historically and factually wrong.",jwt155,e97c2un,conservative
I have faith in our Secret Service agents,Menhadien,e97e6m9,conservative
"It will be entertaining to watch their old wounds open up again.

And their hold on the House is very tenuous. Gonna be awfully hard to pass things with only a 10-vote majority.",RoundSimbacca,e97u4ai,conservative
Not much. Not sure where to watch the results. I might just wait for the morning and see what the subreddit has to say. ,skarface6,e971gn4,conservative
"Have 3 watch parties to go to!      
The best way ive heard this is its like getting ready for a colonoscopy on christmas day. Exciting and scary",DJ_GiantMidget,e971o5l,conservative
And a notorious serial killer who has yet to be caught! /s,PM_ME_YOUR_SPICIEST,e97d4l7,conservative
"> A man who ran against him using the name Beto to virtue signal instead of Robert (Cruz is guilty of the same).

Cruz does not do the same thing.  I am sick of this argument.

>Cruz: Well, you’re absolutely right, my name is Rafael Edward Cruz. I am the son of Rafael Cruz, an immigrant from Cuba who came to Texas with nothing, had a hundred dollars in his underwear, couldn’t speak English, washed dishes making 50 cents an hour, and my dad’s journey of coming to Texas seeking freedom, that’s the American story, that’s who we are.

Cruz's middle name is Edward thus Ted. His Dad is Cuban.  His Mom is from Delaware.  There is no 'signal' there.

Francis is a fourth generation American whose family came over from Ireland to work on the railroad.  Robert Francis O'Rourke is not Spanish.  ""Beto"" is an affectation.  ",lastbastion,e97d8w2,conservative
He took a lot of heat for not endorsing Trump at the convention. So a lot of this is his own fault,eeeinator,e97cozz,conservative
they can't report any numbers until everyone has voted. If you were in line at poll closing you were able to vote. Hence the late reporting.,aCreditGuru,e97nkg5,conservative
"hey fellow floridafag. I wouldn't be so optimistic. If the ballot initiatives tell me anything it's that this state is still ruled by retirees and boomers- very happy to get their ""Free"" stuff (property tax amends) but vote red. Going by what happened in March, they are not to be relied on.",richardguy,e97jy7p,conservative
Honestly? Losing the Presidential Nomination hurt him. Running for those things has risks. ,recentlyunearthed,e97bcs5,conservative
"Cruz is going to win, what are you talking about?",1wjl1,e97bxix,conservative
Yep. Definitely not getting a wall. Hopefully some bipartisan legislation comes out of this but I doubt it,Phinaeus,e97r0ak,conservative
"He'll resign with ""dignity"".",Yosoff,e97gom9,conservative
"I'm not so sure now. The Dems will be leading investigations through the House, so firing Sessions would be getting them ammo.",SovietUrsa,e97geww,conservative
Iowa too. ,xKommandant,e97jz47,conservative
Serious question....who is Rosen?,tsmft05,e97qp84,conservative
Seems like that should break R late with the panhandle no?,mm1255,e974xja,conservative
"Nope, most of Trumps stuff like judges and executive shit is Senate confirmed. Problem is if Dems take the house they'll bog down everything with non-stop investigations and typical bullshit.",SirRollsaSpliff,e97bjpg,conservative
Nyet.,DogBeersHadOne,e97bj31,conservative
"No, just the senate. ",NCSUGrad2012,e97bhli,conservative
Nope,Vrael22,e97bhv5,conservative
nope straight senate.,IvankasFutureHusband,e97bhpf,conservative
Nope,GuitarWizard90,e97bhps,conservative
nope,aCreditGuru,e97bhvi,conservative
No. Supreme Court is all senate. ,KrimsonStorm,e97bhgh,conservative
"No. Senate confirms SC appointees.

Edit: I love how informed we are",AyyyGreens,e97bheu,conservative
"technically yes, it doesn't look great from early reporting.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97ezbx,conservative
"Looks like amendment 3 passed though, so that's good.  ",NCSUGrad2012,e97je7a,conservative
"James is Michigan, though.",RPwhitefrost,e97cs1l,conservative
"> Minnesota's  house went Red

Hell froze over?",zwiebelsaft,e97gim2,conservative
6 more years of Trump isn't a given. ,AMollenhauer,e97n6gw,conservative
"It'll come down to AZ and NV on how large the margin is, but so far, the GOP has picked up Indiana, North Dakota, and (probably) Florida. It depends how the vote breaks in Montana, but there's an outside chance of picking up Tester's seat. ",psstein,e97n1sh,conservative
"yes we did, we'll likely have 54-55 seats once it's over. Ultimately fine, judicial appointments were largely what we were working on anyhow. I cant think of any real legislative goals we had for the House. 

Maybe RBG will retire /s",aCreditGuru,e97n6tz,conservative
Florida starts blue early but goes red as more votes come in (especially the panhandle). Gilium isnt winning by the margins he needs to be in pinellas and Miami right now. That race is still very close.,mbarnar,e971lxr,conservative
Which counties are reporting and at what level?,AyyyGreens,e971kp5,conservative
Beto can ride skateboard lmao.,IvankasFutureHusband,e975izm,conservative
Californian refugees moved there and brought their politics with them. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e979r23,conservative
"Well fuck, hope not I was looking forward to moving out there",LeFabulousFaggot,e979mc1,conservative
Any thoughts on how Kobach got Mortal Kombat fatality'd? ,tiger81775149,e97crs3,conservative
"I never expected Hugin to win. This state is just the worst. I love MacArthur, though, and wish I was in his district instead of stupid Norcross's. I'd like my house vote to matter.",RPwhitefrost,e97cp3z,conservative
"Republican in name only and Democrat in name only. 

For example; John McCain was considered a RINO by many and Joe Manchin is considered a DINO by many ",KnightofFaith26,e97fvba,conservative
Republican/Democrat In Name Only,YankeeBlues21,e97fspv,conservative
Republican / Democrat in name only. ,amjourdan,e97ftk0,conservative
Republican/Democrat in name only ,NCSUGrad2012,e97ftl0,conservative
161 D - 162 R on CNN Politics... They seem to be the quickest ones so I’m sticking with them on my laptop and Fox News on TV.,InAingeWeTrust,e97h97h,conservative
Did King lose?,game46312,e97j83p,conservative
"Curiously, this doesn't bother Identity Politics Jones (Van Jones) like when non-white Democrats lose.",gprime,e97m6f6,conservative
We'll get that one back in two years due to redistricting,tja_1478,e97mkzu,conservative
 They now have +25... ,NeedzRehab,e97k3ok,conservative
"Wow, talk about a slim majority.",NCSUGrad2012,e97k0s3,conservative
"It’s a full-on mandate against Trump!

/s",justhere2havefun,e97km9p,conservative
F,TBSportsFan1254,e97e255,conservative
Ugh. GG.,DogBeersHadOne,e97dvty,conservative
"She did drop out at the last minute and endorsed the Dem in Arizona.

Of course, that doesn't remove your name from the ballot. Early votes nor absentee ballots can't be changed, so it was too late.",RoundSimbacca,e97u1zo,conservative
"I was thinking of moving to Nevada out of crazy Cali. Maybe it’s not the escape I thought it would be. I can’t believe they went full blue. I mean, senate seat, maybe. But state legislature? It’s never going to be dependable Red I guess ",KnightofFaith26,e97tjem,conservative
In two years they had the house and did nothing,Ricardo1701,e97pgkm,conservative
"They'll clown themselves though.  Exit polls showed the majority of the country disapproves of Mueller and he's ""independent"".

There's a reason none of them ran on Russia.   ",tja_1478,e97o65r,conservative
The guy who was supposed to report it somehow died of hypothermia at the Titanic exhibit at the Luxor.,DogBeersHadOne,e97h0ui,conservative
It's under 2k votes right now on the MT SoS official page!,rf-engineer,e97nkyb,conservative
"Dane and Milwaukee counties are both about 100% reported, the only areas really outstanding are rural and heavily Walker.  ",mm1255,e97n9vv,conservative
Too bad.  He'd really turned that state around too.  What's wrong with Wisconsin voters?  Missing the days of high unemployment?,bearcatjoe,e97dn40,conservative
"I can't understand how.  Five thirty eight has the GOP at a 44.7% chance of winning the House.  

This seems way too early to make this call.  ",stoffel_bristov,e979su2,conservative
I get the feeling that Fox is sowing upset to increase viewership. There are no numbers to support this as of yet. ,AyyyGreens,e979uvd,conservative
too early,JMB_was_a_god,e97al6u,conservative
Milwaukee and Madison looks to be 100 percent counted he should be fine ,game46312,e97mk26,conservative
There doesn't seem to be much focus on this race at all in the media.  It seems extremely tight.  ,stoffel_bristov,e97nxas,conservative
Lol its going to take way more than that. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e9790jn,conservative
Not really. Precincts are closed when they start calling it. Maybe if you're talking Presidential elections when the west coast could be swayed. ,NuclearMisogynyist,e97bfnq,conservative
abc just called it for Cruz.,TBSportsFan1254,e97cb89,conservative
Google showing that Cruz is up by almost 100K votes with 16% reporting. ,squidneyforau,e97c9dl,conservative
Cruz in the lead by a thin margin. About 1% I think. 15% reported. ,NeedzRehab,e97c8zu,conservative
"Cruz is holding the lead. A narrow one, but a lead nonetheless.",HappyGunner,e97c7r1,conservative
"you should have already accepted this was likely to happen. Without something big, Dems take the house and Rs keep the Senate.",Rytho,e9724d1,conservative
"Nah, remember when they had a 95% chance for Hillary?  Best thing you can do is wait until the returns are actually in, and until then, sit back and try to stay at peace.  Win or lose, the America you will wake up to tomorrow will be, more or less, the same.

You voted; you presumably told your friends to vote.  You've done your part.  Sit back, and enjoy the show! :)",jreed11,e9725hi,conservative
"We aren't a bunch of leftists, as long as we got out to vote, that's all we can do. Let this be a message to get us out to vote harder for 2020. ",inconspicuoujavert,e9727ow,conservative
"The guy below is a GOP pollster.  Based on counties reporting and what's left outstanding, all of it, this is what he's seeing.  The House flipping has to be somewhat expected in an off year (assuming it happens).  Historically, the party out of power picks up a lot of seats.

Patrick Ruffini@PatrickRuffini
 6m6 minutes ago
More
First House live model run: Dems 232, GOP 203",Roez,e972d6u,conservative
"You shouldn't be freaking out because, imo, it's expected for the non-WH party to pick up seats in off years.",thorvard,e972w9q,conservative
"That is actually slightly lower than 538's final forecast earlier today. I personally still expect the GOP to hold the House by a narrow margin, but if we had to lose one body, the House would be the one to lose. After all, we can keep stacking the court with the Senate, and we need to build a bit of a buffer there since the next two cycles will put a larger number of Republicans on defense.",gprime,e972352,conservative
"> Am I justified in freaking out right now?

No, this always happens.  It would be more shocking if we kept it.

Don't let the Democrats psych you out about something that has happened for all of modern politics.

It was fine to be hyped about the ""Blue Wave"" if you're a Democrat or the ""Red Tsunami"" if you're a Republican in a ""team spirit"" kind of sense but people of both parties should have been recognizing all along that this is just a normal occurrence in modern politics.

People are primed to buy into the Nirvana fallacy, so it's easier to tear down the party in power for their failures than it is to boost them up for their successes.",Telineye,e972vkt,conservative
Hillary had 90 percent chance at the first poll closings just wait,game46312,e972mgp,conservative
If 2016 taught us anything its don't count your chickens before they hatch. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e973083,conservative
"I mean it is what it is but coastal states tend to be blue and thats who is coming in right now.         
Could and could not. But almost all are below <3%",DJ_GiantMidget,e972bws,conservative
"To be fair, we have way more on the line in House than the Dems do. As long as we can hold them off at no more than 21 seats gained, we retain the majority. The problem is we have 48 seats across the Dem-Toss up spectrum.",uniquecannon,e973pyb,conservative
Why do they have Karl rove on?   He’s so 2004 lol,NCSUGrad2012,e97cjbd,conservative
"I take offense to that!

Greg Gutfeld is pretty cool too.",VirulentVoid,e97cnno,conservative
I really do wish Fox was better ,thereisasuperee,e97ch4x,conservative
"That's not bad. Considering on all the seats we had up for grab, that's actually a small victory.  ",SinisterPaige,e97h1dd,conservative
"People vote as they want, nothing wrong with that. No need to blame people, lest we become like the far left.",AyyyGreens,e97ap75,conservative
The Republican party costs themselves those seats with platforms like the war on drugs. ,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e97icw8,conservative
Amen.,DogBeersHadOne,e97ao6n,conservative
"An now an openly gay one at that. Sad!... it seems the last threads of common decency have evaporated, even in mighty America.",mask_and_knife,e9808v3,conservative
538 gives them a 54% chance as of now.,SirRollsaSpliff,e979aln,conservative
"Don't rely on Fox. They have really dropped the ball tonight compared to basically every other source, from CNN to ABC to Decision Desk.",gprime,e979he2,conservative
"Virginian here. Kaine will win easy. The Republican always leads until votes from Northern Virginia and Richmond start coming in. Trump had a big lead here when like 90% of the votes were in, and then Northern Virginia votes came in and swept the lead away. ",GuitarWizard90,e971uno,conservative
"A few networks have already called it for him.  I know exit polls can be wrong, but apparently it's a very large margin.  ",Roez,e971uus,conservative
"Sadly I doubt it will stay that way, but it will be closer then most think. When my part of VA starts reporting the dems always jump ahead. NoVA is beautiful and great country but the people in it are all liberal carpetbaggers, and try and ruin the whole state politically. ",War-Damn-America,e971det,conservative
This won't age well lol,TBSportsFan1254,e9722q3,conservative
"""demographics are destiny"" is provably false and it pisses me off everytime i hear a democrat say it. Demographic coalitions change all the time. We once had the black vote. Bush had half the hispanic vote. The South was once deep blue territory. It has more minorities now than it did when it was a democrat stronghold. The Parties didn't flip, coalitions and voting patterns changed.",Zyrioun,e97lkfj,conservative
"We'll definitely be down, but probably retain an outright majority of governors mansions, dropping from 33 to 26.",gprime,e973dmh,conservative
I think Oregon is going to pass the sanctuary State repeal,Vrael22,e9737cu,conservative
I still have hope for Georgia...,Pyronot,e9738px,conservative
I like the NYT for their election coverage ,mbarnar,e9718bv,conservative
"love this guy, he pretty much just scowers the interwebs like we would and live streams it.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kQ12HGmcK2E",IvankasFutureHusband,e97284m,conservative
"I have no idea if this is good or not.  Fox Nation live stream over at youtube:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xqGWIbuXYQs",Roez,e971eyp,conservative
If you go to The Blaze on Facebook you can watch their coverage. That’s what I’ve got on right now. ,Watchmaker-2112,e971a8i,conservative
Theirs might be subscriber only.,skarface6,e971hvt,conservative
"It's subscriber only at 5pm PST tonight. 
",Vrael22,e971km1,conservative
"No, their coverage kind of stinks tonight, not gonna lie. ",TBSportsFan1254,e979jhu,conservative
They will win it. It’s just a matter of by what margin.,InAingeWeTrust,e97h6z8,conservative
Because it’s a fucking red state and it’s going to go red.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97dhe9,conservative
https://www.foxnews.com/midterms-2018,Yosoff,e971s9j,conservative
"Seems like it'll be a long night for WI governor. 

You can claim whatever number of absentee ballots you want, too. ",psstein,e97ojo9,conservative
"Because Richmond and Northern Virginia precincts will sweep away Stewart's lead. Trust me, I'm a Virginian. I go through this shit every election. The Republican holds a strong lead until Richmond and NoVa votes come in. ",GuitarWizard90,e9727yr,conservative
They do exit polling that can pretty much get them a good enough figure. If its within a certain % they just call it right away. Its correct like 99% of the time. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e971w41,conservative
"I don't know why anyone would be calling it this early, but there are still a lot of heavy blue counties that haven't come in yet. Most of the results are from rural areas.",Pyronot,e971wq8,conservative
"Adding on to what the others have said, you have to look at what counties have been counted and what ones have not.  Rural counties (R) with less population often report more quickly than urban and city areas (D).

My lesson on this was back in 2000.  I remember when Florida was called for Gore and Karl Rove kept saying, ""the pan handle counties had a big turnout, just wait.""  Bush ended up winning the state of course (barely).  ",Roez,e972olt,conservative
"Both sides are active in politics.  It's good to be mindful a lot of stuff is political posturing.  

If the R's pick up Senate seats, this is a good night.  D's were historically going to pick up House seats, it's just how it is.  They didn't blow it out though. ",Roez,e97df1n,conservative
"It was always a bad meme. Realistically, there's been no change in party identification since the election. Every projection is within margin of error (that I've seen).",richardguy,e97d3qy,conservative
It's clear it was fake news as we just lost the house. ,Dunkeliness,e97d9vn,conservative
Relax we're going to lose seats it's normal ,game46312,e976z67,conservative
"It’s a 1.2% lead at 44% precincts reporting, not including most of the panhandle. Still too early.

Edit: 0.8% lead with 45% in. Looks like the lead is shrinking.

Edit 2: 0.4% at 45% in.

Edit 3: 0.3 at 51% in. The panhandle is slowly reporting in.

Edit 4: DeSantis leads at 0.1% with 52% in

Edit 5: DeSantis leads at 0.5% with 59% in. A lot of blue counties still have unaccounted precincts, so this is still a very close race.

Edit 6: Still leading at 0.5% with 71% in",AyyyGreens,e973spj,conservative
nah Panhandle. ,IvankasFutureHusband,e973p85,conservative
"Which outlets? As far as I've seen, no credible outlet (Fox News, CNN, ABC, NBC, CBS) have called either major FL race.",gprime,e973xkh,conservative
Really? I haven't seen that. ,oceanplum,e973qa5,conservative
DeSantis is leading at the moment.  ,MigzMando,e974a75,conservative
"given that it is the pan handle vote coming in, I can't see how that is the case.  ",stoffel_bristov,e974eh1,conservative
they said their model was being 'too aggressive' and tweaked it live...,aCreditGuru,e976347,conservative
R house numbers starting to go back up even despite the tweaks they did that made it fall.,Pyronot,e976ec4,conservative
[removed],,e97echm,conservative
You're a hero.,SirRollsaSpliff,e9779pi,conservative
"Well in that case, prepare for the worst hope for the best.",armyboy941,e97afl2,conservative
Your sacrifice will be honored in the coming Republic,Menhadien,e974w9p,conservative
I haven't un-clenched in 1.69 hours.,TBSportsFan1254,e9756wq,conservative
Illinois. J.B. Prtizker,inconspicuoujavert,e9743df,conservative
"Then again, he's had the media throw the kitchen sink at him, so its not hard at all.",richardguy,e97kh9a,conservative
Teachers. Union.,recentlyunearthed,e97klmd,conservative
Uninformed college kids. I've lived in Madison it's a cesspool,yamsHS,e97kpnc,conservative
"Yes, so they get to determine the policy for the state? This is why I like the republic system; we live here in the tyranny in Oregon. ",Vrael22,e97ljw0,conservative
"Considering that these people still wanted to mass murder half of Alabama after Jones won, they were going to whine, bitch, piss and moan, full stop.",zwiebelsaft,e97h55l,conservative
"No puppies?

I demand a refund!",rf-engineer,e97ajt2,conservative
I need muh crayons,peeves91,e97b4si,conservative
Another 20 years of our current immigration policy and that will be the whole country,eeeinator,e97bg3t,conservative
It will be him v Beto in 224: book it ,Vrael22,e97ia6y,conservative
"Oh yeah I'm originally from CT. Place has been run into the ground over the last 25 years. Hopefully this guy is ok, because the last 3 Republican govs have been uber-RINO (Weicker), corrupt (Rowland) or RINO (Rell)",Marko_Ramius1,e97jh9n,conservative
"I had written that off, but I'm genuinely shocked that Beto is 107k vote ahead with 70% reporting in.",gprime,e9798an,conservative
"Because it appears a virtual certainty that the GOP will win the FL Governor's race, and probably GA eventually, which combined with Republicans keeping MD means all three far-left black candidates for governor will lose.",gprime,e979alc,conservative
"> But the Dems didn’t realign. That’s what scares me. 

History repeats itself, the Democrats had the exact same situation in 1970, interpreting House gains as vindication of their agenda. They nominated George McGovern in 1972. We all know what happened. ",psstein,e97j67h,conservative
I thought I was the only one. Fox is so bad with election results.,pk3maross,e97me22,conservative
"Could you imagine if the media actually pretended he existed? A black war vet, successful business owner looking to clean up Detroit and Michigan. Damn, if he was a democrat they'd never stop singing his praises. Same goes for Young Kim.",SirRollsaSpliff,e97668r,conservative
"> James is the future

He's a damn good looking future as well.",zwiebelsaft,e97h9ik,conservative
Even with a few precincts voting it's not looking like she's gonna get the SE Michigan support dems usually do,mbarnar,e976or5,conservative
Fox and ABC,CherryCokeNixon,e97d3gm,conservative
"Fox, ABC, NBC",NikeSwish,e97dibf,conservative
"True, they booked.",Nightshade37,e97f3vm,conservative
A little bit to be honest. I guess I shouldn't be since the dems threw a shit ton of money into the area. ,Nightshade37,e97f2e4,conservative
"100% Said he wouldn’t because his kids are too young, but we all know the one thing leftists are good at is being full of shit.",averydoggo,e97cu1k,conservative
"Eww.

I don't want to see presidential candidates skateboarding.",rf-engineer,e97cpi2,conservative
"I mean, Beto seems like a nice guy. And if he really wants to market himself as a non-partisan ""candidate of the people"" type of politician, he needs to go over and adjust some of his political views. ",uniquecannon,e97ctp2,conservative
C u there 😉,freedomhertz,e97dto3,conservative
Didn't see MacArthur won! Also the guy in NJ-2 is barely behind the Dem despite being cut off by the national GOP,Marko_Ramius1,e97j6wb,conservative
"We won’t lose the senate in 2020, I dare say if the democrats go full retard in the house — and they will — they will lose house in 2020. ",Racheakt,e97f8h0,conservative
"Agreed, it's the fact they painted Mitt as the worst possible candidate pre Trump shows the left's true motives.",jwt155,e97c533,conservative
"Mitt's at least a Republican, unlike that other guy.  ",Hillary_For_Prison,e97ca37,conservative
60 seats in 2020!,ardee2124,e97mz5c,conservative
Let's see the left try to attack her using #metoo. ,uniquecannon,e97ddal,conservative
Hardiman>Barrett. Just because we will be replacing a vagina seat doesnt mean we need to replace it with another vagina. Secure the 2nd amendment forever. Hardiman forever.,M6D_Magnum,e97dyub,conservative
VA should just give Nova to DC,pdawg43,e9777js,conservative
A socially liberal Republican would win Northern Virginia. A Trumpian candidate cannot especially one that engages in confederate apologism.,combrade,e979azy,conservative
Solid. Adams County is solidly red.,DogBeersHadOne,e97b4w1,conservative
they called it for beto and now they are withdrawing it now. this all reeks of a organized disinfo campaign.,JMB_was_a_god,e97bfsn,conservative
New York Times seriously just suggested it means he'll be less busy for his presidential run. ,myawfulpoliticsacnt,e97gozj,conservative
~~RKO~~BRIAN GIANFORTE OUTTA NOWHERE,DogBeersHadOne,e97iq4o,conservative
"they go to an interactive map much like the NYT, every minute.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9743q9,conservative
"CNN is doing a lot more live tracking, pulling up districts and doing more comprehensive coverage.  Fox is just pundits talking over eachother.",IvankasFutureHusband,e977xbm,conservative
Then why was the governor race not this close? ,SpaghettiSweater,e97b17e,conservative
"exactly. and if they don't this year, they may next time around.",SKWM3000,e977emb,conservative
That or a national party position is what I'm thinking. ,Nats_Enough,e97baf1,conservative
Yup.  Look how Kavanaugh turned out.  The left is seething over Trump. It's very easy to see them overplaying that hand.  ,Roez,e97ecs2,conservative
"It's gonna be so poetic.

Let them take the majority and see what happens in 2020. Middle America can only take so much bullshit.

Also, if we maintain the senate and do well in the gubnatorial races, than I see this might as a huge win. ",amjourdan,e97ee47,conservative
"> Seing as the Blue wave has fizzled

that wont be the news. ",JMB_was_a_god,e97eo9s,conservative
Exactly.,BirchSquid789,e97iczk,conservative
It's been awful. Only 3 counties voted majority her way so we'll be fine for a little bit longer. ,inconspicuoujavert,e97l2qk,conservative
Build a wall,stoffel_bristov,e97l5ap,conservative
"Skelegates, if you will.",Luke15g,e978wyf,conservative
This number was from CNN's on-screen display.,gprime,e977s48,conservative
Well voting is pretty much over at this point so I doubt it lol. ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97acho,conservative
Most of the polls are already closed.,NCSUGrad2012,e97aceu,conservative
https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-michigan-elections.html,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97b4eg,conservative
"Yeah, they often have a Republican surge when the panhandle comes in, followed by a Democratic surge when some urban districts finish counting their votes. Can't get too comfortable.",PubliusVA,e974ghe,conservative
"Try living here, the state is Bi-polar as fuck.",Menhadien,e974hu3,conservative
The whole west coast... ,somegaijin42,e97cdus,conservative
Projected victories that haven’t been confirmed yet. ,Triggs390,e97cnqj,conservative
"California will add a lot of seats for Dems. Republicans need to do well in individual difficult races right now, not be slightly above in the total.",Rytho,e97cidq,conservative
"https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/?ex_cid=extra_banner
",Gugulen1,e97cl9n,conservative
I honestly don't know.  Some voodoo magic or something.,notathrowaway_5150,e97cgxa,conservative
"Not the worst thing tbh, as long as we don’t default on anything, which might be worst case scenario",curlbaumann,e9710c6,conservative
Pity.,Colinm478,e9753l9,conservative
we're leading the house by 5 right now. we were down 10 just half and hr ago. ,tmone,e977dri,conservative
Donnelly i assume,JMB_was_a_god,e976n4x,conservative
Donnelly,Marko_Ramius1,e976skm,conservative
By ABC,Marko_Ramius1,e976si5,conservative
Enjoyable. I love Shapiro and Klavan.,SinisterPaige,e979m6l,conservative
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kbnLuv5H41Y,SinisterPaige,e979jbv,conservative
That's because it's just 1/1024th of a smoke signal. ,LonelyMachines,e97f708,conservative
"Sinema's ads were very, very deceptive. She tried to paint herself as independent (""like Arizona"") and tried to play up a lot of conservative concerns (like everything being politicized when people just want to shop where they want to shop etc), funding the military, etc.

If they didn't know her history, I can see people being easily taken in. She was one of those Democrats who ran (far) more conservative so they can resume being super (Prada-Socialist) after the election.",cipher_six,e97jqpz,conservative
why is foxnews.com saying +0?,DJ_GiantMidget,e97kh7h,conservative
"That is why I am hopeful on them losing it again in 2020, they go here on the back of a lie. Sadly that lie got wings because the GOP failed to put forth their own plan as the effort was killed in the senate. ",Racheakt,e97hhue,conservative
"it can, but for it to move so far in our direction thus far has me a bit confident.",JMB_was_a_god,e975d97,conservative
"Was seeing it on CNN, but within the past 20 seconds it has moved back to Beto.",gprime,e9789y8,conservative
"Seriously, I started out watching Fox at 6 and wasn't impressed. Somebody else here suggested CNN so I gave it a shot, and much as I hate to admit it, their coverage tonight is way better.",gprime,e97880a,conservative
Don’t follow fox. Follow the online voting aggregates.,AyyyGreens,e9787gm,conservative
It’s more amazing that moderate voters fall for it and have no idea about the bigger implications of who runs the House (far left radicals).,the-divine-comedy,e97effn,conservative
"Eh, Kemp’s not my favorite guy ever but we’re not screwed either with him. He seems to be a slightly more Trumpified version of Deal.",Pyronot,e97go3b,conservative
"Kemp is the most important race for me as a Georgia native.

Abrams was so terrifying. ",amjourdan,e97f8gf,conservative
"completely agree, it's the only thing that gives me piece of mind.  We will have an originalist court for about 50 years.  We need to have a full judicial review on almost everything.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97ddp0,conservative
"I'm trying, just had my first, need to pop out 2 more though.  It has to be a solid reversal though, the middle class is dying and natives can't support that many kids anymore.

Government handouts and foreigners pumping out handfuls of babies I just don't see it being enough.",IvankasFutureHusband,e97cx03,conservative
One of his hookers?,dtlv5813,e97obhh,conservative
The party choses. Honestly [the story is fascinating](https://www.newyorker.com/news/dispatch/the-ghost-of-dennis-hof-haunts-the-nevada-midterms),DJ_GiantMidget,e97op5u,conservative
"You forgot Russian meddling, Macedonian content farms, sexism, and the weather. ",LonelyMachines,e97dky9,conservative
Gerrymandering doesn’t work with the senate seats though ,Refresher,e97du4h,conservative
Seriously.  California needs to stop meddling in Texas elections. ,lastbastion,e97daau,conservative
"I got dozens of texts from beto's campaign and MoveOn.org(Soros)....they've spent a ton of outside money here. A lot of people found that annoying but I think they were doing it to GOTV for leaning Dems - kids and stupid people like that.>It's easy we just need outsiders to pour $62 million into Cruz's next campaign! 

",programmingguy,e97dfmn,conservative
https://www.miaminewtimes.com/news/trump-ally-ron-desantis-wins-florida-governors-race-10890106 Came up first in a search. Hopefully it’s correct. ,skarface6,e97fnka,conservative
"But if we are being honest, but we also have to acknowledge that  the SoFla counties that go blue also take forever to count.     ",TBSportsFan1254,e9764rb,conservative
The real answer,Menhadien,e975g69,conservative
"We'll win, but TX is up to 70% in with Beto at a 107,000 vote lead.",gprime,e97954c,conservative
Keeping Gillum out of FL big win IMO.,zuckscyborgpenis,e97m6wd,conservative
"Hectic life. NJ/Philly rush hour traffic, scooping the kids from school from two different ends of town, my mother-in-law informing us dinner was ready as we eat as a family there every Tuesday...

Typical middle class, working family stuff that we all go through. 

I know she’s a Lefty and anti-Trumper, so I wasn’t persistent on her that she vote. ",mikeygio,e973nrk,conservative
If only we didn't run a Looney Toon character,-Shank-,e97ft4g,conservative
We will get that back in 2020.,NCSUGrad2012,e97fojn,conservative
Why have Green when the Dems are going so progressive?,HappyGunner,e97ajco,conservative
He was spitting venom in that segment. Called Booker Spartacus ,JewishJonny,e97eoh4,conservative
I'd also like to see her convince Trump supporters to work with the Democrats.,chaotic_zx,e97itbb,conservative
I genuinely don't understand why people think he's on a downward trend..  I'm very surprised that the media hyping up a hit and run drunk driver no nothing state congressman came close to Lion Ted,ltdshred,e97fkut,conservative
"The real time chart shows a steady increase for R's over the last hour.  It's been bouncing much closer to 50% than I would have guessed.

Obviously, it's too early still.  However, this is what it looked like in 2016.  Not good to draw a parallel, but it does remind me of that night.  ",Roez,e975f4x,conservative
Manchin,ngoni,e97ia7l,conservative
"No, 23 is the point at which we lose it. 22 is the what allows us to retain control.",gprime,e97df9a,conservative
Its been called for desantis I believe ,eeeinator,e97cvjh,conservative
Would have also made Ohio a haven for drug dealers. I was actually thinking about voting for it until I read into a bit more. Really scary stuff,GoofyUmbrella,e97gy9q,conservative
More like yes they are,phantomcut3,e97fuli,conservative
"That's indeed my main concern. With a Dem-controlled House and a GOP-controlled Senate, Congress will probably largely spend the next two years going over just that - not even counting the possible, probable inevitability of impeachment proceedings - and will only get themselves stuck in a spin cycle, when they would have instead put forward legislation, even in either direction.",AvdaxNaviganti,e97hmaq,conservative
"fired up? after all the gun laws he passed? No, the dems blew an easy victory in the senate race.",richardguy,e97eiil,conservative
Yeah. Hard to win a 4th election too. Hoepfully a new conservative will make some decent head way in the next 4 years and be able to make a good challenge for evers seat in 2022.,dayman35,e97e2vn,conservative
No it's perfectly fine when elected Democratic judges do it /s,Marko_Ramius1,e97gdza,conservative
Hopefully. Some of these seats had poor candidates so it'll be interesting to see how that factors in 2020. I think the final will be 229 D 206 R in the House,Marko_Ramius1,e97i1wk,conservative
"He bullshits gullible people into thinking he’s a farmer who cares about farm and ranch issues, while giving the left what they want. So farmers and ranchers vote for him in conjunction with the rabid leftists of the larger cities and the reliable democrat voting blocs of the reservations. ",Mumakata,e986dim,conservative
"I know, but this should’ve been an exception. The Dems are radical and we’ve been wildly successful",YankeeBlues21,e97fafg,conservative
"I'm as conservative as they come and I'm trapped in California :( 

Wife and i are planning a move to Michigan when it comes time to start our family",PM_ME_YOUR_SPICIEST,e97gep4,conservative
"No, it's more like appearing virtuous means everything.  I believe it's part of the reason why people don't take kindly to outsiders here.",zwiebelsaft,e97pqeu,conservative
"I didn't vote here as I only go to school here and did an absentee ballot from home but yeah, the people here are blind. They made a huge deal about Kavanaugh, but turn their eyes to Ellison. ",AMollenhauer,e97npdi,conservative
Beto was 100x worse than this.  Osoff didn’t ha e half the media coverage and talkshow appearances.,mm1255,e97lng0,conservative
Comfortably Smug is has been ripping on them for this for weeks lmao,mm1255,e97n7rf,conservative
Blackburn winning the Tennessee Senate seat yes.,notathrowaway_5150,e978333,conservative
Exactly.,fredwilloughby,e97fsrt,conservative
The guy who was supposed to win the special election in Georgia and lost pretty solidly.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e97fnmu,conservative
Exactly,Savant_PSU,e97fpyq,conservative
[deleted],,e97g2eu,conservative
Escape from LA style. Make Portland an Island. With walls. And barbed wire.,Zyrioun,e97k51g,conservative
"I feel your pain. I expect the same, as MI is about to elect a leftist Democrat to replace our outgoing Republican governor tonight.",gprime,e973ub2,conservative
Hopefully. I'm feeling a bit nervous so far,Marko_Ramius1,e9790o4,conservative
"I'm not sure that's accurate.  It's showing 5 million votes total.  Even in a large state like Texas, that has to be a lot more than 3-4%.",Roez,e9798sf,conservative
lol 4% is in. Where you getting 70%?,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e979ms6,conservative
Damnit. That sucks.,inconspicuoujavert,e97hggj,conservative
"It's looking like there might be a recount, but he won.",RPwhitefrost,e97j63x,conservative
Those marxists won't confirm it until the bitter end,Marko_Ramius1,e97j5hs,conservative
"I'm not either. I think he got pressured by Parkland. I'm hoping he doesn't stick to this stance on guns. 


I'm not familiar with the propositions on Florida's ballot (I'm from NJ), but the few I saw on twitter weren't encouraging. 


DeSantis' victory still has me encouraged for 2020, though. If he can win there, then the state still leans towards Trump. ",RPwhitefrost,e97jbxc,conservative
Got my districts mixed up.  She still needs to pull in more votes from outside the Perimeter to bite at Kemp's heels.,LonelyMachines,e979f8z,conservative
"Please hold please hold please hold.

Please, Cruz!",uniquecannon,e97a3yv,conservative
Not gonna happen with Johnson County in the district...,do_you_know_doug,e97eqxg,conservative
Thanks to the rino snyder. ,Apollo1717,e97l3gn,conservative
Fucking hypocrites.,Moonthrower,e97hbii,conservative
[Garbage ANTIFA loving pile of human excrement.](https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DSpO0wSXcAMPvjw.jpg),Moonthrower,e97dlvb,conservative
"it's not always who is leading, it's what precincts have yet to report in and how they have historically voted in the past.",SKWM3000,e97azbh,conservative
He's getting bad info.,tehForce,e97b56s,conservative
"Yeah.  I'm having a hard time seeing what areas are still outstanding to see what to expect with what's left.  

Ted's a bit stiff as a politician, but holy crap I would not have expected a few percentage point race in Texas.  ",Roez,e97b7jz,conservative
"Do keep in mind, however, that the dems outrageous behavior helped. Kavanaugh comes to mind. Could help set up for great dealings. ",KrimsonStorm,e97c863,conservative
They already showed them and it didn’t work. ,the-divine-comedy,e97gs9w,conservative
they cant repeal the tax cuts when the president and senate are still republican.,dtlv5813,e97hwcm,conservative
The House flipping is not a 'blue wave' by any measure. ,lastbastion,e978arp,conservative
"You're not wrong. But if we keep the Senate and they don't take a strong lead in the house, I will be happy. They still won't have enough power to do really anything. 

And on a more immature note, it's gonna be great to rub it in the faces of all the smug liberals who have been telling me that they will ""take the house and Senate and impeach Trump"" for months on end. ",LumpyWumpus,e978til,conservative
"> Dont expect any goodwill.

Exactly.  This will be one bullshit investigation after another.  Just can't wait to see Adam Schiff's pencil neck back on TV babbling like a moron.  ",stoffel_bristov,e97bkpc,conservative
"Let them.  
  
It'll hand us 2020 on a silver platter.",OrwellianLiberty,e97bboj,conservative
Why should the rest of us pay for NY's tunnels?  That is just stupid.,Corbanis_Maximus,e97bo5j,conservative
"I can't find it on my phone. If you've got a link, send it my way",ConsistentlyRight,e973ybs,conservative
"Every time I see ABC update the 538 house projections, the % keeps tipping towards the GOP. Let's keep our hopes up.",allsystemscrash,e978b67,conservative
The man's a hell of a weathervane.,DogBeersHadOne,e9780x5,conservative
No. He votes with the democrats on everything except what is necessary. He only voted yes on Kavanaugh because if he didn't he'd would have lost.,JMB_was_a_god,e978f4i,conservative
"Come on. Every big bill, he’s voted with Schumer. Obamacare, Tax Reform, Obamacare repeal were all votes with the democrats by Joe. Kavanaugh is the exception, and he really just did that in order to save his ass tonight ",GoofyUmbrella,e9788u2,conservative
It’s a state of conservatives who support unions. The union aspect turns many of them blue. ,Ruckus45,e979b2t,conservative
"After he voted for Kav, yes ",GoofyUmbrella,e9784pt,conservative
"Google

https://www.google.com/search?source=hp&ei=yUriW8m3DYSGtQXQk5bACQ&q=michigan+senate+race&oq=michigan+se&gs_l=psy-ab.1.0.0l10.12.2244..4336...0.0..0.97.595.7......0....1..gws-wiz.4B3bbkwTk5A


Edit:It changes as it updates.
",SinisterPaige,e978lij,conservative
"In the next town over somebody was interviewed and they said he was the ""lesser of two evils"" and while they didn't like him he was better choice.

I mean...he's corrupt..but his opponent is, *gasp* a Republican and a Trump supporter.",thorvard,e97bdf8,conservative
It's New Jersey. Teacher's union is incredibly strong there.,DogBeersHadOne,e97ayxt,conservative
I'm holding out for Florida until I unclench. ,TBSportsFan1254,e97cg6z,conservative
amen!  This guy will go to work tomorrow and make the most out of what will be just any other day.  I'm not going to be triggered and let an election ruin my day.,TBSportsFan1254,e972a7i,conservative
Thank you 'fellow conservative' lol,notathrowaway_5150,e976xz6,conservative
What happened 2 minutes ago? lol,Bostonbuckeye,e977j46,conservative
Another wave of state polls closed. ,Colinm478,e977ej6,conservative
"It gives the Republicans better ground for 2020, the Democrats can't blame everything opn Trump and Republicans when they don't control all the branches of Government, and I'd rather hold the Senate than the House.",jwt155,e97cnvr,conservative
"> Gonna be awfully hard to pass things with only a 10-vote majority.

It doesn't really matter what they pass, given Republican control of the Senate and the White House.",gprime,e988fa7,conservative
"I got some good booze, and college basketball starts tonight so I think I'll watch ASU on the computer and just check in every once in a while.  I'm waiting on RSBN to start their coverage",IvankasFutureHusband,e971n0g,conservative
"I'm probably staying away from TV - would just be a bunch of ""analysts"" discussing (i.e. loudly yelling over each other) anyway. Check out Politico: https://www.politico.com/election-results/2018/house/
",remybob78,e971y8u,conservative
"Dude, you know sometimes you make blanket statements to disarm the otherside right?

I said Ted was guilty of the same thing so crazy's from the left can't use that argument against me.

I agree it's not even remotely the same thing but I'm not going to give someone that talking point either.",jwt155,e97de9i,conservative
"I support Cruz 100% on that still. And I'm a Trump supporter, now that Trump has proven to be mostly great.

It was a Reagan/Ford moment to me at the time. Trump had some real red flags indicating he wouldn't really be conservative when he got in office (having previously supported both the assault rifle ban and Dreamers in his past)....then he proved me wrong. But remember Trump smeared Cruz big-time with lies during the primary.",JesusDied4Me,e97dcus,conservative
Isn't that the same in other states also?,Phinaeus,e97nqtt,conservative
"That may have had a part of it, but frankly I think Cruz has been resting on his laurels too hard.

Yes, it’s a red state, but if he’s learned anything tonight it’s that there’s no guarantees.",HappyGunner,e97bv15,conservative
There were comments before they called it blaming the close results on Californians. ,SpaghettiSweater,e992zxp,conservative
"I think this will only be the case if Rosenstein also goes, but him and Trump are (suprisingly) pretty close despite all the Russia stuff",Marko_Ramius1,e97gj7a,conservative
The new Democratic Senator from Nevada who unseated Heller. ,gprime,e988gs9,conservative
Maybe he means Beto?,S_D_W_2,e982qot,conservative
"The panhandle is reporting in now, granted, not at full capacity. The takeaway should be that DeSantis is leading towards the end of the race, but there’s still opportunity for Gillum to win. *knock on wood*",AyyyGreens,e9750im,conservative
"So then we get to spend the next 2yrs hearing them bitch about Trump's ""pen and phone"" and how it's unconstitutional and unprecedented. All while the media conveniently forget about Obama's track record.",unibuckeye,e97bpqw,conservative
Does the recent Ohio call change this? And thank you for the reply!,jacobwilliamhillard,e97f36s,conservative
The amendments 5-10 were total clusterfluffs here in FL. I think I only said yes to 3 or so amends including stopping the dog races (slightly emotional vote I admit; I have a Whippet curled up next to me now),richardguy,e97jjlw,conservative
"And Wayne County just helped move the Senate to Stabecow +3%

&#x200B;

EDIT: Now Stabecow +4.1%",notathrowaway_5150,e97d5qh,conservative
apparently not :(,IvankasFutureHusband,e97gyfo,conservative
"Agreed, I think we ought to be very careful not to make the same mistakes the Democrats did, where they expected a 16-year Obama/Hillary dynasty. 

Elections are the result of people making choices. People are not predictable. ",psstein,e97nbjt,conservative
"I disagree, the democrats are just spinning their wheels, unless they capitulate and actually run a candidate with appeal to independents, it will end the same. If they truly cracked into independents they could win. Unlikely though. ",GladysCravesRitz,e97wntk,conservative
"[https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-governor-elections.html](https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-governor-elections.html)

&#x200B;

An awesome interactive map that has individual county/precinct results.",Pyronot,e971o78,conservative
47% reporting.,pdawg43,e971ndi,conservative
"Brownback's extreme unpopularity. Kobach couldn't distance himself enough, and he's always been a polarizing figure here in Kansas.",ecfreeman,e97ebtf,conservative
Thanks! Makes sense. ,NavySasquatch,e97fybg,conservative
Thanks! ,NavySasquatch,e97ftcu,conservative
Thanks! ,NavySasquatch,e97g4is,conservative
Thanks! ,NavySasquatch,e97g4sd,conservative
not yet. It's close but he's up.,54367543457109943628,e97joes,conservative
I figured that she lose time to time since her district is literally a coin toss ,game46312,e97mmft,conservative
"I just saw that, yeah, and I expect them to pick up a few more. R-held CA-25 is especially tight at the moment.",AvdaxNaviganti,e97k9q0,conservative
"Damn that's tight.

Second time tonight I've said that.",richardguy,e97k2ia,conservative
Thought I edited that portion. Fixed. But yeah it looks like she may have very well just lost the Dems a Senate seat. Expect anti green party rage posts on /r/politics tomorrow.,-Skinwalker-,e97u3ja,conservative
"Move to Texas instead. They need some conservatives to move there, to counter all the California leftists moving in. ",GuitarWizard90,e97uj65,conservative
"We lost state legislature badly too! They have supermajorities In possibly both houses just waiting on results. 

Basically last night we voted to move the border of California to Utah...",smashzer02,e98iqp2,conservative
Nevada has very corrupt voting. It is a nice state but I'd pass. ,GladysCravesRitz,e97wifo,conservative
Did we forget tax reform already?,AyyyGreens,e97qwci,conservative
"Pretty much.

For all our niceness we're about to get it bad.",richardguy,e97pui2,conservative
"I'm talking bigger picture though. We're now electing active socialists. The Democrats aren't going to be reprimanded for their violence and open hostility to half of the country. We're going to see a doubling down of cries about racism, immigration, and socialized healthcare. We'll see the stock market dampened, the growth of the economy is in jeopardy and forget about any pro-business legislation being passed either.",rjohnson99,e97otl1,conservative
oh no what was he thinking,diamondeyes18,e97h64e,conservative
"Walker is behind about 300 right this second, but last I checked, La Crosse hadn't been fully counted, for whatever that means. A lot of the rural areas are still at 50% or so reporting. 

Edit: As I say that, he jumps 180 ahead. Heart attack waiting to happen!",psstein,e97neot,conservative
It's based on their numbers ,game46312,e979ufx,conservative
"the polls had not closed yet when they did this so........

it will sway votes.",JMB_was_a_god,e97h4wx,conservative
"Is there a particular reason they called that? Not even 20% has been reported according to google. 

Edit: is this because what has been reported is the urban counties ?",squidneyforau,e97cgz2,conservative
"I accepted it a while ago, but now that it's actually happening I'm pretty bummed.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9727k6,conservative
"Well said!  Just vote and then watch the results.  It is all you can do.  Since the start of the 20th century, the party that held the Presidency has only gained seats 2x.  History isn't kind to the President's party.  It is hard to overcome a hundred years of history.",TBSportsFan1254,e972q1l,conservative
"Welp.  He might be wrong, but we should probably accept that Dems will gain a majority, however razor thin, in the House.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e972gqt,conservative
"The problem is that the modern Democratic party is unhinged as shit.

Them gaining power now is far far different from Democrats gaining power 20 years ago.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e973ps7,conservative
ugghh they're still keeping Karl around? Fuckin Karl. ,tiger81775149,e97cphd,conservative
"motherfucker said ""If the media was fair and balanced more outlets would call Trump out on racism/sexism/etc....."" like..... what the fuck?",diamondeyes18,e97cx2q,conservative
It's so odd to see that the warnings of the conservatives in the 1980's were true. ,s0briquet,e9849xh,conservative
59% now,306,e97ab6n,conservative
"Sad in a way.  Virginia is going the way of Maryland when it comes to national politics, at least.  I think the only way of solving it is to Devolve DC or give the partitioned part of Virginia back to DC.",TBSportsFan1254,e97264r,conservative
"Don't be disappointed when you turn up wrong. every place that has had a demographic change turns blue. Texas will be blue. California went blue because of Reagan. Florida may be on the line for 2020 because of Puerto Rican refugees. 

More to the point, if only whites had voted in 2016 Trump would have won every state except some on the west coast and Hawaii. 

If only minorities voted Hilary would have carried 50 states.",JMB_was_a_god,e97m4xn,conservative
">country becomes noticeably less white since 1965 immigration act

>country becomes noticeably more liberal

really activates my almonds",richardguy,e97lvlb,conservative
"I meant commentary, not just maps or text",xKommandant,e971eic,conservative
Glenn Beck coverage is always fun to watch ,game46312,e972v16,conservative
We really hope. Abrams has a lot of support sadly. ,XGuntank02X,e97doqw,conservative
gotcha thanks.,IvankasFutureHusband,e971x9v,conservative
Hoping that’s sarcasm,xKommandant,e97dull,conservative
"I know R's kept Ky-6, but these are also bellweather seats.",mkgandkembafan,e9770r0,conservative
.2% right now.,Pyronot,e9748b7,conservative
"Not gonna lie I got pretty drunk last night watching the midterms. I probably confused certain commentator's opinions with actual legitimate calls.

Either way, Gillum lost so all is well.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9917rm,conservative
"Yeah, thank god he pulled it off.

That was the main race I was watching. Gillum would've been a nightmare.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e991488,conservative
Ooh so they are skewing it to favor dems more. Lol,KrimsonStorm,e976l29,conservative
[removed],,e97eiqa,conservative
Thanks Javik. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e977afa,conservative
"> Yes, so they get to determine the policy for the state? 

Yes, that's how tyranny of the majority works.",gprime,e97mbk4,conservative
If you look at the typical electoral map by R and D wins broken down by county for the entire country...the whole of the united states is red with a bunch of tiny blue dots on all the major cities,Jesterslore,e97m4ts,conservative
"Yeah I was going include support puppies in there, but then I remembered all of those dogs abandoned by the lefty mob protesting the Dakota pipeline. 

https://dailycaller.com/2017/02/27/volunteers-rescue-puppies-abandoned-at-dakota-pipeline-protest/
",MooMooCudChew,e97b0k0,conservative
The dogs were the most efficient part of this budget.,zwiebelsaft,e97h6yx,conservative
"yep, just in time for my son to be entering the work force.  FML",IvankasFutureHusband,e97bjnq,conservative
"I hope John James wins, WTF he gonna say then.",IvankasFutureHusband,e979e3h,conservative
"My understanding is that Grossman is a pretty bad guy. I'm in NJ-1, so my vote didn't matter (the Norcrosses control South Jersey), but I think I would've voted third party over Grossman. It's a shame, too, because NJ-2 should be an easy GOP seat. I don't know how they couldn't find someone better to replace LoBiondo (who I actually quite liked aside from his no vote on the tax cut— which he only opposed because it capped the SALT deduction). ",RPwhitefrost,e97jhl0,conservative
"> Mitt's at least a Republican

He is a Neo-con. he will be a RINO for sure.",JMB_was_a_god,e97cjym,conservative
"Then I would have to find a new place to live, no thank you. Haha",War-Damn-America,e977b2g,conservative
"A socially liberal republican can’t win the primary because he doesn’t appeal to the rest of the state. And even if he did win by some miracle, I wouldn’t doubt that many in the central and southern VA would sit out or vote 3rd party. And Stewart is not Confederate apologist. He just fights for Virginian history and not wanting to whitewash it by destroying all our memorials to Virginia Confederates.   ",War-Damn-America,e979q47,conservative
Lol someone called it for Beto? Did they look at the reported districts? ,PM_ME_UR__UPVOTE,e97bmk9,conservative
"I dont think its disinformation, I think they just jumped the gun
",molon-labe7,e97bhkt,conservative
"CNN was the best in 2016 and still is. They go district to district constantly, and if it starts going right the anchors get upset. Kind of like if MSNBC were more honest.",Colinm478,e97820l,conservative
Thanks!,notathrowaway_5150,e9781fv,conservative
CNN being legit useful and accurate with something?  I'm honestly shocked. xD,mike50333,e97a0sm,conservative
Even if Beto loses the optics will be that it was so close it was basically a win. ,thx_II38,e97ako4,conservative
"They are going to loose seats in the senate, the house was going to flip but it will be much closer than expected",freedomhertz,e97f6t1,conservative
"Did you's think I'd forgotten Dahnald. For 1,000 years I've waited, watched in dejection and you made your pitiful country great again. I really hope you enjoyed yourself, I do. Because in the time that you've been president I've amassed a great and terrible army of skeleton delegates, Skelegates if you will Dahnald. Without you to ward off the forces of chaos I can finally escape from my prison.You just made your first mistake Dahnald, now i can return to that fateful night in 2016 and claim what is rightfully mine. Together with my army of Skelegates I will finally have the majority needed to become the republican nominee and fight for a principled conservative campaign for President. Nothing will stand in our way. Goodbye Dahnald your New York ways will taint the party no longer. This is the Priesthood Rising. With my new powers I will plunge this country into 10,000 of darkness and the Skelegates, they will be at my side every step of the way. Thank you Dahnald thank you.﻿",thx_II38,e979u8y,conservative
Thank you! ,molon-labe7,e97ba7x,conservative
"Shutdowns are actually a pretty good thing in the grand scheme of things, but the media and everyone on the left loses their minds and makes it seem like a national crisis. ",Watchmaker-2112,e9716c0,conservative
"Politicians who talk about the Federal government defaulting are lying or ignorant. Law **requires** that mandatory expenditures are paid. So, a government shutdown only effects discretionary spending. That's why government shutdowns usually only effect about 15%-20% of government operations.",PhilosoGuido,e990fnr,conservative
Yes!!!!!!!!  Thanks!!!,NCSUGrad2012,e976zx0,conservative
Gotcha. I'm still very nervous for Texas. ,AMollenhauer,e978bbo,conservative
"They have a very good, easy to follow election coverage. Just need to drown out the talking",Al_C_Oholic,e978bvu,conservative
Still working on graduating and finding a girl to settle down with.,DogBeersHadOne,e97czur,conservative
"And last but not but the least...climate change. It was either too hot, chilly. raining, mosquitos, you name it... ",programmingguy,e97ehsv,conservative
Explain that to the left,averydoggo,e98eexs,conservative
True it’s going to be tight. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e9774uk,conservative
I’m okay with it too,Splickity-Lit,e973tac,conservative
Is he called Spartacus because Romans liked to feel up other dudes in baths?,piper06w,e97fp8s,conservative
There is no working with Democrats. Not the current Ocasio-Cluless breed anyway.,jhnmiller84,e97j111,conservative
Because Beto O'Rourke is a very charismatic guy as well as he campaigned extremely well. I hate his politics but he traveled in the deepest red spots of Texas to try and win.,InAingeWeTrust,e97hkop,conservative
"I didn't watch 2016 because 1. I assumed the outcome like a dumbass, 2. I went to some batting cages instead because who doesn't like hitting spheres with aluminum, so that's very useful info. ",glacierguy1,e975lhx,conservative
"No, tester voted against Kav and is going to win.

Edit:maybe",Rytho,e97im0d,conservative
Sauce? ,TBSportsFan1254,e97eheq,conservative
The gun stuff pissed me off big time but Scott still got my vote. It's looking good but it's not over yet.,Floridacracker720,e97f2gf,conservative
"Goes to show a fucking stupid double standard by the left. I went straight Republican in MN today and I'm not sure how to feel about Walz winning and replacing ""Deer in Headlights"" Mark Dayton.",MusicApollo93,e97nw4r,conservative
I dont know if you remember or not but Osoff was being played off as some sort of bellwether to show how much America hated Trump. Everyone and their grandmother out of state pulled strings for him.,richardguy,e97lrnl,conservative
"Ahh, ty.  ",Roez,e978fwb,conservative
"I think that's the joke :)
",aCreditGuru,e97fwfy,conservative
 Robert Paulson,NeedzRehab,e97gej0,conservative
The even worse part is all but one of the measures on the ballot were shot down too. ,AMollenhauer,e97k6fg,conservative
Apparently he could run again in 2020 against a weaker opponent,dhighway61,e97hkqv,conservative
">I'm not either. I think he got pressured by Parkland

Which is absolutely idiotic when you realize that FL republicans hold a super majority in the senate and a majority in the house AND had a republican ""republican"" governor.",richardguy,e97jh70,conservative
It's so blatant that it's actually amazing.  I have stories about how legitimately socially stupid people are in Hennepin County.  The Al Franken/Brett Kavanaugh/Karen Monahan opinion comparisons only touch the surface of it.,zwiebelsaft,e97hl86,conservative
What did I tell you? You're holding back.,DogBeersHadOne,e97doin,conservative
"What matters is total votes in. All this stuff about predicting is just preaching to get views or ratings. What matters are the raw numbers. Precincts can flip or become more deeply entrenched. Once 95% of votes are in, then we can talk about calling an election, but until then, at this point, it’s still too early to call.",AyyyGreens,e97b5kt,conservative
"It's the typical state of affairs after one party takes the presidency, the fact that it is basically 50/50 on who takes the house proves that the ""Blue Wave"" was a load of bull and demonstrates how much the Dems have turned off moderates.",Luke15g,e978uif,conservative
I hope. It'll lead to a bigly shift ,amjourdan,e97dusb,conservative
"Tunnel goes from New York to New Jersey. That makes it interstate, which makes it federal.",DogBeersHadOne,e97bt17,conservative
[just found it](https://youtu.be/kbnLuv5H41Y) ,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e973yyd,conservative
He and Gillibrand could compete for that title.,SirRollsaSpliff,e9784o6,conservative
Thanks!!!,notathrowaway_5150,e978qhl,conservative
"It definitely matters, because there's legislation that has to pass, such as the budget. If the Dems can't piece together a partisan budget with their teensy majority then it will fall of Republicans to make up the difference.

If we discount the must-pass bills, the Dems will still be forced by their base to ""take a stand"" on social issues. Because they can't pass the Senate and are unlikely to become law, their impact will be for virtue signalling.

They will definitely hold symbolic votes.

",RoundSimbacca,e988nao,conservative
CBB starts tonight? Dang. ,skarface6,e971uo2,conservative
"this guy does pretty good coverage. Agenda-Free, https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kQ12HGmcK2E",IvankasFutureHusband,e9726gi,conservative
"not to my knowledge (admittedly not an expert, I just looked up what the hold up was). Other states are clear to report once polls officially close. NV makes them wait until all ballots are cast.",aCreditGuru,e97nucl,conservative
The question is whether or not the requisite Broward County truck of fake ballots will be delivered in a large enough quantity to defraud yet another election.,kaioto,e9756he,conservative
"James was such a great candidate, but, despite my hopes, never really had a shot. Still, he put up a good fight. He's our Beto, except actually smart. ",RPwhitefrost,e97dbzp,conservative
"Michigan, Pennsylvania, and Wisconsin all swung in favor of Democrats. If Trump were to lose those 3 states he would lose the election. ",AMollenhauer,e97nds7,conservative
"Ah, 7% reporting. Still way too early to tell",AyyyGreens,e971rar,conservative
"I found a place, and it says only 7% of precincts are reported.",AyyyGreens,e971t4r,conservative
Happy to help :) ,amjourdan,e97gbna,conservative
Looks like King won,ImagineAllTheKarma,e97jz9k,conservative
+26,DJ_GiantMidget,e97klfl,conservative
"Honestly, they'd be enraged if that seat was pivotal to their control of the Senate. Vox, Slate, PuffHost, etc. would have all have had articles about how the ""GREEN PARTY STOLE SENATE FOR REPUBLICANS.""

It turns out it wasn't a pivotal seat, so they'll let it slide this time.",RoundSimbacca,e97ue7e,conservative
That’s our problem right now. Californians keep moving to Washoe County.,smashzer02,e98irxf,conservative
#NEAAAAAR FAAAAAR WHEREVEEEER YOU ARRRRRREE,DogBeersHadOne,e97h8r0,conservative
"If you’re on NYT it’s been within ~1,000 for a while now... and Walker back on top by less than 200 lmao it’s gonna be a long night",mm1255,e97nhfr,conservative
Google is behind. Get on NYT or 538. ,TBSportsFan1254,e97ci5t,conservative
"Hey man, the Republic goes on. Win or lose we all have other things to do.",Rytho,e974ff6,conservative
"The way to solve it would be to shrink the federal government and spread some of the Federal departments around the country. So while they have their HQs in DC the majority of the bureaucrats are in other parts of the country. We mainly get liberal federal workers, lobbyists, and the like who move from DC or MD to excape higher taxes but still want to be close to DC. And they bring their politics with them. ",War-Damn-America,e973ciq,conservative
"Republicans have been making gains among minorities, but we need to work harder to break the perceptions created by the left that Republicans are Racist. Democrats haven't always had a monopoly on minorities, and they won't keep it forever either. Unfortunately, people like you don't help.",Zyrioun,e97mfcu,conservative
"I guess you're completely ignoring the progressive movment of the 1920's which ended up in the 1940's with a 3 term FDR followed by Truman with countless years  of Congressional and Judicial progressive control, whereas by contrast  after 1965 led to the biggest gain in  republican history, with Reagan permanently flipping the South and winning the biggest  landslides in our parties history,  followed by GHWB, a moderate dem, and  GWB who won half the  hispanic vote.

Your racist implication that progressivism is inherently linked to darker skin or that people of darker skin can't be swayed to conservatism is ridiculous and stupid and, so far as i've been told, a bannable offense.",Zyrioun,e97m83c,conservative
Nope. We lost the house. :(,Dunkeliness,e97e14b,conservative
DeSantis is leading now,AyyyGreens,e974a25,conservative
When you don't like the outcome change the methodology... lol,aCreditGuru,e977ppc,conservative
In my cycle we gave up both of our femurs and never complained.,Menhadien,e977pjt,conservative
"Well, that's really sad.",rf-engineer,e97bnwl,conservative
Black people don't count when it hurts the left's narrative. ,gprime,e979xzj,conservative
he'll say that john james is a white man.,SKWM3000,e979jwu,conservative
"Probably going to call JJ Tom, the spouse of his aunt.",notathrowaway_5150,e979m2w,conservative
Yeah if the R's put up a half-decent candidate in 2020 they should get the district back,Marko_Ramius1,e97jtz4,conservative
"I'm not saying socially liberal like Gary Johnson. I'm saying Mitt Romney or Marco Rubio, the kind of candidate suburban voters like voting for. I don't see why southern VA wouldn't grudgingly vote for such a candidate. 

Also,Stewart literally said the civil war wasn't about [slavery](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/gop-senate-candidate-corey-stewart-says-civil-war-wasnt-about-slavery/). He's an apologist. Don't downvote me for saying so.",combrade,e97alww,conservative
"I dunno - Wolf Blitzer desperately trying to figure out a way Clinton ""could still win"" after it was clearly not going her way, was pretty amusing.",remybob78,e97bqrl,conservative
true,SKWM3000,e97avqq,conservative
that does not matter. they will report a blue wave anyway.,JMB_was_a_god,e97fenz,conservative
"Charismatic? I barfed during the debate when he spoke Spanish in a horrible accent, and I can speak that language pretty well",ltdshred,e97hpz5,conservative
"Basically, it started off with Hillary at 95% chance up until probably 8 PM EST, but then returns from the rust belt states like Penn started to roll in around 9 to 10 PM EST, plus Florida remained tight.
  

As the night rolled on it became more and more clear Trump had a chance.  The famous NYTimes election meter went from 99% chance down to 5% chance over only a couple hours.  ",Roez,e975za1,conservative
"yeah, all night trumps chance trended up just like this.",JMB_was_a_god,e975zmy,conservative
Looks like maybe not.,ngoni,e981h1x,conservative
https://www.miaminewtimes.com/news/trump-ally-ron-desantis-wins-florida-governors-race-10890106,eeeinator,e97ephn,conservative
"""I'm a teacher and vet and I'm just like Garrison Keillor donchaknow""",zwiebelsaft,e97pse8,conservative
"I don’t disagree with you but Beto in a national election year with people like Lebron and Beyoncé endorsing him from California and being on Colbert, Ellen, Maher, etc. seems like the media tried so much harder to make this happen.  Plus a lot of those types dislike Cruz almost as much as Trump.  ",mm1255,e97lxa0,conservative
"Speaking of Osoff, I have not seen anything conclusive from the district he ran in all this time. Karen Handel must be facing some tough competition.",AvdaxNaviganti,e97m95e,conservative
That seriously pissed me off. There's no way anyone outside of portland voted no on those. Like what the hell?,Zyrioun,e97kbjz,conservative
"That's very disappointing. Perhaps he had his senate race in mind. Hopefully he shows more of a backbone in the Senate. I'd still rather have him than Nelson, at least.",RPwhitefrost,e97jk0j,conservative
Thanks! ,ConsistentlyRight,e97534z,conservative
"Like I stated, it's still very early. But James has been catching up to her and now has a slight lead.

*fingers crossed*",SinisterPaige,e978urz,conservative
"Good link, thank you for sharing!
",remybob78,e97at9u,conservative
MO is the Same way ,game46312,e97o1gd,conservative
"Hopefully James can run again in a couple years against Peters.  Peters is a weak ass candidate as well.

Michiganders deserve to not have Democrats holding court over their seats in the Senate.  We are so far from a far left state but that's all we ever have had in the Senate as far as I can remember.",notathrowaway_5150,e97djwn,conservative
Why didn't he have a shot?,Dudehitscar,e97edo7,conservative
Shapiro discussed that tonight. The issue that Trump will likely face is how to appeal to those voters while simultaneously keeping a broader base of support. ,psstein,e97nu8w,conservative
Fox News shows 55%,pdawg43,e971w5m,conservative
"Looks like Reynolds will win a close one as well, but having two representatives flip (including my own) sure sucks.",xKommandant,e97kl3i,conservative
#I BELIEEEEEEEEEEVE THAT MY HEAAAART WILLLLLL GOOOO OOOOOOOONNNNNNNN,diamondeyes18,e97hl7q,conservative
"I don't have a meeting until 11, I'll be fine! 

",psstein,e97nwid,conservative
"Yeah, after looking at things this morning I'm fine with saying this was a victory for us as well as the Democrats. We expanded our power in the senate, which will only aid our judicial appointments. It wasn't a bad night.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9911k5,conservative
"> Republicans have been making gains among minorities,

this is said before every election. it is never true. ",JMB_was_a_god,e97mhhf,conservative
Reality and history are tough for people stuck in alt-right loony talking points. ,psstein,e97mfco,conservative
"Funny because the country under FDR was ironically 50x more conservative than it is today under Bush, Obama or Trump.",richardguy,e97mfp4,conservative
"It wasn’t about slavery it was about the right for states to secede or not from the Union, which was a major issue from the founding of the country till the Civil War. Slavery was the catalyst, but it’s not what it was about. If slavery hadn’t had been an issue at all, we probably wouldn’t have had the Civil War in 1861, but we would have had it and fought over the same thing, the ability for states to secede from the Union at different date. 

But more importantly to this discussion, a Romney or Rubio canidate would not appeal to the rest of the state, and turn out in those areas would be lower because Central and Southern Va Republicans would be far less motivated to vote. The number of votes you would pick up in NoVa would not make up for the lack of enthusiasm and low turnout in the rest of the state. ",War-Damn-America,e97b326,conservative
Shpuld we expect anything else tbh?,freedomhertz,e97fnp7,conservative
Well not to true conservatives but to other people I'd think. Just like how Donald Trump is extremely charismatic but Democrats are disgusted by what he says.,InAingeWeTrust,e97hsdm,conservative
"Never heard of that publication. I'll wait for AP, or one of the major news sources. ",TBSportsFan1254,e97f1n5,conservative
"Most of them were in the 65-35 range. I just don't understand it either. The grocery tax one shouldn't even be a partisan measure, but apparently people enjoy paying more taxes. ",AMollenhauer,e97kgro,conservative
"Stabenow was very entrenched, and he started in too deep a hole. No one knew who he was to begin. He wound up putting on a very impressive showing. In the future, he could very well win a seat.",RPwhitefrost,e97hg82,conservative
NYT shows 11% based on their voting results tool.,AyyyGreens,e9720oo,conservative
"I just moved to Iowa's 1st district from Texas. Tried to do my part by voting straight red. 

Looks like it wasn't enough for Blum.",MajesticMulva,e97mi9l,conservative
I hate that song but my God it is so memeable.,DogBeersHadOne,e97hy1x,conservative
"George Bush had over 40% of the hispanic vote. Even Trump has built upon our share of minority voters. Your alt-right belief that ""dark or non-white"" people are incapable of conservatism has no place here.",Zyrioun,e97mpge,conservative
"It's annoying. I report them, but the mods ignore it, even though on the meta they claim they ban them..",Zyrioun,e97n63p,conservative
"What the fuck?! No they weren't. Progressivism had spread so far under FDR that even some republicans were abandoning fiscal conservatism and supporting MASSIVE FAR LEFT Policies.  FDR was MASSIVELY far left, he makes Obama look republican by comparison. Eugenics, Socialism, and collectivism was far more wide-spread in the country at that time. Although i imagine you much preferred the Eugenics and Racism that was in Vogue at the time.",Zyrioun,e97mmza,conservative
"Ah yes the New Deal. The same program that created the Social Security Act, Wagner-Steagall Act, and founded the alphabet agencies. Almost 90 years ago that was considered socialism by conservatives at the time. This doesnt even include the other dozen acts that were enacted. Don't even get me started on Keynesian economics. Maybe check out some of FDRs policies before making more uninformed opinions.",TheEsophagus,e97psua,conservative
"Slavery is why the states seceded. It's was states rights to own slavery.Here is  a Prager video on this [subject](https://youtu.be/pcy7qV-BGF4).

As for our main discussion, Republicans generally will fall in line as long you don't go full sjw like Gary Johnson. I don't see southern Virginians  not showing up given that they're more worried about gun rights.   But we'll have to agree to disagree as we're discussing an imaginary  candidate. I live in the suburbs and there are many voters who are Romney voters but not Trump voters so maybe I don't have an accurate perspective as I'm the minority of Trump voters in my area.",combrade,e97cdp2,conservative
"Google it, jesus, even drudge has called it",eeeinator,e97flkc,conservative
Ah,pdawg43,e972mpb,conservative
You know what though? On a state level we won both houses of the legislature and retained the governorship. We did out part mate.,xKommandant,e98g9i7,conservative
"They are not incapable. Its just that the democrats offer them more, such as vast and expensive social welfare programs that are unsustainable. ",JMB_was_a_god,e97mz21,conservative
The alt-right has the same idiotic type of racial essentialization that the loony left has. What I mean is that they act as though all racial groups act/vote/live in precisely the same manner across time. ,psstein,e97n8a5,conservative
"We also didn't have nearly as much of an issue with entitlements, practically zero gun control until 1934, much greater civil liberties. Today we have bankrupt medicare and social security, gun control out the ass, and domestic spying. Yeah, as we get more people from authoritarian regimes in south america we just get more free.",richardguy,e97muak,conservative
America as a whole was still far more conservative.,richardguy,e97pzmh,conservative
"That is the only Prager video I disagree with that I can think of off the top of my head. I’ve watched it and don’t agree with their points. Slavery was the catalysis for the secession movement in 1860. However why Lincoln and the Union fought the South was because they said you can’t secede from the Union. Once youre in it’s permeant. And the south fought back trying to secede but ultimately failed. If it was about slavery and not secession the Union would have emancipated all the southern slaves in 1861, and freed all the northern slaves at that time as well. The Emancipation Proclamation was put in to place to hurt the south and their economy, not because they wanted to free the salves. It only covered the seceding slave states, and more specifically the counties/parishes in those states that had not been brought back under Union control. So like for example here in Alexandria Va, when the proclamation was released in 1863 any slaves in Alexandria were exempt because it was in a Union occupied county. While a slave in Richmond would have fallen under it and was freed. 

Northern VA has just been infested with people who work for the federal government or a related field like lobbyists. They tend to be liberal, and when they are republican they tend to be RINOs. It’s the nature of who is attracted to government work and the like. So a moderate is effective up here but not the rest of the state. And people do tend to fall in line, but to really motivate the base and get people voting for the rest of the state you can’t be a moderate republican.  So we will agree to disagree. ",War-Damn-America,e97dob6,conservative
"They offer that to poor white people too. The key is breaking through the perceptions of us being racist and reinforcing the idea that a better, stronger free market benefits the poor and downtrodden more than handouts, and allows more freedom.

People like you saying we need  more white  people and  less brown people does not help that at all. It reinforces the claims of the left, which is why we need to purge the alt right form places like this.",Zyrioun,e97na8s,conservative
"It's exactly that.  It's literal prejudice based on race. History disproves this notion of course, only in recent history have democrats claimed a monopoly on minority votes, and polls show that monopoly on minority voters is slipping. As long as we prevent alt-right idiots from gaining any prominence, it's possible Republicans can make a breakout in minority communities.",Zyrioun,e97ng1r,conservative
"Are you kidding or are you a literal idiot? Medicare and  Social  Security were literally created during the progressive era of the 1940's.  There were no ""people from south american authoritarian regimes"" in america at the time, and yet we passed the largest entitlements ever passed in american history, before or since. Gun control  legislation was heavily pushed at the time, FDR tried to forcefully expand and  pack the courts, Socialism and collectivism was running rampant through the country all the way through to the 70's.

The idea that we were some conservative bastion until them brown people came is complete and utter bullshit and ignores the entire history of the country, not to mention ignoring that republicans once had a large share of the minority vote, even GWB had 40% of the hispanic vote.",Zyrioun,e97n3ln,conservative
">  It reinforces the claims of the left

those claims are going to be made no matter what we do. ",JMB_was_a_god,e97o0c4,conservative
"I think one of the smartest things Trump has done in the last two years is kick Bannon/Miller/Gorka/etc. to the curb. A viable GOP has to find ways to appeal to minority voters. I think the improved economy has, so far, helped. A rising tide lifts all boats and all that. 

",psstein,e97npym,conservative
"The difference is that yesterday's liberalism would be today's ""far right"". You've missed my point friend. As we continue on, we become more and more liberal at an alarming rate.",richardguy,e97nq36,conservative
"So since they're going to be made either way, you think ""what the hell, might as well be an actual racist""?",Zyrioun,e97qxmb,conservative
"Uh, progressives in 1940  were not far right. The country has not moved to the left of FDR. He and the progressive movement was further to the left than most liberals today, Obama included. Democrats at large and a large portion of the nation were supporting the progressive movement, it's why progressives continued to get elected for decades. You clearly have little grasp on this country's history.",Zyrioun,e97qy1t,conservative
Fuck it who cares,gtrdundave2,e98f5ah,conservative
"If you were a true conservative you wouldn’t care. He has free speech and can speak how he wants, I don’t like Beto but I support his right to free speech . By the way if you didn’t criticize trump for dropping the F bomb, don’t act like this language is new in politics .",Thirdeyewonder1,e98f6m3,conservative
this isnt news.....,JMB_was_a_god,e98qfmo,conservative
So classy....,aaronholliday,e98evoq,conservative
"How brave. Beto for President 2020

-the left",JimboJehosephat,e98g17c,conservative
Did you say that when trump dropped the F Bomb too?,Thirdeyewonder1,e98f1a6,conservative
FUCK. YES.,LAFRM600,e97iu7u,conservative
Lmao. Thank the lord,MaddSim,e97jgsf,conservative
Wasn’t even close. We’re pretty sick of her shit here in Missouri. ,GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97otqc,conservative
Lololololo,rwwman50,e97k2wv,conservative
"Good riddance to this fraud. No more of her lies about being bipartisan, then voting with the radical left 90% of the time. People are hopefully waking up to the fact that there are no more moderate Democrats.",PhilosoGuido,e97vp5r,conservative
And by a larger margin than anticipated. ,Haff174_,e97skq3,conservative
Oooooo whaaaat ,GladysCravesRitz,e97yrnk,conservative
That’s a shame but was the expected outcome. Rosendale was never ahead in the polls. Damn good effort though. ,Knollsit,e98nx4e,conservative
"That's still 54 seats for us. More than enough to confirm judges, even without Collins/Murkowski.",sendintheshermans,e98p4er,conservative
Have to hold onto that AZ seat.,the-divine-comedy,e98ookk,conservative
barf,stoffel_bristov,e98wmhs,conservative
"Florida needs a recount before Scott is considered in, but I don’t think it will make a difference.",AyyyGreens,e98qgaq,conservative
"Collins/Murkowski/Romney  

Romney for all his claims ""conservatism"" is a liberal shithead.",StraightNewt,e98pm4z,conservative
Looking at Scott's election history that guy always just squeaks by in elections. ,ozric101,e98rqxi,conservative
I think Romney will be better than expected.  I am hoping at least.  ,stoffel_bristov,e98wogt,conservative
"He’s not super popular, but he’s popular enough",AyyyGreens,e98s05g,conservative
Check his record as governor of Massachusetts.  It speaks for itself.,StraightNewt,e99s16o,conservative
"Boy Scouts can’t fucking win anything. It’s not the Boy Scouts fault that the Girl Scouts abandoned scouting to just become a cookie pushing corporation. Instead of bitching to the boy scouts about it,maybe people invested in the Girl Scouts should clean house fix their own fucking organization. Hell become a troop leader and actually go outside for once no ones stopping them. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e97mnfp,conservative
"So not only are they not allowed to be boys only, they're not allowed to try and improve the amount of girls that join.

Nothing will EVER be good enough for these bossy people",JackHazardous,e97ayjl,conservative
"So they want inclusivity, but don't want it? 

So gender matters.",gab907,e97ajz4,conservative
"My wife constantly talks about how boring the Girl Scouts were whenever articles like this rear their head, and how fun the Boy Scouts always looked. I remember the Girl Scout camp across the lake was more like a hotel, while we were all setting up tents and camping around a fire, having a blast.

 Maybe the Girl Scouts should actually go outside and go camping. Kids love doing stuff like that, and clearly there is a gigantic demand amongst girls to do the same. The Girl Scouts would have much more of a leg to stand on if they were just the girl version of the Boy Scouts, but they're essentially a girly arts and crafts club. Look up some of the merit badges in Girl Scouts, you'd be shocked.

There's literally a badge called ""my best self"" and ""having a great day"". You'd think that this was a program for emotionally fragile recovering trauma victims.",TomToonami93,e982522,conservative
Those that eat their own eating their own.,sfx6c,e97ldr1,conservative
/r/notthebabylonbee,MarioFanaticXV,e97v7la,conservative
This world is becoming such a shitty place.,PurpleHouseSlippers,e97auv1,conservative
"The lawsuit is a good thing and to be expected.  I think we will see the Streisand Effect come in to play here and actually boost Scout participation.  They have essentially opened themselves up to large amounts of scrutiny.  I applaud the boy scouts for becoming more inclusive, it was a great business decision and I think it will help them grow as an organization.",Falkamper,e981gnc,conservative
😂😂😂😂😂😂😂,zwiebelsaft,e97nx8z,conservative
The patriarchy is stopping them. Don't you know?,TomToonami93,e981wol,conservative
That is why you never cave to the unreasonable demands of idiots.  ,ozric101,e97cs6c,conservative
"Politics are downstream of culture, we lost the culture. Teach your kids to be independent critical thinkers. I remember being a kid in the Bush years and getting barraged with this stuff from all sides, thinking I must be evil for holding conservative beliefs. Getting older made me realize the barrage is deliberate, and the real form of mass voter suppression and intimidation.",MackMizzo,e96gkcs,conservative
"The Democrats announce their campaign strategy and policy positions for the next election:

""Republicans Are Bad""",elvisjulep,e95ykje,conservative
Most conservatives are pretty good people and just want to be left alone.  There are plenty of good liberals too.  But the Republican party has some aweful decision makers.  Real conservatives have little to no representation.,touch0ph,e974dfg,conservative
"Just remember that media bias isn't always in what they report, but what they don't report, or how the article is written.",Sideswipe0009,e961bcz,conservative
Absolutely true for conservatives in Europe also!,AstraeaAthena,e963tay,conservative
My Friends think I'm a monster,The_Fyrd,e95xgwi,conservative
"Devil's advocate here.

Is it *at all* possible that at least *some* Republicans have fallen prey to the ""Democrats are bad"" mentality?",nasaldecongestant,e96qilq,conservative
Orange man bad...,SimplyKaz,e960m38,conservative
The left are sheep and the conservatives are woken up. That's why conservatives were so secret in voting for Trump to avoid conflicts because they knew what was right. The left bring so much violence. ,StruggleSnug69,e970ayw,conservative
People who are still Republican today have incredible strength of will. It's the strength that founded this country and what makes it great to this day.,tenshon,e964n2i,conservative
You do realize that both sides do this.....watch NBC or CNN. Now watch Fox. They both bash the other side....,RCo1a,e96sn9x,conservative
"Why is it this way though?    I don't think it's that specific to party, but I do think that it's skewed towards liberal ideals in most cases. Is there something beyond surface bias?",Falkamper,e98156q,conservative
Well done!,Gnome_Sane,e9654vb,conservative
Snowflake much?,billytheid,e97e45j,conservative
reeeeeePOST,thegypsymc,e970iz4,conservative
I think most rock stars were more anti war than anti republican. ,Prof_Disappointment,e97iioo,conservative
"> we lost the culture.

I don't think ""we"" did.",chabanais,e96h18w,conservative
[republicans are so stupid](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IGl1CCprCeU),warningtrackpower12,e97irx3,conservative
"If parties had to have honest slogans:

""We'll Double Your Taxes to Pay for Socialist Healthcare""",LibertyTerp,e9676tb,conservative
This is the most important thing. Why the fuck would every single media outlet start talking about gun control 5 minutes into a school shooting? It's all propaganda that fits a narrative.,LibertyTerp,e967hp9,conservative
"I sympathize with this. If my friends at university ever found out what I actually thought on social issues, they would probably disown me and report me to the Dean.",big_flute,e972izs,conservative
"If so, they're probably not your friends.",jd_porter,e96h9gt,conservative
https://m.imgur.com/L51KfuG,chabanais,e95yyp4,conservative
http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m52z86Kfv91r79k32.gif,JaneTheThird,e96bon7,conservative
https://pics.me.me/you-still-hold-true-to-your-beliefs-even-after-i-7911708.png,rankaisija,e96apzl,conservative
"Yes, but not as many. I’ve been a liberal in a conservative community and a conservative in a liberal community. I’d much rather be the former. Because conservatives think liberals are stupid or naive. But liberals think conservatives are evil. And I’d rather have people call me stupid or naive than have people call me evil.",big_flute,e972h1m,conservative
[deleted],,e96uhaq,conservative
"Maybe. With people, and politics, any thing is possible. There are people that vote for Beto ""because he's hot"" 

So... Yea. Probably. ",Themusician67,e970acq,conservative
"Living in Maryland my whole life, it looks so easy and comforting to be an angry Democrat. I just sit there watching them blissfully repeating ""ORANGE MAN BAD"" back to each other. It's like a nature documentary, ""Here you see the NPC in its natural habitat. The transgender male's mating call of ORANGE MAN BAD intrigues the female transgender.""",LibertyTerp,e967brx,conservative
[deleted],,e96u9ol,conservative
"You have about 100 other echochambers to endulge yourself in on Reddit, why do you bother us in ours? ",Ledcookey,e97f052,conservative
The left can't meme. You're so bad at it you just coopt ours and pretend you invented it.,Odoacer476CE,e97nvqj,conservative
What do you mean? ,Themusician67,e96omya,conservative
You’re right. It was the hatred of minorities and lgbt peoples that led to it. Along with the reluctance to abandon corporate interests in the face of science that people became educated about. ,Teethpasta,e9772lg,conservative
Groups similar to the infamous journolist definitely still exist to coordinate and control the news cycles.,rankaisija,e96b157,conservative
"Eh, it can be good for discussion.",The_Fyrd,e96t279,conservative
Stealing this image thanks,Jayttt98,e97a7hl,conservative
"I think the same could be said in regards to the majority of Republicans and/or conservatives. Overall, most people *don't* justify their political beliefs with anything more than emotions.

The vocal minority rules **both** sides of the political spectrum, one side claiming that liberal snowflakes want to strip Christians of their guns, and the other side claiming that republican white supremacist nazis are trying to murder black gay children in schools.

What everyone should be focusing on is the shared values of the population of the United States of America. Compassion, Justice, Liberty, Free Speech, and Self Determination are values that most Americans treasure. Once both sides realize that, I think there will be less vitriol in the public debate.",nasaldecongestant,e96vo41,conservative
Wait now I'm confused. Where did transgender come in to this?,Litten_The_Memelord,e98caxh,conservative
"*quid pro quo* Clarice

When ‘*idea I disagree with* snowflake’ stops being a conservative talking point I’ll stop pointing out the absurd irony of it. ",billytheid,e97f6qp,conservative
"I think their point is more that the left engaged in a decades long hostile take over of ""culture."" 

""Culture"" in this instance really being mass media. It's Robert Conquest's second law in action. ""Any organization not explicitly right-wing sooner or later becomes left-wing.""

You can see it in news media most prevalently. There are almost no truly unbiased sources out there. There are explicitly right-wing sources (Brietbart, Daily Wire, and yes, Fox News just to name a few), and there are explicitly left wing sources (ThinkProgress, Mother Jones, The Nation, just to name a few), but just about every source that purports to be neutral also has a left-wing slant. See CNN, MSNBC, NBC, CBS, ABC, New York Times, Washington Post, Newsweek, Time, Huffington Post, Buzzfeed, etc. Even shit that supposedly isn't even political let alone ideological, like Vogue or GQ, have become leftwing mouthpieces. The only purportedly neutral source that leans somewhat right that I can think of is the Wall Street Journal.

This is just the journalism side of media though. Its just as bad when you look at the entertainment side of mass media. Television and movies are overwhelmingly run by left-wingers. Music mostly is as well. They may not dominate other entertainment mediums, but they're still the majority in most of them.

None of this is a coincidence. Survey data has shown time and again that left wingers are less tolerant of differing opinions, and that will always eventually wind up manifesting in hiring and firing decisions, which in turn invariably leads to ideological hegemony within an organization. 

That's what's been going on in mass media for, really, about 60 years. It wasn't a fast process, but we do see the results now, and its [this shit right here.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nRp1CK_X_Yw)",Whiggly,e96qq94,conservative
Lost the culture war.,chabanais,e96rr3n,conservative
"So you agree ""we"" didnt lose the culture war.

Thanks.",chabanais,e97anl0,conservative
Spread it like a rash.,chabanais,e97apa1,conservative
"But you're doing it on reddit... where no one (except those in r/politics) denies the use of echochambers.

Get back to me when places like these College campuses  all over the country stop suppressing Conservative and other right wing voices... good god the Lefts total lack of awareness is insane. ",Ledcookey,e97fhec,conservative
"Well i ment to ask him about the ""we"" emphasis. But it sounds like your point is ""liberals high jacked culture"" instead of ""won a culture war"" 

Am I right?",Themusician67,e96s540,conservative
that ad ho-lee-crap,kroatone,e96xsd8,conservative
Wow that ad. I can't believe they think this helps their cause.,Genouard,e97fpc2,conservative
"I would consider it a product of political entropy. The Right represents the dominant culture, the political core, the unitary majority. The Left represents peripheral groups, obscure subcultures, outsider voices and marginal spaces. A culture war therefore represents almost an encircling action with the center besieged by the peripheries. 

The more anarchy in the system, (caused by the fragmentation of media sources and epistemology), the more the center cannot hold. Like a pill dissolving in soda. It just disappears and we're left with, just, froth.

You ever see a country run by froth?",silentnoisemakers76,e97vbtf,conservative
"Sorry I wasn't clear. I ment to ask about the emphasis on ""we"" ",Themusician67,e96s12y,conservative
"Freedom of speech isn’t freedom from accountability: if you want to use distinctly divisive or repressive rhetoric, don’t expect to be tolerated by people who are inclusive and egalitarian.  

Also if you really think the current Republican Party is democratically conservative then you’re probably not at a college to study... that’s not a slight on conservative politics, that’s just the present state of the GoP. ",billytheid,e97gk2e,conservative
"The more anarchy in the system, the less the fringe will be able to direct the center.  The Left won the culture war precisely due to the centralized nature of TV and Hollywood.  The fringe element occupied those centers of control and used them to great effect.  With a real variety in available media, people will seek out what interests them rather than what the limited, propaganda infused options from the Blue Church.  The center is conservative because the bulk of people are looking for what's rational, knowable, and effective.  It takes the concerted effort of a Leftist to divert away from that and a real marketplace of ideas will sort them out before they get away with their bullshit.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e983iig,conservative
"I don't think it's helpful to use ""we"" when discussing politics unless it's a politician discussing their campaign, etc.",chabanais,e96skm6,conservative
"""...tolerated by people who are inclusive and egalitarian.""

Wow... 

You're absolutely right about the 1st not covering you for accountability, that however doesnt dictate that public colleges, or any public schools for that matter, are free to suppress speach they dont like. Plenty of private schools that receive tax money dont, or at least shouldnt, have that ability either. 

Places of learning, especially those of higher levels, are meant to expose people to ideas they dont often like, dont often hear, and dont often understand. If they dont, and only allow the same biased and false rhetoric one side puts out, you get what we have now. A bunch of factories spitting out intolerant Leftist who cant define any ideology other than their own and even struggle with that. 

Not to mention the rediculous amounts of unfounded hate that spews from these same Leftists towards anyone who thinks differently than they do. 

Despite everything Im saying goin into one ear and out the other for you, I do appreciate you providing an absolutely perfect example of the ignorance the Left displays when talking about anything outside their own little bubbles. 

And I should say, again despite all this not so nice talking, I dont consider you anything close to a bad person for your views. This isnt me patronizing you or even trying to find common ground really. I just think it's important to say that, while I still take issue with how you think just as you do with me, im sure you're a fine human being (as much as I can be with someone I dont know). I wish absolutely no harm to you and bid you good luck in your future. 



",Ledcookey,e97t0zs,conservative
"But he is asking who you meant, you are the one who said ""we""",mphilly44,e96sz4s,conservative
Can you describe a Leftist?,billytheid,e97t30v,conservative
"Right. It sounded like he was saying ""its not we that lost"" 

You know?",Themusician67,e96u42g,conservative
"I never said it:

>we lost the culture",chabanais,e96x26z,conservative
"Someone futher left than your typical Liberal and moderate Democrat.

It obviously varies by person for the most part, but when I think of Leftists I think of the same people who do what they can to shut down opposing views. People who advocate for Socialism and/or Socialist policies (im talking about things like wealth redistribution), Open borders or policies close to it, and intentional disregard of the Constitution in favor of more globalist tendencies or even simply more centralization of power here in the States. Etc. 

The last bit can be attributed to most Democrats nowadays, but I do believe there is a distinction between giving ground for ""securities"" and wanting to completely go in the opposite direction of the Constitution. ",Ledcookey,e97tqfd,conservative
You ,phantomcut3,e98g5zk,conservative
It's not over by a long shot.,chabanais,e96x51u,conservative
"Very simple question, you said:
I don't think ""we"" did.

He simply asked who you are referring to by saying ""we""? I understand the person above you said we, but you clearly meant something by placing quotations around ""we"" and a question was simply asked to clarify what you meant by that.",mphilly44,e96zpr1,conservative
Im so confused......,Themusician67,e96xfit,conservative
"If you had to guess, what would you say?",chabanais,e973gln,conservative
"A very round about response to a seemingly simple question, I'd expect no less",mphilly44,e96zgyw,conservative
"Love it, cheers",mphilly44,e974zxd,conservative
"Alex Jones was not chanting death to America, yet all of his soical media accounts were banned. ",ozric101,e96w9tb,conservative
"Farrakhan is just a piece of shit. Why should there even be any need to ""renew fire"" for someone like him. The same fire should continue burning him indefinitely. He's like a modern day Hitler",VoinaYMir,e97d6gj,conservative
"Said it in... some other subreddit where it wasn't well-received, and will say it here:

Extremists gonna extremist",GorathThorgath,e97exqp,conservative
"I don't understand how merely being called a Nazi dehumanizes someone while being affiliated to this person somehow spares Democrats of the backlash.  Or there's actually no backlash.  


Is Farrakhan and Sarsour just a joke or the best evidence that the USA is the best place in the planet to be ""different""?.  


Because they sure are living proof that in America, you can say the most terrible things about people and the country itself and still have the right to live in it.",markcocjin,e982qh4,conservative
Cancel his passport - let him stay there.,undue-influence,e982z6v,conservative
'Death to America' must be approved speech on those platforms. ,CapitalGGeek,e96zzha,conservative
"Yeah but like, you can’t just go around accusing frogs of being gay. That’s hate speech, obviously.",Infinity_Over_Zero,e97ib7k,conservative
He has praised hitler,phantomcut3,e98g750,conservative
How do they know that they're DACA people? Is there another ID that they use to separate them? ,Scozzar,e97g59k,conservative
"People, as well as political parties who use illegals to garner votes, or conspire to give illegals the right to vote should be charged with treason.",FooLyCooLie,e97mzjs,conservative
This honestly just sounds like someone who doesn’t know what she’s talking about. Not willfully trying to stack the vote. He’s saying he’s registered so by her logic that means he can vote. She even doubles back when he presses going “oh he might not actually be registered like you think he is if you’re saying that.” ,fluffstravels,e989270,conservative
Is anyone surprised?,DemosthenesXXX,e979mib,conservative
"In other news, the sky is blue.",ShillinTheVillain,e97fez2,conservative
"You realize that these poll workers are not always the most informed, right?  They keep re-iterating that if he is registered and has an id, then he can vote.  That's all they care about.

Where should the citizen check be made? At the polling site by volunteers, or by state employees when said person registers to vote?

All this video shows is that the volunteers at polling sites might be ignorant of the lack of voting rights by DACA individuals. They do know that you have to be registered to vote and have an ID, and that's all they really need to know.",seadondo,e98076z,conservative
What other proof do you need?  Does it get more concrete than this?,insomagent,e97i8h8,conservative
I thought the point of DACA was to create citizenship,CreativeRoutine,e97fu5z,conservative
Time to look up what DACA means. Well other than fire power but I think that is different,GrandMoffPhoenix,e97r3hb,conservative
There is no proof. How would a DACA individual be registered to vote in the first place?  That's where veritas needs to go; show that state employees are registering non citizens to vote,seadondo,e980ciz,conservative
But they are not yet citizens. ,alcohall183,e97vauk,conservative
For immigration look up Robert  Putnam's paper E Pluribus Enum . You can  find a pdf of it .,combrade,e98zx9p,conservative
[FoxNews Live Stream](https://youtu.be/nzmXYf8qbTk),tehForce,e973mlo,conservative
I just want to say I fucking love being American. ,Fair_enough42,e975hse,conservative
"""Analyst"" Chuck Todd on NBC literally just said ""we"" when referring to the Democratic party.",Frashizzle,e97b8vh,conservative
Texas is officially in Cruz control ,OfficialMikeTrout,e97cgxj,conservative
"People on Fox Business are saying it seems premature and are questioning their own network  right now, not joking.",Zyrioun,e979x3a,conservative
Texas back to red on Politico. ,steampunker13,e97amxw,conservative
The word 'socialist' is being used quite freely by multiple commentators and politicians tonight. The grooming of future socialists has officially begun. ,postonrddt,e97ayet,conservative
"Really disappointing to see John James likely lose. A vet, a minority, and a successful businessman who is a Uniter, and not a divider, and he got no attention because he was a conservative. If he gets the attention Abrams,Beto,or Guillium get he has a real chance. 
",yoyowatup,e97glcm,conservative
Say it with me. Justice. Amy. Coney. Barrett. ,punishedpat76,e97flca,conservative
"/r/politics in early meltdown mode:

&#x200B;

>If these trends hold, I honestly don't know what their is to live for when we're gonna get fucked environmentally and social by the elderly until they die.  
>  
>I've never felt this despondent before in my life.

&#x200B;",KillaB33z,e9788f6,conservative
"As shitty as it may seem, House was expected to go. Senate victory is huge for us, and we can still pick up seats",surferdude28,e97dtnn,conservative
"DeSantis is going to win, as will Scott IMO. Holy shit!",RedDevil5,e97abmc,conservative
"Cruz Called. 

#ye of little faith.",memberCP,e97cfl5,conservative
"As a female, under 30, minority I am proud to be a conservative. ",blameitonthetetons1,e978fqf,conservative
Cruz Campaign: We just told America that California doesn't get 3 Senators. Lmao. ,tiger81775149,e97fssd,conservative
"My favorite comment on r/politics right now

>Took out extra on my student loans to donate to Beto. Gutted....

Oh what fools they are.",tehForce,e97crjg,conservative
"16% of precincts in and Cruz is pulling away. Like I've been trying to tell everyone, Beto's counties are already done, the rural vote will trickle in and Cruz will take the state by 4-6%.",zgh5002,e97a36d,conservative
"Feinstein won? She manipulated a sexual assault survivor for political gain and then won reelection at 85.... Unreal.

Edit - TIL she was the better option... Wtf California?!",mouser58907,e97fyxj,conservative
"FivethirtyEight now reporting its 50/50 for republicans to take control of House and 90% they win Senate!! 

https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/?ex_cid=extra_banner",Riley_Cubs,e975hcb,conservative
Florida’s going red!!,blameitonthetetons1,e9774fv,conservative
Everyone relax on Texas. Red counties haven't even begun to report anything yet,aburks41,e9798i5,conservative
"Desantis victory is huge, he will be able to appoint 3 FL Supreme Court justices immediately. ",Refresher,e97fvx3,conservative
I said go Cruz in r/politics and have 102 downvotes in 5 minutes lol. Totally worth it.,yoyowatup,e97ezzp,conservative
Nancy Pelosi as Speaker makes me want to vomit.,rjohnson99,e979sfv,conservative
I posted a pro Ted Cruz comment in the r/politics election thread and now my inbox is basically being attacked. This is kind of fun. ,Craqqer,e97e36e,conservative
"""It's not about Republicans and Democrats, it's about stopping the GOP!""

-Literally Pelosi.",14thAndVine,e97i9dl,conservative
Every person Obama campaigned for lost rofl,tja_1478,e97la48,conservative
"Regardless of outcome, let’s all realize that the minority party winning House power in a midterm is not even CLOSE to  “new” in politics... *internally cries*",baileyculp,e97bb41,conservative
Holy fucking shit if James wins I'm going to cream my pants ,RedDevil5,e97dfom,conservative
Van jones is the absolute worst. He’s essentially saying if you didn’t vote democrat you are embracing hate and bigotry. ,yoyowatup,e979841,conservative
Let’s go McSally!,trs287,e9703j7,conservative
"I have to watch CNN since I don't have Fox News, but I love hearing them get so excited about the Democrats leading on like 1% voting reported every single time",multiple4,e9726gh,conservative
Everyone's freaking out way too early. These numbers and polls are going to swing wildly as different precincts reports. Only when they go over 50% should you worry/celebrate.,lion27,e972we1,conservative
POLITICO JUST FLIPPED TEXAS TO RED,steampunker13,e979rkk,conservative
The only good thing to ever come out of New Jersey is The Sopranos. ,severeneckpain,e97ap6c,conservative
"Close one, Romney has won UTAH.",memberCP,e97blxn,conservative
"REPUBLICANS WON FLORIDA WOW

edit: wait nvm there's still some votes left

edit2: the votes are 99% and 95% complete and republicans are in the lead, so I think it might be safe to say Florida is red which is surprising",top-perro,e97bm7q,conservative
Something is very clear: The polls are completely missing some Trump supporters.,RedDevil5,e97dssp,conservative
As regards Gillum's concession: Thank You James O'Keefe,Odoacer476CE,e97frad,conservative
"I guess keeping the senate and winning gubernatorial races was more important at the end of the day.  At least we can confirm more justices and have solid assurance Trump won't be impeached and removed over horseshit (even though it would require 66% of the vote in the Senate anyway).

I can't wait for the endless investigations from the House *yawn*",ltdshred,e97frlr,conservative
Those of you on the east coast. Be sure to stay up to watch the oregon governor race. It could be very close and we might actually elect a Republican,kshebdhdbr,e971aov,conservative
"CNN’s abandoned the blue wave narrative.

Dems still seem likely to hold the house unfortunately, by 6 or 7 seats.",gster50,e97agis,conservative
"lol. I love the liberal media trying to wrap their heads around the failing ""blue wave."" NBC said that polls showed that majority of people don't believe in the Mueller probe. ""Trump is a great marketer I guess.""",TheOneAboveAll,e97ahh6,conservative
"Heitlamp officially loses, another senate gop gain ",Refresher,e97buso,conservative
Cruz projected to win hey? Brb heading to /r/politics for that delicious salt.,CyberBury,e97cfzm,conservative
"Missouri just flipped bigly in hawley's favor! 

https://www.politico.com/election-results/2018/senate/",tifuforreal,e97e8g3,conservative
Gillium conceded. Hopefully he can now focus on dealing with the FBI.,memberCP,e97fc1k,conservative
Fox calls Missouri for Josh Hawley. Frick yeah. ,soxfan90,e97g70l,conservative
Cockburn vs  Riggleman wins funniest name race,TedyCruz,e970qtj,conservative
Scott still leads by a hair with 93 reporting!,colinpail,e9755ff,conservative
Some voters are strange. Like Vermont. How can you elect a Republican Governor yet elect Sanders? I dont get people. ,MaddSim,e9764a2,conservative
John James is doing well. I want him to win so bad that would be epic. He was trailing double digits last week. ,latotokyo123,e979g73,conservative
"so I switched to 538 and ABC and WTF, it shows Republicans are way ahead than what CNN is showing

either CNN is slow or in denial",top-perro,e97a45a,conservative
There we go Cruz holding it,Taygr,e97cb3w,conservative
Gillum concedes lol,RedDevil5,e97fc7s,conservative
I know it's early but Texas senate race is too close. I have faith that Cruz will win but it should not be this close. ,GFZDW,e975qph,conservative
/r/politics is amazing at the moment.,lion27,e976c7u,conservative
Mike Braun just called by ABC for Indiana - a pickup for R in the Senate,TastelessSmell,e976hyd,conservative
Who knows what happens but it appears worst case scenario for the GOP is not going to happen,RedDevil5,e976u22,conservative
"CNN: It's not a blue wave, now it's a blue war

&#x200B;

LOLOLOL",top-perro,e978ytd,conservative
Is it just me or did Fox call the House pretty early? 538 has it close right now ,StevensCassidy2020,e97auez,conservative
"Still no blue wave, but our chances to keep the house look worse and worse.",TheBarberOfFleetSt,e97axpn,conservative
CRUZ IS BACK ON TOP BITCHES,KillaB33z,e97b4bl,conservative
"What the hell is happening?!?! Is 538 just trolling? Republicans have 60% chance of the HOUSE THE HOUSE. I don’t want to get ahead of myself but oh my god 


Edit: oh okay back to 40 but still really good. ",latotokyo123,e9750d1,conservative
538 now saying only 57.3% chance the Democrats take the house ,Bronc27,e9752ci,conservative
**JUST CALLED: BARR WINS KY-06**,aburks41,e975ybh,conservative
Marsha Blackburn called!,Taygr,e977go6,conservative
Tapper: there’s no blue wave,jreed11,e977ryd,conservative
"Nate Silver: Beto O’Rourke is holding into a slight lead in Texas, but it’s hard to know what to make of it, as a lot of it is based on early votes. Cruz is about a 3-to-1 favorite in betting markets.",rob_s_458,e979dz8,conservative
~150 house seats have been called and Democrats have only picked up 2 seats. Things aren't so bad I guess.,superdude411,e979x4y,conservative
Perhaps the weirdest outcome by far today is Kansas is turning blue. Freaking Kansas.,jonk012,e97c2os,conservative
"Abc just called it, cruz",Superfreak_84,e97c8h2,conservative
#LION TED,tmv4,e97cggi,conservative
Fucking hate how Colorado never goes red. We used to be a battleground state ,_JackieBoy_,e97co9e,conservative
POLITICO JUST GAVE THE SENATE TO THE REPUBLICANS,steampunker13,e97d0nu,conservative
When Cruz gets the election called for him we need to focus the meme magic ON JOHN FUCKING JAMES,steampunker13,e97d5wx,conservative
"Gotta say it... fuck Rick Scott for his gun control measures while governor.

Hope he redeems himself. ",GFZDW,e97eim9,conservative
THERE WE GO HAWLEY BRINGING THE RED WALL,Taygr,e97gage,conservative
Juan Williams is so out of touch with facts and reality that it's not even funny anymore. I can't even respect him anymore.,dapcook,e97gy46,conservative
Yeah big winner tonight is Mitch McConnell ,Taygr,e97i8w5,conservative
LETS GET THIS RED,colinpail,e9704f1,conservative
Please God let this go well ,HolsterOfNuts,e97066a,conservative
Let's face it....If O'Rourke comes anywhere close to beating Cruz and still losing (and i'm talking 5 points or less) you can pretty much take it to the bank that it's going to be O'Rourke vs Trump in 2020.,jonk012,e976kko,conservative
"NBC Nightly News has officially gone into ""we might not even win the house"" mode and are blaming Trump for 'getting his people to turn out.'


It's all bullshit. The fact is that the wide majority of people want politicians who will make their own lives better in some way. The racial tension, ideologue bullshit is just a dog whistle for college students. Working people want lower taxes. Working people want immigration reform so that we can actually *enforce* labor laws.",Frashizzle,e9774bq,conservative
"with 25% of the game reporting, ESPN had projected DUKE the winner of this game.",dapcook,e97dhac,conservative
"Meh, obviously prefer keeping the house but this helps Trump's re-election chances.  All the impeachment and obstruction screeching will hurt Dems big time. ",tja_1478,e97gsbs,conservative
"Big Republican movement in the last hour. 538 had Rs at 6% in the House and 80% in the Senate an hour ago.

Now it's 32% in the House and 97% Senate.",oren0,e9749on,conservative
"It may be a bit early, but this is starting to look like 2016 all over again. 538 and betting lines now have Republicans as slight favorites to keep the house and gain an average of 4 Senate seats.",oren0,e974x0u,conservative
My Leftist Tears Tumblr is already full what is happening?,Vrael22,e9754b6,conservative
"John James maintaining a 50 to 47 lead, but just 1% in still.",tenshon,e9766za,conservative
"Looks like 538 is back up to 45% for Republicans winning the house. Not bad for their initial prediction of 19%. Hopefully at the very least we'll stop the ""Blue Wave"".",lamall,e977dg0,conservative
"So far this has been an even better night than I expected it'd be! Indiana has flipped and Rick Scott looks like he might pull through in the Florida race! 

Sen. Menendez won in New Jersey, a sign that the electorate in that state is too far gone and have lost all their scruples. Sad! ",BudrickBundy,e977hji,conservative
Claire in MO is fucked. Similar to IN in demographics and Braun rolled the fuck out of Donnelly. Montana may be a win for the GOP as well.,RedDevil5,e977k0j,conservative
"From FiveThirtyEight:

Early exit polls (with caveats, of course) in Arizona don’t look so good for Democrat Kyrsten Sinema who is running against Republican Martha McSally for the Senate seat. By a margin of 53 to 42 percent, Arizona voters say they’d like Republicans to control the Senate.

Trump, who won the state by 4 points in 2016, has a 52 percent approval rating and 47 percent disapproval rating.",rob_s_458,e977lvv,conservative
I can't believe what Mike Braun just did. He just shit on an incumbent. Incredible. ,RedDevil5,e977s6h,conservative
And Blackburn has been called for Tennesee!! It is now impossible for the Dems to take the senate! A republican win in Missouri will be icing on the cake.,jonk012,e977slw,conservative
"CBS News is almost unwatchable. Nora O Donnel keeps trying too hard to make this a ""year of the woman."" You'd think that only liberal women are allowed to vote based on her tone. ",TheOneAboveAll,e978o60,conservative
"Fuck me, John James might pull this off in MI. If he wins, I bet that man will be POTUS someday. Look at Stabenow's numbers compared to Clinton! 

https://www.nytimes.com/elections/2016/results/president
",lion27,e978u9h,conservative
"Bizarre how 538 has it so close, but all the news networks are already calling the House for the Dems.",CyberBury,e979qen,conservative
Lets just hope fox screwed up calling the house just yet.,RigsbyQuist,e97a05y,conservative
"John James' lead is slightly dwindling. 

Edit: As soon as I posted this it jumped up a little bit. ",steampunker13,e97b91g,conservative
TED I BELIEVE IN YOU,top-perro,e97cenf,conservative
JUST CRUZIN,KillaB33z,e97cff1,conservative
Fox calls Senate for Republicans.,Clatsop,e97d0dt,conservative
"In the long run the Democrats taking the house might actually help the Republicans in 2020 because you know impeach and investigations talking points are going to be a HUGE focus. It might come to bite them back in the ass. If they were smart the would stick to someone like Beto for 2020 but let’s be real here, identify politics is king and that won’t happen. ",wonderfulworldofwill,e97exai,conservative
"So the House is going to spend all its time investigating. 

(And lets be clear, the subpoenas shall **RAIN** down like manna from heaven)

The Senate will spend *ALL* its time Confirming Judges. 

It could be worst.",memberCP,e97ezge,conservative
Is it just me or can John James still pull it off here? I thought he was done and then the NYT map has all GOP districts blank. He’s kept it very competitive in cities. ,latotokyo123,e97gjh1,conservative
The minute Juan Williams opens his mouth I want to throw myself out a window. He is literally the dumbest commentator on TV.,the-divine-comedy,e97gvwa,conservative
Text from my brother: “McCaskill getting her McCasskicked”,soxfan90,e97i2oz,conservative
"BAHAHAHA! 69 million dollars for Beto along with Lebron James and Beyonce,etc endorsing him, and he didn't even win!",jonk012,e97gzka,conservative
"What is really going to grind my gears? When we hear for the next 5 months about how “huge” of a victory this was for Democrats, and (soon to be Speaker) Nancy Pelosi touting this as the greatest Blue Wave in history. Ugh, lord help me ",baileyculp,e97dahk,conservative
"Losing Florida is a disaster, but I think that its very possible.",yackippo,e970j7h,conservative
Gillum//DeSantis is worrisome. So close to each other!,i_floop_the_pig,e971o0z,conservative
"It's funny watching the Dem's chances of taking the House on 538 drop from 90% to like 66%. 

I'm not saying its a repeat, but this is similar to how it looked during the 2016 election. Hillary was doing well until she wasn't.

IF the GOP pulls out a win in the House it HAS to be another blow to Nate Silver's credibility.

EDIT: Down to 52%. LOOOOOOOOLLLL what a ride.",Faceh,e974hjl,conservative
COME ON DESANTIS. Holy hell that's a close one. ,GFZDW,e974wjm,conservative
"Theoretically the dems should never be as gassed up as they are for this mid term election. If the best they can do is barely take the house and fail to win the senate (perhaps even lose seats), they're going to be pretty demoralized.",severeneckpain,e975a12,conservative
"3/516 reporting (very early), but Stabenow only up 51.4 to 47.1 over John James in MI's Oakland county has to be concerning...

edit: Concerning for the Democrats. Oakland county is pretty much Detroit.",lion27,e975edr,conservative
"Lol remember how much Democrats criticized Republicans for voting Moore, and the lack of Republican turnout lost it for him. Menendez wins against a very moderate Republican candidate... anyone? ",latotokyo123,e977saw,conservative
Braun winning so easily has to fuck up Claire and Jon Tester. ,RedDevil5,e978cvz,conservative
Indiana called for Braun.,rjohnson99,e978ep4,conservative
FUUUUUUUCK god damn it Cruz pull it out!,yackippo,e9792q4,conservative
"Interesting Fox News calls the House for the Democrats this early, while 538 still has a 45% chance for Republicans to keep control. We'll see what happens",ecfreeman,e979rdl,conservative
Why does the national news have the Texas senate as 50 reporting and local news has it at 3%,craig80,e979uze,conservative
Beto lead down to 21k - keep falling dammit,TastelessSmell,e97amny,conservative
"Nate Cohn, NYT guru, said Cruz will win comfortably. All the votes for the Dems are pretty much in. It was early votes.",RedDevil5,e97bcvq,conservative
Mitt is officially going to Washington ,cadmus_irl,e97bkty,conservative
Fox officially calls Cruz and Senate control,rob_s_458,e97czt8,conservative
CNN just called the senate for us.,severeneckpain,e97dl6w,conservative
"My heart is breaking for John James 💔💔💔

Edit: Still too close to call at 44% reporting. Come on my dude!!!",sydazzles,e97ejqq,conservative
House is definitely not looking pretty but whatever we're doing well in the Senate.,RedDevil5,e97elta,conservative
"rick scott now up by 150,000 votes in florida! 

https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/2018-election/midterms/fl ",tifuforreal,e97emly,conservative
GOP in Montana needs to get their shit together ,_JackieBoy_,e97hed9,conservative
"Please send help. All hope is lost.

Sincerely,

California",McFreedomWithCheese,e97jzr8,conservative
"NBC Nightly News is now discussing the Mueller probe and blaming Trump for flipping public opinion on it.


A two year long investigation on the current President of the United States that has produces some prosecutions on the fringes of the campaign **is a fucking witch hunt.**


This is ridiculous. They are literally saying, on national television, ""the majority is just brainwashed.""",Frashizzle,e97a2hi,conservative
Losing Florida is a sign of danger for 2020 a lot can change of course but we absolutely need to win that state every time. ,yackippo,e971fni,conservative
"Kentucky 6th is tied! Wow, what a comeback!",jonk012,e973a87,conservative
When should I start to worry about Cruz ,OfficialMikeTrout,e9753fr,conservative
**BRAUN CALLED FOR SENATE: GOP +1 LOLOLOL**,aburks41,e976ef1,conservative
"Everyone. Please say a prayer for Florida. I'm with all you conservatives, but we always need prayer in our lives.",SendixBunny,e976is8,conservative
3/8 chance to get the house is HUGE compared to early projections. Very hopeful!,ZCZ4iOS,e976pu7,conservative
One guy is calling FL for DeSantis,tja_1478,e977gah,conservative
Just voted in SoCal!,_ExitMusic_,e977yv5,conservative
"Manchin won re-election, honestly he was unlikely to lose and does sometimes side with us.  Would like a more Republican guy from WV but it could be worse.",Taygr,e97885m,conservative
Texas wat,arogozine,e978ajc,conservative
Well we can still win the Senate easily but Cruz losing is a fucking L of massive proportions ,RedDevil5,e9792e4,conservative
"NBC Nightly News is currently reporting that the migrant caravan was just ""made up"" by Trump.


Which contradicts the objective fact that 10,000+ refugees are making their way through Mexico right now as part of an organized effort. It was just reported by far-left NPR *tonight* that a stadium in central Mexico is housing a substantial portion of it.


It's just an objective fact that it exists. Why is NBC now calling it a lie for the purposes of drumming up Republican vote?",Frashizzle,e979q3k,conservative
The way the Daily Wire does their sponsorship tonight has been hilarious ,TastelessSmell,e97bgdf,conservative
"***Arizona***

McSally vs Sinema is so freaking close.

Doug Ducey is keeping his governorship.


Also I am shocked that Prop 127 is 50/50 right now. It's a ""clean energy"" mandate that if passed would amend our freaking state constitution and close our primary energy production plant, the Palo Verde nuclear station---which is cleaner, cheaper, and more efficient than literally anything else. I am completely dumbfounded.",cipher_six,e97cvsy,conservative
Why is no one talking about Georgia?!?!,nekkomori,e97d4ll,conservative
"Desantis is victorious, Gollum is conceding.",bumpy-meyers,e97fq60,conservative
"Hell yeah, Hawley flips MO",CyberBury,e97g8z0,conservative
[It went pretty much as expected.](https://i.postimg.cc/NMT94Z87/RE.jpg),MrSparkle86,e97ghlp,conservative
"Walker closing gap, now within .8",memberCP,e97h6da,conservative
"Oh hey some good news from Cali, they defeated the Rent Control Measure.",memberCP,e97hjm4,conservative
With this senate cushion I want Trump to nominate a conservative caveman for the next SCOTUS vacancy.,tja_1478,e97ingj,conservative
CRUZ PROJECTED TO WIN TX!!,Themusician67,e97cai1,conservative
"You voted yourself out of the senate during the Kavanaugh vote, Donnelly. Good riddance. 

I appreciate blue dog democrats like him and Manchin but, he can’t blame anyone but himself. ",kroatone,e976kpn,conservative
"An analyst on NBC just said ""we have enough votes in to call it - that there is not a Blue Wave in this election.""",Frashizzle,e977zfm,conservative
They've gotta deport Californians from Texas,severeneckpain,e979786,conservative
How the fuck does a veteran combat pilot lose to a lifetime politician who's literally never done anything? WTF.,Odoacer476CE,e97hkgl,conservative
"I don't really like them as a news source, but the New York Times as a really nice live update map to follow along with for house/Senate/individual states.

https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-house-elections.html",RW9GangGreenJB6,e970nrt,conservative
"Donnelly is finished

Cya ",kroatone,e975r16,conservative
Thoughts on 538 saying Cruz at 92% to win? Take as a grain of salt or how legitimate is this?,gstratton27,e976o9a,conservative
"At the very least, this isn't a blue wave.",StJohnTheSwift,e976qnp,conservative
Saw that HAWLEY was just called by polling co on Twitter...Think it might be premature but it looks like another senate flip for us hahahah,aburks41,e9772th,conservative
CNN call for Blackburn! well done TN!,yackippo,e978h1s,conservative
"As a Floridian, my butthole is clenched looking at the gubernatorial results",tmv4,e978hd7,conservative
Man Cruz losing would be incredible horrible ,RedDevil5,e978ugh,conservative
"keeping the House would have been nice, but it looks like we're going to gain a few seats in the Senate so I'll take that tradeoff!",RedDevil5,e979unq,conservative
Come on Kemp! Abrams is the wrong choice. ,GFZDW,e97atf2,conservative
"Look at it this way, sure, the Dems will use the House to play games and ""investigate"" and try to pass extreme laws. But we will still hold the Senate. While we may not get done what we want, no way we pass extreme laws the Dems push for. ",MaddSim,e97b7yy,conservative
Kansas wants a Dem as governor huh?,the-divine-comedy,e97bjn1,conservative
Man. It sure is crazy just how different the Senate and House maps are. GOP is likely to gain a couple in Senate while Dems take the House. Urban/Rural divide is growing even more.,jakewebs,e97c25q,conservative
CRAMER THAT'S IT THAT'S THE SENATE,Taygr,e97c4lh,conservative
Why isn't Florida being announced yet? it's 99% ,top-perro,e97cahj,conservative
Ted!,cadmus_irl,e97cd7j,conservative
Faith restored in my great state. Lion Ted!,DavisAg,e97cr0n,conservative
Lol get ready for gridlock folks. ,CITY_F0X,e97ghh9,conservative
I wonder how the Stock market will react tomorrow,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97glzn,conservative
Claire concedes ,RedDevil5,e97ic7l,conservative
"Fuck, look at the Texas map. So much blue on the border.

Can we we get some border control, please?

Edit: I'm not against people coming to the USA but come legally. ",GFZDW,e97ae65,conservative
"Reminder to everyone that you also voted for local officials, and while the House/Senate is important, local officials are important to **you** especially, don't forget to check in on them!",Patsrul,e970agg,conservative
Wooooo Marsha Blackburn! Take that Taylor Swift!!!!!,sydazzles,e977mbf,conservative
I'm actually super excited to see Senator Romney ,mnslice,e97bnvp,conservative
"JUST SAYING... CRUZ vs BETO RACE IS/WAS TOO CLOSE.

Don't take the *easy* races easy. We need to vote and work to get other like-minded individuals to vote, as well.

2020 is ours if we DO THE WORK. ",GFZDW,e97d74p,conservative
"If Republicans lose a lot of power, we will still not react the way the Democrats did when Trump won. We won't be blocking the highways and rioting in the streets. ",Craqqer,e972fap,conservative
"Republicans lose the house: Oh shucks, we'll get them next time.

Liberals lose the senate even further: Is this Nazi Germany? ",CITY_F0X,e97cy98,conservative
Republicans must have pissed about Kavanaugh. Every single red state Democrat who voted against Kav got smoked tonight ,GoofyUmbrella,e97gwu1,conservative
"we should be prepared, mentally and emotionally, to lose the house.",SKWM3000,e970bmj,conservative
Checking the salt levels at /r/politics brb,ltdshred,e97fbp8,conservative
CNN is already calling it a fucking wave LMAO.,steampunker13,e97g7qs,conservative
Thanks mods for this thread!,FourthEchelon19,e97046u,conservative
"538 says 60!!!!% chance republicans KEEP the HOUSE!!


aaaand back down to 42% ",aburks41,e974wcs,conservative
I know we're losing some but you can't say Conservatives didn't show up to vote. ,GFZDW,e9765k0,conservative
I know it’s a long shot but I’m really hoping republicans keep the house. ,WannabeBadGalRiri,e976c5f,conservative
They are so shocked that Florida is red still lolol,multiple4,e976njh,conservative
Has Florida started the traditional recount yet?,Watchmaker-2112,e976r0o,conservative
"Am I looking at the wrong streams or is Fox News' coverage really bad? I went back to CNN so I can actually see what is going on, even if they are Democrat.",multiple4,e976sln,conservative
"Well, things are looking better than I expected so that’s a plus. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e977snm,conservative
[deleted],,e977tnv,conservative
Five thirty eight keeps dropping the chances for Dems to hold the house ,valmeister,e9785cw,conservative
Whitmer called for Michigan. I hate my state sometimes :(,sydazzles,e9789ee,conservative
Overall not looking as bad as some had predicted. However we are getting clapped in Ohio and Pennsylvania ,surferdude28,e9789i8,conservative
ABC News projects that Republican Henry McMaster will win the gubernatorial race in South Carolina.,rob_s_458,e979j7v,conservative
Anyone else notice how nervous all the nbc talking heads sound?,Gotta_go_fast_22,e97aaxq,conservative
Fox now saying Nelson 10:1 favorite in Florida Senate... typo?,soxfan90,e97bief,conservative
"Does CNN have access to like 500,000 extra votes in MI than NYTimes, RealClear, Fox, everyone? THey have a way different tally
",pharmermummles,e97bo3d,conservative
Fox Projects Republicans keep the senate,Zyrioun,e97czvb,conservative
Apparently ABC called Texas for Cruz 10 minutes ago.,gprime,e97d8sk,conservative
Is New York still counting cemetery votes? They have like 10% reported. ,vampslayer53,e97epth,conservative
Beto-Cruz race too close for me. Texas is safe for now.,Scozzar,e97g1ll,conservative
Hawley Projected to win by Fox!,Zyrioun,e97g8oa,conservative
So how much weight did Kavanaugh actually carry? Note that the only Dem who voted for him was the only vulnerable one who won easily. ,soxfan90,e97ge8a,conservative
Nancy Pelosi is a botox nightmare. ,steampunker13,e97i2hy,conservative
Fucking hell I hate my state. ,Vrael22,e97i3t2,conservative
Lol look at Texas' border county's results and try to tell me there's not an illegal immigrant wave there. Shady shit.,mbarnar,e976tod,conservative
"Big win for Cruz and GOP in Texas, but I have a feeling this won’t be the last we see of O’Rourke. Let’s make sure this loser tastes defeat a second time!!",surferdude28,e97dm93,conservative
"texas will be fine

&#x200B;",KillaB33z,e97984n,conservative
"looks like how most people predicted - democrats narrowly take house, gop picks up some seats in the senate. 

glad to see florida stayed red in the gov race and finally kicked nelson out of the senate. ",tifuforreal,e97e2z9,conservative
"I don’t know about anyone else, but I feel much, much better about tonight. 
Senate is safe, there was no landslide democrat victory in the house. 
It’s gonna be ok. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97ewfk,conservative
Crazy how the Taylor Swift endorsement basically didn't matter. Who would have thought ,Shinglings,e97foyw,conservative
"I'm fine with a Democratic controlled House.

A Democrat House throwing out various policies and then a Republican Senate accepting/rejecting/renegotiating makes sense as a legislative business model.",Frashizzle,e97f1lg,conservative
Taylor Swift devastated lmao ,yoyowatup,e979rp8,conservative
John James is behind now :( COME ON MY DUDE,sydazzles,e97ci0e,conservative
"This idiot: https://twitter.com/Acosta/status/1060000102293651464

The GOP won 62 Seats in 2010, far outside the expected gains. Dems are literally getting right on the money for the house at 30.",memberCP,e97dos9,conservative
"With the D’s winning the House but the R’s keeping the Senate, get ready for even more calls from the Left to abolish the Senate.",HappyBelichick,e97f6xg,conservative
CBS is talking about impeachment ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97fxh1,conservative
">Ilhan Omar, first Somali-American woman in Congress

Also first representative to have married a sibling.",PubliusVA,e97g6n5,conservative
"Here’s to two absolutely insufferable years, full of Democrat led house committees and the non passage of even the most bipartisan common-sense legislation. Come on 2020",AcornToOak,e97gk4p,conservative
"I know it's only 3% of the vote, but just seeing Cox ahead in California is a nice little peace before Newsom wins and makes us the state of San Francisco. ",Kaptain_Konrad,e97hlw1,conservative
Looking good in Indiana ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9702yr,conservative
"After seeing the Republicans get wiped out last year in Virginia, I don’t have high hopes for the National races today.   Hopefully, we can stop the bleeding to the House, preserve the senate so the radical leftist legislation can be kept at bay. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e970nly,conservative
"~~Big update, Scotts down almost a 0.5 a percent... Still early.~~

30 seconds later, he's back up by inches. C'mon Scottster.",SendixBunny,e970y5r,conservative
"Why does RCP list Virginia and Vermont as ""dem hold"" in the senate races?  Looks like the Great Interuptor Tim Kaine is getting shellacked early.",LandHouston,e9715uh,conservative
"I don’t know about you guys but I’m actually feeling optimistic about these elections. It’s definitely a guarded optimism, but I feel like if Trump can win literally anything can happen (and don’t trust polls)!",sydazzles,e9719lb,conservative
"Keep an eye out for Kentucky 6th District and Virginia 7th. Those are pretty important as they are big indicators as to whether there will be a ""blue wave"" or not. We are currently losing Kentucky 6th District.",jonk012,e971h0l,conservative
"Good news! We are up by almost 7 points in Virginia 7th!

BUT..... We just lost Virginia 10th",jonk012,e971wuy,conservative
"Florida is not looking good...  Shit might be fucked brehs...  Good luck to the rest of you bros.

Edit: it's close now",goldmouthdawg,e972jz6,conservative
"Barr making a comeback in KY...thank you god lol

Only down 600 votes with 70% reporting",aburks41,e9733s2,conservative
"Wait, Massachusetts Gov is going R?? Did I miss something, was that projected??",lion27,e974ckp,conservative
538 House needle just swung from <80% Dem chance to basically 50/50,SouthernTrumpVet,e974r07,conservative
"Florida is so close, holy cow ",i_floop_the_pig,e9750bq,conservative
DeSantis YOU PULL THIS OFF! ,GFZDW,e975uzv,conservative
Shout out to the Puerto Ricans who came out for DeSantis,Ritter97,e9762oe,conservative
Cruz up 50-49.4,TastelessSmell,e97683n,conservative
Who else is drunk?,justific4tion,e976cwc,conservative
Looks like Rick Scott is going to win Florida,WannabeBadGalRiri,e976zus,conservative
In shock over Texas,the-divine-comedy,e978nvc,conservative
wtf is going on?,justific4tion,e979ymr,conservative
CRUZ BACK ON TOP BITCHES,KillaB33z,e97a21d,conservative
"A lot of good Republicans are losing tonight. I like Scott Taylor, Carlos Cuberlo, and Mike Coffman. Oh well.",RedDevil5,e97bdt4,conservative
It's hard to watch NBC and think they're unbiased.,jamesmir89,e97c117,conservative
NBC Senate to Republicans.,memberCP,e97d34e,conservative
I know we still think of Ohio as a swing state but I'd say its almost a Lean Republican now,Taygr,e97ewhg,conservative
Ohio picks DeWine for Gov but keeps Brown for Senate. I've never met anybody in real life or on social media that loves a Republican Governor but believes in a Democratic Senator or vice versa. Who the hell votes like that? ,tiger81775149,e97f0ql,conservative
Come the fuck on Montana.,steampunker13,e97f37j,conservative
Gianforte is down. Guess they’re pissed he body slammed a reporter ,GoofyUmbrella,e97fmok,conservative
Man if Renacci hadn't quit on his race the GOP could've won in Ohio.,RedDevil5,e97gef1,conservative
"Any updates on Walker?

I think there's going to be a recount at this rate. He's under performing in some countries from 2016.",-Wiscompton-,e97gfhu,conservative
Pelosi makes my skin crawl ,i_floop_the_pig,e97j52o,conservative
Abrams won't concede even though she clearly lost. Something tells me that this will lead to the biggest dem tantrum out of all the races this year.,Nora_Durst,e980369,conservative
">Let's be honest. No Blue wave. Sadly, republicans will continue voting for the R , regardless of all the shit their party pulls off.  
>  
>*- Random* r/politics user",mikecx79,e97bzkq,conservative
I love my state. Thank you Florida,TruthfulSarcasm,e97gi6x,conservative
"Brown up 10 points in Oregon. I fucking hate Portland. I fucking hate the Willamette Valley. It's time for the State of Jefferson!


.....i'm more pissed about this than the house..",Zyrioun,e97gruv,conservative
This would be totally different if 25+ incumbents didn't retire and Paul Ryan got out of the way.,Dorian_v25,e97lh6j,conservative
"I just don't understand the people that see a thriving economy, record employment, and an effective push to reduce illegal immigration and think, ""no, I don't like this.""  If these people make up the popular vote the country is fucked.  Might as well go our separate ways and form 2 countries.",justific4tion,e97bqv9,conservative
HAHAHAHAHA BETO LOST,top-perro,e97dq4m,conservative
"The Left has already lost tonight. Regardless of if they take a narrow majority or not, they've underperformed. There was no 'blue wave.' They, again, overlooked the silent majority. They'd better abandon this hysterical, political correctness, intersectional, identify politics bullshit they've been pulling for the last decade. ",CandidLanguage,e97atcp,conservative
"Jake Tapper: The math really favors the republicans

NYT Headline Tomorrow: Is Math Racist?",severeneckpain,e978ng5,conservative
"Two elections in a row where democrats had unrealistic expectations of a blow out win due to liberal media bias. Two elections now where voters clearly show they like Trump more than polls indicate and liberal media talking about who to blame and where they went wrong. I hope that Dems learn nothing and chose Elizabeth ""Hillary 2.0"" Warren in 2020.",TheOneAboveAll,e97fjsw,conservative
"If we lose the House, I dont think Trump should change much. I do think he should tone SOME of what he says down a bit, but hes been great recently.  I still cant understand Florida. How on earth could so many want an income tax? Seriously, why in Gods name would anyone want an income tax when you havent had one? ""Sure, take more of my money that I earn...""  WHO THE HELL SAYS THAT?!",MaddSim,e975fxu,conservative
Honestly at this rate House < Senate. House may try to do shit but not much they can do with the Senate still red.,14thAndVine,e97d8g0,conservative
There we go keeping that Florida Republican streak,Taygr,e97fj2q,conservative
Lets go Indiana!,Zac1245,e97062e,conservative
I don’t have high hopes. Hopefully we can hold them off a little and not get completely fucked in the ass like democrats did in 2014,alaskancoloradan,e970rpw,conservative
Are any of the good Conservative youtubers live tonight? Trying to find someone more entertaining to watch than fox. ,L3thalGho5t,e972hlm,conservative
Cruz vs Beto is tied ,i_floop_the_pig,e975n0p,conservative
Why is that crazy SJW winning the MI Governor race? Michigan has been turning around since they dumped Jennifer Granholm from the Governor's mansion.,Highenergyperson,e975vyo,conservative
[No nutt November getting difficult.](https://twitter.com/NumbersMuncher/status/1059979491374718981),memberCP,e9761jr,conservative
"I want you all to know they this election is a true toss up.

My district, for instance (NY19), was put in the ""lean democrat"" column by the smarties that never visited upstate NY. 

We've had Republican reps since 2010, and a shitty little poll of 300 sample size last week had the dem up by +2 (and a margin of error of 5). Thus, the ""lean dem"" forecast. It's ballocks.

I think my district will stay red. May be wrong though!",from_gondolin,e976do5,conservative
"Not a huge surprise, but NBC already calling Pritzker for Illinois. So the one defense we had against Madigan is gone.",rob_s_458,e976pxz,conservative
"One thing I cant stand about NYT is they jump the gun on calling blue seats and hesitate to call red seats.

They've called Mendez which is a virtual tie right now in NJ but havent called Braun which has already been  called by ABC lol",mbarnar,e977dep,conservative
If Scott Walker doesn’t win Wisconsin I’m going to flip shit. ,blameitonthetetons1,e977dys,conservative
MARSHA!!! LETS GOOO,aburks41,e977l1e,conservative
Barr called by ABC,Taygr,e977tx0,conservative
I'm still really nervous on Rick Scott. Those lower counties have so many people and only about a 60k vote advantage,multiple4,e977uqi,conservative
Fivethirtyeight looking better and better for us. ,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e97833e,conservative
HOLY COW REPUBLICANS WON TENNESSEE ,top-perro,e978upc,conservative
Worried about Texas...,WannabeBadGalRiri,e979696,conservative
I really hope Hawley pulls this out.,ponmbr,e979nzq,conservative
Did Jared Polis really win? Fuck I hate that guy ,_JackieBoy_,e97a9ek,conservative
Mike Braun looks a terrifying lot like Bernie Sanders.,14thAndVine,e97bcy5,conservative
Utah has colluded with RuSsIa!!! ,tiger81775149,e97bzpx,conservative
Romney 2: Electric Boogaloo,CITY_F0X,e97c4j8,conservative
"Come on, Texas... ",GFZDW,e97c6qs,conservative
MSNBC projecting Cruz,DL-Refugee,e97cghw,conservative
Exactly where has these lost seats come from? All the blue places on the map seems as though they would have been blue anyway.,vampslayer53,e97dvtt,conservative
30% in and GOP candidate is winning CT-Gov race by 8%,RedDevil5,e97e0h4,conservative
Montana was a pipe dream I guess.,the-divine-comedy,e97fpky,conservative
"ABC just brought up an interesting point. With the Dems control of the house, it's going to be investigations galore. This is officially the end of Trump's wall since a law needs to go through both houses of congress, and the Dems will immediately shut it down. 

&#x200B;

But on the bright side....we still have control of the Senate, which means we could still appoint Supreme Court justices.",jonk012,e97fr59,conservative
Let's go Oregon ,kshebdhdbr,e97g32m,conservative
Hawley wins MO!,justhere2havefun,e97g6qm,conservative
So does Juan Williams  make sense to anyone. Or does he just keep talking nonsense on fox. Just curious of other opinions. ,godzillaeatsasians,e97gml1,conservative
"3% margin in WV, damn man. If Jenkins had won the GOP primary we'd have won that too.",RedDevil5,e97gntd,conservative
Walker now within 0.1%...yikes!,CarbineGuy,e97hx5f,conservative
"CNN has retracted it's call for Londrigan. Davis up almost 5,000 votes and 2 percentage points with 95% reporting. I think that's my cue to go to bed.",rob_s_458,e97icw3,conservative
Fuck yeah another senate seat all wrapped up,Taygr,e97ide3,conservative
"All right, i'm going to call it a night,guys. Overall, i'm pretty happy with the results. ",jonk012,e97ikof,conservative
"I like Rick Scott and all,but his attempt at speaking Spanish was painful to listen to.",14thAndVine,e97j42j,conservative
"FOX CALLS FLORIDA

FOX CALLS FLORIDA

FOX CALLS FLORIDA",soxfan90,e97jkx2,conservative
I'm watching TYT and the Daily Wire side by side. I highly recommend it.,Aech1274,e97l1hi,conservative
So... was this a blue wave?,GoofyUmbrella,e97ln7s,conservative
Every update in MT Rosendale chips away a few thousand votes.,tja_1478,e97m2x0,conservative
"All that beta money, down the shitter",Dogfacedgod88,e97dqbl,conservative
"Dems are gonna act like the House Majority is the ""Blue Wave"" but this was not the win they thought it would be. ",steampunker13,e97fwf6,conservative
"Ehh, Manchin ain’t *horrible* since he sided with Kavanaugh ",i_floop_the_pig,e977x4w,conservative
Democratic Texans make me sad. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97831t,conservative
"It appears we will sadly gonna lose the house, but we will control the Senate. Blue wave my ass. ",darkknight915,e97bz50,conservative
I guess marijuana legalization can be passed?,justific4tion,e97dmqr,conservative
We flipped the Ohio governor seat,tja_1478,e97fv3q,conservative
I can’t take Lester Holt seriously. I keep waiting on him to tell me about a murder mystery ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97gjiy,conservative
Texas flipping blue is NOT good for 2020. ,AMollenhauer,e978rj6,conservative
Another 6 years of that insufferable cunt Chris Murphy. I knew it was going to happen and yet I am still disappointed.,severeneckpain,e973mrq,conservative
I mean Democrats getting the house it was pretty much expected.  I just hope that bitch Pelosi isn't appointed speaker.,Taygr,e97d1ju,conservative
What race are you folks watching that you think will determine the house? Which one is your canary in the coal mine? I'm watching PA 16 very carefully.,Snicsnipe,e970gqz,conservative
Let’s see if Florida man pulled through!,AyyyGreens,e971ajy,conservative
Does it concern anyone else that Fox News is saying 50% probability for the Senate?,CyberBury,e971trw,conservative
"[ElectionBettingOdds.com](https://electionbettingodds.com/) is a good resource. Numbers are based on betting markets, which did well in 2016.

Current numbers are 91% R senate (good numbers in IN and FL so far) and 82% D House (mostly based on exit polls and early returns, I'd guess).",oren0,e972jaf,conservative
"Woah comstock got smoked in VA10. 

I’m not shocked. NoVA is a liberal hotbed. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e972m0c,conservative
"Florida looks gone. Schweikart was pretty stubborn about Rs keeping the house. 

Not looking good for that at all. ",adeezy58,e972v1u,conservative
"Barr making a comeback, Brat is doing well with about 50-60% reporting! ",latotokyo123,e973akz,conservative
All tied in Florida,RigsbyQuist,e9748hg,conservative
I gotta think they declare Braun elected soon,Taygr,e974bzr,conservative
How the hell is Texas leaning blue?,KillaB33z,e974jt0,conservative
"Definitely wound up being a referendum on Trump, by early looks. ",GFZDW,e974pd0,conservative
Wow! Scott is actually beating Nelson with 70% Who would've thought,jonk012,e974yu7,conservative
James is up early in Michigan... don't want to get excited now but it's a good sign.,lamall,e9765y4,conservative
I’m traveling right now... how’s it loook for the red team?? ,foodVSfood,e9766uc,conservative
"For those of us who were on the verge of breaking NNN due to 538's House forecast swinging wildly, they've clarified:

>You may have noticed that our real-time forecast has moved toward Republicans in the House. It’s being too aggressive, in my opinion. The model sees that a bunch of “likely Republican” districts (particularly in Florida) are now 100 percent likely to go red. But there hasn’t been the chance for Democrats to clinch many equivalent likely Democratic districts.

",SouthernTrumpVet,e9768q1,conservative
Man watching ABC what the hell did Meghan McCain like eat her way out of the Republican party,Taygr,e976c3u,conservative
I dont care for trump but... this sure as fuck owns the libs.,memberCP,e976efw,conservative
#Not time to celebrate yet ,sleepyradio182,e9784ni,conservative
**DESANTIS CALLED** https://twitter.com/henryolsenEPPC/status/1059989027896492034,aburks41,e978ax0,conservative
"Why is everyone freaking out about Texas? Yes it’s close, but it’s not a huge blowout. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e978hfe,conservative
[deleted],,e978r3j,conservative
Oh not this guy on CNN,multiple4,e978y42,conservative
We need a discord channel,DrudgeBreitbart,e9791o2,conservative
Did NBC actually call the house?,justific4tion,e979j37,conservative
Fox Projects Dems take House.,Zyrioun,e979pte,conservative
Oh good god I can't do this.  Now Beto is up 49.9-49.  Closing the gap a little.,TastelessSmell,e979rgn,conservative
My big question: When will Florida be called?,soxfan90,e97a274,conservative
"The Ohio senate election actually is pretty close given Brown was almost guaranteed to win, only a 4 point lead",Taygr,e97az7w,conservative
Dems win KS Govenor... yikes.,memberCP,e97bg59,conservative
The Florida Keys strong on healthcare and immigration... no shit ,GFZDW,e97caio,conservative
seeing Montana blue is weird to me,KillaB33z,e97cdok,conservative
Looks like Cordray is gonna go down. A good result in Ohio.,longroadtohappyness,e97cnd4,conservative
NYT reporting Roskam lost IL-6. ,rob_s_458,e97e0mz,conservative
"Checking in from Wisconsin, I'm so disappointed that Baldwin is going to be re-elected. She hasn't done ANYTHING besides letting veterans be overprescribed opioids. 

At this point it's too early to tell if Gov. Walker is gonna win, but we are seeing lots of smaller elections lean Republican. Will be interesting to see how governor's race turns out.",WagonWheel22,e97euj4,conservative
So does the win in Senate compare to a potential loss in house? Like would one be a bigger deal at controlling than the other?,_PersonGuy_,e97fpsj,conservative
Come on Hawley!,justhere2havefun,e97fzkh,conservative
CBS is so bad at this ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97gcj9,conservative
Fucking Connecticut (my home state) is so fucking slow with reporting. ,severeneckpain,e97ged2,conservative
C’mon Arizona,bumpy-meyers,e97gh9e,conservative
"Proposition B in Missouri passed overwhelmingly so now our minimum wage is going to get jacked up over the next few years.  Our CEO of my company I work for has already said we're going to be closing stores that aren't doing so great but were kept open to keep people employed, as well as never opening another store in the state and focusing on adding more stores in Texas.",ponmbr,e97hv2n,conservative
"Holy frack Cox is leading in CA with 3% in. Not expecting it to last I fear once SF and LA are counted.

ETA: And now at 5% there it went... POOF",Terra_green2,e97i0b2,conservative
"Idk how ABC has called California governor, vote is 50/50 right now",Taygr,e97i63d,conservative
Fox called FLA for Scott!,bumpy-meyers,e97jkzq,conservative
Dino Rossi losing an open seat in a Republican district is a shame. They need to pick a new face for the party here. He clearly can't win. ,XxSMCxX1587,e97jmq4,conservative
Let’s go Walker!!,blameitonthetetons1,e97kiwt,conservative
These AZ returns are brutally slow.,tja_1478,e97kme0,conservative
who's more impressive? Scott Walker or Rick Scott?,RedDevil5,e97ktfv,conservative
"If Dems win the house, it’s ultimately a reminder that evil often has its day. Make it a short two years and put that party in the garbage where it belongs in 2020. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e97ab64,conservative
I just like the fact that no matter the outcome my party isn’t gonna lose our shit ,ben1234321,e97epmh,conservative
"Remember, in the Senate if we win Indiana, Missouri, and Tennesee, there is literally no way the Democrats can win. ",jonk012,e97321z,conservative
[This is the midterms the Dems hath wrought](https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DrXXZIXWwAAkXGu.jpg),aCreditGuru,e978125,conservative
"Is Cruz that unlikable? Sheeit

",GFZDW,e9786xs,conservative
"3% of Texaz has reported. Chillax.

Thered an error in 538's number input.",RoundSimbacca,e979cpi,conservative
Come on Florida. Every time with this shit. If we have another recount...,why-this,e97dpro,conservative
lol mitt romney winning by just single digits in utah...,tifuforreal,e97ea7s,conservative
How the fuck did Cortez win?!? She says crazier shit than sanders ,snizwizard88,e97g1fh,conservative
"Oh ffs this guy and his ""New Democratic Party"" lmao ""younger, more brown, more women, more veterans"" this guyyyy like who gives a shit. Are we not at the point in America where we can just realize that all that stuff is normal now? And now he is arguing that we all knew we would win this many Senate seats lololllll we rekt them in the Senate",multiple4,e97g6tx,conservative
"NYT is calling NJ for Menendez.  With 15% reporting and <1000 votes between him and Hugin.  What the hell are they smoking?  Oh, right, Marxism.

Edit: And now Menendez is up to an actual lead.  Dammit, New Jersey.  What's wrong with that state?",Jackoffalltrades89,e9773zn,conservative
[removed],,e97bdlk,conservative
"I dont get the public, never will. But it seems every mid terms, the party that doesnt hold President does well in some form. Its just weird. Anyhow, yeah, media will spin this as some HUGE victory for Dems but its just the norm. And they didnt do as well as they hoped. And they know it.",MaddSim,e97e2rq,conservative
I was posting all over r/politics and they blocked me. They sour about cruz go do Reagan's work and post on there for me!,HurricanePaulHarvey,e97cqc4,conservative
I think this is a minor victory for republicans. We held Texas and lost the house which we were supposed to do anyways. We held the line ,_JackieBoy_,e97gzgl,conservative
Oh fuck me my tax dollars are going to keep funding abortion aren't they,Vrael22,e97ga2z,conservative
"How is California a key state? It's always the same. Even though i ""painted the town red."" If you catch my drift.",Kaptain_Konrad,e972n0k,conservative
Texas is going blue because all of the Californians who moved there..and it will turn into California. ,AMollenhauer,e974rsi,conservative
HOLY COW Florida 93% red?? Is this fake news?,top-perro,e975974,conservative
"Nearly every state across the country, major cities go blue. I just cant wrap my head around why. I wish the GOP could figure out why and make an effort to change it but maybe its hopeless. What is it with cities and damn love affair with Dems?",MaddSim,e9760sg,conservative
NBC has called the house for Democrats with at least 33 seats.,the-divine-comedy,e978v8c,conservative
"My state is predicted to have Kaine keep his Senate seat. 

Damn DC suburbs skew everything. ",caldera599,e97aw2b,conservative
"Earlier this year, Rick Scott ran an ad, titled “Quien Es Bill Nelson,” suggesting that Nelson had failed to engage with the Hispanic community in Florida. And the exit polls in Florida seem to support that view. Nelson is now +11 among Hispanics, which trails Hillary Clinton’s margin with Latino voters in the state from 2016.",rob_s_458,e97fd3t,conservative
Bye bye Gillum!,steampunker13,e97fere,conservative
Walker just fucking wins like it's no one's business.,tja_1478,e97kof3,conservative
"Oh I missed this, Republicans Flipped the OH Governors Mansion. Sweet.",memberCP,e97gn4m,conservative
Looking good friends! Can't wait for the REEEEEEEEEEEE's from the lunatics on the left from not winning the Senate.,MrSparkle86,e97eb2q,conservative
Is it safe to call it for the house if we lose Pennsylvania 1st? Or are there other districts just as important as that one?,jonk012,e972dba,conservative
Manchin beating Morissey by 22. But less than 1% reporting....,jonk012,e972lmw,conservative
All these districts making my head spin tbh,severeneckpain,e972ne4,conservative
Barr only down 20 votes with 74% now...come on Kentucky!!!!,aburks41,e9738if,conservative
I hope that Brown loses to Renacci tonight ,Shinglings,e974dcz,conservative
Where are you guys seeing these percentages from 538? Can I get a link?,colinpail,e9760kx,conservative
"I'm pretty confused about FL right now. How much is reporting? Is it 93% or 79%
",pharmermummles,e9765j2,conservative
"Feelings on Beto-Cruz? As a Texan, really looking for more info and can't find the info I'm looking for. What are you guys thinking and what are you seeing?",gstratton27,e976e47,conservative
W@ooooo get fucked Donnelly!,justific4tion,e976hsf,conservative
Relieved to see Barr win.,CyberBury,e976kja,conservative
"Just to look at how polarized politics are in this country, there are 74 House races that close at 9 PM ET. Of those, FiveThirtyEight estimates that 47 have a greater than 99% chance of going one way or the other.",rob_s_458,e9778nj,conservative
Let’s go TN!,i_floop_the_pig,e977m6p,conservative
Where are you guys getting the 2% for Texas? My dad is saying that it is at 50%. ,steampunker13,e977t96,conservative
"""You were saying you disagree""

""Well no—I—do not agree""

This guy is so ignorant lmao then goes on to act like the Democrat party wasn't running anti-Trump",multiple4,e9796f8,conservative
"This is going to be a gross two years, ugh",mnslice,e979qxp,conservative
How the hell is Beto beating Cruz?  Dude floats from job to job and now he's going to be a Senator?,RageCage05,e979r64,conservative
"THE NEEDLE

https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-house-forecast.html?smid=tw-nytpolitics&smtyp=cur",memberCP,e97aimy,conservative
Colin Peterson's district was one I thought was not being talked about enough. He barely won in 16 and Trump won the district by like 30 points.,RedDevil5,e97bicm,conservative
"Any ideas for the dem house majority? Seems like +30 from most outlets, what do people think?",the_tragic_wagon,e97bxeq,conservative
Tennessee called for Blackburn,CyberBury,e97c3ep,conservative
"NY-11 is a district that needs to go right back for GOP in 2020. Trump is still popular there, apparently Dan Donovan is not. ",RedDevil5,e97c3z9,conservative
North Dakota - Repub Senate Kevin Cramer called to win,DL-Refugee,e97c825,conservative
And now I think my house district will fall to the pro-abort witch. ,caldera599,e97cu2d,conservative
republicans will hold senate per MSNBC,DL-Refugee,e97d61j,conservative
[NBC calling Ohio Governor for DeWine](https://twitter.com/NBCPolitics/status/1060014928793362432),Shinglings,e97eshz,conservative
[Chabot wins reelection for Ohio 1](https://twitter.com/NRCC/status/1060013877512036353),Shinglings,e97f346,conservative
"YES! Davis just took the lead in IL-13. Only 700 votes, but Londrigan had such a big lead before any precincts reported (I'm assuming that was early votes) that it makes me breathe a little easier. At least we can keep downstate red.",rob_s_458,e97fa89,conservative
Steve King may be going down in Iowa.,memberCP,e97fogg,conservative
floridamen to the rescue!,BowsahTheAlmighty,e97fvst,conservative
https://twitter.com/LPDonovan/status/1060021043040059393,memberCP,e97ghbj,conservative
Not looking good for Walker. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97gp57,conservative
"Reynolds has pulled ahead in Iowa. All that's left is rural counties, so it's likely that she wins.",14thAndVine,e97ja1e,conservative
Rick Scott omg,Taygr,e97jlw0,conservative
"So the Dems are apparently gonna take the House.

Was hoping the Reps would keep it to prevent a lock up of the government (the House Dems will inevitably use their majority to heckle the hell out Trump), but the senate gained 2+ in favor of Reps. 

At the very least, another Kavanaugh debacle seems unlikely (at least, in terms of seriously threatening the nominee).

Most disappointment is that I won’t get to mine any salt, seeing as most Liberals kind of expected the senate to stay Red; only the House was more unpredictable.",Bigbluebuttonman,e97k02e,conservative
[deleted],,e97kcgv,conservative
"I’m honestly not worried about Rosendale. Tester voted against Kavanaugh. From what we’ve already seen tonight, I don’t think Tester has a shot",GoofyUmbrella,e97l8t3,conservative
Does Montana have a chance to flip? ,latotokyo123,e97lgc4,conservative
"Apparently 45K votes not counted yet from Milwaukee. If true, Walker is likely done.",pharmermummles,e97n5g9,conservative
So why did Pence say they might keep the house? Were the internal polling wrong?,Terra_green2,e97ngl2,conservative
"Holy shit. My mom came into my room to bring me a plate of chicken nuggets and I literally screamed at her and hit the plate of chicken nuggets out of her hand. She started yelling and swearing at me and I slammed the door on her. I'm so distressed right now I don't know what to do. I didn't mean to do that to my mom but I'm literally in shock from the results tonight. I feel like I'm going to explode. Why the fucking fuck are they losing? This can't be happening. I'm having a fucking breakdown. I don't want to believe the world is so corrupt. I want a future to believe in. I want a blue wave to fix this broken country. I cannot fucking deal with this right now. It wasn't supposed to be like this, I thought we were polling well in Florida???? This is so fucked.",Marcheesio,e97982m,conservative
95% negative coverage is a tough hill to climb twice,TedyCruz,e970o76,conservative
[deleted],,e977fis,conservative
Not trying to be negative but I'm still positive Republicans aren't going to do so well,top-perro,e972zk8,conservative
"538: 60% republicans keep house now

This can’t be real life. It can’t. This is just too amazing. There HAS to be leftist bias in these polls somehow ",kroatone,e975v47,conservative
Is everyone taking Fox’s projection that seriously? Not sure who to believe at this point ,KnightofFaith26,e979ukz,conservative
"Pensylvania's 1st District is literally the definition of a last stand. Once that district falls, it's all over.",jonk012,e97dagl,conservative
"Dems pick up the Colorado State Senate, so they now have both chambers and the governorship. Get out now.",rob_s_458,e97epl6,conservative
"So, house is probably gone. I just hope we keep it close enough that Pelosi doesn't get the speakership",sendintheshermans,e97dhjk,conservative
"Not looking good. I wish Trump had come out strong on economy and unemployment instead of immigration. There's not been enough done on a substantial border wall to politic on that.

Florida looks to be a complete loss and some key seats have gone the other way. ",GFZDW,e973rcm,conservative
Cmon Scott we need you. Florida is a nail biter ,surferdude28,e9749dl,conservative
lots of dems unseating repubs in the house: 11 seats gained so far. 95% chance of dem control of house,DL-Refugee,e97bus5,conservative
full control would’ve been awesome but I guess this’ll do for now ,ben1234321,e97f74q,conservative
Expanded school voucher program (prop 305) voted down in AZ,AcornToOak,e97gvif,conservative
Is Florida senate going to be called tonight?,VJManna1123,e97hmli,conservative
"More evidence that CNN is fake news: called IL-13 for Londrigan about an hour ago. Now they've shaded it red but if you hover over it, it still says Londrigan projected winner. NYT and AP projecting Davis",rob_s_458,e97hz7l,conservative
The media is the enemy of the people.  With this narrow victory does anyone think it wasn't due to the 90%+ negative coverage of Trump?,justific4tion,e97d493,conservative
"While it's looking better in other area's, Cruz behind by 2-3 points in texas with 61% reporting ?!?! Wtf texas?",Zyrioun,e978lj7,conservative
"Blue wave
https://static.tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pub/images/kotex_blue_liquid_5940.jpg",TheShakinBacon,e978qbc,conservative
"any links to livestream coverage

&#x200B;",mwood281,e973b38,conservative
Fox news has it 76% for Dems to take the house sadly. As long as they don't get a super majority things should be ok. ,valmeister,e9741rf,conservative
Man Florida is going to be a nail biter. Again.,lion27,e974o5p,conservative
Dems picked up Florida-27,YanksSensBills,e974ttv,conservative
Back up to a 1/3 for the republicans in the house. Still hoping the red votes come in.,xJownage,e975vk1,conservative
There we go Braun,Taygr,e9767wq,conservative
Fuck....Texas don't do this to me,yackippo,e976h5o,conservative
where are you guys getting your live results from? CNN keeps saying Beto is leading but others are saying Cruz is leading,top-perro,e976hmh,conservative
If Beto wins....,AMollenhauer,e976kid,conservative
DeWine currently holding serve with Cordray ,Shinglings,e976rvc,conservative
Looks like Fl-26 and VA-7 are going to flip. Blue wave is still on the menu :(,mkgandkembafan,e976u5p,conservative
So glad Heitkamp looks gooooone. ,GFZDW,e977dz4,conservative
"I can’t stand Tammy Baldwin! Wtf Wisconsin?! I wasn’t expecting differently but how did WI go for Johnson, Trump, and Walker and can’t take Baldwin’s of all peoples seat. ",blameitonthetetons1,e977l6p,conservative
Fox reports Dems win House control as expected.,Refresher,e979npl,conservative
KS Seat Lost.,memberCP,e97b4yz,conservative
I'm still shocked by FL on the Gov and Senate races.  GA Gov as well....,TastelessSmell,e97bfgp,conservative
Come on Montana ,kshebdhdbr,e97bz5f,conservative
Can we win MO and MT too? I would trade the House for so many gains.,RedDevil5,e97c7w1,conservative
Is there even a chance we hold the house?,dontcuckmefgt,e97cdd0,conservative
"I'm officially worried about IL-13. Davis down 10,000 votes with nearly 50% reporting",rob_s_458,e97chtu,conservative
[deleted],,e97dakg,conservative
"Is there any way Republicans can retain the house? Sorry if that sounds stupid, my first midterm!",jacobwilliamhillard,e97evh0,conservative
"Davis has cut the lead to only 5,000 in IL-13. It's going to be a pants-shitter. 2 rural counties still to report. Champaign Co about 60% in but that's still a lot of votes. Depends on whether the remaining precincts are U of I students or townies.",rob_s_458,e97f13u,conservative
"Nicole Wallace is the most biased person I've ever seen on national TV, ever.


And her title is ""political analyst"" with NBC. ",Frashizzle,e97fa6m,conservative
Add NY-22 as another GOP target immediately for 2020.,RedDevil5,e97fi7a,conservative
Here comes the West ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97frdu,conservative
"Why was this thread unpinned?

Iowa governor race is pretty close. ",14thAndVine,e97hy4w,conservative
I quit F5ing after the House was decided. What’s the final Senate tally?,kroatone,e97j9vs,conservative
"Still so mad about WV and OH. Renacci fucking quit on his race. Someone running a serious race would have won. 

And Morissey just wasn't a great fir for his state (moved from NJ, lives in the most Dem part of the state), but he came so damn close. Damn.",RedDevil5,e97jgvg,conservative
"Today went down pretty much exactly how i thought it would, except I called Beto winning. It's not a great day, but it could of been so much worse. ",cheesecake-gnome,e97jrdn,conservative
Steve King winds up hanging on after all,Taygr,e97k0r2,conservative
"https://twitter.com/SeanTrende/status/1060035111129890816

""Tester is in trouble.  I'd say he wins, but @LPDonovan and I were not crazy.  It should be close.""",RedDevil5,e97kba7,conservative
Not seeing where Evers can pick up more votes,tja_1478,e97lseg,conservative
"If the NY Republicans had vetted Cortez's opponent properly they could've promoted them and attacked Cortez and socialism with much more veracity. They blew a chance in NY.

And we know that Republicans don't want to kill people with health care legislation but they need to state that much more clearly while slamming the cost and regulation of the ACA. I've heard estimates of 30K to 3 million have severe pre existing conditions. They haven't learned to deal with highly emotional protestors frequently treating them a protected class. Should the other other 300 million have to suffer by engaging in a plan that will give them extreme cost and the pre existing condition of bankruptcy?",postonrddt,e97s17y,conservative
Several house seats not looking good. KY going to flip. It does look like blue wave in the house is building.,the-divine-comedy,e971mig,conservative
"I would accept a Ted loss if he becomes Attorney General. And we take Michigan, Florida, Indiana, North Dakota, Montana and Missouri. ",latotokyo123,e978ax5,conservative
Hopefully over the next two years there can bipartisan effort to pass bills. ,Fire2box,e97h44l,conservative
Seeing all these pics really makes you realize how physically unattractive all these Democratic women are,Taygr,e97geej,conservative
They were not happy with me voting Hawley in politic’s thread for Missouri ,i_floop_the_pig,e9713qc,conservative
Scott is back up...,lamall,e973yph,conservative
YES DONNELLY WAY DOWN,Taygr,e97421j,conservative
It's a coin flip in the house!!! Holy shit.,JustAnotherJon,e974n0l,conservative
"Reps +1 in the senate right now, nice!",i_floop_the_pig,e978ink,conservative
wow Morissey made it really close with Manchin. Too bad he couldn't pull it off.,RedDevil5,e97bwrf,conservative
"So super early thoughts, will we take back the house in 2020 when trump wins reelection?",xJownage,e97g1vr,conservative
"Holy hell, Cruz is losing...",MaddSim,e977mw6,conservative
"Beto is ahead, votes are 70% complete",top-perro,e97949v,conservative
"Dems have the house? 

 Nice job America.  Do me a favor and shove off. ",caldera599,e97bck0,conservative
How do media outlets call a winner with less than 1% of the precincts reporting?,Lodingi,e97467n,conservative
Is texas going blue for O'Rouke?,Kaptain_Konrad,e974hxk,conservative
Is anyone else looking at Ohio? Brown is only up 4 according to the nytimes. Far less than was projected.,sendintheshermans,e97br7v,conservative
"In my wonderful state of Nebraska, our incumbent Republican governor won, the incumbent Republican senator won, and all 3 house seats will likely stay red. This was a good day.",14thAndVine,e97jjg2,conservative
"Aaaand, it appears we're going to lose Florida 27th as well. Virginia 10th and Florida 27th were vital for republicans to have a chance to retake the House. Oh well....",jonk012,e973uyc,conservative
I Can’t believe republicans lost the house... so disappointed ,agoss1,e97auy6,conservative
I will say it again. There is no way tonight happens the way it does without there being some flat out fuckery on the part of the democrat party.,Odoacer476CE,e97l0qu,conservative
If Reagan was running today he wouldn't have even gotten the Republican nomination for Senator.,MyNewAccount962,e976qx7,conservative
"Georgia Governor election Kemp is winning. I am glad I pulled all my money on Stacey
",oldforstocks,e972czw,conservative
Was Comstock one that was already written off or a tossup?,Enzo_SAWFT,e972ugt,conservative
Hey guys is CNN accurate? Their reports are conflicting with Google and NYT,top-perro,e974qwy,conservative
"FYI for those that don’t know. Polls don’t give perfect values. A poll gives an expected value. With that expected value, it’s reports a margin of error (let’s say 3%) that generally gives a 95% chance of that expected value being within 3% of the actual value. Stuff like sample size and better demographic sampling reduces this range. TLDR: polls are an estimate, so in a state like Florida for example, even though the polls showed D, the GOP still had a high probability (but less than 50% of winning).",YanksSensBills,e975lhw,conservative
We will win ,Coleman0003,e975oqm,conservative
Great job Indiana! Let's keep it going!,Xcrunner_1009,e976d02,conservative
"The fact that  Abby Finkenauer's campaign slogan wasn't ""Don't stink. Fink.""  is the real disappointment of the left this election. ",KillaB33z,e977oni,conservative
Major miss in WV. If Jenkins had won the primary he would have won. Too bad.,RedDevil5,e9784qb,conservative
"If Beto wins, imagine the red wave next election for whatever republican runs against him ",alaskancoloradan,e978iow,conservative
FNC projects Democrats win the House,DrudgeBreitbart,e979mfi,conservative
"&#x200B;

any updates on Texas? I can't watch TV coverage, its too stressful.",DL-Refugee,e979ujw,conservative
any new update on TX?,DL-Refugee,e97aj6x,conservative
Was away for about 30 minutes. How’s it going? ,latotokyo123,e97boqd,conservative
Connecticut governor race is looking pretty good on the Republican side so far,Taygr,e97c8z5,conservative
Noem up by 3 in SD for Governor,TipoBajito,e97eraw,conservative
Va.7 that's a close race.,Kaptain_Konrad,e97fdmg,conservative
https://twitter.com/henryolsenEPPC/status/1060015269433663489,memberCP,e97fj1b,conservative
"Well the good news is there are some House seats that the GOP will get to work on tomorrow (NY ones, the one in OK, etc.). House was definitely not very pretty but let's be real: I'm willing to bet most Dems are not fully satisfied with tonight.",RedDevil5,e97jwh1,conservative
We might pick up a governor in CT,tja_1478,e97l662,conservative
Any updates on what is going on in NV?,pharmermummles,e97m4yf,conservative
"Why are you guys happy that it wasn't a 'blowout' in the House?? I'm sorry, but that's loser mentality if I ever seen it... I would have rather gone for the win and get the border wall",ltdshred,e97g8j3,conservative
How is a tyranny winning a governors race right now? ,iwasthebeaver,e970wi7,conservative
CRUZ NOT ON TOP ANYMORE,KillaB33z,e97a8am,conservative
[deleted],,e97eevj,conservative
Is CNN accurate guys? ,top-perro,e9748z5,conservative
fuckkkk there goes the house ,aburks41,e979lqr,conservative
Fox News projects that Dems will win the house :(,CyberBury,e979mu0,conservative
I'm fucking pissed about ohio issue 1 being turned down.,Astro4545,e97cr2o,conservative
There's some serious chicanery going on. That's all I have to say.,Odoacer476CE,e97fguj,conservative
How many seats are the Dems projected to win in the House and Republicans in the Senate?,InfernoBA,e97gn3x,conservative
Beto is gunna win TX.  WTH,TastelessSmell,e978gs2,conservative
Obviously this won't be popular here but I really hope Walker loses in Wisconsin. You can't say your a conservative and then give 3 billion dollars to a company.,adamb10,e970emq,conservative
Romney will stand up 2 Trump unlike other Republicans,MyNewAccount962,e97ey1v,conservative
BETO IS AHEAD IT'S HAPPENING,top-perro,e973qja,conservative
"Let’s see if Indiana’s latest polls are accurate...

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/epolls/2018/senate/in/indiana_senate_braun_vs_donnelly-6573.html",Iwanttobedelivered,e9710j0,conservative
Illinois governor is JB Pritzker. SO glad I got out!,DrudgeBreitbart,e9742ob,conservative
NJ letting a cuck like Mendenez in,Taygr,e975fal,conservative
[Google live election results](https://www.google.com/search?rlz=1C1CHBF_enUS799US799&ei=m0HiW_SeEaaw_QaE6IeACA&q=midterm+elections+2018&oq=midterm&gs_l=psy-ab.3.2.35i39j0i67l3j0j0i67j0j0i67j0l2.376788.377447..379545...0.0..0.114.650.6j1),Orbtecc,e976nqa,conservative
Lol silent majority lol. ,ausversehn0,e97g90a,conservative
So this is where the Stephen Millers and Ted Cruzes of the world hang out... ,GeezerIommi,e97e4xr,conservative
Dems winning the house is yuge.,MyNewAccount962,e97dklm,conservative
Trump you will have to release your Tax Returns since the Dems won the House :),MyNewAccount962,e97h6g1,conservative
Hope the Republicans lose. The party died when Trumpism took over.,MyNewAccount962,e975frg,conservative
[deleted],,e97e0de,conservative
[removed],,e97gq2o,conservative
"Taking the House 😎 No Wall funding, no Obamacare repeal, Trumps Tax returns, emoluments investigations, Subpoena Power...

Hell yeah guys. This is a huge win for Democrats",ausversehn0,e97eqa1,conservative
I'm just here for delicious white male tears.,llluvli,e970jst,conservative
If the Dems get The House Trump may finally be impeached,MyNewAccount962,e97a5x3,conservative
Why would the people of Texas support Ted Cruz when he has accomplished absolutely nothing for them? He is another all talk no action pol!,MyNewAccount962,e979k3x,conservative
"Lyin' Ted is showing who he truly is. A political loser. Sad!

Edit: Just repeating Trump's talking points about Ted before he ""changed his mind""",MyNewAccount962,e978xay,conservative
Amen!,Zac1245,e975m2m,conservative
Damn straight.,Dogfacedgod88,e975qb3,conservative
Right? What a great country and time we live in. You'd never know hearing the way the left talks. It must be exhausting being on the political left these days.,bruux,e975n6v,conservative
"Wow, not even trying to hide it anymore. ",soxfan90,e97bcmc,conservative
Which kills me when bernie and Sid suck up to the guy every week on 770 AM ny radio.  The guy is an outright Dem. ,MaddSim,e97bsml,conservative
I hope. I’m gonna keep drinking just too be safe.,XxtexasxX,e97cpij,conservative
"I'm bunkering down for a riot in Austin. Good thing I stocked up on bottled water during the ""crisis.""",zgh5002,e97cvg9,conservative
"We've won the senate. I was really worried there at first, but we can destroy anything the democrats try in the House now.",NY_Driver,e97d0h2,conservative
thank you Jesus,DL-Refugee,e97cio5,conservative
I'm honestly confused why Fox did that. 538 still has it at 44% for Republicans to win the House. Not even CNN or MSNBC made that call yet.,lamall,e97a1sf,conservative
"This roller coaster has to stop.

50-49.4 Cruz lead with 40k votes",TastelessSmell,e97aq8p,conservative
This country will turn into a socialist country in our lifetimes. ,AMollenhauer,e97b6ff,conservative
"There's another Senate race there in 2020, we can give it another shot then.",sendintheshermans,e97gtwn,conservative
"Totally agree, I really like wished I could have voted for him ",Kspresent,e97gvlp,conservative
James would be a good presidential candidate IMO. ,AMollenhauer,e97h79o,conservative
RBG is 85...,Shinglings,e97fmf5,conservative
Is it too early to sell CNN my story about how she raped me 20 years ago?,Ung-Tik,e97gabt,conservative
Miiiillions will diiiiieeee,i_floop_the_pig,e978ayc,conservative
"Honestly I love reading r/politics on election nights, since they are always so fucking smug going into this",JasonJBL,e978aih,conservative
"Love how it's ""r/politics"" but it's more like""r/democrats""",LAFRM600,e978izc,conservative
They think only elderly vote Republican :),arogozine,e978m6p,conservative
"> environmentally 
 

Yes!!!! Getting fucked environmentally 
",foodVSfood,e978jrr,conservative
The more the better for 2020 and 2022.,memberCP,e97dx6d,conservative
"As a Floridian, this election looks like it's going to go as well as can be expected. Dems will get a small advantage in the house probably, but Florida is safe for the next few years from pointless taxes. ",Faraday314,e97ag8b,conservative
I'll stand here and be corrected.,TastelessSmell,e97citk,conservative
I am a worrier ,yackippo,e97dcnc,conservative
Also female under 30! You are not alone! ,smile4dayz29,e97amh8,conservative
"There are dozens of you, dozens!",kroatone,e978sdz,conservative
Me too!! Yay!,HumbleRaspberry15,e97gflj,conservative
"Oh. My. God.

That is absolutely hysterical.",bumpy-meyers,e97fw73,conservative
Did Cruz win?,MyUsernameIsReallyOk,e97fx4l,conservative
"Haha, good one.",Terra_green2,e97gjjd,conservative
Any idiot who spends their student loan on anything other than education deserves to live in debt for life.,lion27,e97cynr,conservative
I choose to believe this was a troll. ,zgh5002,e97ctqu,conservative
For their sake I hope that is a troll. ,steampunker13,e97cv92,conservative
Lolz you'd think they wouldve learned the lesson from bernie if thats true,fuckthisnewfeature,e97cwl8,conservative
If you are that stupid...I don’t even know what to say,KnightofFaith26,e97d6l3,conservative
poor guy/gal but I lol'd,top-perro,e97da9v,conservative
Perfect example of why we need a student loan bailout /s,soxfan90,e97e4yd,conservative
We need 10%,GFZDW,e97a5r7,conservative
Welcome to the communist Unitarian republic of California. ,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e97g4ab,conservative
"If Menedez won re-election, I guess anything is possible, it is really sad.",bumpy-meyers,e97g1oq,conservative
It’s California. ,soxfan90,e97g065,conservative
"Oh thank god. The way California runs the show, it ended up being Feinstein vs. De Leon (D). Yep, two Dems on the ticket. He's the ""30 round clips in a half a second"" guy, so it was good that he got shut down.",leftajar,e97gdb9,conservative
She was running against far left DeLeon so voted for as the less extremist. Who knows what happens when she retires.,Terra_green2,e97gfty,conservative
"She's still not as evil as De Leon is though. She was the lesser of two evils, as much as it pains me to say that.",Scozzar,e97gaqp,conservative
It’s either her or someone further to the left than her. Scary thing is she was the better option,Enzo_SAWFT,e97gbkc,conservative
I voted for her. Lesser of two evils in long term outlook. I'm still hoping for censure after they investigate her crap.  De Leon is fiery hot garbage and him losing tonight effectively kills his political career.,pfildeez,e97gk2u,conservative
Libs honestly don't care unless it can maybe help them politically. ,vampslayer53,e97g2a9,conservative
"I have watched ABC go from 14/15 chance Dems take control, to 12/13, to 11/12, to now 2/5...

Is this 2016 again?!?!

Edit: currently 4/7 chance. Wow",why-this,e975oue,conservative
">
You may have noticed that our real-time forecast has moved toward Republicans in the House. It’s being too aggressive, in my opinion. The model sees that a bunch of “likely Republican” districts (particularly in Florida) are now 100 percent likely to go red. But there hasn’t been the chance for Democrats to clinch many equivalent likely Democratic districts",MBBIBM,e975r9y,conservative
BAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA,severeneckpain,e975lh2,conservative
They just said their model is biased in favour of the GOP cause they had more early safe seats. ,YanksSensBills,e975xwe,conservative
Lets hope Texas does too,TastelessSmell,e9779qi,conservative
I hope so. I'm on PalmettoStateArmory.com with 10 AR15 mags in my cart in case Gillum wins. hahaha,dlc_protocol,e9778ob,conservative
"Theres 5.3m votes counted.  Numbers I was reading said to expect 6-6.5m...  not a lot of time left to make up 160,000+ votes...  But, like I've said, I hope you're right.",TastelessSmell,e979eqd,conservative
Nice!,skarface6,e97g4f7,conservative
At least you can comment there. I’m banned!,HappyBelichick,e97f2c1,conservative
I can’t even go there anymore. they say it’s supposed to be unbiased and shit but it’s more liberal than california ,ben1234321,e97f1op,conservative
Ill give you an upvote as compensation. ,xJownage,e97f2ri,conservative
The cherry on top is that Dem fools pissed away a cool 80 million on that race they could have used to defend vulnerable red state Senators. Thanks Ted for being the lighting rod.,PhilosoGuido,e97fpeo,conservative
I’m more worried about Maxine Waters holding the purse strings of the nation ,FuckTimBeck,e979yk6,conservative
She’s almost as bad as Feinstein. ,blameitonthetetons1,e979v7s,conservative
I kind of wonder if there will be an insurgency against Pelosi by DSA,yackippo,e979zw1,conservative
Ask them how they sleep at night defending a DUI suspect who lied about it and ran?,MaddSim,e97eg5q,conservative
Trolling that sub is a fun thing to do when you're bored.,14thAndVine,e97efjg,conservative
I did the same. I'm cracking up.,Kremer_K3,e97f673,conservative
And they're gonna make her Speaker.,severeneckpain,e97ig0m,conservative
Muted the TV as soon as I heard her.,Odoacer476CE,e97if7l,conservative
"I got a good chuckle out of that myself, he was great at getting himself elected, but doomed the rest of his party.",bumpy-meyers,e97lddd,conservative
I need a list,Phinaeus,e97ra2g,conservative
It's happened every election since like 1920.,TheShakinBacon,e97bf1n,conservative
But why? Why does the non-presidential party always stay home.,the-divine-comedy,e97bhl4,conservative
"And, as midterms go, they haven't won much.  Even if they pick up the 32 sears projected, it's not the sort of upset we saw in 2006 or 2010.  Republicans increased their majority in the Senate, and the Democratic majority in the house is too slim to grant then a blank check for anything. ",LonelyMachines,e97ffhw,conservative
Where are you looking at this? I can't find him anywhere near on the sites I'm looking at.,PenguinDanger34,e97ehqb,conservative
It’s all they have left. Scream that anyone who disagrees is hateful. And I welcome it. The more they do the more people will wake up and see how insane that side is. ,Watchmaker-2112,e979kg0,conservative
"Van Jones is an unapologetic racist. Remember his ""whitelash"" comments during election night 2016? Disgusting.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97guv1,conservative
Hasn’t everyone on the left been saying that for at least 8 years?,awyden,e97cx1f,conservative
"Hell yeah, im moving back to AZ (most likely) soon and dont want Sinema! ",Zac1245,e9706y0,conservative
"I was just gonna say that, Wolf is creaming his pants every time they show a Democrat up 27 votes with 1% reporting",SouthernTrumpVet,e972dqe,conservative
Fox News is live on Youtube. ,L3thalGho5t,e972c59,conservative
OH GOD PLEASE STAY RED,TastelessSmell,e979sze,conservative
"Ted Cruz*
Republican
2,366,997	50.4%  

Beto O'Rourke
Democrat
2,279,033	48.5%  

4,700,402 votes, 6% reporting (442 of 7,949 precincts)",rob_s_458,e979whq,conservative
Axios did as well ,dan4daniel,e979vil,conservative
AND ITS BACK 49.8-49.1 BETO,TastelessSmell,e97a3ru,conservative
Got yo'self a gun,yackippo,e97ar8g,conservative
"We tried
",nowthatsrich,e97awzh,conservative
I’m watching abc’s coverage and am enjoying Christie’s commentary ,CanOfCope,e97axou,conservative
"I tried.  It saddens me that people could vote for such a blatantly corrupt person.  He played it smart.  All his signs were focused in poorer urban districts and were giant letters saying, “stop Trump” and then his name.  Nobody focused on the facts, just followed the rhetoric.  It’s sad because nj is a red state except for a strip of blue that runs from newark, through Trenton, and into Camden.  They end up determining the whole state.  This is why the electoral college is so important!",jdizzle161,e97bh3h,conservative
Apparently anything less than shooting a black guy in the middle of Newark isn't enough for Menendez to lose his seat.,Chao-Z,e97buaw,conservative
I was just telling someone that i'm surprised someone bothered to even run against Romney in Utah.,Zyrioun,e97bqer,conservative
Yup. Trafalgar called the Florida Race by doing Robocalls to find republicans.,memberCP,e97dw3s,conservative
"Don’t undersell the fact that there wasn’t a blowout landslide with the House. Comparatively, it looks like we’ll lose less seats than the party in power has in past midterms. 

There was no blue wave, the country hasn’t gone complete leftist. This is a good night. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97g06c,conservative
I’m interested to see what the budgets and such turn out to be. Maybe some government shutdowns.,skarface6,e97g73m,conservative
"As an Oregonian, i'm *really* hoping we get Knute in. Kate has been horrible.",Zyrioun,e971dow,conservative
"Gotta be up early tomorrow but I will be up, I wouldn't be able to sleep anyhow lol. ",Zac1245,e971fn5,conservative
Good riddance. ,steampunker13,e97bwrc,conservative
"Just read some people saying they were happy the blue wave has held up...

Literally wut",why-this,e97cu57,conservative
"Nice, now we just need to flip Florida and Arizona - a complete takeover of the senate would be yuuuge!

Edit: my bad I meant Florida and Arizona, not Florida and Missouri, as you stated Missouri flipped already

Edit the edit: Filled to Flipped",bumpy-meyers,e97elzr,conservative
Good. Was worried about him being presidential contender in 2020.,soxfan90,e97fd6u,conservative
Bye bye McCaskill!,steampunker13,e97ga1s,conservative
There’s also Spanberger vs Brat,i_floop_the_pig,e972okh,conservative
A true battle for the ages,GinormousBurrito,e970sxh,conservative
A Cockburn is something no one ever wants...,Zac1245,e970umi,conservative
Its Florida though we'll be counting all night,Taygr,e9757fz,conservative
"Left Libertarian.


Also the Trangender Dem might be too far left for them.",Enzo_SAWFT,e976a4c,conservative
I'm not even from Michigan and I love John James. Dude seems like a great person and I would love for him to win. ,steampunker13,e979ljw,conservative
"Ironically, CNN's website was the first one to show Cruz recovering in Texas.",caffienatedjedi,e97aa0r,conservative
Buh bye commie. Hopefully Federal prison for corruption charges awaits.,PhilosoGuido,e97fjjy,conservative
I think part of it might have been the order in which the precincts reported. Things seem to be moving more towards what we expected. ,colinpail,e975ue3,conservative
Do we have numbers on how much money was spent on O'Rourke? They threw so much money at Cruz. ,thx_II38,e97668t,conservative
"If we keep both, I am going to have so much fun there tomorrow. ",CarbineGuy,e976gvl,conservative
What are they doing?,TastelessSmell,e976f3p,conservative
You mean r/democrats ? r/politics is so biased I can't even conceive the notion that they post anything reasonable. ,LAFRM600,e978wwr,conservative
It really is. It went from so many posts you couldn't keep track to an absolute silence.,JustAnotherJon,e976e93,conservative
"No, the realistic scenario is to hold onto the Senate (most likely) and have a thin margin in the House and gridlock for the next two years as Dems investigate ""muh russia"" ",UncleRedGreen,e977309,conservative
538 is projecting a dem gain of 27.  That's not a wave for sure,TastelessSmell,e97awuo,conservative
"Nah, they’ll win. But it won’t be a huge rout that was predicted, a much narrower majority. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97b3q7,conservative
"They called it early but it’s accurate, I see many sources calling a narrow majority for Dems",baileyculp,e97axo8,conservative
50.1 - 49.3 Cruz lead...,TastelessSmell,e97bbpo,conservative
What the fuck,steampunker13,e9757xm,conservative
">You may have noticed that our real-time forecast has moved toward Republicans in the House. It’s being too aggressive, in my opinion. The model sees that a bunch of “likely Republican” districts (particularly in Florida) are now 100 percent likely to go red. But there hasn’t been the chance for Democrats to clinch many equivalent likely Democratic districts",MBBIBM,e9757a1,conservative
It's been fluctuating this whole night but it was always >50%.,superdude411,e978pil,conservative
YESSSSSSS!!!! That's excellent news. ,Highenergyperson,e9761t1,conservative
"Why was this one so important??? Sorry still learning the ropes 
Edit: got it. Thanks friends:)",inconspicuoujavert,e975zrx,conservative
Shots all around@!,justific4tion,e977kdm,conservative
Tapper is at least somewhat sane.  He's one of the only CNN staff that I can tolerate.,justific4tion,e9781eh,conservative
Sounds like they'll take it but by a small margin from what I'm hearing/seeing,TastelessSmell,e97a03h,conservative
Networks calling house for Dems already ,MaddSim,e979yz9,conservative
Their incumbent governor was stupidly unpopular though from what I've heard. They'll probably go back to red next election once a fresh face comes in. ,steampunker13,e97c6ew,conservative
yeah that was really surprising,DL-Refugee,e97cfet,conservative
"The problem is a human one.  

Governors who match the color of their electoral college vote for president (whether red governor in a red state, or blue governor in a blue state) tend to rely on ideology and identity to win instead of governance and governing ability.   

I'm in Oklahoma.  I assume GOP candidate Stitt wins (I haven't followed the local coverage).  

But we just went through 8 years of terrible governance, by a so called conservative, so called republican governor in Mary Fallin.  And it's not ""so called"" conservative because she was a RINO or moderate...but because she is/was incompetent and corrupt, and shouldn't be trusted, at a human level, to be the assistant manager at McDonald's, yet alone governor.  

But she could waive her pro life pro gun card and people would fling to her, overlook how bad she is, cause ideology.  

And I'm not picking on conservative Republicans, you can say the same about blue state Illinois and Washington and Oregon, electing ideologues over leaders, choosing identity over problem solving.  

I know some about Kansas, but I imagine people are sick of bad human governance, and I wish to God the GOP made this *the* issue instead of worrying about identity or allegiance to a specific issue.  There is room here to dominate:  preach wisdom and problem solving, pragmatism and solution.  No.  Freaking. Mary.  Fallins.   

My guess is that some of the best governors are democrats in red states and republicans in blue states.  They're hedged.  They can be ideologies, they have find common ground and reach out for solutions instead of terrible lazy trump cards of ""I'M PRO-CHOICE/PRO-LIFE KEEP ME IN OFFICE!"" idiocy.  ",0siris0,e97dhrf,conservative
"Not surprising. KS was even close in 14, KS GOP is not popular. Trump JA 55% in the state so it's more the state's GOP than Trump. Kobach is also very controversial. ",RedDevil5,e97c6d2,conservative
"Thank God. But wow. I still cant believe how close that was considering DUI running and lying about it Beto was. My God, people are just too stupid to be able to vote. ",MaddSim,e97ce0p,conservative
no one else is yet...  I do see ABC calling it on 538,TastelessSmell,e97cfhh,conservative
To many damn transplants who fucked up California moving in to fuck up Colorado ,Blu3Yeti,e97csmr,conservative
being the first to legalize weed attracted the degenerates en mass,KillaB33z,e97d0do,conservative
"Gotta get Denver to secede, my friend ",GFZDW,e97cqvz,conservative
When was that? 1980s?,vampslayer53,e97cvzw,conservative
Too many Californians with vacation homes,Taygr,e97cqt3,conservative
"Colorado has tons of voter fraud, yet voter ID laws will never get passed there because it benefits the libs.",NY_Driver,e97cwqy,conservative
Qué?,justific4tion,e97d06y,conservative
Agreed. But still better than Gillum.,lion27,e97ek8a,conservative
HOLY SHIT,memberCP,e97gcvl,conservative
"I used to think he was somewhat reasonable at times, but since Trump was elected, he has turned into another lib lunatic suffering from TDS.",bumpy-meyers,e97h2yo,conservative
"Of course. Barring something crazy in Florida, the turtle population in the Senate is about to double. ",soxfan90,e97ief5,conservative
I love you ,i_floop_the_pig,e970j34,conservative
"I'm cautiously optimistic, but still worried. I hope we can still hold a seat or two majority in the House and maybe get an extra seat in the Senate.",SinisterPaige,e970ggz,conservative
Oh dang you might be right ,i_floop_the_pig,e976o90,conservative
"Oh, he'll at least be in the Primary, not sure if he'd make it out, but I agree for the most part",TastelessSmell,e976mlu,conservative
"How 'bout crazy eyes?

&#x200B;

Nah, it'll still be pudding Sanders",DrudgeBreitbart,e976s36,conservative
What's the current count for Cruz v Orouke?,Themusician67,e976no2,conservative
DAMNIT! WRONG THREAD!! LOL that is what I get for looking at 2 different reddit threads tonight!!!,dapcook,e97dkib,conservative
Reagan lost 26 seats in his first midterm and proceeded to win 49 states in 1984. I'm not too worried,mbarnar,e97gvnu,conservative
They will most assuredly shoot themselves in the foot,bumpy-meyers,e97gwef,conservative
"The way the economy is going I see the same thing happening with Trump. Maybe not 49 states, but probably at least 45. ",SexAddictRecovery,e97hkg3,conservative
If we actually keep the House that would be incredible ,Shinglings,e974cax,conservative
ARE YOU SERIOUS??,latotokyo123,e974dlj,conservative
Where do you get those at,kshebdhdbr,e974ejt,conservative
If we can hold it by 1 seat....  I will be thankful.,ozric101,e976jqt,conservative
If there’s one thing 90% can agree on it’s that Tumblr is a shit hole. ,YanksSensBills,e975ari,conservative
He’s close with Detroit being reported. Good sign ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9768ft,conservative
Still very nervous about Texas,AMollenhauer,e977eik,conservative
Thank god; I'm from St. Louis. Can't believe she's been around as long as she has. ,LAFRM600,e977n8a,conservative
God I hope so ,i_floop_the_pig,e977ne7,conservative
"I wasn’t going to vote, but after those tapes came out where Sinema called the state and it’s people crazy... Well, the way the democrats despise the people just got me motivated. I’m sure I wasn’t alone.",SexAddictRecovery,e977tl3,conservative
"Indiana has sold out for Trump. Given the 2016 election results im not surprised one bit.

Plus Indiana had Donnelly fatigue. Wouldve lost in 2012 if his opponent wasnt an idiot.",mbarnar,e977uua,conservative
Even if we lose the house (which we kinda expected anyway) holding the senate was super crucial as well. Good to see we'll keep it. ,CITY_F0X,e977x0c,conservative
What did you expect watching CBS?,lamall,e978t52,conservative
COME ON JOHN JAMES!!!!,sydazzles,e978y2l,conservative
PLEASE,steampunker13,e978xw7,conservative
Yeah Stabenow has been there for far too long. Time for someone new!,eastsidefetus,e9794d0,conservative
"538 says there is a problem with their model putting out projections that are too optimistic, and they just changed it to a different setting.",RoundSimbacca,e97a4f0,conservative
It's way too early to call it. I'm surprised they did.,mfisch4,e97a5pn,conservative
"It was always gonna happen, the point is that it will be by a very small margin.

Looking forward to taking a break from politics, it looks like nothing mayor is going to happen till 2020, just a lot of shouting",TedyCruz,e97a3l7,conservative
JOHN JAMES JOHN JAMES JOHN JAMES JOHN JAMES J,sydazzles,e97bds2,conservative
"Really pulling for this guy. (Surprise liberals, im not a racist).  He deserves this. Either way, win or lose, I hope this guy keeps on charging. Hes got a future in politics. ",MaddSim,e97bqqo,conservative
"Exactly what I was saying last night. This may be a blessing in disguise because they'll double down on their stupidity, and as a consequence, Trump will easily win 2020.",xJownage,e97f5od,conservative
"RemindMe! Two years ""Will Democrats continue being dumb""",curagus,e97fwae,conservative
I am thinking the same think. The more they look deranged the more people will vote Republican. ,8K12,e97f4fa,conservative
"I'm conflicted about the raining subpoenas. On one hand, I'm hoping Dems wear themselves out and by 2020 Trump will have got a net gain via #walkaway voters. On the other, regardless of if the subpoenas dig up anything concrete, I imagine many Dems will regard the subpoenas as evidence in and of themselves. 
",S_D_W_2,e97fnf4,conservative
I’d love to see it. As a Massachusetts voter I may have no say in that race but I really do like him. ,Derp2638,e97gm6v,conservative
But Van Jones is on TV,yoyowatup,e97hfb9,conservative
I miss Beckel ,MasteroftheUnlverse,e97h2d2,conservative
It almost seems like people in California can’t vote in Texas! AMAZING!,soxfan90,e97h17t,conservative
Hey he won Santa Monica and Hollywood by double digits though!,memberCP,e97h2dr,conservative
He can win another time. 2020 sounds nice. ,Gordon_Frohman_Lives,e97hh2u,conservative
When it is more like a splash.,8K12,e97dihu,conservative
It looks like the dems could win the popular vote by 8-9% - is that not a fairly big victory?,thisistrue1234,e97drl0,conservative
Putnam would have been a better candidate.        ,TBSportsFan1254,e971ofl,conservative
Not good for Desantis given that Scott is up a tad within the same districts. ,RigsbyQuist,e971uha,conservative
Now 50-50,gt2xs,e974kz7,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> IF the GOP pulls out a win in the House it HAS to be another blow to Nate Silver's credibility.

I wasn't sure he ever had too much credibility, except among people who want politics to fit in neat little statistical boxes. Say what you want about Bill Clinton and James Carville, but both of them were nothing short of fantastic at knowing how to read an electorate's mood and adjust strategy accordingly. ",psstein,e974t59,conservative
">IF the GOP pulls out a win in the House it HAS to be another blow to Nate Silver's credibility.

The Republican Chances where 1 in 5. A percentage means like that means it will happen 1 in 5 times you do an experiment. They are not low odds. 

To put it another way, as Nate Silver said, Republicans would need  a systematic polling error of 1 or 2 points in their favor to keep the house. 

Systematic polling errors does not, as some think the name implies, happen rarely. They happen a lot. 

>That conclusion about the Senate ought to be fairly intuitive, I think. Even if you credit Democrats with wins in all the toss-up races, that wouldn’t be enough — it would only get them to 50 seats. What might be more surprising is that the same conclusion holds for Republicans in the House. They need for there to be a systematic polling error too. If the polls are about right overall but Republicans are hoping to getting lucky in the swing districts, it probably won’t happen — the odds are stacked heavily against them.

>**The reason it’s counterintuitive is because you can’t really identify 23 districts that are safe bets to flip to Democrats** (that’s the number they need to take the House). In the Deluxe version of our model (the one I’ll be focusing on here), only 193 seats are considered to be “solid Democratic” (at least a 95 percent chance of a Democratic victory). If Democrats won only those seats and no others, they’d actually lose two seats from the 195 they control now. Another 15 seats are “likely Democratic,” where Democrats have at least a 75 chance of winning. Win those as well, and Democrats are … still up to a net gain of only 13 seats.1
The model then has 34 seats in its three most competitive categories: “lean Democratic” (eight seats), “toss-up” (16 seats) and “lean Republican” (10 seats). If Republicans win 24 of those 34 seats — assuming everything else goes to form — they’ll keep the House.

>**How hard is that? Because of the possibility of a systematic polling error, it isn’t really that hard at all. If there’s a typical polling error of 2 to 3 percentage points and it works in Republicans’ favor, the House would be a toss-up.** We might not even know the winner for several days as everyone waits for additional mail ballots to be returned from California. Thus, the Lite forecast gives Republicans a 2 in 9, or 22 percent, chance of keeping the House based on the possibility of a systematic polling error. Their chances are 18 percent in Deluxe and 15 percent in our Classic version, meanwhile.


So how likely is it that Republicans win the house? Enough for me to bet on it just in case I made money.",memberCP,e974yeg,conservative
He just took a lead of 50 to 48 with 1% in.,tenshon,e975pm4,conservative
Oakland is Detroit. A GOP being down less than 5 in Detroit is not bad,Enzo_SAWFT,e975nei,conservative
I’ll be so happy if John James wins (voted for him today!). I’m a Michigander and I absolutely can’t stand Stabenow. ,sydazzles,e975ngc,conservative
Concerning for who? lol,Zac1245,e975n16,conservative
"You’ve not learned?!? It’s all virtue signaling. As long as you have a D by your name, you can get away with murder ",Rabidraccoon76,e978co5,conservative
"Haha fox trying to get out the west coast vote good on them my wife ran out the door to vote for Cruz when she walked in and saw him behind, we need Fox to help us get out the vote tonight ",FuckTimBeck,e97a23x,conservative
Early vote vs precincts. ,zgh5002,e979x21,conservative
They're basing their results on someone who fat fingered the reporting %'s.,RoundSimbacca,e97a0w6,conservative
"No clue. ABC has Texas at 72% with O'Rourke up by \~<1%

&#x200B;

\----

8:38PM

O'Rourke Democrat -- 2,751,031 -- 50%

Cruz \*Republican -- 2,743,392 -- 50%",OneImportantQuestion,e979ykq,conservative
I was thinking the EXACT same thing. There is one even claiming 70% in. ,Themusician67,e979ztt,conservative
"7% precincts reporting. Just give it time. 

https://www.nytimes.com/elections/results/texas-senate",memberCP,e97aphq,conservative
It was always going to be an huge uphill battle for him. He did well.,redbullXvodka,e97fa8e,conservative
NBC is reporting the house is lost,Nemesis651,e97eoqy,conservative
"It's just like Oregon,  3 big cities that ""represent"" the state",kshebdhdbr,e97hnnc,conservative
Oregon needs some as well,kshebdhdbr,e97lipj,conservative
"You didn't see the sign on your way in?

ABANDON ALL HOPE, YE WHO ENTER HERE",Odoacer476CE,e97l3pn,conservative
"F for California  


I'm leaving as soon as I get my Bachelor's.",KommaisonReddit,e97lbum,conservative
I heard that and was like WTF Lol.,Zac1245,e97a7ba,conservative
Chairman of campaign is on the fringes?,tilyral,e97bu6r,conservative
"Don't give up on us. Even if things go bad tonight, just typical midterm backlash.",SendixBunny,e971s9w,conservative
At 80%,prey4villains,e9755bw,conservative
"Not soon. 538 has him at 92% to win, higher than he was before results started coming in.",oren0,e975d5l,conservative
If he's losing at 55% reporting.,Zac1245,e9754o3,conservative
probably at 60% reporting,yackippo,e97552y,conservative
Some of that polling was way offfffffffffffffffffffff,Zac1245,e976hf9,conservative
How are the local candidates there?,0verkast,e9781x0,conservative
It could be worse and we didn’t run a great rep here in WV. Ugh. ,skarface6,e978dxz,conservative
Morrisey was never going to beat Manchin. I voted for Jenkins in the primaries I thought he had a better chance.,rjohnson99,e978hs5,conservative
Manchin is cool. He can be an honorary Republican for all I care. I read a long profile about him and I fully understand why he is a Democrat.,kroatone,e978w7x,conservative
Yep who would think Texas would ever turn blue?,RKfan,e979990,conservative
This is an apple,chudsonracing,e97a0vf,conservative
explain,MaddSim,e97bivb,conservative
Stamps!,AcrazyConundrum,e97blel,conservative
"LET'S GO, MCSALLY! ",GFZDW,e97cxji,conservative
AZ resident here. I’m looking forward to California energy prices! /s  ,AcornToOak,e97d0hd,conservative
AZ also voted for the minimum wage increase in 2016. ,Zac1245,e97d4z8,conservative
But nuclear = bad!,cavemanben,e97d54y,conservative
We are. You are. It’s too close. Staci is a wacko fun grabbing tax hiking “equality” lunatic. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e97dknw,conservative
It’s like a 10 point difference ,i_floop_the_pig,e97ghbl,conservative
"And Dane is 81% in, MKE basically all in",pharmermummles,e97hpnc,conservative
Now to get rid of that gas tax.,MrSparkle86,e97hxcc,conservative
ann coulter ,tifuforreal,e97j4tv,conservative
I’m very curious to watch how the Dems go after Amy Barrett,i_floop_the_pig,e97jwlx,conservative
"Sure but they are still picking up the house, unfortunately",snoppballe,e978dwh,conservative
But are they going to get the house??? ,foodVSfood,e978lfh,conservative
It is IMMIGRATION that is the main problem. I get Californians fleeing to Austin has an effect but it's not as big as immigration. Same thing happened in Virginia and people blame the influx of people to NoVa. 1 in 7 people in Virginia are foreign born. In 1980 it was 1 in 100. This is why we are losing these states that used to be solid Red. This is why immigration is the number 1 issue to a lot of conservatives. People recognize that unless this is fixed no other conservative priority is going to be possible in the near future. ,Highenergyperson,e979o3p,conservative
They fucked up their state and now they’re all moving here to fuck our state up ,Blaphlafagus,e979hpa,conservative
Please don't deport them to Georgia. Our gubernatorial race is already way too close from the New England nutjobs,DrudgeBreitbart,e979khz,conservative
"Americans like politicians who have never had real jobs, that’s how",soxfan90,e97hlqy,conservative
I hate Stabenow too,sydazzles,e97hzgb,conservative
":(
He can still engage though with other things and maybe rebid.",Terra_green2,e97i250,conservative
Does the veteran combat pilot have good policies? Or did they run only on the fact that they are a veteran. ,godzillaeatsasians,e97hpcu,conservative
They do have the nicest election coverage.,kshebdhdbr,e970yki,conservative
"Yeah, I agree they do a nice layout. ",Zac1245,e9713iz,conservative
"Check out Politico too. Both are good. https://www.politico.com/election-results/2018/house

In 2016 I was so thrilled to see NYT’s prediction graph flip that night. ",DrudgeBreitbart,e9716rd,conservative
They need to call that race. Theres only about 600K votes left and hes behind 150K as is... needs basically 75% of the remaining votes.,mbarnar,e975uir,conservative
He won't be missed.,superdude411,e978jet,conservative
Beto's biggest counties are already in and huge chunks of Texas that are solid red are not. ,zgh5002,e976vkx,conservative
"There are 1.7% of precincts reporting, a long way to go",TastelessSmell,e976tmk,conservative
Subscribe ,GFZDW,e976rsb,conservative
I would agree with that.,Zac1245,e976s62,conservative
"538 and those who call the races have access to a lot of models. Once certain places in X have come they can begin subtracting from the total expected vote and asking the question, Does a candidate have enough votes in yet to be called places within an accepted confidence interval?

TLDR Beto or a Dem winning in texas have to be winning exceptionally large numbers in Red areas to finish ahead.",memberCP,e977c6v,conservative
"Why fixate on Cruz, who will win, when there are so many close races?",tau_decay,e976u5z,conservative
"You asked, and the volunteer state delivered. You are welcome.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e979364,conservative
I'm with you there,TheOriginalCDizzle,e978lz8,conservative
It’s so stressful.,N0RM1N,e978qzn,conservative
Probably a runoff :(,DrudgeBreitbart,e97b0ln,conservative
"Might backfire on them too, impeaching Clinton didn’t work well for the Republicans.",gster50,e97bfe4,conservative
"I just can't take the gloating from the left, which means 99% of the media",DL-Refugee,e97bf1s,conservative
"Yes, I think part of why Obama won was the Democrat Senate protecting him from having to veto a bunch of popular conservative bills after 2010.",soxfan90,e97bbjf,conservative
"I heard their voters have been getting tired of the state GOP for a while. Also, the GOP nominee was probably the most polarizing Republican in the state. 

I’m guessing the “check on legislature” argument is winning here like it did in Maaasachusetts. ",soxfan90,e97bny8,conservative
Not this Kansan... but it's hard to overcome how unpopular Kobach is around here I guess. ,ecfreeman,e97bmi8,conservative
"I think you underestimate just how unpopular Brownback and his people were. Of course, just look at the fact that even as Kelly is winning, pretty much every other state government branch is still in Republican hands.",TheModernDaVinci,e97bwf1,conservative
the previous republican governor fucked the state hard. voters had no choice but to vote dem,Catdaddypanther97,e97bwok,conservative
It really hurt to do but I'm a Kansan who voted for Kelly. Brownback really did a number to our state and Kobach is nearly an exact clone of him. Kobach for governor is as Hillary was to president and may have been the worst candidate possible for the republicans to nominate for governor.,whrithin,e97bz57,conservative
"Not surprising. Occasionally a solid red Midwestern state will vote in a Democrat when they're center enough and when the state's GOP is tiring enough or the nominee just flat out sucks. That's how Heitkamp won the ND Senate seat in the first place, for example.",14thAndVine,e97c0fj,conservative
Ah fuck no.,Hillary_For_Prison,e97bnu7,conservative
Hope they like getting the wrath of God from all the abortions that will happen now. ,caldera599,e97cgtn,conservative
Chad's fault.,tehForce,e97cvpq,conservative
"As long as we can keep control over the narrative, that may help is in 2020. We should push for immigration reform and force Dems to say no. We should push for permanent taxes and force Dems to say no. We want to show the public that Democrats are all talk and zero action.",8K12,e97gvxd,conservative
Holy hell. Great news. ,MaddSim,e97iqf0,conservative
And probably moves to DC or CA by February,soxfan90,e97ikgl,conservative
"Would've worked about 20 years ago, those guys are all in now.

Gotta start making some babies up north...",snoppballe,e97ah84,conservative
"Edit was unnecessary. 
",justific4tion,e97ai92,conservative
Also the state legislature races! These could be super impactful and no ones talking about it.,Zac1245,e970cr5,conservative
Yep especially when you also vote on judges,Enzo_SAWFT,e970f0c,conservative
"Really hoping Knute wins in Oregon. I really...really...really don't like Kate Brown. Ugh, State of Jefferson when?",Zyrioun,e970u9m,conservative
"this is the first time I've heard of him since 2012 haha 

&#x200B;

had no idea he was still in politics",top-perro,e97bu3c,conservative
The Dems poured an absurd amount of money and attention into that race though. I'm not sure they will do the same in 2020. ,steampunker13,e97de6i,conservative
"Voter apathy will be at all time highs in Texas. Go out, do work and it will be a cakewalk. ",zgh5002,e97djq9,conservative
why only like minded individuals?,hurley_300,e97deru,conservative
yea we have jobs ,jewsandcazoos,e972zpe,conservative
Well yeah... We aren't babies.,mouser58907,e972wy1,conservative
https://m.imgur.com/gallery/Y7Zpt,ggrieves,e972wxu,conservative
I know I certainly was ,i_floop_the_pig,e97gxts,conservative
I think that's where the energized base mostly went,Terra_green2,e97h3a6,conservative
"Not Tester, damn it.",rf-engineer,e97l3qr,conservative
"I hope we keep it, i'll be ecstatic if we  keep it, but i'm not getting my hopes up. I was  never a big fan of the ""red wave"" stuff, breeds overconfidence and there's nothing  to suggest anything like it. At most we prevent a blue wave and hold the line, there's no red wave coming (though i would love to be surprised.)",Zyrioun,e970jft,conservative
"Idk about you... 

but I'm gonna quit my job, buy a pink hat, and march if we lose control.

Lol, jk, I have actual bills to pay. If we lose I'll just continue to live my life normally. Because, you know, that's how regular, well adjusted, adults behave. ",amjourdan,e970h8n,conservative
"Yeah, it's just a bit disappointing. I just literally don't comprehend how if it's really ""the economy, stupid"" and it's been doing so much better under Trump that we've got an 85% chance of losing the House. 

Either way, it feels a bit futile; no matter what, the ""free shit train"" isn't going to be curtailed by anyone likely to win tonight, which just means more taxation for people like me.",soylent_absinthe,e971rmj,conservative
It’s a shame we didn’t take the house and the senate. I want to see the salt go everywhere. I still hope John James wins. ,Derp2638,e97fpgu,conservative
Nah they think they won apparently ,Blaphlafagus,e97ffun,conservative
They're revelling in their gain of the House.,Odoacer476CE,e97fio7,conservative
"This is exactly what everyone predicted lol, I don't know what a wave is I guess. And CNN is going right back to the poulular vote as an argument",mcal24,e97gbzg,conservative
"The house kind of is, the dems may win close to 40 seats.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e97gge6,conservative
Down to 40 :(,StJohnTheSwift,e974yck,conservative
They're saying their model is too aggressive. ,tehForce,e975ym0,conservative
538 shows 42.7% they keep it right now. ..,TastelessSmell,e976gji,conservative
"Honestly CNN might not be a bad idea to watch, especially if there’s a meltdown. I’m watching Fox right now and it’s pretty bad tbh ",i_floop_the_pig,e977alb,conservative
It usually is!,0verkast,e9780mn,conservative
Whoa that soon? I keep an eye on states Trump flipped in 16. I find it very strange that crazy SJW won it so easily. Michigan seems to be doing a lot better since that Hillary crazy Jennifer Granholm was out of there.,Highenergyperson,e978ntu,conservative
">Overall not looking as bad as some had predicted.


I'd say so! I mean, we essentially already have the Senate locked and now it's looking like the House might stay red as well.",Frashizzle,e978di5,conservative
Was expected though,Taygr,e978blc,conservative
Texas isn't looking good either ,AMollenhauer,e978d2b,conservative
"You're insane, this night is a huge win for Republicans already. Governors in Georgia and Florida, a very healthy showing in the house and a few gains in the senate. Blue wave lol",polar902,e978hwg,conservative
Colons are hard. ,Ennui2778,e97bnpb,conservative
CNN has been weird all night. ,AMollenhauer,e97c34u,conservative
Cruz won ,Enzo_SAWFT,e97g9fa,conservative
"The governor race is more comforting, +14 R",snoppballe,e97h2o4,conservative
"You can tell from her face even the Botox doesn’t agree with her, lmaooooo",bumpy-meyers,e97j2x3,conservative
Oregon or California?,soxfan90,e97i4tz,conservative
God help us all,GFZDW,e979h4g,conservative
Yeah tonight was just okay. Glad Beto and Gillum lost. ,top-perro,e97f0uw,conservative
"I’m not thrilled but I’m not too disappointed.

I’m whelmed",i_floop_the_pig,e97f0vm,conservative
"Yep, Senate with some breathing room is what I would call a victory for R's tonight, regardless of the House. We knew we were going to lose out House seats anyways, I'm not sure if the other side expected to fall out of the Senate that hard.",royallprick,e97f0t7,conservative
"Georgia needs Kemp to win and then it’ll be okay. 

Ugghhhhhhhhhhhh but it looks like it could be a runoff ",HumbleRaspberry15,e97g1j7,conservative
Amazed she can even still vote in TN,soxfan90,e97fqch,conservative
"Lol fuck that, I'm not comfortable with those things ever having power again.",groyperslefthand,e97fmlu,conservative
"Democrats are going to use their investigative power to wreak absolute havoc over the administration, which they are going to actively try and destroy because of their animus towards President Trump, who many have likened to Hitler.

The only upside is the Republicans still hold most of the rest of the government.",gster50,e97f86v,conservative
Maxine Waters,the-divine-comedy,e97fbsl,conservative
Ideally I agree. In reality I worry that we'll just see more resistance,0verkast,e97ff5n,conservative
"I agree, I’m pretty moderate, and in an ideal world I don’t want either party to have full control and I would like to see politicians working together and making tough deals and compromising to get things done that works best for America.  I’m really getting sick of the political animosity, partisanship, and stone walking being done by both sides.  For the last few election cycles I have been trying to vote for candidates who have that approach.  I think it’s one of the reasons there isn’t much animosity towards Hogan here in Maryland.",absolut696,e97fzx0,conservative
Honestly a lot of the seats that flipped wont really be free to blindly toe the party line if they wanna get reelected too,mbarnar,e97fo8o,conservative
They were riffing on her a bit on the Daily Wire coverage a bit ago. Lol,mfisch4,e97acl1,conservative
Who?,arogozine,e979y3p,conservative
"now imagine if he was given the attention Beto got in Texas. He would have cruised to victory. I say it again, I HATE our biased media. I hate them. With all my heart. ",MaddSim,e97cqfy,conservative
TAKE MY ENERGY! ,GFZDW,e97cn4v,conservative
"John James is NOT DONE YET. Even if he loses this race, he has a HUGE future ahead of him.",tenshon,e97ctw4,conservative
Wayne County just dropped half of its vote.  James has a lot left.,tja_1478,e97cubq,conservative
I want the House to send a bill to the Senate . . . to abolish the Senate and the Senate kills the bill. I dunno I just think it would be cute. ,tiger81775149,e97fbe3,conservative
It makes me laugh that Dems hate the senate but want to get rid of the electoral college and go to popular vote. Like what?,blameitonthetetons1,e97fb43,conservative
Of course they are. That’s a guarantee as long as enough democrats want to appease their base and think it won’t affect their reelection chances. ,skarface6,e97g268,conservative
Unless something major happens that's a massive fail. Most people don't want that.,RedDevil5,e97g068,conservative
Did they learn nothing from Gingrich?,memberCP,e97g1k7,conservative
lol,soxfan90,e97fyj0,conservative
Of course they are,bumpy-meyers,e97fyxg,conservative
Well said. Investigations upon investigations while nothing gets done. ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97gnqg,conservative
The grand standing will be epic,eeeinator,e97gnnf,conservative
Poop,8K12,e97hra5,conservative
Yep 😕,Terra_green2,e97ik7j,conservative
"It’s kind of crazy. Jennifer Wexton (D) is expected to beat Barbara Comstock (R) in VA-10, a seat that has been Republican for decades. I think Virginia is officially going from purple to blue. Kind of a bummer. I’m worried what the Dems will do to our taxes and gun laws.",Iamyourbetter,e97364d,conservative
Nail biter! ,Zac1245,e9712vn,conservative
"That is always how Virginia is.  Looks like an R win, and then the northern counties like arlington/alexandria get counted and the R candidate loses.  It will likely be the same again tonight.                 ",TBSportsFan1254,e971j5v,conservative
"Because Stewart isn’t nearly as popular as Kaine is here. Personally, I wish that Freitas had been the candidate but it is what it is. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e9718zx,conservative
"That's how it was during the Presidential Election in 2016 as well until the big cities in the north checked in. 
",Vrael22,e971h7l,conservative
It's the districts reporting. I don't see any way Stewart comes within 10 points tonight when all is said and done.,pharmermummles,e971ae5,conservative
Only 44% reporting in the 6th.,Zac1245,e971pfc,conservative
That was pretty expected tho. ,Zac1245,e9721gk,conservative
"Baker is the incumbent. Massachusetts is weird like that. The governor before Baker was a Democrat, but before that they had Mitt Romney, Jane Swift, Paul Celucci, and Bill Weld, all Republicans.",HappyBelichick,e974gwl,conservative
"Hell yeah Baker is probably the most popular governor in the country, he's the incumbent ",Taygr,e974hqc,conservative
"Yeah, like MD Gov",Zac1245,e974jlf,conservative
Yes Baker is one of the most popular governors in the country. At least for a Republican in a historically Democrat state. Same with Hogan in Maryland and Sununu in Rhode island,mlbernardo,e974fac,conservative
Any particular reason for the swing?,the_tragic_wagon,e974ukb,conservative
This makes me extremely happy but I can’t share with anyone around me because I’m alone in my beliefs. Here’s to R. ,StrongAffordance,e974xma,conservative
"My wife saw the early numbers when she walked in the door, told me to throw a frozen pizza in the oven and rushed out to vote Cruz while cursing me for voting Dikeman, lol. ",FuckTimBeck,e976f8g,conservative
Halfway there lmao,Zac1245,e976i30,conservative
Getting there!!,Bronc27,e976dtx,conservative
Don't say this.,multiple4,e9771k8,conservative
3% reporting...,matts290,e978r0q,conservative
History.,PX32cluster,e97als2,conservative
yay,DL-Refugee,e97a8hf,conservative
True but we also had our own surprises to our benefit. ,MaddSim,e97bkhj,conservative
Fox and fivethirtyeight to. Means good chance for another supreme Court seat!,valmeister,e97d812,conservative
I bet its pissing them off to report it,gab907,e97dkxb,conservative
"Apparently a lot of people in Massachusetts, Michigan, Missouri, Montana, Kansas, New Hampshire, Vermont, and more. ",soxfan90,e97fb0u,conservative
Wisconsin would like a word. Please please please win Walker. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97f4nf,conservative
"unfortunately, a lot of people. ",tifuforreal,e97g7hl,conservative
He’s down a %. I’m getting nervous. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97gilg,conservative
Nelson is competing with Abrams for the tantrum prize.  ,stoffel_bristov,e98wixz,conservative
"It’s true, we do pull off some pretty nutty shit 😎",i_floop_the_pig,e97c6ci,conservative
"Sadly, Democrats will continue voting for the D , regardless of all the shit their party pulls off. 

Also a valid statement and I don't think either are that far fetched",mcal24,e97c9ys,conservative
Its literally Portland eugene and Corvallis ,kshebdhdbr,e97gwv9,conservative
Fucking hell even Salem went red. I'm so sick of this state. ,Vrael22,e97h1fh,conservative
"I...I like Willamette Valley wine, though...",8K12,e97h4pw,conservative
Portland rules the hinterlands again. State of Jefferson would cut off their tax revenue. ,InquisitorThorn,e97hz1u,conservative
"I hate to say it, but people voting for a 3rd party could have been the difference ",kshebdhdbr,e97h5bx,conservative
Yea they were pussies.  Now just flush them and prepare to take back what we lost.,tja_1478,e97lni6,conservative
If nothing gets done things stay the same,Taygr,e97buq2,conservative
"because midterms are more of a referendum on the president, and even though the country is over all in a good place right now trump has been antagonizing the left with very polarizing rhetoric which gets the vote out.",ersevni,e97crwr,conservative
"Because they want more free stuff, and they want to control *your* life. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e97c7ta,conservative
"Usually those people aren’t that bright. It’s like when theu say unemployment is at a low and people’s response are “well because people have to work two jobs.” Uhh, that is not how unemployment works.",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e97c0eo,conservative
"If you asked most people I would say they did not hear that much messaging on the economy in the last week. 

You should choose only one thing as a closing argument and not several. Most of what I heard was about the caravan.",memberCP,e97c6jz,conservative
https://twitter.com/r_keith_/status/1060011900879192069,memberCP,e97e1tj,conservative
"> They'd better abandon this hysterical, political correctness, intersectional, identify politics bullshit they've been pulling for the last decade. 

They didn't do it after a loss so what makes you think they'll do it after a win? They will never compromise when they know they'll inevitably win the demographic war at the current rate",dizzee_raskolnikov,e97b2jw,conservative
Drop Gun Control for God's sake.,TastelessSmell,e97azkm,conservative
History repeats itself. The Democrats will take a narrow House win as a vindication of their far-left identity politics and double down in 2020. Their candidate will lose by a landslide. ,psstein,e97b0wp,conservative
That’s actually probably an insult to Hillary,soxfan90,e97fnsf,conservative
Are you talking about Pocahontas?,Taygr,e97fm7w,conservative
"I honestly think dems winning the house will win trump a second term.  They will go crazier that usual with their drunken power and abuse it in the national limelight.  Two years of them doing nothing but screaming, “orange man bad!”  By the time the election comes! Many of the undecided will be sick of it and trump will get his second term, and seats will swing back to red.  ",jdizzle161,e97dkua,conservative
They can prevent a bunch of good stuff getting done tho. ,RigsbyQuist,e97dfw0,conservative
"[Styx](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3uKNHhFWS1w)

[Agenda Free](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kQ12HGmcK2E)

[RSBN](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FkGTPeJSbxw&feature=player_embedded_uturn)",IvankasFutureHusband,e972p5g,conservative
I think Daily Wire is starting a livestream at 5,8K12,e972l46,conservative
Give it time. We good.,memberCP,e975p8m,conservative
How much reporting? Missed it.,inconspicuoujavert,e975pet,conservative
"Showing 50 vs 49, for Cruz, with 1% showing. ",GFZDW,e975twj,conservative
50.1 - 49.3 Cruz now,TastelessSmell,e975x3y,conservative
I lost that last week,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9765tc,conservative
Prepare to open your wallets. I'm glad I got out. ,AMollenhauer,e976td3,conservative
"I’m in Wisconsin and **everyone** around me bitches about him constantly, yet I’m sure he’ll stay. ",CarbineGuy,e977kkc,conservative
Lol I don't see it at all. ,matts290,e97bh0s,conservative
His mannerisms are definitely similar. ,RigsbyQuist,e97bjzj,conservative
"ABC looks like it just called Cruz. 

[https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/texas-midterm-election-results/story?id=58394958](https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/texas-midterm-election-results/story?id=58394958)",OneImportantQuestion,e97c8mb,conservative
I sure hope that's the true true. ,GFZDW,e97cpl2,conservative
Long term I don’t think it works well for the Dems and 2020 we take it back. ,Zac1245,e97fu87,conservative
"I wouldn’t say it’s officially gone. The wall doesn’t really do anything, and it is a very large bargaining chip for the democrats to get some of their agenda passed. I see Trump giving up quite a bit in return. ",cetamega,e97fyyq,conservative
"I bet the wall turns virtual. 

Which actually is not that bad, bad naming aside.",memberCP,e97g3o6,conservative
Trying to out do Bob Beckel when he was with the 5. ,Themusician67,e97hdhl,conservative
go walker! ,tifuforreal,e97j9d7,conservative
"cnn is fake news 
",tifuforreal,e97j6ep,conservative
"Wait, which one? Did they finally call FL?",soxfan90,e97ij7q,conservative
i disagree-- i think democrats get gifted the understanding of cultural diversity for whatever reason -- it's great to see an R speak spanish. Shows the dems that it isnt only them with cultural connection. ,Sharkysharkson,e97jazi,conservative
Just thinking how media is going to have a field day with him tomorrow,bumpy-meyers,e97j7ep,conservative
I'm counting on someone makin another TYT compilation video. 2016 one was fucking gold. ,soxfan90,e97mdeh,conservative
"Not really. It was a pretty normal reaction in the direction against the party of the president,  (which pretty much always happens in the midterms), as opposed to the abnormally high surge Democrats were hoping for. Obviously Democrats made big gains in the house, but it wasn’t a massive blow out or anything.",SymmetricColoration,e97s21n,conservative
 Not even close. This could have happened any year. For a ‘wave’ of any color we would need to see something atypical. At most this is surprising in how unsurprising it is.,ithinkmynameismoose,e984pkq,conservative
They took the house. That means Trump's agenda is done for two years. ,Odoacer476CE,e97lsci,conservative
MT was not one I expected to pick up. That would be great.,pharmermummles,e97m4jh,conservative
"The party of the POTUS almost always loses the house in the midterms. This is anything but special, or a blue wave, it's business as usual.",severeneckpain,e97g4uj,conservative
"Over in politics they're already saying ""no one ever said/thought we'd win anything but the house.""",Odoacer476CE,e97g290,conservative
They’re definitely going to play it that way. Gird your loins because they’re going to crow about it here en masse.,skarface6,e97g409,conservative
Only reason he is keeping his seat I think,dkdodd52,e97836p,conservative
"California Transplants, but like I keep saying, relax and wait. ",zgh5002,e978d63,conservative
Me too ,XxtexasxX,e9787ck,conservative
"Damn right, what are they thinking...",tenshon,e978egy,conservative
"Exit polls put it around 65%, according to Fox, if I'm remembering correctly.

It's time, if you ask me. The Drug War has been lost. ",GFZDW,e97dv07,conservative
"excuse my ignorance, but what specifically happened today that makes this a probability?",claudi-oh-oh,e97fnhv,conservative
Technically retained,Taygr,e97fylc,conservative
Was already red,soxfan90,e97fxir,conservative
You're welcome!,colinpail,e97gcq8,conservative
Lol,brubeck5,e97h9rt,conservative
They still voted a Republican governor so I doubt the state as a whole will flip,kshebdhdbr,e978v68,conservative
"Have some faith in us Texans, the counting is not over.",dan1776,e979bj3,conservative
It’s been called against Cruz already?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e978y07,conservative
My guess is it has more to do with people not liking Cruz.  I don’t really like him to be honest. ,limoz33n,e9790lh,conservative
I'm more concerned about Maxine being head of the finance committee,Liberty_Pr1me,e97d5iu,conservative
Actually I hope she is. That only helps Trump.,RedDevil5,e97d4v0,conservative
AZ-2 ,Zac1245,e970v88,conservative
What's the worst that could happen. Impeach trump and we now get pence. I'm not worried about the senate. As long as most stay the same and a few flip red.,kshebdhdbr,e9720mp,conservative
It's flipped on us for Florida... at least it's not ground lost.,SendixBunny,e972yd1,conservative
panhandle votes havent been counted yet. It's gonna be close,aburks41,e9731ke,conservative
Just pulled ahead. ,MondayNightRawr,e974aih,conservative
Holy hell this is close. ,inconspicuoujavert,e9749k3,conservative
Dallas mainly. Conservative counties not really in yet,Enzo_SAWFT,e974n12,conservative
Can you imagine? I believe. ,GFZDW,e9768ej,conservative
It keeps going back and forth like 2016,i_floop_the_pig,e97689g,conservative
"It’s looking better than projections expected. 

This sounds familiar....",kroatone,e976bi6,conservative
Overall still seems likely for the libs but looking a little better for us.,DrudgeBreitbart,e976dfi,conservative
"@NateSilver538:

>""Well, I'm trying to do 6 things at once -- we think our live election day forecast is definitely being too aggressive and are going to put it on a more conservative setting where it waits more for projections/calls instead of making inferences from partial vote counts.""

He changed the projection. ",JustAnotherJon,e976jlf,conservative
Takes after her late father.,Zac1245,e976jsn,conservative
How reputable is this guy? ,steampunker13,e978dao,conservative
"By some guy. I won't be comfortable until a bigger outlet calls it. Florida is going so well right now (referring to the current condition of the state, not the election) and I'm so afraid of it getting effed up. ",Faraday314,e978go7,conservative
"The big urban areas will report first, all will go beto.  It's all about the rest of the state slowly trickling in. 

I still expect Cruz to win. ",Blu3Yeti,e978ms3,conservative
People are freaking out with like 3% reporting...,Zac1245,e978k94,conservative
It's heaps closer than it should be.,severeneckpain,e978svh,conservative
"Because its on the front of Drudge. 

2% of return are in.",RoundSimbacca,e978l7h,conservative
"160,000 vote lead right now...",TastelessSmell,e978k9n,conservative
Senate *,AMollenhauer,e978s1w,conservative
"Yes, but they aren’t doing off of stats, they are doing off of trY hard.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e979ocu,conservative
Fox just did,Marcheesio,e979mt2,conservative
Just saw that. Seems premature ,Ruckus45,e979qpp,conservative
Sad but it's probably true sadly ,valmeister,e979sfj,conservative
Now 50.4-48.5 Cruz lead,TastelessSmell,e979tok,conservative
Tomorrow,Taygr,e97aal6,conservative
"Pretty fucking soon I hope. Never voted for an R governor in Florida until tonight, let's go Desantis!",piper06w,e97ad1u,conservative
"Renacci has already conceded, unfortunately.  Brown has pretty much won, which kind of confuses me, because it looks like we are going to have Republicans for Gov, Sec. of State, Auditor and Treasurer.   ",bismarck309,e97becg,conservative
Kathleen Sibelius was the last one.,Hillary_For_Prison,e97by98,conservative
"Helena, Bozeman and Missoula ",kshebdhdbr,e97cftb,conservative
"Californians, go home!",rf-engineer,e97d44p,conservative
The biggest cities there also happen to be college towns.,14thAndVine,e97coiz,conservative
"Same. We NEED Walker to pull out that victory. It’s getting tighter. I was worried earlier, but I’m feeling better about it. ",blameitonthetetons1,e97ezsj,conservative
"Senate confirms judicial appointees. To me, that’s more important than legislation. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97g47k,conservative
Senate is a bigger deal. Six year terms and they do appointments. We will revote on the house in two years. ,Zac1245,e97fwiy,conservative
"Bigger deal to wipe out those Dem incumbents. Will be much harder for Dems to win back Senate control now. Also note that Dems only passed the ACA because of a lot of the red state Dems that lost tonight. Would be much harder for a future Democratic administration to get what it wants without those Dems. In contrast, we can win back the House in two years. ",soxfan90,e97fwxx,conservative
"Obviously controlling both houses of Congress is better than controlling one. There wasn’t any real threat of the Democrats taking the senate, so it isn’t a one or the other situation. 

Of the two houses, the senate is the better one to keep. It allows for appointing sympathetic (some would say activist) justices. ",cetamega,e97g88d,conservative
[Sums it up](https://twitter.com/DavidAFrench/status/1060018754065784832),memberCP,e97g8xd,conservative
"Gridlock will hopefully mean the government does as little as possible instead of awful laws. 
",skarface6,e97gaie,conservative
Still counting the cemetery vote like NY,vampslayer53,e97gi1h,conservative
"I mean, outside of the governor race there aren’t any surprises. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97gk5c,conservative
Not even remotely surprised. The democrats would raise minimum wage up to $10000 and destroy the country.,ithinkmynameismoose,e984xtr,conservative
He's just started to get baggage after his statewide campaigns,Taygr,e97jzdk,conservative
he's gonna pull it off. Milwaukee and Madison are all in. Incredible. The dude is a fucking animal.,RedDevil5,e97klty,conservative
I’m pretty biased as a Wisconsinite but I love Walker. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97kusx,conservative
"They'll overplay their hand. No legislation will get passed, they'll likely be pressured into impeaching trump by their base, and that will play right into 2020. That could backfire on them like a fucking nuke if they do it too.",Zyrioun,e97ajri,conservative
">evil often has its day.

Dems aren't evil. Don't be needlessly polarizing. They're just misguided.",AdVerbera,e97af9x,conservative
The big thing is that it won’t be a route. ,Gotta_go_fast_22,e97af9h,conservative
Seems like Indiana is leaning R ,AMollenhauer,e973i8q,conservative
"Relax. It's very early.

But yeah Cruz isn't the most likable person.",lion27,e978af9,conservative
70%. ,AMollenhauer,e979eq4,conservative
"Texas has a ton of tiny precincts that haven’t reported. It’s 6% of precincts, but 70% of the vote. 

Senators are elected by the vote, not by number of precincts so the percentage of the vote is more accurate to report. ",cetamega,e97bgwa,conservative
18% now,snoppballe,e97eyhw,conservative
"She was essentially unopposed due to the district being hardcore D. (Heh)

The shocking part was her winning over the incumbent in the primary. But when you promise socialist dreams to a party losing its identity and veering hard left, she had a cake walk. ",justhere2havefun,e97gafx,conservative
Safe D district,soxfan90,e97g4zx,conservative
"I love when you say this, people say, well pussy grabbing Trump, says stupid shit like, use rifles against people throwing rocks.

Well Cortez is an economics major who doesn't know how unemployment works. ",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e97gj04,conservative
"She has a big ole ""D"" next to her name on the ballot. ",steampunker13,e97g2ro,conservative
Her district is uber liberal...,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e97g2vp,conservative
Same way Bernie won VT,Enzo_SAWFT,e97ga51,conservative
"As an Albertan looking in on the US, hearing “New Democratic Party” gives me chills. I don’t want to be reminded of the leftys ruining my province. Thank god the next election here is on or before May 31 next year",Crashviper,e97hufy,conservative
exit polls,aburks41,e9777xx,conservative
NYT always calls blue states early and red states late. See Indiana ,mbarnar,e977eij,conservative
"If you win Union, Hudson, Essex, Bergen, Middlesex, Mercer and Camden you win. Thats were the big cities are and theres nothing the rural/suburban counties can do about it. Look at a map of the counties election results, it's the same every year

Also Hugin was a garbage candidate and the state GOP fucked up a golden opportunity",beachmedic23,e979g2u,conservative
"Ginsburg retires to teach at the America Samoa School of Law. 
Go Sand Crabs!",Rabidraccoon76,e97bsqy,conservative
Nah Thomas could have 10-15 more years tbh,mm1255,e97c09a,conservative
It's easier to attack someone than to defend yourself. ,snoppballe,e97ek1k,conservative
It’s pretty American to favor divided government,yackippo,e97fko7,conservative
Let's not encourage brigading. ,pharmermummles,e97cvrm,conservative
"Less blue wave, more blue trickle. We kept the Senate which means Mitch can ram a buttload of young conservative judges. That's what I really care about. ",brubeck5,e97hzpj,conservative
"Sadly so. 



You get an abortion! You get an abortion! Every one gets an abortion!",Themusician67,e97hqwc,conservative
Sadly,kshebdhdbr,e97gerb,conservative
".7% reporting bro, chill for a bit haha",Zac1245,e974x8k,conservative
"Nah, dog. That's gonna be a no from me. ",GFZDW,e974ycy,conservative
By land area?,memberCP,e975dbo,conservative
"People who are on the left are more likely to live in big cities. Also people who live in poor areas of large cities are enticed by Dems talking points of handouts, and the same areas tend to be largely populated by minorities who have been trained that Republicans are racist and want the worst for them.",chudsonracing,e97660x,conservative
Free stuff and unions,tehForce,e97637p,conservative
Good article on that here: https://www.forbes.com/sites/markhendrickson/2012/11/15/what-explains-the-partisan-divide-between-urban-and-non-urban-areas/#5f16423533ea,tenshon,e976454,conservative
I feel like that's a ridiculously premature call...,justific4tion,e9790ip,conservative
How is that possible lmao,aburks41,e978xpk,conservative
Lol now they say 31 seats.,NuclearMisogynyist,e979cbo,conservative
"It says as many as, now updated to 31. This isn't news
",pharmermummles,e979cbp,conservative
"I mean, we all knew we weren’t taking the house. ",blameitonthetetons1,e978wtt,conservative
"Stewart was a lousy candidate. 

If Freitas made it through the primary, I think it would’ve been gone our way. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97azvv,conservative
Lol. Considering what Kasich became...I guess you could call it a flip. :) ,Bostonbuckeye,e97gqom,conservative
Kasich held it so it's not exactly a flip,Gunsofglory,e97goy1,conservative
Some of them in r/politics seem to be happy. ,AMollenhauer,e97efgm,conservative
That seat was a lost cause. Braun is promising.,SendixBunny,e972ueq,conservative
I do too... doesn't look like its happening :(,colinpail,e974gzw,conservative
"https://twitter.com/NumbersMuncher/status/1059979491374718981

It swings back in forth.",memberCP,e97624e,conservative
https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/?ex_cid=extra_banner,tenshon,e976281,conservative
Actual forecast https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/,memberCP,e9762mp,conservative
93% ,inconspicuoujavert,e9768g2,conservative
I think texas is just slow usually.,memberCP,e976ftn,conservative
This is more of a testament to the fact that Cruz isn't a likable human being than it is a blue wave in Texas.,3lauYourMind,e976ikz,conservative
Cruz by 4-6%,zgh5002,e976klx,conservative
"Cruz will win, there is knife edge stuff elsewhere, including the House majority.                  ",tau_decay,e976pm2,conservative
2% of precincts are in. ,zgh5002,e977x3o,conservative
[deleted],,e977w4c,conservative
That is a good question. CNN website says 54%. NYT + Politico say 2% on their websites.,caffienatedjedi,e977zoe,conservative
I see Fox at 50% and the new york times shows 2.1%  - my guess is it's popular vote vs precincts reporting,TastelessSmell,e977xpw,conservative
https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-senate-elections.html,aCreditGuru,e977xww,conservative
https://www.politico.com/election-results/2018/texas/,Zac1245,e977yjw,conservative
Where the hell are they pulling +30 seats for the Dems?,Vrael22,e97akx0,conservative
"One one hand, it's reassuring they have Cruz at 95% chance of winning, but how are they estimating Nelson will pass Scott?",rob_s_458,e97at4r,conservative
"30-35. But let's be real, there's no wave and they're losing multiple Senate seats. ",RedDevil5,e97bzey,conservative
"It will be a narrow majority, I say under 10. so from 218D-228D",memberCP,e97ccsw,conservative
CNN just called it for Londrigan. ,steampunker13,e97fcbf,conservative
Fine by me. Would be temporary. New GOP rep in 2020 almost guaranteed. ,soxfan90,e97fpgc,conservative
He’s a dick anyway ,yackippo,e97gcyj,conservative
Dems gerrymandered PA last year,tja_1478,e97kemf,conservative
He's ahead by 7 right now,Odoacer476CE,e97ltn9,conservative
Yes.,RedDevil5,e97ljc5,conservative
Same could be said for rest of state but yes that's a bad development.,RedDevil5,e97nbnh,conservative
"Probably just to get people to vote. What's he supposed to say? ""We have no chance of keeping the House"" ",RedDevil5,e97nu2b,conservative
I assume this is comedy?,justific4tion,e979a9w,conservative
"Ahhh, an oldie but a goodie.
",DangerToDemocracy,e979ew3,conservative
lol wut,DrudgeBreitbart,e979a39,conservative
"Dude if you are that stressed about this then you need to not watch this, or get some help...

It's not THAT big of a deal. You should be able to handle this without being an asshole to your mom.",multiple4,e9799uh,conservative
Hi CSPAN Pete! ,Highenergyperson,e979i53,conservative
WSB,OfficialCheeseNips,e979icb,conservative
Where are you seeing 50% in? I'm only seeing 2% lol,mbarnar,e977jk2,conservative
Im only seeing 2% in?,Zac1245,e977jou,conservative
Not even two percent of precincts are in... ,zgh5002,e977is9,conservative
Don't look to Fox for those 'in' numbers. ,GFZDW,e977mwq,conservative
I think you're looking at Beto being at 51% and thinking that's the % reporting.,lion27,e977o1v,conservative
Mostly cities and not rural texas,stanleythemanley44,e977xjp,conservative
">You may have noticed that our real-time forecast has moved toward Republicans in the House. It’s being too aggressive, in my opinion. The model sees that a bunch of “likely Republican” districts (particularly in Florida) are now 100 percent likely to go red. But there hasn’t been the chance for Democrats to clinch many equivalent likely Democratic districts",MBBIBM,e975x9o,conservative
You serious? It was at like 12% chance last I checked. ,valmeister,e9760k2,conservative
Wait what do you mean (sorry just getting deeper into politics haven't paid attention to a midterm this closely and I haven't heard the lingo),ipokecows,e976399,conservative
its now 35%,StJohnTheSwift,e975wf5,conservative
It seems way too early to me. Praying that they’re wrong!!,sydazzles,e979ynq,conservative
Why do you say this?,mkgandkembafan,e97dlbx,conservative
Gun control is coming I suppose. ,Zac1245,e97ezuh,conservative
"With like 5839172548502727 millennials moving there by the hour I’m not surprised. Meh, hope for the best I guess ",HumbleRaspberry15,e97g4n9,conservative
"Welcome to gridlock, my friend. ",GFZDW,e97e3sh,conservative
How close does it have to be so she isn’t the speaker of the house ?,Derp2638,e97dklv,conservative
It was fairly expected.  But it's no blue wave - it's actually worse than the usual gains for midterms for the non-incumbent party.,thensfw2,e97c0yt,conservative
Clinton won more than 23 R controlled house districts. Simply wining all of those gives them majority.,memberCP,e97ceu1,conservative
"We still get judicial appointments and Cocaine Mitch can block the extremist bills from the House. That’s a win. 

Plus, looks like the House loses will be less than previous administrations. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97fn20,conservative
I don’t even understand what this meant. Can you explain it to me?,SexAddictRecovery,e97hgfi,conservative
"Nate Silver (11:27 PM):  
I’ve been told not to expect a call in Florida’s Senate race tonight, where we could easily be in recount territory again.",rob_s_458,e97htsc,conservative
Doesn’t sound like it. They’re having Internet problems that resulted in poll workers having to physically transport results on USB drives. ,soxfan90,e97hs3k,conservative
95%. the media is the enemy ,osamanobama,e97d97m,conservative
3% reporting. ,zgh5002,e978tbl,conservative
It is 3% reporting. No idea where you're getting that. ,reddit--hivemind,e978up6,conservative
NYT has Texas @ 3% -- are they really that behind?,justific4tion,e978pzq,conservative
Funny,tenshon,e978wq7,conservative
There should be a number of live streams in YouTube. Load it up and search. ,SexAddictRecovery,e973ksk,conservative
Stickied the fox stream at the top,tehForce,e974jig,conservative
"76% chance of having a majority, not 76% of the seats. If they win it, it will be within 10 seats.",SendixBunny,e974gum,conservative
"House is simple majority. As long as they vote lockstep, which they generally do, it won't make much difference how much they win by.",pharmermummles,e9748e3,conservative
Relax. The heavy hitters for Beto already hit and Cruz is leading. ,zgh5002,e976jw0,conservative
"It's less than 1% reporting, so every time a precinct reports it fluctuates wildly.",rob_s_458,e976kkz,conservative
From Amy Schumer. Because it’s the only jokes she has.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e976lfo,conservative
538,JustAnotherJon,e976o2u,conservative
In the senate they are hitting a red wall,Taygr,e9772o5,conservative
They were expected losses regardless,tja_1478,e9771sf,conservative
"I do not think at this point you can say a wave is possible. I would say a wave is Dems winning an unusual number of seats from expected, so from 20-30 to high 40s or more. Very far from the mean. 

If it was a wave still it would extremely unusual for this not to show in many other non house races.",memberCP,e97760t,conservative
"Looking more like a ripple than a wave, at least in the House. A narrow D majority House will suck on many levels, but it's not going to be entrenched, nor will it have any measure of unity. If D's get a 1 member majority, then all it takes is one to muck things up for them ... like keep Pelosi and the leftists out of leadership.",RoundSimbacca,e977f4r,conservative
VA-10 already flipped to blue,superdude411,e9783q8,conservative
Yoder?,soxfan90,e97b7v7,conservative
Damnit... I live in the KS 3rd district and was hopeful Yoder would pull it off. Ridiculous how many adds were being blasted everywhere for Davids. Non-stop lies from the left here,ecfreeman,e97bkc1,conservative
Who won?,dan4daniel,e97bl1z,conservative
Probably not. But the blue wave was a lie. That in and of itself is a victory. ,Gotta_go_fast_22,e97cpnc,conservative
very slim chance,top-perro,e97chc8,conservative
No,oclotty,e97cre0,conservative
PLEASE,GFZDW,e97dewo,conservative
Yes but its slim based on national polling for the last presidential election,Vrael22,e97f0cn,conservative
almost impossible. but not literally impossible. ,tifuforreal,e97gau2,conservative
Right now the thread has 113 upvotes but over 1k comments. ,AmericanHunter,e97ibvt,conservative
Could be 55 Republican seats if all breaks our way,Taygr,e97jh0y,conservative
"Still waiting on Arizona, Montana, and Nevada. Nothing out of Nevada yet. Arizona looking red but plenty of vote still out. Montana looking blue but plenty of vote still out. 

I think 51 Republicans so far. ",soxfan90,e97ji5w,conservative
"That's good news, he's probably the most ""woke"" GOP congressman at the moment. The Dems really wanted to bring him down, I'm glad he held on. ",Trevor_awesome,e97kbjt,conservative
Agreed. Looking great for Walker!,pharmermummles,e97luj3,conservative
"Apparently 50,000 absentee ballots weren’t counted in MKE. 😬",blameitonthetetons1,e97n6jv,conservative
"Alright, debby-downer, it just started. Take a chill pill",jonk012,e971rjt,conservative
"Nah, dog. Unless there's a serious whiplash in 2020.",GFZDW,e978gkm,conservative
Will never happen.  Dems vote lock step and the GOP has too many warring factions.,tja_1478,e97hrrb,conservative
"i hope so, but I doubt it",TastelessSmell,e97h7u3,conservative
Ha!,soxfan90,e97h4jn,conservative
LOL ,MaddSim,e97hegm,conservative
Lol the conservative subreddit has that quote about the left being extremely dangerous. The liberal subreddits are talking about the fascist right. The divide seems to be growing. ,medman010204,e97hnqc,conservative
"I hope so too, but I don't think it's likely.",severeneckpain,e97hrk8,conservative
Lololol ,Grande_Oso_Hermoso,e97gfth,conservative
Miami is barely in though :/,yackippo,e9741wf,conservative
I want to get optimistic but there is still a LOT of vote still left in Broward and Dade counties...,Killabrewster,e9741pi,conservative
Scott is a RINO for me on gun control and always will be. ,GFZDW,e974kqs,conservative
Which projection are you using? I'm still seeing betting odds favor Dems at about 70%. I'm hopeful though.,pharmermummles,e974qic,conservative
I think you mean a ruble flip comrade! How dare the Kremlin control 50% of our electorate! ,tiger81775149,e974z7c,conservative
"We should, but the losses in the gubernatorial races are what’s really going to hurt. These governors will still be in power when redistricting happens in 2021. ",soxfan90,e97g47a,conservative
This large of a Democrat turnout in a midterm election is not a good sign at all for the 2020 election. ,cetamega,e97gftf,conservative
"It's not impossible, but it has been like 70 years since a president lost the House in his first term and gained it back in his second. I suppose on the flipside, we will have a pretty unbalanced Senate in Republicans favor and the two tend to reflect each other. ",S_D_W_2,e97gh18,conservative
"He's not gonna lose. It's big city votes coming in right now, not conservative rural votes",aburks41,e977pde,conservative
You cant call him losing with 2% in bro lol,Zac1245,e977qkv,conservative
2% reporting...,justific4tion,e977ptm,conservative
Cruz is down less than 1% with all the major cities in and none of the rural counties. Its about to pull away in favor of Cruz. ,zgh5002,e977z45,conservative
"I'm not enjoying watching this.  2.1% reporting though, so holding hope",TastelessSmell,e977oxa,conservative
Cruz is really just fucking us on his own,Taygr,e977os4,conservative
4% of precincts are reporting. ,zgh5002,e979e0u,conservative
Where do you see that? Google has 4 percent ,TheShakinBacon,e9799dn,conservative
We kind of knew it was coming. It really hurt having so many retire at one time. Kinda wish some would stuck around for name recognition. This isnt highlighted enough as to why some seats are lost. ,MaddSim,e97bndr,conservative
If its an expected win based off polling. So people who were polling like 15+,Zac1245,e97490f,conservative
Exit polls,rollingrock16,e974ac5,conservative
Maybe when a big county flips? Or such a massive district votes one way? Couldn't tell you,inconspicuoujavert,e974anu,conservative
Early voting + exit polls. ,memberCP,e9752s8,conservative
its the dallas vote driving it right now. We're good lol,aburks41,e974pbp,conservative
No. ,memberCP,e974mm5,conservative
It's like 1% of votes counted. Way to early to tell anything,BFunPhoto,e974ljg,conservative
Not likely. ,GFZDW,e974moy,conservative
Gave a victory speech about an hour ago. Would be funny if Renacci overtakes him but I don't see it happening.,jdbewls,e97c2rq,conservative
What areas are still out?,soxfan90,e97bw8v,conservative
but governorship and senate are still in play,yackippo,e973ywz,conservative
I disagree. I did a district by district analysis over the weekend and had the GOP keeping the House without winning either district. It was pretty clear that even under an optimal outcome those seats were going to the Democrats.,gprime,e9745qo,conservative
"If it provides any solace, the fact that we only lost the House shows that we actually outperformed by historical standards",Ritter97,e97b6m7,conservative
"Suburban Flight is a problem, though not surprising. 

This could have been a far worse night.",memberCP,e97bof0,conservative
PA dem gerrymandering netted them 3 seats,tja_1478,e97l2jc,conservative
"Some had it tossup and some had it lean but personally, it was always lean. ",Zac1245,e972zs7,conservative
"I live in NoVA and figured she was doomed. For the last couple months practically every other ad on YouTube for me has been: ""Barbara *TRUMP*stock: with TRUMP 97% of the time, even when he's WRONG for *WOMEN*!""",PubliusVA,e973c5f,conservative
"soft toss up, but most people thought it would go blue",yackippo,e972xv1,conservative
"This shouldn't be a question. 

The NYT is incredibly biased, but actually has some real journalists working for it. CNN is entertainment TV.",psstein,e975a6w,conservative
"I wish I had your optimism. Bob is gonna get crushed in New Haven, Bridgeport, and Hartford. I hope he can hold on and win, but I'm doubtful.

Most interesting thing I noticed is that ~3600 people voted in Glastonbury which is a town of 35k. That's terrible lol.",severeneckpain,e97cjru,conservative
"Nope, we won't. Too many high population (relatively speaking) deep blue cities haven't been reported yet. If Stefanowski does hold on and win, it'll be by a razor thin margin. ",severeneckpain,e97liqd,conservative
"Would like to know too, Im getting nothing on NYT.",RedDevil5,e97mp6x,conservative
House was pretty set on turning no matter what but it's not nearly the victory Dems were looking for. ,Gunsofglory,e97ggwd,conservative
"Because the House isn't what matters in the long run. It's state legislatures and the Senate. 

",psstein,e97gpy0,conservative
Just speculating but it’s probably because we’re doing will in the senate and governor races but were expected to lose the house ,i_floop_the_pig,e97gm3t,conservative
Because a lot of people don’t recognize it for what it is. They hear “free stuff” after a life time of not understanding individual freedom is and run with it.  ,Gotta_go_fast_22,e9715jn,conservative
It dropped from 16% reporting to 7%. ,zgh5002,e97abor,conservative
Where does this rollercoaster end?!,arogozine,e97abxi,conservative
"Down by 30k votes now

wait - 26k",TastelessSmell,e97ad2l,conservative
We didn't need the house for Kavanaugh? ,AMollenhauer,e97egdi,conservative
They are working the panhandle,tehForce,e974d2w,conservative
Why?,oclotty,e97czjo,conservative
It was a horrible amendment that should've never gotten to the ballots.   ,bismarck309,e97d5z1,conservative
"So I am. With many of my family members having issues with drugs and jail time, I know how important it is for people to be able to get help. You can just watch them spiral downward into the hole of drug addiction. As 16-year-old making more money an hour than my own mother was just odd. Over the last couple of years, she has since recovered mostly due to state-funded programs and is getting back on the right track. It would have been a big win for people struggling with addiction for that issue to pass.",colinpail,e97d2gq,conservative
No he isn't. ,zgh5002,e978k4b,conservative
"538 has it at 93% Cruz, 8% Beto. Yes. 101%. Not sure what to make of it. ",gstratton27,e978ktn,conservative
Where do you see that?,renew123,e978lbh,conservative
"Youre so misinformed, he didnt just hand out money.",windstarke,e970tce,conservative
"Purest stuff like this holds us back against the Dems.  Your fabled pure ideological candidate doesn't exist.  When you latch on to single issues as a reason not to vote for someone, you just divide us from within.  The Dems are much better at closing ranks to rally around their own.  I wish we could do better.    ",TBSportsFan1254,e971tue,conservative
"You mean kowtow to the media’s narrative.

Thank you John McCain for Obamacare, another guy who “stood up to Trump” by fucking over his constitutuents ",gster50,e97fbti,conservative
lol,WAIST_DEEP_IN_WOMEN,e97f0e5,conservative
????????,xJownage,e97f3zl,conservative
"No, lol. Never read into <1% results.",SendixBunny,e973u9n,conservative
CRUZ IS AHEAD NOW OMG,DrudgeBreitbart,e9741sd,conservative
At least on the bright side maybe they'll realize this mistake they made in 2020,Taygr,e9745up,conservative
Me too. This guy is going to make the population of Illinois drop even more. ,AMollenhauer,e9748iz,conservative
"It's so fucking weird how libs/progs scream CORPORATIONS CORPORATIONS CORPORATIONS  
. . .  and then vote for Pritzker. ",tiger81775149,e974k83,conservative
"This isn’t a big win for the dems. Usually incumbent party loses by a lot. So yeah.

Also, lol blue wave lol.",hulk_hogans_alt,e97gh67,conservative
"Not really. It's normal, and certainly wasn't a Blue Wave.

Dems underperformed today.",ShillinTheVillain,e97dpxj,conservative
Username does not check out ,multiple4,e97hdyq,conservative
"Lol I can’t wait until he gives it to you and you all realize it was a huge waste of time, not that it would keep any of you from coming up with some other retarded excuse to investigate him. Oh wait, you already did that with Russiagate ha lulz",flinstone001,e97i3pp,conservative
"Technically no, the House alone can simply demand them and the IRS will turn them over. Trump would have no say in the matter.",memberCP,e97h9f4,conservative
Just move to Europe already lol,CITY_F0X,e97hmnt,conservative
Trump has reinvigorated the party. What are you talking about?,IHaveAPersian,e975mhx,conservative
https://media.giphy.com/media/TL6poLzwbHuF2/giphy.gif,pgifford1987,e975n3k,conservative
Maybe we shouldn't have had stale opponents going into the election.,ipokecows,e975jq6,conservative
Wat,cipher_six,e97eb4x,conservative
How is Ginsburg doing?,memberCP,e97f17i,conservative
Though if we can get a large lead in the senate it won't be competitive again until 2022.  By that time you have to figure Souter and Ginsburg will be out.,Taygr,e97etwd,conservative
Excited for that 3rd SCOTUS pick?,i_floop_the_pig,e97f2gg,conservative
"I'm feeling like this is a troll...Wall funding will likely happen anyways, Trump would've repealed obamacare already, his tax returns are pretty much a no-go after what happened with Maddow....yeah no.",xJownage,e97fbwi,conservative
We’ll get ya next time ,yackippo,e97fbmd,conservative
Imagine being this petty. Glad I’m not you,BrokenTrashcan,e970ptv,conservative
"You're gonna have to go somewhere else for that.

Edit: I'll provide you a link:

#/r/politics",amjourdan,e970mg4,conservative
">>I'm just here for delicious white male tears.

About what? Democracy working? U.S. citizens being engaged in healthy political contest? 

I love this. I wish EVERY election had politicians scrutinized, investigated, and challenged as heartily as has happened the past 4 months. This is glorious.",monkeiboi,e970w59,conservative
Guys I think I found an NPC.,arogozine,e9710af,conservative
I enjoyed your tears 2 years ago. First election I’ve “won” since being an adult. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e97185z,conservative
I too have my Leftist Tears Tumbler ready ,i_floop_the_pig,e9718ce,conservative
https://youtu.be/6DRyGZbSZUM plenty here my guy. I gotchu,inconspicuoujavert,e970u8i,conservative
Imagine saying this about any other race or about women. How you people feel like you’re morally superior while being racist and sexist is mind boggling to me ,KillaB33z,e971p0y,conservative
And you call us the racists...,ShillinTheVillain,e978mhy,conservative
For what?,ShillinTheVillain,e97aa8j,conservative
But they won't get the Senate so that doesn't really mean anything.,caffienatedjedi,e97a92j,conservative
Yeah that wouldn't cause a political meltdown.,curagus,e97a89u,conservative
Bahhahahhahahahhaha,blameitonthetetons1,e97a9ga,conservative
They were projected to take it for a while. They cant just impeach him on a whim. There is nothing to impeach him on. And the Senate still has a say which we should win,MaddSim,e97ae8x,conservative
But will the Senate find him guilty at the trial? ,Smashin_n_Dashin,e97adji,conservative
Did you come up with that observation on your own?  That’s been an accepted fact of a possible outcome ,renew123,e97a9n0,conservative
Why do people vote for Debbie Stabenow? She done nothing for Michigan! She only come to our state every 6 years to beg for votes. 18 years of nothing. ,gusto911,e97a0ya,conservative
Mods please ban this guy. ,steampunker13,e979mf8,conservative
Clean your room and pay your mom rent,dkdodd52,e978zpa,conservative
Just stop. You’re being really annoying ,i_floop_the_pig,e978yy1,conservative
Ban,AMollenhauer,e97903r,conservative
Are you saying you LIKE BEER? ,doobsftw,e97g9cf,conservative
"One analyst just said ""I know we..work  for fox...but how we go from 56% chance democrats retake, to absolute  certainty? i don't know about that"".",Zyrioun,e97a4tv,conservative
I have two essays due tonight and I am going to spend my time watching this instead. God dammit. ,steampunker13,e97asog,conservative
Did CBS call TX to Beto?,DL-Refugee,e97axb9,conservative
And then it collapses during our grandchildren's.,jd_porter,e97bbwr,conservative
I don’t want to be forced to live in a socialist country 😔,-----Kyle-----,e97b9gr,conservative
Over my dead body.,Zyrioun,e97beob,conservative
Then this country better spilt ,trolliamnot,e97care,conservative
And he should,MaddSim,e97hiaf,conservative
If we get 54 senate seats then we are likely to hold the senate till 2022 when RBG would be 89,Taygr,e97frdm,conservative
I think Thomas may decide to retire now. ,punishedpat76,e97fs0m,conservative
Being 29 is elderly. Waiting for my social security check any time now.....,BTFU_POTFH,e978w6d,conservative
Thank. God.,N0RM1N,e97augz,conservative
It's ok. I for one appreciate the passion and the concern. ,zgh5002,e97cwng,conservative
"Yes, it has been called for Cruz for a bit now. ",steampunker13,e97fydn,conservative
I wanna believe it's true but you're probably right ,GFZDW,e97cw3y,conservative
As in Ted will finish at 54-56% ,zgh5002,e97a6ut,conservative
But they were SO outraged about Roy Moore...,YankeeBlues21,e97g4if,conservative
"> Is this 2016 again?!?!

Oh, god, I hope so. That night was probably the most amusing political scene I've ever experienced. Just the complete and total meltdowns all around me were so god damn funny.",mnslice,e975xf8,conservative
Cmon Teddy!,blameitonthetetons1,e977asd,conservative
[deleted],,e977io3,conservative
Buy them anyways yo ,UncleRedGreen,e977ckm,conservative
Literally 90% of the remaining vote is rural. ,zgh5002,e979off,conservative
"I've heard new projections are saying 8 mil on the radio. We'll see. That would make sense, Beto getting a good turnout, but Cruz pulling it out in a larger vote than once imagined. 

&#x200B;",gstratton27,e979pbg,conservative
Only every 10 minutes lol,yoyowatup,e97fb6k,conservative
More like idiot hive mind ,Chastethrow316420,e97f4ex,conservative
Oh dear Lord! That's a future NO ONE wants. ,mfisch4,e97a9o6,conservative
It wouldn't be a huge shock. Pelosi is widely despised. ,psstein,e97a88z,conservative
"538 is projecting a +2 dem majority. 

So yes.",memberCP,e97abv5,conservative
There’s a lot of these new Democrats who say they won’t support her. We’ll see.,rjohnson99,e97cca3,conservative
until they ban you ,tifuforreal,e97epsb,conservative
Except 2002.,Hillary_For_Prison,e97bqvd,conservative
Well damn Republicans go out and vote to keep your majority idiots.,the-divine-comedy,e97bq69,conservative
"I think it's stuff like thinking they already did their job getting their guy into office and then the reality of politics sets in over the first two years and their guy doesn't immediately keep all his promises so they give him the finger.

Fast forward two years later and they're all riled up again, trying to get keep their guy in office",SouthernTrumpVet,e97btkf,conservative
"Because it’s easy to rail against the party in power, and not offer any meaningful policy platforms.  Which is exactly what happened",mm1255,e97c4lr,conservative
Please...,DL-Refugee,e979zmk,conservative
NOOOOO,steampunker13,e97a6yv,conservative
Will that guy turn RINO on Trump?,programmingguy,e97bspw,conservative
"It could have been worse... but now this means we'll get almost nothing done.  No border wall, no spending cuts, no further tax cuts... essentially it will be endless investigations for the next two years",ltdshred,e97g51e,conservative
I have Democratic friends that hate Kate Brown; that's how bad she's been. ,Vrael22,e971f7m,conservative
"He seems to attract the moderates in bend, plus we have everyone voting for him out of hatred for kate.",kshebdhdbr,e971fst,conservative
"I actually got to meet him a few days ago (I work at OSU and he came in with his family). Super nice guy, and completely fine with talking through any of his policies! ",cowboyfan08,e971uud,conservative
"Fellow Oregonian here, I’m fairly young and I guess I don’t realize the bad effects Kate has had on our state can you fill me in on them? Also what did you think of measure of 102? ",batman-34,e973x74,conservative
"Brat. Every time. I tried a SPAMburger once. BIG mistake.

Please note that I have no idea who these candidates are or what they're running for. ",somegaijin42,e9732t8,conservative
I mean have you googled transgender surgery?,TedyCruz,e971dgv,conservative
Agreed but I expected 10 points for Cruz ,GFZDW,e975wxt,conservative
$70m+ on Beto and half as much on Cruz. Half of Betos money from out of state. ,GFZDW,e976kih,conservative
"SPS won't just be a gold mine, it'll be gold, platinum, and diamonds all in one.",rob_s_458,e976mrx,conservative
Being dumber and more erratic than usual,multiple4,e976kdf,conservative
Crying a lot,lion27,e9775p5,conservative
It will be according to headlines,greeneyedunicorn2,e97b2kx,conservative
Hey ya never know!,StevensCassidy2020,e97az4w,conservative
13%,i_floop_the_pig,e97bfl8,conservative
It looked like it might have flipped but it held red,Enzo_SAWFT,e9763bm,conservative
"Its indicative of whether or not the election is a wave. Its starting to look like the majority may be up for grabs, but not a significant majority. ",yackippo,e9768d8,conservative
"It was considered a bell-weather district. If D's won, it could indicate a blue wave. A close R race probably indicates what everybody expected tonight - Dems take House, R's keep Senate",mlbernardo,e9763sa,conservative
"supposedly the ""bellwether"" for the blue wave. Barr winning shows that we might keep the house, but it will be very close",aburks41,e9764n9,conservative
It was considered one of the tossups with a Republican incumbent. There are many of them but it’s an early indicator of if there’s a blue wave and Dem blowout. ,latotokyo123,e976578,conservative
"Yeah, they picked up 9 with ~200 seats called. This is not good.",superdude411,e97ckf3,conservative
It's good to know running away from a DWI crash is a-okay for public office in Texas. ^^/s,GFZDW,e97clp4,conservative
I hear you but Florida still loses bigly due to Scott. ,GFZDW,e97enwh,conservative
Pretty good eh?,colinpail,e971xlh,conservative
Beto has more support outside of Texas than he does in Texas. He would make a really decent run in the primary. ,zgh5002,e976q6y,conservative
"She’s not even old enough, is she?",scarvalho555,e9777ky,conservative
I'm getting 51 to 47% O'Rourke in the lead. But it's just 2% reporting.,jonk012,e976uee,conservative
Lol,8K12,e97elv0,conservative
Ok this is funny,ISwallowedALego,e97e5xx,conservative
"And damned near won the 50th, his opponent’s home state, only losing it by 1,000 votes. ",soxfan90,e97gxv4,conservative
Electorate was very different back then obviously.,the-divine-comedy,e97h7z8,conservative
"Still a longshot, but these numbers are better than expected.",JustAnotherJon,e974k89,conservative
538 is moving BIG,JustAnotherJon,e974gty,conservative
Fivethirtyeight.com. They now have Republicans favored to keep the House and +4 in the Senate.,oren0,e974v3e,conservative
I hope they slow rolling it... ,GFZDW,e977h8c,conservative
NBC is almost better lol,Taygr,e978xjg,conservative
FLY,throwaway01273674,e9794o5,conservative
And a loooot of judges.,piper06w,e97afbx,conservative
A liberal? What are you doing in here you silly goose!,jonk012,e97hlur,conservative
What’s in 2020?,billybobjorkins,e97i0hf,conservative
"Not really no, its expected. A wave is an unusual result IMO.",memberCP,e97e5l1,conservative
Nate is sweating right now.,Faceh,e974pek,conservative
"too early, but...

/r/the_meltdown ",memberCP,e97503c,conservative
Do you have the link to this?,Taygr,e974nk0,conservative
"I think we've learned, in the past 2 years, that polling data is not as reliable as advertised.

The mistake Nate and others make is, apparently, to discount the uncertainty and putting overconfidence in the data on hand.

Still, he got the Senate right so that's something.",Faceh,e9757a9,conservative
">To put it another way, as Nate Silver said, Republicans would need a systematic polling error of 1 or 2 points in their favor to keep the house. 

I agree, but the critique here is that you have no way to detect a 'systematic polling error' if all you have are polls. Your confidence should be limited, correspondingly.

Nassim Taleb called him out this recently on twitter.

It strikes me as overconfidence in the data and the models. We'll see.",Faceh,e975dke,conservative
my man!,lion27,e975tmi,conservative
oooh!! crossing fingers hard for him!!,Terra_green2,e9762n6,conservative
"For the Dems! Lol, sorry if it wasn't clear.",lion27,e975ogr,conservative
Nbc has 70% reporting while at the bottom of the screen local nbc is scrolling 6% reoorting.,craig80,e97abw6,conservative
True. I really got my hopes up and I probably shouldn’t have. At least Stabenow has to sweat!,sydazzles,e97fbjx,conservative
so was fox,ben1234321,e97er5f,conservative
"I mean the alternative is the minority in the rural areas stomp on us urbanites. Neither option is particularly palatable, but at least majority rules as a veneer of legitimacy. ",ByronicAsian,e985om7,conservative
"I didn’t really get a choice to come here.

But do you think Texas will allow me to apply for refugee status?",McFreedomWithCheese,e97lurz,conservative
Lucky you. I’m leaving as soon as my job gives me the chance.,McFreedomWithCheese,e97lkt2,conservative
"Not giving up, but I would be very distressed if we didn't try to adapt if there's a wave.",yackippo,e971yko,conservative
"If they already counted Duval, shit is fucked.",goldmouthdawg,e972tkz,conservative
Why is he a Democrat?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9799uv,conservative
"That's CNN. They are so far left it's unbelievable.


""This is an apple. Apple sauce is better than orange juice and everybody knows it."" 


That is considered to be an objective news report on apples vs. oranges.",Frashizzle,e97a9bm,conservative
"The segway of talking about the free market then all of the sudden someone says ""the free market is great, LIKE STAMPS.COM!!!!""",TastelessSmell,e97blb2,conservative
"so did MO, currently it looks like it will pass 60% yes with like 8% reporting. :(",osamanobama,e97di1m,conservative
"Fuck even with 75% called in?!?!?
",nekkomori,e97drse,conservative
I laughed way harder at this than is appropriate.,matt_brownies,e97jg1a,conservative
"Frankly, I'm not that interested in her at all. ",Odoacer476CE,e97l97n,conservative
"Sexual assault allegations, duh. ",Moonthrower,e97qk3e,conservative
"I don't know. NBC's own poll currently rates the house at 65% chance for the Democrats. It was like 90% going into today. If this trend starts holding in Western states, we might be in business.",Frashizzle,e978kir,conservative
"Honestly, that's no surprise.  I think everyone expected them to pickup seats, the question has always been ""how many""",Blu3Yeti,e978js0,conservative
"Same with Illinois. I'll admit I'm an Illinois refugee who came down to Texas, but goddammit I'm here to be Texan not recreate my failing state.",caffienatedjedi,e97aum2,conservative
I really don't understand that shit.,severeneckpain,e979zfk,conservative
"Didn't know there were a lot of New England transplants in GA. GA is high on my list as a future home, but I vote the right way, so don't worry about me.",severeneckpain,e979y3f,conservative
"No, she's literally never done anything. She has never even introduced a bill. She's actually never done anything. Ever.",Odoacer476CE,e97hoc8,conservative
The person they are running against has been in office for two decades and never done a single thing. Literally nothing. Voting for a drunk beaver would be a win. ,Odoacer476CE,e97hs6g,conservative
"Good. I about shit myself when I saw that goon was leading by over 100,000 votes.",JackFucington,e97739v,conservative
I live in Texas. Beto supporters are obnoxious. That is the most simple I can put it. ,gstratton27,e976zd8,conservative
"Gotta tell you, as a Texan, this race is very important. I don't want Cruz to just win... I want him to clobber Francis. ",GFZDW,e976xrt,conservative
"I've been watching the numbers all night, and Kemp has maintained a solid 14 point lead at a minimum.",haplogreenleaf,e97basz,conservative
"They can gloat all they want, they vastly underperformed tonight",chii0628,e97bqnj,conservative
"Today ABC said that something like 50% of all newborns in Texas are Hispanic. Whatever the legal status of the parents, all the newborns are citizens.

I think your statement is very accurate; it seems like the demographics of Texas have changed and aren't likely to reverse course.",h3half,e97ode1,conservative
I guess you're right. Dems want us to be an apologetic party and I need to stop being so apologetic. ,GFZDW,e97alzs,conservative
"Indeed! Probably because they are more specific, and when it comes to Congress we can all agree on what to look for. Still, I hope that the surge of voters recently gives more attention to local elections, they are there, and they are very very useful",Patsrul,e970j51,conservative
"Yes the state races are very important this year.
With a census being taken in 2 years, any redistricting efforts are going to rely on who has control in your state legislature.",MooMooCudChew,e972lun,conservative
"I hear you but, damn, it sucks when someone nullifies your vote.

At the same time, you're right... voting = democracy. ",GFZDW,e97dpd3,conservative
Only 34% in tho. Mark my words... he’s done ,GoofyUmbrella,e97l64s,conservative
oh totally. i'll laugh like a mofo if somehow we keep the house.,SKWM3000,e970mdh,conservative
"While I agree that I don't think there will be a red wave, I do think we will be able to pick up seats in the Senate.",dippyzippy,e9716yp,conservative
[removed],,e970p4k,conservative
My favorite comment of the day.,Clatsop,e97bhvt,conservative
"> I just literally don't comprehend how if it's really ""the economy, stupid"" and it's been doing so much better under Trump that we've got an 85% chance of losing the House.

Because Trump didn't run on ""It's the economy, stupid."" Politico had a really good article the other day about how he hijacked the messaging with a lot of divisive shit - it rallied the base but Trump seems to have forgotten that you need more than ""the base"" to win in Virginia or Florida",SouthernTrumpVet,e972jjm,conservative
"well, i mean, they did win in a lot of places...",tifuforreal,e97g4ay,conservative
"Came back, and now I have cancer",ltdshred,e97fn6m,conservative
40 seats is huge! Many thought they would scrape by to the majority.,the-divine-comedy,e97h4b6,conservative
up to 46%,TastelessSmell,e9758xi,conservative
46!,S_D_W_2,e9759vh,conservative
It’s been so much better!! I really like our current governor (Rick Snyder) but some people blame him personally for the Flint water crisis so it’s not really surprising that Whitmer won. But yeah I’m wary of ones they call so soon. ,sydazzles,e978s3c,conservative
O'Rourke still had like $22 million cash to spend on ads going into the last two weeks of October. That one was definitely going to tighten up.,Frashizzle,e978hev,conservative
I wouldn’t call it a huge win just yet. All eyes are on Texas right now. ,surferdude28,e978rni,conservative
"I know that, but just the fact that is was so close is worrisome for future elections.",Scozzar,e97gjb4,conservative
"Looking like  Kate Brown is going to win in Oregon, purely off of portland and Eugene. Fuck Portland.",Zyrioun,e97i7fc,conservative
Oregon.,Vrael22,e97ibln,conservative
A lot of stars live in TN still,Shinglings,e97frzk,conservative
"I know, but that will be like the Kavanaugh fiasco. It will be a couple of months of smoke and false flags and extremism... and then we can get something done.",Frashizzle,e97fnbv,conservative
"Yup. It's in their misguided interest to sabotage as much of the process of government as possible. The more trouble they can stir up with a majority red government, the more they can try and blame on us, and the more they can try and shift the public opinion towards Republicans being evil and not doing a good job.",_SkeletonJelly,e97fml0,conservative
Chaffetz reminded fox viewers yesterday that Waters could be chair of a committee and have unilateral power as such. Buckle up for unbridled crazy. ,justhere2havefun,e97fiwk,conservative
She will help us. ,8K12,e97fgyv,conservative
Moderate who agreed but I wanted the Dems to learn a lesson in manners. But they're too entrenched with stupid college kids. ,Terra_green2,e97gx63,conservative
Daily Wire said a lot were moderate Dems.,Terra_green2,e97gysa,conservative
"SAME. I can’t think of a single person who has overstayed their welcome in politics more than Stabenow (or as I call her, Stab-me-now).",sydazzles,e97cwcu,conservative
He's gonna be the first republican black president just you watch. ,CITY_F0X,e97d05x,conservative
Very true!!,sydazzles,e97cyb4,conservative
Praying!!!,sydazzles,e97cyyf,conservative
I mean I'm fine with gridlock; let the government stall and not pass anything and let Trump dismantle the federal beautocracy ,Vrael22,e97h3hv,conservative
Everywhere. I already see it in staircases downtown.,Kaptain_Konrad,e97ht61,conservative
I fear the same. ,Gotta_go_fast_22,e973exy,conservative
"Shit and I just moved from California to here. Thought it was a somewhat secure state. Nope, purple. Did my part and voted to keep my new home sane...but damn.",subversive07,e977qfa,conservative
Always is.,SendixBunny,e97162d,conservative
Well that sucks.,LandHouston,e971q94,conservative
"His twitter was ridiculous he was claiming he was ""in a dead-even race."" I voted for the guy but come on man, you aren't in a dead heat with Kaine lol.",Zac1245,e971i4q,conservative
Freitas at least would've had a chance. I couldn't bring myself to vote for Stewart. ,psstein,e97524k,conservative
"Yes, but if we wanted to scare the demoncrats, we NEEDED to win Virginia 10th and Florida 27th.",jonk012,e97259d,conservative
Weird. Just considered everything northeast of PA a lost cause lol,lion27,e974ijr,conservative
96% of the vote is in,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9776gs,conservative
Says 61%,the-divine-comedy,e978ts4,conservative
"...Ginsburg, how you doing girl?",memberCP,e97djpi,conservative
Yes that's apparent from the election results but I've never seen anybody in real life or online that ever articulated the thought process for splitting their ticket like that. =\\ ,tiger81775149,e97fo63,conservative
"Knute is a fucking moderate too. We just aren't allowed self-governance in this state, republicans are completely cock-blocked by Portland and Eugene and it's fucking  ridiculous. We need to put more pressure for the State of Jefferson because  otherwise we're just going to keep getting fucked in this stupid state.",Zyrioun,e97h6j3,conservative
Can I ask what the State of Jefferson is? Ive seen it a few times on this thread and Im curious,banebridge,e97j24o,conservative
Sure but why?  Why not just split the country into 2.  See which one thrives!  (maybe they both will but I doubt a country with >50% welfare would do very well...),justific4tion,e97c5io,conservative
Calling Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez!,CarbineGuy,e97c5dt,conservative
Seriously. It isnt rocket science. Can you imagine how much of a boost O'Rourke would have if he left the 2A alone?,why-this,e97b5mf,conservative
I'd still rather have the Senate than the house if I had to pick one. Especially considering we could be seeing another Supreme Court opening soon. Hopefully Pelosi is the speaker and Waters is somewhere high up so Democrats humiliate themselves again.,14thAndVine,e97dmmw,conservative
Thank you. I watched agenda free. It was the best in my opinion. ,L3thalGho5t,e97lqj7,conservative
[removed],,e973bna,conservative
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kbnLuv5H41Y,plow_ur_ass,e974bqg,conservative
Thank you. I watched some of Ben and the crew. ,L3thalGho5t,e97lrua,conservative
1% and Austin is in so... should be fine. ,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e975trg,conservative
1% Cruz is gaining on every refresh and will take the lead momentarily. ,zgh5002,e975v5e,conservative
I’m not far behind you...,WenchSlayer,e976vkj,conservative
I’m in WI too. I love Milwaukee but sometimes the people there can drive me crazy. Less than 3% unemployment and people act like Walker is the antichrist. ,blameitonthetetons1,e977qsw,conservative
"I see it in his face. He has a forehead though, unlike Sanders.",14thAndVine,e97bht0,conservative
I sure hope so. Conservatives need to send some serious money in the next elections. So much out-of-state cash for Beto. ,GFZDW,e97cdqf,conservative
Exactly. The wall is a huge waste of money especially considering most illegal immigrants are here originally on visas then overstaying them. ,riseoftheorange,e97g19h,conservative
It’s not a bargaining chip at all building the wall would destroy the dems with their base ,yackippo,e97g9z4,conservative
"The wall deals with the inflow, but it doesn't deal with any of the other issues. ",psstein,e97gass,conservative
Shiiiiit this close. ,CarbineGuy,e97ja14,conservative
"Also quite a few governorships, which will improve their position for redistricting in 2021. ",PubliusVA,e97qi02,conservative
"Once IN and MO became blowouts, and WV and OH were much closer than expected, I became much more interested in MT.",RedDevil5,e97mufw,conservative
">
>
> 
>The party of the POTUS almost always loses the house in the midterms.

They don't.


https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/7/73/Party_divisions_and_control_of_the_house_and_senate.pdf/page1-800px-Party_divisions_and_control_of_the_house_and_senate.pdf.jpg

",tectalbunny,e97go1m,conservative
I wouldn’t be surprised. ,skarface6,e978fa8,conservative
I fully believe that Trump will legalize weed at a federal level to help people get off opioids ,i_floop_the_pig,e97e7qk,conservative
that's the joke,tja_1478,e97gcox,conservative
Double flipped?,mouser58907,e97g4s0,conservative
That's the joke,tja_1478,e97gc40,conservative
I mean... John K. was kind of a RINO.,N0RM1N,e97g0mq,conservative
"Look again.  Beto is up 50.8-48.1
EDIT - nm I see what you're saying...",TastelessSmell,e9794si,conservative
"Not not yet, but it's very very close and Houston hasn't reported yet. ",AMollenhauer,e978z4s,conservative
You should be far more concerned about the intel committee...,StrugglingJob,e97duq3,conservative
Oh God ,i_floop_the_pig,e97ds7b,conservative
That's all but a foregone conclusion I think. ,Dunkeliness,e97dou1,conservative
How do? I figure she'll ne a hindrance ,gab907,e97dm3r,conservative
I'll be surprised if AZ-2 doesn't go Red. ,Vrael22,e971j2m,conservative
The inability to get any more SCOTUS judges confirmed would probably be the worst part...,Killabrewster,e97291v,conservative
"that would be pretty bad for the gop, as dems who win here are ofc safe for another six years. the situation dems are in this year (pretty much everyone's up for fuckin reelection and that's why they can't really go ahead too much) will be true for the gop in upcoming elections",drinking_crow,e973r6u,conservative
Thank you for the comfort. Really a fan of Cruz.,ItWasLikeWhite,e974wwg,conservative
Every time the ticker flashes back to Texas Beto goes down in percent ,i_floop_the_pig,e974uny,conservative
looks to be legit. Would be shocking if he didnt win at this point - theres not enough votes left in the blue counties to make up the difference,aburks41,e978h5j,conservative
Houston still isn't in yet though...,yackippo,e978r9h,conservative
"In a state pushing 30,000,000 with 3% reporting. Look at a heat map. See all that gray? Those are red counties. ",zgh5002,e978pp2,conservative
Gonna be back and forth all night ,FuckTimBeck,e97a157,conservative
"omg, and I still don't have my flair :(",DL-Refugee,e97a2h2,conservative
"I just don't understand how anyone could vote for Evers. People I've spoken to complain about old white guys in government, yet the oldest whitest guy(Evers) is getting damn near half the vote in Wisconsin. A complete head scratcher",WagonWheel22,e97f95r,conservative
"Are you david french?

https://twitter.com/DavidAFrench/status/1060018754065784832",memberCP,e97g848,conservative
Especially since Trump can hold vetos on any of the legislation he’s already passed. ,shawn77,e97gdqz,conservative
"I was joking with my mother earlier that she should've gone to vote a second time pretending to be my grandmother who is in a nursing home with pretty advanced dementia. Would've balanced out the bullshit the dems do haha. 
",severeneckpain,e97h2p0,conservative
Well that's what I'm waiting for!,severeneckpain,e97gwvr,conservative
It's quite fascinating.  We overwhelmingly elected Josh Hawley while simultaneously approving a minimum wage hike.  We have basic store employees who will end up making what the higher level employees are making so not only are we going to be paying more wages to basic employees but we're also going to have to raise the wages of those above them higher as well.  Some of the stores we'd have to close aren't even in Missouri.  It's going to suck.,ponmbr,e985g3b,conservative
I hope so. I can’t wait to read all the salt when he gets this win. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97krq7,conservative
Not evil? Maybe it's the hard Left wing of the party that's evil and they hold quite the sway. Forgot about Kavinaugh already? Kavinaugh certainly wasn't misguided. That was pure evil.    ,programmingguy,e97awm0,conservative
"They treat the murder of unborn children as a holy sacrament. 

If you have another word for that besides evil, I’m all ears. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e97aj2z,conservative
This. We need to not use the tactics someone else on the left may use. Or on the right. We are better than that. ,inconspicuoujavert,e97ais9,conservative
Oh I know but I don't want Texas to be *that* race in the midterms that went the other way. ,GFZDW,e978d3m,conservative
"70% of early votes, 4% of precincts. ",zgh5002,e979iax,conservative
Politico has 3% of precincts reporting. ,steampunker13,e979jvi,conservative
Where are you getting this. I can't find that anywhere. Every source I see says 3%,pharmermummles,e979k21,conservative
I just thought the dems were so divided that maybe they wouldn’t be able to get enough support ,snizwizard88,e97ggjy,conservative
">Well Cortez is an economics major who doesn't know how unemployment works.

Also has a degree in international relations and doesn't know what's going on in Israel. ",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97hja1,conservative
"That’s not fair, I, us and trump were provoked to say stupid things
That cocksucking slob doesn’t  understand her text books because she’s got shit for brains ",snizwizard88,e97h835,conservative
She’s soooo looney tunes. Im just gonna hang myself ,snizwizard88,e97gdyx,conservative
"Oh I know haha, but Texas is definitely more blue than it used to be. ",AMollenhauer,e974zcr,conservative
Same thing happened in 2016 haha,yackippo,e974z94,conservative
"> unions

Less and less so with each passing year.",jd_porter,e9769eu,conservative
...and college educations,MBBIBM,e9767ow,conservative
Reporting on Drudge,the-divine-comedy,e9798mt,conservative
"538 still don't know that, almost even.             ",tau_decay,e979a1h,conservative
Hm.  538 has it at 57%.,blackscholz,e979b3a,conservative
Lousy candidate?  Lol,caldera599,e97b4bj,conservative
/s,memberCP,e9819dz,conservative
"Yeah, anybody shocked the Dems didn’t win the senate hasn’t been paying attention for the last month.",gster50,e97ekpb,conservative
"Yeah they've stopped the bleeding that has been going on since 2010. 

Congrats on controlling 1/4th of the federal government. ",WAIST_DEEP_IN_WOMEN,e97epkc,conservative
I mean both sides have plenty to point at to be happy if they want to be. ,pharmermummles,e97em4l,conservative
"Actually, Morrisey is winning right now.",jonk012,e972xxi,conservative
Thanks!,colinpail,e97656f,conservative
"They just said on twitter that they changed the algorithm. Said that the predictions were calling certain races too early. They did this when the Republican chance to hold the house went way up. 

Basically, our projections are causing heart attacks already so we'll just pretend it isn't happening.

edit: https://twitter.com/NateSilver538
",JaXXXuP,e976dve,conservative
Thanks!,colinpail,e9764uy,conservative
"Just to help everyone reading this, the ""source"" says you're saying 93%. You can't just do a number and a period or reddit will make a list, starting with 1.",rob_s_458,e976flj,conservative
Oh ok. That makes me feel a little better. ,steampunker13,e977ze0,conservative
Just saw it on Fox they fixed it it says 3%,godzillaeatsasians,e9787tp,conservative
"Well, the sun doesn't shine there...",rf-engineer,e97aqbf,conservative
Districts Clinton Won are more than enough to take the house.,memberCP,e97ax0g,conservative
Estimate says 50/50 for me.,memberCP,e97b4c7,conservative
Lol it just flipped to scott.,memberCP,e97b5zx,conservative
"I think the wave narrative will persist with the media, even if the swing is less than the historic norms for mid terms",the_tragic_wagon,e97c8i6,conservative
That's odd. CNN and NYT have different vote totals despite both reporting 79%,rob_s_458,e97flzq,conservative
It says 50.1% R ,Derp2638,e97fsbg,conservative
"Yup. When the house is already called, may as well get rid of some baggage for a couple of years. ",memberCP,e97gazu,conservative
Not anymore.,Big_Joosh,e97qnmp,conservative
And there were a lot of close races that could easily have gone either way. This was definitely within the margin of error.,PubliusVA,e9840bo,conservative
Its a copy pasta from 2016,yackippo,e979dbf,conservative
This is a well known copypasta from an actual rant from some liberal after 2016. ,Faraday314,e979cgj,conservative
its a copy pasta ,KillaB33z,e979dyo,conservative
It's copy pasta. ,secret_porn_acct,e979d19,conservative
Probably Fox ,i_floop_the_pig,e977ls2,conservative
Silver kept lowering the odds more and more over the night ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9764yd,conservative
They said they just switched it to be more conservative (not in the political sense).,tenshon,e97612g,conservative
538 is ping-ponging like crazy ,i_floop_the_pig,e97619l,conservative
Same! ,KnightofFaith26,e979zqe,conservative
"It's a big part of the Republicans ""firewall"". It's really important.",jonk012,e97e4tb,conservative
We recalled them last time they tried,303Carpenter,e97fep1,conservative
Needs 218 votes to be speaker ,XxtexasxX,e97dsav,conservative
"I'd say exceptionally close like under 10 or 5 majority. 

A few committee chairships and pork goes a long way for most.",memberCP,e97du5y,conservative
Florida does love its recounts 💘,Terra_green2,e97iiv6,conservative
"We need to go back to pen and paper ballots. Then we need to enact a law that all ballot boxes are strictly watched by either local authorities or national guard members of that state. 

Also voter fucking ID please. ",AmericanHunter,e97ifmg,conservative
That doesn’t sound suspicious at all....,flinstone001,e97hz41,conservative
I'm wondering where that 5% positive coverage is??,AThievingStableBoy,e97dmjy,conservative
"No, 66% reporting on fox news, Cruz still down 2.",Zyrioun,e978wb0,conservative
"Fox News has it at 66% reporting, Cruz down 2.",Zyrioun,e978zpz,conservative
Politico has it as 3% too. ,Highenergyperson,e9793lq,conservative
"Fox News and Fox Business have it listed at 61% reporting last time they showed it, and it's bad for cruz at the moment. 

Edit: 66% now,  Cruz still behind 2 points.",Zyrioun,e978s9n,conservative
"Yeah got that, thanks though!",valmeister,e974nyd,conservative
Real? I was thinking to try and impeach Trump it took a super majority. The investigations are what I'm worried about. Everything else a Republican Senate can help dilute. ,valmeister,e974cr8,conservative
This. They are also going to extend poll times because of long lines. ,Themusician67,e976pfw,conservative
All forecasters I've seen have them as toss-ups.,mkgandkembafan,e97745f,conservative
Yep,Taygr,e97bah1,conservative
GOP across the board.,N0RM1N,e97boep,conservative
Rick Scott is up 1.2% in FL for Senate;  DeSantis is up 1% in FL for Governor; Brian Kemp is up 12% in GA Governor,TastelessSmell,e97eb0e,conservative
Seems like it might.,SexAddictRecovery,e97jid3,conservative
That’s a pivotal seat. Trump won it by 15.,the-divine-comedy,e971vrm,conservative
Yeah it's a extreme longshot and they have a boss unlike they've ever had before. ,Fire2box,e97h7bo,conservative
"538. It's gone to 54.6 for the dems. I'm not sure whose more accurate. 538 was way off two years ago, but so was Vegas. I'm pretty sure their analysts have a liberal bias.",JustAnotherJon,e977la0,conservative
Calm down buddy.,JustAnotherJon,e977f53,conservative
Republicans had huge turnouts in 2010 yet Obama got re-elected. ,Zac1245,e97hdq5,conservative
The 2020 turnout is going to depend on who the Democrats nominate. ,psstein,e97gsgi,conservative
"If they got a large turnout yet didn't have a ""blue wave"" as was expected, we can feel very good about the 2020 election for trump",xJownage,e97hiqd,conservative
they're showing 4M votes cast tho. there aren’t 200M people in texas...,kroatone,e977u5b,conservative
2% of the vote in guys... Really?????,Themusician67,e977sls,conservative
Axios only had three percent. ,dan4daniel,e979e6e,conservative
CNN has 70%.,AMollenhauer,e979g6v,conservative
....CNN,top-perro,e979hrh,conservative
Now the Dems will try and overthrow president by impeachment and estbalish their socialist regime.   ,caldera599,e97bt97,conservative
Very bizarre. PA called a winner the second the polls closed. ,Lodingi,e974grx,conservative
I wish Dallas and Austin would just secede and head west to California. California would get back so many of the voters that have moved here. ,GFZDW,e974tnw,conservative
Ok. What are the really important ones for us to make a comeback?,jonk012,e974alt,conservative
"But, wait, I was told *__only republicans__* gerrymandered?",Odoacer476CE,e97lhc9,conservative
So that loss is not too shocking then?,Enzo_SAWFT,e9732fx,conservative
We needed some better then fucking Corey Stewart tho. ,Zac1245,e973kfc,conservative
"I live in McLean and two years ago, I don’t even remember who she was running against. This years I saw way more Wexton signs than whoever was last running. But the TrumpStock thing was everywhere. ",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e973smk,conservative
"i mean in the context of reporting the poll results, i already know how bad they are",top-perro,e975ki1,conservative
Hey even a close race is a win in a place like Connecticut,Taygr,e97clvv,conservative
Bob is winning new haven county,sendintheshermans,e97csk2,conservative
Stefanowski's up by 35k with something like 80% reporting,Odoacer476CE,e97m95n,conservative
"I'm reading that they still have people waiting in lines, and they won't release results until they have voted. Like 3 hours after polls close...",pharmermummles,e97mt9d,conservative
"Because it was a perfectly sensible amendment reducing the penalties for drug users, unless I misunderstood it.",Astro4545,e97d4t5,conservative
Can you explain why?,Astro4545,e97dblm,conservative
I hope you're right.,TastelessSmell,e978tly,conservative
Everything's bigger in Texas.,tenshon,e978n5g,conservative
I just keep watching the vote counts go up but the spread not getting smaller,TastelessSmell,e978v5t,conservative
"That was just me, not a real call. ",TastelessSmell,e978suu,conservative
"He largely did. Yes there are job creation requirements tied to them but even by the most optimistic results, WI won't recoup the money until 2040.  Also since then, Foxconn has scaled back the factory.  Oh and now he's trying to give money to Kimberly Clark.",adamb10,e97130g,conservative
Yeah I learned that lesson watching the votes roll in before President Hillary took office,SouthernTrumpVet,e9743oa,conservative
"Lol I know 

I usually don't add ""ITS HAPPENING"" when making a serious comment",top-perro,e973ytr,conservative
Lol,steampunker13,e97484p,conservative
"Yeah right. Rauner, while socially liberal, was a godsend. A one-in-a-million chance to have him as governor. Good luck Illinois! I won't miss you.",DrudgeBreitbart,e974k9j,conservative
What state did you get to? IL will continue to suffer under Pritzker.,DrudgeBreitbart,e974l9x,conservative
"Richest governor

&#x200B;

Not that I care, but isn't that what the libs are against?",DrudgeBreitbart,e975ajf,conservative
"Its funny because when you go to r/politics and ask about the blue wave they say ""it was the house the whole time"" 

Oh really. Have fun with one branch out of three, and a right leaning supreme court. ",Themusician67,e97hu10,conservative
"
>Dems underperformed today.

Sadly this isn't true. The only thing they have underperformed with is Cruz winning. Look at how badly Kris Kobach just lost in KS. We're getting womped. ",Dunkeliness,e97dy3h,conservative
He's been low effort trolling this thread all night.,severeneckpain,e97hlv9,conservative
Mitt Romney is a traitor who will only derail a conservative agenda and we wasted a good red seat so he can please his donors. Why would he bother running at all? ,latotokyo123,e97eger,conservative
Lol haha you really have drank the Kool-Aid. ,ausversehn0,e97ff9b,conservative
I'm just discussing the midterms by bringing up Trump's old tweet. This is a Open Megathread.,MyNewAccount962,e979nst,conservative
I STILL LIKE BEER,XxtexasxX,e97ir5s,conservative
"I don't see that right now, I'm watching 538, Politico, NYT and Fox.",TastelessSmell,e97b84g,conservative
As soon as these mellennials  growp up and immigrants actually try to assimilate socialism can be beat but until then forget because the young and new have little time away from a socialist government they are still used to someone else paying for it.,postonrddt,e97irf1,conservative
Agree 100%,AMollenhauer,e97cbcl,conservative
Also goodbye potential court packing if we lose in 2020,yackippo,e97gfkz,conservative
"Radicalllllllllll awesome, thanks!",MyUsernameIsReallyOk,e97fzab,conservative
"Not gonna lie. When that election was going on, I set up a cooler of beer and prepared for sadness. By 8pm, I was drinking from excitement. Hangover was worth it 1000%",why-this,e976fki,conservative
Cruz will take it by 4-6%,zgh5002,e977rxx,conservative
"You right, you right.",dlc_protocol,e977eu0,conservative
thats my reasoning. Same reason I question the ability to impeach. ,yackippo,e97ahs7,conservative
I’ve been on the 10 min timer comment ban for awhile now. It’s super annoying to deal with when you’re getting swarmed with replies ,i_floop_the_pig,e97eyni,conservative
911 had a lot to do with that. ,LonelyMachines,e97f8wt,conservative
He'll be a strong Conservative in a state like Utah I would bet.  He's probably more conservative than he was as Massachusetts governor,Taygr,e97bx9g,conservative
"To be fair, it’s not like we got a ton done in 2 years legislatively.  
Outside of the tax bill, we still didn’t get the wall, didn’t get any progun legislation through, still have ACA. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97gf2l,conservative
No thank,Zac1245,e971k08,conservative
"My god, it’s no nut November, stop it. ",CarbineGuy,e976pqy,conservative
"Lol, they keep finding new ways to impress me ",UncleRedGreen,e976qsg,conservative
I cannot fathom what that’s like. ,CarbineGuy,e976wf7,conservative
Thanks:),inconspicuoujavert,e9768z5,conservative
Nah you’re right. I’m silly. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e977s2b,conservative
"Someone just showed a 47.6 to 47.8 Cruz, with 54% reported.... This was reported by CBS news. 

Is 54% of the vote in texas really in?",Themusician67,e978z5i,conservative
"Seriously, I've got a lot going on tonight. lol",dapcook,e97egfu,conservative
Head to r/politics yo start mining the salt.,kshebdhdbr,e974yjr,conservative
He’s still ahead with 33% reporting!!! Come on!!!!!!,sydazzles,e97alni,conservative
It’s his cakeday thooo,i_floop_the_pig,e97hq3j,conservative
"I guess it depends on what your expectations were. Maybe its more accurate to describe it as a ""landslide"" victory (because it is so one-sided), but not a huge victory (because it was expected to be very one-sided).",thisistrue1234,e97eq03,conservative
https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/?ex_cid=extra_banner,Faceh,e974orm,conservative
"538 showing 60% chance house going republican

https://fivethirtyeight.com/live-blog/2018-election-results-coverage/

talk about a hockey stick curve!

Edit:  These numbers are swinging wildly back and forth.  not reliable at all at this point.",alpachydermatologist,e974u64,conservative
"Nassim called him out for not rating it as 50/50 but I think the problem with that view is toss up to statistics would mean actually a 1 in 2 chance. 

Tossup for the public generally mean anything that is not statistically unusual. (more than 2 standard deviations or 95%) and it would not be true to use those that term. 

But I see the argument. I think the problem comes more from the Media talking heads who use 538 and other statistical models saying an 80 or 70 percent is a virtual lock, when it just isn't. 

Silver, The Upshot etc, would never describe it that way. That angry dude on MSNBC will. ",memberCP,e976x3e,conservative
He has a bright future for sure.,redbullXvodka,e97fdaq,conservative
like an hour ago...,memberCP,e97es1z,conservative
"Oof. Dunno. I heard there's talk of a wall. A big, beautiful wall. A wall that goes from Mexico to Canada. A big, beautiful wall. And California's gonna pay for it.",Odoacer476CE,e97m0tp,conservative
"It's probably not a wave so much as a pendulum swing. But we lost Florida in 2006, 2008 and 2012.",SendixBunny,e9724sp,conservative
"WV is very pro-union due to the coal industry.

But Manchin is a blue collar Dem and has been willing to work with Republicans on many issues. He's not a bad guy.",ShillinTheVillain,e97bly4,conservative
Yeah. The polls had Kemp +1 or so. Probably they’d call it for him except for the fact that he needs >50% of the vote to win. Otherwise it’s a runoff. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e97e6t6,conservative
"Yep. The key point was the senate tbh, and it looks like it will stay red.",snoppballe,e978p9v,conservative
Welcome to Texas! ,Blaphlafagus,e97awem,conservative
Sure seems like it. It's anecdotal though. I am originally from SC and AL. I prefer AL to GA but GA is a good state. We welcome you here.,DrudgeBreitbart,e97b9ob,conservative
"I'm still holding out a little long-shot hope.  Stabenow's lead is almost entirely because of a handful of districts, and those same districts only have about half of their precincts reporting.  State's only 55% reporting so far as well.  Hoping James plays to his outs and waits until we get a more thorough tally.",Jackoffalltrades89,e97hv05,conservative
I mean they’ve voted on things. People like the way they vote. ,godzillaeatsasians,e97hust,conservative
Ok which combat veteran are you talking about there’s quite a few this race ,godzillaeatsasians,e97i4qt,conservative
I'd rather he win by less than 1k votes and get scared straight,Oberst_Ryan,e978ehh,conservative
Yeah but composition of results matter. No poll ever had Kemp +14.,DrudgeBreitbart,e97bn7e,conservative
"Yep. The writings were on the wall for decades but Republicans ignored the demographic change in the southern states, and as such we're (shit I'm not even American, I'm just rooting for conservatism) paying the price for it now.",snoppballe,e982h5j,conservative
Yup.  Common sense doesn't require justification.,justific4tion,e97ar4w,conservative
"Growing up in a blue state has taught me two things. 

1. We need to stop apologizing for our stances and own them proudly, yet not close-minded.

2. It is incredibly important to realize what kind of person you are talking to. Start with respect and have an open conversation. However, if they get rude or angry, be willing to call them out for it and walk away.

Edit: formatting",cowboyfan08,e97azua,conservative
"Yup! States like Colorado, North Carolina, Arizona, Iowa could see big changes in their state legislatures. ",Zac1245,e970oja,conservative
"I hope you're right. 

I'm just glad that Gianforte is ahead.

Edit: update before bed: Tester's lead has dropped from 8k down to under 2k. While Gianforte's lead has gone up to 18k.

Rosendale may still be in the game, depending on how the remaining precincts come in.",rf-engineer,e97m0ci,conservative
I am legitimately honored. ,amjourdan,e97bn36,conservative
Indeed. That place is carcinogenic.,Odoacer476CE,e97fvk1,conservative
"Pro Planned Parenthood. 

Supports higher corporate taxes. 

Against marijuana legalization.  


She sucks on every level.",ShillinTheVillain,e97bb78,conservative
"Look to Thr Texas Gov, it was more anti Cruz than anti GOP",Enzo_SAWFT,e97gqd7,conservative
"I think at a certain point everyone, politicians, the media, and citizens, needs to just grow up.  We all should be humble with our victories, and take our defeats like grown adults, instead of perpetuating divisiveness.  A 2 to 4 year election cycle won’t destroy America.  I think the problem is mostly due to the media stoking these flames.  I listen to NPR and conservative radio to/from work, and they are both guilty of it.  I genuinely believe that neither side is innocent in this matter, and until everyone realizes this, nothing will happen.",absolut696,e97hjbh,conservative
Not sure where you see that but 61 is incorrect,matts290,e978vmj,conservative
Is that Fox?,i_floop_the_pig,e978xjo,conservative
"A movement for NorCal and SoOregon to break off and become a separate state since we don't get to self govern. 

It was approved just before WWII and never got moving again. ",Vrael22,e97lm49,conservative
"Well, the country is already split into 50+ ...",mkgandkembafan,e97ej4x,conservative
The economics major.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e97cchr,conservative
A crap ton.  The Democrats in general would be smart to get off the gun control plank completely.,TastelessSmell,e97ba2c,conservative
"Politico had a great article recently titled ""Did Beto Blow It?"" where they said pretty much the exact same thing; if he'd done the same thing Doug Jones did in Alabama he may very well have won Texas, unpopular as Cruz is even among Repubs.

Instead he bafflingly doubled-down on lefty positions. I personally wonder if he didn't really think he could win and was just laying the groundwork for 2020",SouthernTrumpVet,e97bfy8,conservative
Agree completely. Also considering that only 33% of Senate is up for grabs each election verses 100% of the house. ,RigsbyQuist,e97dugd,conservative
daily wire is up now on youtube,blackhawk767,e973yks,conservative
Looks like 37% to me right now ,i_floop_the_pig,e975ycq,conservative
Thanks my guy. Austin was my biggest worry. My first year of actually really watching the election night so still learning ,inconspicuoujavert,e975w08,conservative
I cannot get a straight answer on why haha. ,CarbineGuy,e977ta3,conservative
Oh I thought you saw it in his knuckles ,matts290,e97bj61,conservative
It won’t. Schumer and Pelosi had an offer on the table to build the wall for DACA. Trump turned it down.  ,cetamega,e97gr43,conservative
The wall doesn’t deal with the inflow at all. Most illegal immigrants are visa overstays. Ladders exist. You can’t build a contiguous wall. This attitude that a wall fixes anything is why Trump is going to give up too much. ,cetamega,e97gnjp,conservative
"HW, Clintin, George, and Obama all last house seats in their first midterm ",Rytho,e97i600,conservative
If Trump legalized weed the media would explode. ,steampunker13,e97eda8,conservative
"Harris County is showing 57% Beto.

Edit: so friggin pissed at my county ",GFZDW,e97922k,conservative
"she's unpopular as hell, everyone in the country hates her.",RedDevil5,e97dq2s,conservative
"I understand, and I thought the same exact thing until today. If the worst that happens is a total gridlock in government, I'm not too worried. However, that's excluding what gridlock means for the 2020 race. ",cowboyfan08,e972tm0,conservative
"Houston will be a split. Dallas, Austin and San Antonio lean left. Fort Worth, Arlington and Plano go right. Houston ends up somewhere in the middle. ",zgh5002,e978z2p,conservative
But there's a lot of Republican suburbs in Harris County too.,dan1776,e9791tp,conservative
They're all pretty low population though.  I hope you're right.,TastelessSmell,e978s2p,conservative
And we complain and blame Walker for MPS’ problems. 🤦🏻‍♀️ smh. ,blameitonthetetons1,e97fd62,conservative
"Hahaha I can confirm I am not. 

Should I know who he is?",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97g9zx,conservative
">They treat the murder of unborn children as a holy sacrament.

Believing that is just as bad as the people that truly believe we're Nazis.",AdVerbera,e97amd2,conservative
"Hmm, CNN has 70%.",AMollenhauer,e979l2r,conservative
CNN reporting 70%.,AMollenhauer,e979kjv,conservative
Sucks :/,GFZDW,e975599,conservative
Only in 3 cities.,zgh5002,e9759vc,conservative
Yep look how he's losing badly.,PubliusVA,e97bqov,conservative
"Against Kaine, yes. ",Gotta_go_fast_22,e97cnn2,conservative
Yeah personally I was hoping the house would be closer. Trump is going to have a hard time passing much of his agenda. ,AMollenhauer,e97ep4u,conservative
Not by enough out of the gate to really have a chance.,SendixBunny,e9731fk,conservative
"Nate silver, kills more the Net neutrality and tax reform campaigned. 

Ironic. ",memberCP,e976yrn,conservative
I doubt it. NBC and CNN have been saying that the wave didn’t materialize. ,Gotta_go_fast_22,e97cue6,conservative
Oh ok thank God ,multiple4,e979f0y,conservative
"If the Republicans keep it, does the House stay Republican?",mkgandkembafan,e97e6cy,conservative
Why does it work that way?,mkgandkembafan,e97e0c8,conservative
"Anytime there's a ""recount"" in Florida, somehow FloridaMan always seems to find just enough extra votes to put the democrat over the top.",Odoacer476CE,e97ikxo,conservative
Sean hannity. Lol,osamanobama,e97dopm,conservative
"289 of 7,949 precincts reporting, which is now 4%. All the liberal heavy hitters are in, conservative counties will trickle in slowly. ",zgh5002,e9792c4,conservative
I really can't imagine such a gigantic disconnect.,justific4tion,e978u97,conservative
"Yep. Simple majority in house to impeach/pass legislation, etc. Senate is more complex, but requires 67 votes to indict on an impeachment. Zero chance that happens.",pharmermummles,e974ih7,conservative
They weren't though.  The GOP candidates were grossly overperforming so they were toss ups by technicality.  ,tja_1478,e97783q,conservative
There might be bipartisan cooperation on naming post offices,soxfan90,e97h8dx,conservative
Democrats are supposed to underperform in midterms. Democrats doing well in a midterm is a much larger indication that republicans doing well in a midterm. ,cetamega,e97je4t,conservative
And they were just given a front runner in Beto. ,cetamega,e97jevu,conservative
Democrats turn out better in presidential elections than midterms. Democrats doing well in a midterm is not good for Republicans in 2020. ,cetamega,e97jcft,conservative
Google show Ted leading though.,TheShakinBacon,e979uu7,conservative
"They cant just do it magically. Sure, they're going to be royal pains in the asses, but just because they wish it, doesnt mean it can be done. And we still have the Senate. At worst, the Dems are going to prevent any meaningful legislation and spend time investigating. But thats all they can do. And they can impeach, but they have no grounds to. The senate will shut that down fast. ",MaddSim,e97c18d,conservative
"They can impeach, but impeachment is meaningless if they don't hold the Senate.",caffienatedjedi,e97cjhr,conservative
"IL-06, MN-01, NV-03",gprime,e975uc9,conservative
"The voting rights act of 1965 consisted entirely of gerrymandering districts. Democrats started it, they are the masters at it. Don't be fooled.",Big_Joosh,e97qrsl,conservative
"No, not at all. Wexton was always polling up 10%. I live in the area, Comstock was on borrowed time, that area is going through demographic changes and it was inevitable. ",Zac1245,e973j03,conservative
"Luanne Bennette was who she ran against two years ago, who was an awful candidate.",Zac1245,e973w34,conservative
Are you from CT?,severeneckpain,e97cpr4,conservative
"[Not much difference with current map compared to 2014 where the dems won. There a couple  small towns that flipped one way or the other, but basically the same so far.](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/8/8a/Connecticut_gubernatorial_election%2C_2014_results_by_municipality.svg/1200px-Connecticut_gubernatorial_election%2C_2014_results_by_municipality.svg.png)

",severeneckpain,e97dj9a,conservative
"Lamont (the democunt) is winning 85% of the vote in Hartford with 58% of the votes counted. He's winning 84% of the vote in New Haven with 20% counted. He's winning 76% of the vote in Bridgeport with 46% of the votes counted. These are the three most populous cities in CT. Stefanowski's lead is going to evaporate very soon. Trust me. I know my dumbass state and its dumbass voters. The outgoing dem Gov (Malloy) is the least popular governor in the country. The fact that it's this close should tell you all you need to know.

[The biggest paper in CT's website is where I'm getting the vote counts.](https://www.courant.com/politics/elections/hc-ct-general-election-results-20181106-htmlstory.html) That map also has several cities/towns that went blue listed as not reporting. They're listed on CNN's tracker though.",severeneckpain,e97n2v4,conservative
"I had the same stance until I read [this](https://www.cleveland.com/opinion/index.ssf/2018/09/no_on_issue_1_on_drug_crimes_e.html) ... honestly i wouldn’t have been mad if it passed, was it close?",oclotty,e97dbzd,conservative
"The language of the issue sounds more like a bill that should've gone through the General Assembly, not a Constitutional Amendment.  To quote from the [Ohio Judicial Conference](http://www.ohiojudges.org/Document.ashx?DocGuid=4e09a424-0cb4-4652-9366-8a0de24a4e0f): 

""A state constitution should set forth the powers and functions of the branches of government,certain general values and principles upon which the citizens of the state generally
agree, and the basic rights which are afforded to the citizens of the state. It should set
forth matters which are so fundamental and important that they will not be subject to
change over time. This proposed constitutional amendment does not in any way
belong in a state constitution. It seeks to change sentencing law as it exists in the state
of Ohio based on an assumption that change needs to be made. If change does need
to be made, then it should be made through the process of enacting legislation, as is
done on a regular basis in this state, and not through a constitutional amendment.""

That is good enough for me to vote no on an issue, whether or not I agree with it.  But the issue itself was also pretty bad.  [This](http://www.ohiojudges.org/Document.ashx?DocGuid=ad742401-fa4a-4e98-9b3d-0f68f92dcc09) document, again from the Ohio Judicial Conference, sums up why I personally was against the issue.",bismarck309,e97e0cg,conservative
"absolutely true. I just don't know exactly what to look for, so 538 is my go to. 
",gstratton27,e978x9a,conservative
I'm at college in Minnesota and my parents just moved to Oregon a couple of weeks ago. ,AMollenhauer,e974mfm,conservative
"The house wasn't even a huge win though. They're delusional and will move the goalpost when they see fit, use mental gymnastics, etc. Fact is, this was an embarrassing showing for them, for a midterm especially.",hulk_hogans_alt,e97hyvi,conservative
I heard that he was really unpopular though ,i_floop_the_pig,e97e9l1,conservative
Kris Kobach was also wildly unpopular. ,steampunker13,e97ees0,conservative
Push for impeachment and watch what happens,ShillinTheVillain,e97frth,conservative
Aw I love Kool-Aid!,xJownage,e97fs05,conservative
You're a twat but you're certainly free to continue your whole life being a twat,dkdodd52,e979uax,conservative
"I wasn't a Trump voter so I didn't care all that much, and I figured it was a slam dunk for Clinton... As did everyone around me. Watching them sink into drunken despair is something I'll never forget lol",mnslice,e976p2x,conservative
"I hope so, I don’t want to see a Beto run TX",Blaphlafagus,e977ssx,conservative
"Then buy 10 *more* if Gillum wins. Or if he loses, to celebrate.",PubliusVA,e977x8v,conservative
"Man, i've seen 61% reporting, and i've seen 4%, so i'm not sure.",jonk012,e979ik2,conservative
Thx,Taygr,e974uw2,conservative
"I’m sure you could convince Californians to pay for it. The prop just needs to say “approves funding for protection for children, schools and parks from overdevelopment.” That would be a tax everyone would vote for, whether they’re dead or alive.",McFreedomWithCheese,e97mi6v,conservative
"It's going to get redder by the looks of it.

55 isn't out of the question right now. ",Blu3Yeti,e978r7d,conservative
">We welcome you here.

Thanks man, much appreciated.",severeneckpain,e97bzto,conservative
"That is quite literally the weakest defense of a politician I have ever seen. 

Even Robert Byrd - arguably one if the most ineffectual Senators in American history - at least introduced a bill to rename a bridge. Stabenow has literally never done anything in two decades. She's there to hold a seat and collect a check. She's fucking worthless.

Whatever. You deserve whatever you get Michigan. ",Odoacer476CE,e97icla,conservative
"She really does. She’s like Granholm but 100000x worse. But we’re gonna fix the roads, right??? Ugh. ",sydazzles,e97bmqs,conservative
I completely agree.,Terra_green2,e97irwh,conservative
"It's not incorrect, Fox news has it at 66% now with cruz behind 2 and not all of houston reporting. It's a very real possibility we just lost Cruz.",Zyrioun,e9795q7,conservative
"I'm seeing 70% now, but from the dailywire live stream all the democrat strongholds have reported the rest of the vote coming in is strong red. Shapiro is confident Cruz wins that seat.",NuclearMisogynyist,e979a4g,conservative
"> The Democrats in general would be smart

First problem right there",why-this,e97bie4,conservative
"Why? 1.2 million live here, 400,000 vote and a sizable chunk of that goes to libertarians and republicans anyway. 27% of the most liberal city in Texas voted for Trump. ",zgh5002,e9761qb,conservative
"> Ladders exist. 

Oh shit, why hasn't anybody ever thought of that before!? Trump is gonna feel so silly now with his useless wall. Forgot all about ladders.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97hsrf,conservative
Yeah just came in and put Beto ahead with 70% in. Think we might lose this one ☹️,AMollenhauer,e9795qo,conservative
With 1% of the votes counted,The_Bird_King,e9796da,conservative
"Even the liberals hate her? 

If so, that's pathetic yet funny ",gab907,e97fw75,conservative
They are low population but there are a fuckton of them.,steampunker13,e978wmm,conservative
"The rural areas of Texas may lack in population per county, but there are way, way more counties that are rural. ",zgh5002,e97999w,conservative
Evers being elected would take MPS back another 10 years. ,WagonWheel22,e97geo3,conservative
"No lol, NRO writer. you both expressed a similar thought. See Tweet.",memberCP,e97glki,conservative
"One of those things is true, one is not.  

I have no interest in capitulating to the party of death. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e97axe7,conservative
CNN is special needs calm down.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e979pti,conservative
As opposed to his gay-enabling and baby murdering opponent? ,caldera599,e97bv4f,conservative
Senate is so much more important though. Appointments will proceed unhindered.,pharmermummles,e97er1b,conservative
"Not necessarily. It's still an up-hill battle, but it would be a big win.",jonk012,e97eanv,conservative
"218 is over half of the 435 seats in the House.  If Dems get that many seats, they'll lockstep vote Pelosi into the Speaker slot.  Hell, if they get close, she'll probably still get it, since the Dems are a single entity when it comes to votes and the Republicans are like herding cats; we'll probably get a couple RINOs jumping ship to be on the ""winning team"" for the Speaker vote.

Not sure having her be Speaker is entirely a bad thing, though.  She's nearly as big a walking gaffe machine as Waters or Biden.",Jackoffalltrades89,e97ennp,conservative
Do you not remember 2000?,soxfan90,e97iuin,conservative
"Weird, wonder if Broward county had any extras ",flinstone001,e97iqnr,conservative
"Don’t forget Laura Ingram, she loves herself some Trump too",bumpy-meyers,e97e8xg,conservative
"Whatever source you're using is behind, because fox is almost to 70% now reporting in Texas. Unless you think Fox News is lying.",Zyrioun,e979ae4,conservative
"Yep, just know Dems will start all kinds of bullshitary",valmeister,e974p4d,conservative
You mean in 2016 they did?,mkgandkembafan,e9778xg,conservative
[It's something](https://i.imgur.com/ECXnThf.jpg),Fire2box,e97hi9g,conservative
I wouldn't say that about this midterm with how polarized the country is. I get the feeling democrats came out in mass for this one.,xJownage,e97jeba,conservative
Seems very inconsistent from source to source. ,AMollenhauer,e979vw4,conservative
Yeah right.  I don't believe you,caldera599,e97c929,conservative
NOVA is a pretty liberal area. The conservatives are dying in the McLean/Great Falls area and she basically was being saved by the Winchester area.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e973zkk,conservative
I grew up around there. Comstock was never all that popular- she managed to survive because she faced a series of absolutely miserable Democratic candidates. ,psstein,e974y8f,conservative
Nope is there something I should know?,Taygr,e97csws,conservative
"No, I'll defer to you. Local/native voters have a better grasp on the pulse of their areas/states than anyone. 

",Odoacer476CE,e97njht,conservative
Nope,Astro4545,e97dejh,conservative
Best of luck to you. Keep up the good fight. I'm in Georgia now (north Atlanta) and Stacey Abrams (gun grabbing loon) is too close for comfort.,DrudgeBreitbart,e9759bs,conservative
Even so. He wasn't supposed to lose. ,Dunkeliness,e97ehts,conservative
All of the counties Beto would win are in. As soon as the rest of the state trickles in Cruz will start pulling away. ,zgh5002,e977um0,conservative
If he loses Ill buy a new upper for my MK18 clone,dlc_protocol,e978fve,conservative
I wonder if its to discourage cruz voters....,Themusician67,e97c1zu,conservative
As long as Texas doesn't turn blue lol,snoppballe,e978w1a,conservative
I THOUGHT YOU WERE TALKING ABOUT AMY MCGRATH! I’m sorry!!!!  Not John James!!! PLEASE FORGIVE ME  JOHN JAMES DESERVED TO WIN ,godzillaeatsasians,e97insm,conservative
"Our roads do suck, and investment in infrastructure creates jobs. I just don't know how she plans to pay for it.",ShillinTheVillain,e97cbro,conservative
"Sorry man you are just wrong, it's ok though we are on the same team. ",matts290,e9797qj,conservative
How is Fox showing 66% reported on the whole state? ,GFZDW,e979cy6,conservative
They're both not true except for extreme circumstances and using the outliers as your view of an entire group of people is the exact same thing they do.,AdVerbera,e97b1jc,conservative
"I bet there are at least some non-baby-murderers, like Freitas, who would manage to not get thumped by Kaine so badly.",PubliusVA,e97c1fg,conservative
Amen,bumpy-meyers,e97esmb,conservative
"People have a serious hate boner for her, so it might not be the worst thing.",piper06w,e97fa15,conservative
"Yeah, I remember 2000 perfectly. That's kind of half my point. 
",Odoacer476CE,e97j5y7,conservative
Fox News is not reporting precincts. ,zgh5002,e979bcq,conservative
"No, in the polling leading up to today.  ",tja_1478,e977atb,conservative
"> NOVA is a pretty liberal area

I know, I live in Alexndria lmao",Zac1245,e9742iz,conservative
"[Our current dem governor is the least popular governor in the country.](https://www.courant.com/politics/capitol-watch/hc-pol-malloy-least-popular-governor-20180412-story.html) People should be running away screaming from anyone with a D next to their name. The problem is, they're not.",severeneckpain,e97d72o,conservative
Surprised honestly. I like the big picture of the admendment  but not the fine details  ,oclotty,e97dgpn,conservative
"Nah, everyone is saying Cruz should win comfortably. It was all early voting coming in.",jonk012,e97c8f0,conservative
No need to apologize to me homeskillet. Is what it is. ,Odoacer476CE,e97j8g6,conservative
"It's not me that's wrong, i'm watching Fox Right now, staring right at it. You're saying Fox News is wrong/lying.",Zyrioun,e979dic,conservative
I don't know but every other source says 1%,The_Bird_King,e979fkt,conservative
Yeah right.  My state is just infested with commies,caldera599,e97c7gn,conservative
"They show the total amount reported in. It's in the corner when they show the state. It will say ""xx% in"".",Zyrioun,e979idl,conservative
But they're both incumbents. Shouldn't they by definition be doing well?,mkgandkembafan,e977bou,conservative
I have been following on NY times live thing and it shows 4% ,matts290,e979n93,conservative
Axios.com showing 5% and Beto ahead. I hope you're right. ,GFZDW,e979kp9,conservative
"Amigo, fox is reporting early votes. Not total. They literally just said this. 4% of precincts have reported. ",zgh5002,e979lpx,conservative
Only Curbelo is an incumbent and he has been extremely vulnerable for years.  He's like the East coast version of Darryl Issa,tja_1478,e977d6o,conservative
We good,AMollenhauer,e97chib,conservative
🤗🤗🤗🤗,boom-boom-betty,e96jg2t,conservative
Keep it up. We're all in this together.,TravisKrooks,e96jubk,conservative
I know it's hard but I deleted Twitter and Facebook like three months ago and it's honestly been refreshing not having that in my life. ,beachmedic23,e96vgtc,conservative
I'm a slightly lieft centerist myself but it's nice to stop by here and listen to what the other side has to say sometimes. Echo chambers aren't constructive at all. You need to understand both sides of an issue before you move forward.,RyuseiTheNora,e96tqed,conservative
As a conservative teenager in California voting in his first mid term election I can honestly say this thread helped me see clarity on a lot of issues by showing me the other side of a story the media never tells you. I’m glad to have found this. It is really nice to listen to people talk in a civil manner and have similar opinions instead of shaming me for my beliefs. Like for instance on my college campus I’ve had things thrown at me for peacefully wearing my Trump shirt. Also nothing has made me feel more proud to be an American than voting today! God bless the USA! 🇺🇸,Sandwich-Police,e97hgil,conservative
"I really hope you saw this meme:

https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9uoqbm/youre_just_brainwashed/

And I want you to know that as a over 40 conservative - it's always been like this. Don't let people tell you it is somehow new and because of Trump. This is exactly how all the democrats acted from 2000-2008, from 1980-1992... and even in the years they were in charge, it just wasn't as over the top as it is when they are out of office.

I personally don't remember before then... but if you go read Buckley's book God And Man At Yale - that seems to be the start point somewhere in the 1950s.

You have a great day too, buddy!",Gnome_Sane,e96uxzf,conservative
They call us the Silent Majority for a reason. ,smokejaguar,e96s9t7,conservative
I second this. I was starting to feel pretty alone.,anonymouspatriot84,e96vrhj,conservative
❤️,psyneapple,e974vbe,conservative
"Friend, I am writing this from NYC on my way home from work. It is nice to be able to come here and know that I am not alone.",TheRandManCan,e96qlkc,conservative
"Here is something controversial:

Elections are not that important to individuals. There are so many other things that can improve your and your families life, it’s not worth obsessing or losing family over.


After this election I’m disconnecting from Politics and spending more time with my wife and children.",TedyCruz,e96wt4l,conservative
"What the left has become is quite un-American.

The civil society relies on people of virtue, and sadly, there are fewer and fewer.

Don’t be afraid to confront ideology based on emotion with facts, logic and reason, ever.",m2guru,e97hjcu,conservative
"In college in the 1980's I was called homophobic and racist, because I didn't go along with my Socialist resident director's view points.  She was sincere, and we were having a decent conversation.  I doubted myself even though I didn't see it.  At some point it, after being around that stuff for years and years, it became apparent their condemnation was all about me to go along with their position.  They just keep moving those goal posts. 

I'm not in your situation.  I'm still fairly sure it's not about you.  Don't let the gas-lighting and shaming get to you.  ",Roez,e96xoxv,conservative
[deleted],,e96vm71,conservative
Welcome to the fairest forum you'll find as a free thinker. ,TearsForPeers,e96xsni,conservative
"You’re not alone, OP! Hubby and I just came back from voting. We pretty much swept red on the ballots.

Good job on voting!",PurpleAngel23,e97dr4p,conservative
I need to do the exact same,jacobwilliamhillard,e96wmt9,conservative
"100% agree with you, I was left wing all the way until the 2016 election. It was my first chance to vote and I took it very seriously, I studied the issues heavily, and completely flipped my views. At first the flip was very “in your face” and I found myself going into a right wing echo chamber. I caught myself, and now I try to listen to a left wing video or article on the same topics also. It hasn’t switched my views for the most part, but has enabled me to articulate my points a lot better when politics are mentioned.",jacobwilliamhillard,e96uwpt,conservative
"I’ll take a look at it, and thank you!",jacobwilliamhillard,e96wr2k,conservative
"That is for sure.   I was in High School when Hinckley shot President Reagan, and there were students cheering about it.   ",Lanrick,e96xual,conservative
"It’s okay, we are here for you ❤️.",PurpleAngel23,e97dthi,conservative
Im glad you and so many seem to be able to relate! The love is much appreciated!,jacobwilliamhillard,e96x2kh,conservative
"Amen to that, I really separated myself from it since the 2016 election. Than all of a sudden the Kavanuagh situation happened and man has that gotten nasty. I’ll happily follow your lead and disengage for a bit once this is over.",jacobwilliamhillard,e96x0w6,conservative
"I’m from VA but I watched the Cruz vs Baeto debates and the contrast was staggering, I don’t think it be possible for him to win. At least I hope not!",jacobwilliamhillard,e96wwv1,conservative
"I dunked facebook in 2016 and I’ve never regretted it once. Social media sucks, you’ll be happier without it :)",Indeyon,e97iyx3,conservative
Do it. Its not hard. Take up a new hobby or something. ,hat_wine_clock,e96xvwb,conservative
"In fact, it is astounding to me how many of my liberal friends who called Bush Hitler, insisted he was going to be impeached every day of his presidency for war crimes, that he planned 9/11 and blew up levees in New Orleans just to kill brown people... then tried to convince me in 2015/16 that they are only saying stuff like this about Trump and would never say it about other ""Normal Republicans"". Literally denying they called Bush Hitler... Cleverly ""Bushitler""... as if I would forget they said it to me for all of 2000-2008!

Don't let it get to you, find other friends who think like you or start a republican club at your school.",Gnome_Sane,e96xyey,conservative
Omg. Wanna know why our country is in the toilet? It’s because of people like them. Shame on them.,PurpleAngel23,e97dzuj,conservative
"I'm actually left leaning but like to check k in here for the same reasons as the guy above (normally never comment).  Super curious about this since traditionally Republicans and all other flavors of conservatives have hated Ted Cruz standing on his own.  Is it just that you disagree so much with Beto, am I wrong about how most of you view Cruz or is it just that he energizes Democrats elsewhere in the country so he feels like a bigger threat to conservative movements?",MooseMcEgan,e96zfxo,conservative
Well I enlisted in the Marine Corps so that should do it for the next couple of months 😂,jacobwilliamhillard,e96y627,conservative
"i wish i could find the article, but i read something about how pretty much every republican candidate since the second world war has been compared to hitler by the left.",fireball3k,e96zczu,conservative
"As someone who has only been in politics since 2016, I personally haven’t had a problem with Cruz at all. I do also disagree with Beto on everything so in my opinion it all depends on the age bracket you’re asking.",jacobwilliamhillard,e970s9u,conservative
"If you can find it, I’d like to see it as well",khoodgrindin,e97jhq6,conservative
But muh blue wave.. ,L3301,e98smlc,conservative
The only wave I’m interested in is Old Glory waving in the breeze ,Colonel_Shepard,e98sobp,conservative
He needs to work on building the black base. Even getting to 15% is pretty much an assured victory. We need more WWE-MLB watching Trump.,Enzo_SAWFT,e99qduv,conservative
I almost want Jeb! to run again just for the memes. ,soxfan90,e99w99p,conservative
Also Asians. Their cultures tend to be fairly conservative and they're pissed at affirmative action.,Terra_green2,e9a0w0v,conservative
Dems took the house. So no matter what. They win here ,MaddSim,e979xla,conservative
"There were 6 GOP constitutional officers; now: 1. There was a GOP U.S. senator before Tues; not anymore. 2 at-risk D House districts stayed D. Large margins. There were 27 D Assembly seats; now: 29. There were 11 D state Senate seats; now: 13.

&#x200B;

Source: Some dude on Twitter",RobotXander,e9cxg3f,conservative
"The ""blue wave"" was suppose to take both.  It was a trickle.",SuperFunMonkey,e97c05w,conservative
No one except Fox News has called that. ,MigzMando,e97a6bm,conservative
The House is still close ,McKnight36,e97dawf,conservative
T_D also hyped it to be a red wave.,zwiebelsaft,e97nxxn,conservative
"See? Thank you. 


""Blue wave"" was NOT supposed to be just one house. It was of course supposed to be both houses. ",Themusician67,e987tnb,conservative
">The ""blue wave"" was suppose to take both. 

No it wasn't. Winning both was a pipe dream. R politics was always saying that. Governor races and local races flipping to Dems is happening right now and that wasn't expected. They got their dumb blue wave. Thank god we kept the Senate. Had we lost that, we'd be in huge trouble. 

",Dunkeliness,e97eew0,conservative
"Right? 26 seat majority. 

This was a blue drizzle. ",Themusician67,e987vot,conservative
If it was a blue wave Florida would of went blue ,phantomcut3,e98gg8v,conservative
"Smart, young, and conservative. He’s a great candidate ",casual-degenerate,e960j59,conservative
Send this man to the U.N. if he can't get an upset win tonight.,SendixBunny,e95to6v,conservative
I voted for him!,InsertNameHere9,e95yycv,conservative
Fuckin' John James!,fuckeveryone________,e96i420,conservative
Pollsters have a recent history of getting Michigan wrong. If there's anywhere we can get an upset win tonight I am hoping it'll be James in MI.,Martbell,e965avd,conservative
Can we call people racist for not voting for a person of color??,jeremy226,e96cla6,conservative
This guy is a treasure.  He should be running in a more favorable environment though.,Reven1911,e96ds5t,conservative
"It’s truly a shame for Michigan that he didn’t pick up that seat... but something like 95 open cabinet seats in the Trump administration still. He’ll be in DC soon, watch.",m2guru,e97je3k,conservative
Get this man to Washington! ,sans_laRegret,e96oim1,conservative
"Just got a robocall from his campaign claiming he's down two points and people need to get out the vote. I have no idea if that is true of not. I frankly can't imagine he'll win, but I voted for him earlier today, because while he's not especially compelling, he's definitely the lesser evil.",gprime,e96ra9l,conservative
[7 am! I was there to vote for John James.](https://i.imgur.com/ZLHwJsu.jpg),gusto911,e96rx3c,conservative
He’s got my vote. ,the-G-Man,e96s6mn,conservative
Wish I could vote for him. He seems like a very good man. We need more of them in government. ,neemarita,e96uvll,conservative
Thankfully my wife took my advice so I feel like I got to vote twice for him.  That comment was electric!  Now we hope that the rest of this State can see the value in a doer vs a receiver.,mattmcd20,e96iglm,conservative
there's something influential (probably wrong word) about black republicans,r3duced2ash,e975l12,conservative
"I like this man, who is he?",Moloty,e96u4gk,conservative
"Gah.   A direct video link for reposting perhaps?
",ErieHog,e9684ib,conservative
"I don’t think James had the resume for a foreign policy job, but it would definitely be a great idea to get him a job in the administration if he loses.  There are a lot of rumors about Wilbur Ross leaving, I think James would be a better fit as Commerce secretary.",joozian_,e961iko,conservative
"As did I. Also I loved the ""only voted once"" thing.",Atrocitus777,e962ocu,conservative
"I was grinning like an idiot while filling in my vote for him.
*edited because extra words",caffiend525,e96a1mf,conservative
Hahahah so great. ,Themusician67,e96pev6,conservative
That would be a great consolation prize if we lose the house.,Reven1911,e96dy4k,conservative
I hope so!,Terra_green2,e96l39r,conservative
"""No, only villains do that!"" 

- All Might",molon-labe7,e96h4p8,conservative
He's running in a state that voted for Trump in the last election. ,Glsbnewt,e96rs3v,conservative
"As of right this second, with 13% of precincts reporting, James is leading 50.3% to 47.5%.",mecha_bossman,e979iiq,conservative
Running for Senate in Michigan.,Twentyamf28,e975poa,conservative
"Deputy VA Secretary, bumped to Sec after 2020 would be great for his resume and the VA
",CCPCanuck,e96lab8,conservative
As a former military pilot his foreign policy was to kick some A$$,davetn37,e96ksj7,conservative
Yes Trump won by less than 0.25% and if he had run in 2016 he'd have an advantage.  2018 is not a good year for Republicans running in purple or blue states.  It's just the nature of the political cycle.,Reven1911,e96sjqo,conservative
"Yeah, I like that.",joozian_,e96ldfi,conservative
After the whole Sarah Jeong incident we already knew the NYT was racist,WeimarRepublic,e97hokh,conservative
"If I said that I wasn't willing to let black people off the hook for voting for Obama, that'd be an acceptable statement, right?",mastaxn,e97jgl6,conservative
Another far left racist on the NYT editorial.... trying to recover from Trump Derangement Syndrome since 2016,programmingguy,e97k7jr,conservative
What are white people supposed to do upon hearing all this racist bullshit? Sue? Get a gun? Get many guns? ,sjwking,e97njsg,conservative
I'm not willing to let black people off the hook for voting for Obama,Mormonster,e97p5po,conservative
I'm not willing to let Muslims off the hook for 9/11,Bob9999999999999,e97oho9,conservative
Fuck that racist cunt. ,MaddSim,e97gwoi,conservative
Her hook is meaningless.,HiGloss,e97twd1,conservative
"Not sure anyone gives a fuck what you think, lady",puddboy,e987zh3,conservative
"Yep. Try to bring it up and you're accused of ""white fragility"".


Textbook racists, plain and simple.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97vbs4,conservative
"Call this shit for what it is in every forum imaginable: Racism.  Then vote in every election.
I know last night could have gone better but the GOP was on defense and we held up pretty good.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9910nu,conservative
I am not willing to let black people off the hook for all of the violent crime and drugs rampant in their neighborhoods.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9913xm,conservative
"I’d call you racist, but I understand the difference between an ethnicity and a religion. ",justhere2havefun,e97qowo,conservative
Another Swift loser she can write a song about.,DH5650,e984b0f,conservative
Well it frees up time for skateboarding at whataburger.,godsdragon79,e97yrcf,conservative
"“Literally Shaking...”

Post video?",Clatsop,e9804ni,conservative
I cant wait to gloat around dallas today!,buffalo_chum,e97ys9f,conservative
"I might be alone in this, but this has become one of my favorite things to laugh at post-election. Or whenever crying and shaking ensues. Hasn't gotten old yet.",katouhayato,e9802me,conservative
And these supposed adults want to be taken seriously.,Kutepov,e97zx5j,conservative
He has the flacid idiot look so reminiscent of John Kerry...or most drunk frat boys on Sunday morning!,JFGFNY,e99hbd7,conservative
Video or it didn’t happen.,Schlabonmykob,e980b6v,conservative
"My fiance's family all voted for beto and they were so vocal about it. 

Today is a good day. ",Themusician67,e989hss,conservative
"Same. Because why? Why are you doing that, people? ",Themusician67,e989jd4,conservative
"They probably couldn't even tell you a real reason why. Which is pretty sad, but I'm still going to laugh at the *shaking and crying* wave.",katouhayato,e98boon,conservative
I’m always for changes in these leadership positions just for the sake of new perspectives and approaches. So good luck to her. ,etherealsmog,e98lknl,conservative
"My county went 65% for John Cox.  In my little town the city council race was decided by 21 votes.  On the bright side, with Newsome as governor we can have shit covered streets statewide",BrockLee76,e98p2ot,conservative
This would potentially be an interesting article if they explained what this means for the person voting.  ,I_am_really_shocked,e9a7irh,conservative
Sounds like voters will be able to rank the candidates on a scale of one to however many candidates there are ...?,RomeoMyHomeo,e9a8iyk,conservative
No vote splitting. No spoiler effect.,ApprovalVoting4Spoil,e9ag9m6,conservative
"She'll either have to live without ever seeing her own reflection again or find a way to, uh, remove herself from the equation. ",katouhayato,e98e40l,conservative
"I guess she should know about disgusting white people, she sees one in the mirror every time. ",chriztee,e98e4ei,conservative
Ok bye,gtrdundave2,e98e4bt,conservative
Shitty one hit wonder artist desperately tries to be remain relevant as she is bypassed by thousands of superior artists.,smileimhigh,e98g5jg,conservative
Uh oh.  Is she off her meds again?,phydeaux70,e98hdit,conservative
Never heard of her.,t3ch21,e98fn04,conservative
Hmm - is this to do with the US mid terms? Last I heard you aren't an American so...,JFGFNY,e98mqcu,conservative
"Islam, the religion of the mentally deranged.",nharding,e9aq2c5,conservative
And she had Prince to thank for her one hit.,MadLordPunt,e98gqrz,conservative
The stuff they won't show on TV,Ali-aMemes,e95o7sr,conservative
Holy shit. The stuff mainstream shows is so highly edited it’s borderline criminal what they do to manipulate. ,anon20202,e95rgfp,conservative
"Holy crap, *just like the NAZI'S did!*",Jizzlobber42,e95ujwo,conservative
Kind of a random question but does anyone wanna split a mugclub membership with me? ,vorcazm,e9693p1,conservative
"If this happened to Obama, you'd hear about it EVERYWHERE.",rdf-,e95sksb,conservative
God Bless America,PurpleAngel23,e97e61p,conservative
These rallies are so full of violent hateful people. /s,pk3maross,e95uyuv,conservative
No one knows the other verses lol just like the national anthem,69beaverfucker420,e96brtc,conservative
"Good job, Mr. President. Good job, citizens. Love seeing this stuff at rallies.",Or_That,e96l89a,conservative
"He did this in the Indiana Rally too. It wasn’t as long a stoppage and crowd didn’t sing, but he still stopped and took time to find a doctor and make sure the person had help",Ltimh,e96tbik,conservative
I have to say that it's nice to see him show compassion in any way.  This was nice.  Thanks for sharing.,Russilito,e95vcao,conservative
This gave me goosebumps!,psyneapple,e974hdp,conservative
"Donald Trump is a good person, and there is far more content than has been provided in this post to prove it.

Donald Trump doesn't care whether one is: white, black, tall, short, big, slim, male, female, transgender, heterosexual, lesbian or gay.

Donald Trump asks exactly what is asked of citizens in other countries. He simply requests: the people work hard to contribute to their society and economy if they are fit to do so, that migrants enter their state legally so that they can be given all of the support and help they need to be a success in America and that everybody oboes by the laws set out by his government to keep everybody safe.

The difference between Donald Trump and other states is that if one doesn't do their best to make their country a better place to live for everybody then they will face the consequences; what's so wrong with that?

In short, Donald Trump is setting out the American dream for everybody in his country for what it actually is. He is not making it what previous presidents have made it. Why do you think people want to live in America? Because the American dream is possible! ",radioStar05,e96ev3f,conservative
"You should check out some of the leftist reaction to this. Would be great to get some of the twitter posts and comments on various news articles out into the light. 

We're in a battle of good vs evil. ",AmericanYidGunner,e95qyiq,conservative
"Imagine if this was an Obama o Bernie rally...


Remember the bird that landed on the podium? Or the of photos Obama shaking hands with janitors? I was living in Europe at the time and I saw them all, now I’m in America and Reddit is the only place I see anything remotely positive about our President",TedyCruz,e96esbv,conservative
This is why I come to this sub.,Positron311,e96owo8,conservative
"Wow all those heterogarbage, white cis male Russian racists don’t really seem that bad. #KAG",TheSawceBawss,e95te9p,conservative
i love that man ,donjohn1986,e95quzi,conservative
Total gentleman.,fuckeveryone________,e96h0r7,conservative
Wow! A bunch of Nazis chanting! /s ,DancingDinos,e967p7k,conservative
“This is one of our great people” he said of her,HowRememberAll,e962g0u,conservative
[removed],,e96lspe,conservative
Wow,War-Damn-America,e961y21,conservative
This title confuses me...,JingyBreadMan,e95wz8s,conservative
"Every once in a while, you'll see a sincere glimpse into who Trump the man really is, and it's nothing like the evil caricature the media portrays.

He loves to go out of his way to shake hands, invite strangers up on stage, meet the people who want to talk to him.  I remember the way he chased down that Marine's hat in the wind.  He is a more humble person than he gets credit for.

I truly believe he has a great deal of care for the people he serves and leads.  When he talks about protecting American industry and jobs and security, he means it.

",nited_states,e969cqr,conservative
Everyone knows Amazing Grace is practically a Nazi rally song you uncultured baby murdere- wait... ,EvenGotItTattedOnMe,e96wo5f,conservative
I might be persuaded. DM me ,realbaconator,e96isre,conservative
It did happen to Obama while he was campaigning. It happened often enough to where it was believed to be fake. ,rAlexanderAcosta,e960n1n,conservative
[removed],,e9696oj,conservative
"When I was in middle school, our teacher made us remember verses of the national anthem so we could sing them together. I went to a Christian private school, so she could get away with it there.",PurpleAngel23,e97eehb,conservative
He tried to ban Muslims.,sIurrpp,e971gof,conservative
Link to them.,tehForce,e963k7b,conservative
"If you can, link me some of the post reactions.",goldrotmgonly,e962nx7,conservative
"I'm not being a dick, but it's every once in a while exactly because Trump is behaving poorly most of the time. If he was normally a decent human being, this wouldn't be news. The fact that you drool over it would suggest it's irregular even to you. ",yM32R8fw,e97aizh,conservative
Was it?,PurpleAngel23,e97efxt,conservative
"Muh Nazis, you’re sick in the head

Seek help",CCPCanuck,e96ky3s,conservative
"he wasn’t restricting them because of their religion, it was country of origin. If he did the same thing for an Asia nation, the media would say he hates Buddhists. it was a matter of security, not religious persecution",Trav_X,e97hn77,conservative
"lol then i guess obama also tried to ""ban muslims"" ",motivate_cs,e97ojbk,conservative
"Unfortunately I cannot access Twitter/many other sites from work, and all my activity is traced. If you search for the article on it in The Hill, and read the comments you'll see what I'm talking about. ",AmericanYidGunner,e968cds,conservative
"You are being a dick.  And wrong, which is worse.",nited_states,e97am9b,conservative
"It wasn’t just a country, it was the whole region. But okay.",sIurrpp,e988z0k,conservative
"All he spreads is fear, hatred and lies. Some people refuse to admit it but he's unfit for most jobs based on his behavior. He's very unfit to represent America. At least more than just one face of it.",yM32R8fw,e97bnkl,conservative
It was an Obama made list of countries my dude....,Drewbagger,e98bxz4,conservative
literally nonsense. if you can show me one instance of trump spreading fear and hatred i'll give you gold but you probably can't. ,motivate_cs,e97obw2,conservative
r/politics is over there,BrockLee76,e97ckfs,conservative
"How about his most recent attempts to stroke fear of the evil caravan of people coming to invade America? Or the insinuation of shooting them if they throw stones? Immigration is his and the parties primary fear subject. Gangster Mexicans are coming to kill you. But he doesn't seem to have much to say about large groups of white males chanting ""Jews will not replace us!"" He doesn't have much to say for someone who clearly supports him if they mail/deliver bombs to his political opponents. It's a selective and racist fear to push a bigoted agenda and you're either incapable of or simply unwilling to admit it.

Either way, there's probably no point in addressing facts (fake news) with someone who is unable to see the literal nonsense spewing from this dumb ass president of ours. Deuces.",yM32R8fw,e98g61n,conservative
the fact that illegal immigrants have high rates of murder and rape is hardly why conservatives believe illegal immigration is such an issue so clearly you don't know much. they enter our nation and benefit from social services without paying taxes and take jobs from citizens who would actually be paying taxes,motivate_cs,e98zksj,conservative
Jim Jordan or Bust,iwasthebeaver,e98r1kw,conservative
Odds he joins the Collins-Murkowski duo? ,latotokyo123,e97ds7p,conservative
Top 10 anime characters who came back from the dead,CITY_F0X,e97h1m3,conservative
"Romney definitely would have voted for Kavanaugh.  Sure, he is a moderate Republican but he isn't a spineless hack like Flake/Collins/Murkowski",Mormonster,e97eaun,conservative
"I dunno. He seems to be the type that wants media praise, despite hot the media treated him in 2012. He won't be as bad as McCain, but he is still a rhino of sorts",MaddSim,e97guv0,conservative
Flake was 10x more conservative than Romney. Romney has already matched Flake's comments about Trump. I am pretty concerned. ,latotokyo123,e97j9ls,conservative
"> spineless hack like Flake/Collins/Murkowski

I doubt that",JMB_was_a_god,e97g3gm,conservative
"I think you'd be surprised.  He will vote for what he believes is best for Utah.  I'd imagine he won't support everything on Trump's agenda, but he won't actively try to sabotage the President.",Mormonster,e97gha0,conservative
"> but he won't actively try to sabotage the President.

he is McCain 2.0.",JMB_was_a_god,e97gim4,conservative
"Lindsay Graham was McCain's BFF.  

Romney is not in that mold.",Mormonster,e97goll,conservative
do not hold your breath,JMB_was_a_god,e97gpzd,conservative
Just because someone doesn't agree with Trump on 100% of things doesn't make them a bad person.  It just makes them someone that can think for themselves,Mormonster,e97h2qr,conservative
"Do you think that's the problem? Rand Paul might disagree with Trump (and the rest of the GOP) like 30% of the time and everyone loves him. It's about grandstanding and trying to sabotage your own party by virtue signaling.  Mitt Romney his whole career has flip-flopped and been more unprincipled than Trump. Mitt Romney was hawkish on immigration in 2012, guarantee he flips and becomes an amnesty proponent. ",latotokyo123,e97kkqu,conservative
"Mitt Romney flip flopped as a Presidential candidate (as literally every candidate including Trump has done since the beginning of time).

All I know is Utahns love Romney because he brought the Olympics to Salt Lake City and brought the state tens of millions of dollars (which is rare because most Olympic hosts lose money)",Mormonster,e97kwdp,conservative
"Mitt Romney has changed his position for every office he's run for. I get changing your policies for one election to appeal to voters, Trump is an egregious offender of this I agree. Mitt's changed his positions from a failed senate campaign, as a governor, two presidential elections and then another senate campaign. Someone this ambitious for power is not a good thing. It's great Utah loves Romney, but it's mostly because of his Mormon identity. I want to remain optimistic but I'm very skeptical he won't be an obstructionist. But if he does, I don't want people making excuses by saying he's principled and thinks for himself. I'm sick of giving RINO's the benefit of the doubt. ",latotokyo123,e97l6ga,conservative
"As a MN I’m not to happy. 

Over in r/Minnesota everyone is happy that we voted for minorities and women but I care about policy more than identity points. ",DudeCaptain,e980imx,conservative
"Anytime a Dem tries to lecture you about civility or decency a la Roy Moore, please remind them they elected Ellison and Menendez without any quibble ",Marko_Ramius1,e982iwg,conservative
"> Over in r/Minnesota everyone is happy that we voted for minorities and women but I care about policy more than identity points.

The economy didn't matter, tax cuts didn't matter, race mattered.

In a multicultural society, democracy is nothing more than a racial headcount, and the GOP has done a pretty poor job courting white voters. ",IndefinitePresent,e98akan,conservative
"Same, seriously a little disgusted with the results",Beechboy96,e980wwr,conservative
"Furious former Democrats — fed up at the party’s leftward lurch — are banding together in protest under the banner of the #Walkaway movement.

The seven-month-old online effort pushes the idea of abandoning a party that, members say, has become allergic to dissent and hostile to moderate voices. 

Thousands of former progressives have joined the #WalkAway campaign, sharing their own stories on social media.

* **[#WalkAway Compilation Part 1 - ""Why I left the Democrat Party""](https://youtube.com/watch?v=Qn3G4MFqTlI)**

* **[#WalkAway Compilation Part 2 - ""Why I left the Democrat Party""](https://youtube.com/watch?v=eUj3AuoK-Wk)**

*****

**You will cast your ballot in secret today. If you have not walked away from the Democrats publicly yet, you do not have to share with everyone how you actually voted.**

**But, please #WalkAway**

#/r/WalkAway  

",Clatsop,e95lk3u,conservative
[removed],,e95wgfl,conservative
[removed],,e95sxzq,conservative
[removed],,e95wvs0,conservative
"Vote for whoever you feel will do a better job representing you. And if you're in Michigan, yes on prop 1.",bullbolony,e95vric,conservative
[removed],,e95rl5e,conservative
[removed],,e95swab,conservative
[removed],,e95ov7a,conservative
"For the first time in my life, I will be voting Republican.",waffleezz,e95t7kl,conservative
[deleted],,e95ts2k,conservative
Lol @ all the mad libs in this thread ,necktits_,e95vec7,conservative
Scariest thing about today’s election is if Dems win big America will be endorsing this behavior.,the-divine-comedy,e95oiph,conservative
Just voted if our incumbent comptroller and sheriff don’t win they can  thank the Democrat’s. Historically voted for these guys even though they were dems but after Kavanaugh I promised I would vote straight republican ,billswinthesuperbowl,e95ovpv,conservative
What if they're rioting because they want to get paid more?,lioninawhat,e95rpwg,conservative
">not mobs

>Republican

Hmm",doooooooomed,e97k1h6,conservative
Yeah. Remember when those protesters damaged that poor car?,lenmae,e984kq1,conservative
"Original Leftist post deleted:

>These top minds here completely ignoring the fact that the vast majority of recent violent/hateful ""protests"" have been obsessive Repubs shooting up schools and synagogues, or holding racist rallies while mowing down peaceful counter-protesters.

Come on man, with your logic we'd blame the left for shooting up concerts, schools, clubs, offices, churches and police officers. Of course we understand using such weak connections in most cases to paint our entire opposition as terrorist is rediculous. 
",PerceivedShift,e95x1xz,conservative
Will we get a thiving economy or 50 genders?,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e966nsa,conservative
Communists need to be as demonized as NatSoc. It's disgusting how the hammer/sickle isn't.,TheMormanTrump,e9691lu,conservative
"My social media is full of “punch a Nazi” memes right now. Boy, I hope the Left loses today.",8K12,e96j242,conservative
The mainstream left doesn't participate but still fails to denounce it.,doobsftw,e95yi17,conservative
[removed],,e95tq13,conservative
"Heres a whole thread advocating unapologetic violence without a single comment removed.

https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/8u53ws/protesters_confront_mcconnell_chao_over_family/?st=JIWK3Y32&sh=bef08ad1


>As a reminder, this subreddit is for civil discussion.

>In general, be courteous to others. Attack ideas, not users. Personal insults, shill or troll accusations, hate speech, any advocating or wishing death/physical harm, and other rule violations can result in a permanent ban.

and yet...

>""It's working, however minor, it's working. Don't stop, no peace for these fools.""

>""McConnell deserves no peace the rest of his goddamn life.""

>""Good. Fuck both of those pieces of shit.""

>""Why don't you leave my husband alone?""

>Because he is a vile, repulsive piece of shit.""


what about all the threads celebrating when any conservative dies? the place literally goes into calibration mode. fucking vile place/ r/politics. 


Just a few examples of the incivility and calls to violence that /r/politics totally frowns upon and removes...

""that ratfucking sewer-dweller — Mitch McConnell is a thief and hypocrite extraordinaire...He supports separating families and caging helpless children. He supports racism, fascism, and concentration camps. He supports and promotes inequality. He doesn’t want America to have good schools, good jobs, or affordable healthcare...Fuck him til he falls out of his shell and rots in the hot sun of justice."" +246

""Johnson: War on Poverty

Nixon: War on Drugs

GW Bush: War on Terrorism

Trump: War on Humanity"" +60

""Stalk the motherfucker and do everything possible within the confines of the law to hold his feet to the fire.

We need to make this a thing. Make a website, make an app, plan out mass flash mob confrontations. Let him never have a day of peace again."" +102

""The civil war has started."" +17

""Idiot trash republican voters and their Nazi loving GOO are treasonous traitors supporting a coup. Traitors will face justice."" +12

""Mitch and Chao don’t deserve our respect or civility. Run these fuckers out of town and make them think twice before ever stepping foot out in public."" +59

""Fuck it, use violence. The fuckers are already calling for it fucking killed someone at a protest. Let’s stop fighting fascism with one hand behind our back."" +14

""Time to stop caring about rallying up the racist pieces of shit that are assisting the country turning into a authoritarian government."" +100

...and on and on and on. This sort of hateful rhetoric is going to get someone seriously injured or killed. And that sub will sweep it under the rug, while shooting one racist bitch saying racist shit to the top as proof that all Republicans are evil and Trump's words are endangering the country and ""emboldening the racist GOP"". You know who's being ""emboldened"" here? The fuckers who are going to look at Maxine's words as not only permission, but actual direction, to physically attack Republicans. And it isn't going to just be the politicians. It's going to be anyone who dares to be anything but a tow-the-line leftist.",tmone,e95wftc,conservative
"So you have one time where Trump offered to pay the legal fees of anyone willing to punch a violent protester brigading their rally.

Meanwhile....

just a list of the times the media has called for violence against Trump or his supporters

Trump has never called for attacks on the media

But the media (and demokkkrat politicians) HAVE called for attacks on trump supporters and politicians

https://imgur.com/ndDQ2ZX.jpg

https://www.bing.com/videos/search?q=media+calls+for+violence+against+trump&amp;amp;amp;amp;docid=608001564387313248&amp;amp;amp;amp;mid=12C164ADFB663C9EB0C112C164ADFB663C9EB0C1&amp;amp;amp;amp;view=detail&amp;amp;amp;amp;FORM=VIRE

https://youtu.be/nw9kyYEwg2A

https://www.breitbart.com/big-journalism/2018/07/07/new-york-times-calls-godfather-tactics-stop-trumps-scotus-nominee/

http://archive.is/exNo0

http://conservativedailypost.com/maxine-waters-calls-for-public-harassment-against-trump-officials/

would you like me to link all the compilations of maga hat wearing victims getting beat to a pulp in the street by mobs? 


edit

fuckn desperate and angry little brigaders today. lol. 
",tmone,e95tvl7,conservative
"NPC #627, you have strayed to far from the mother subreddit. Reboot your system and return r/politics for another batch of programed responces.

Edit:Brigaders are out in force this morning.",03V6Premium,e95sa1b,conservative
"> 17 dead, 12 injured

Otherwise known as a weekend in Dem-controlled Chicago.",they_be_cray_z,e95sgoy,conservative
"Yeah ""right wing"". You do realize you can't just classify everything you dislike as ""right wing"" you bigot.",ultimis,e95sr3m,conservative
"Majority rules is a mob idea. No matter what, if a majority is always in control, they will expolit the minority.",03V6Premium,e95uahe,conservative
so a tyranny. a tyrannical mob.,tmone,e95tpn0,conservative
Me too brother! ,TheKingBrycen,e95vxmc,conservative
[deleted],,e960g7s,conservative
Got legit excited to fill in some random words for a nonsensical story before I realised you meant angry liberals. ,GottaPewp,e967sxp,conservative
"Tilting at windmills repeatedly as only their Python script allows.  

edit: awww babies mad? Babies need changies?",BJUmholtz,e95vr07,conservative
[removed],,e95td4g,conservative
Hell if they even win the house by one they will be proclaiming a win and how the country rejected trump,billswinthesuperbowl,e95oyhp,conservative
I don't think they will. Polls have been sliding R ever since the Kavanaugh hearings lit a fire in the conservative electorate. ,smokejaguar,e95p9vg,conservative
then the rioting is never going to end because they will never be satisfied. ,skid472,e95v63b,conservative
Then they are petulant children? I can’t imagine any adult thinking throwing a tantrum will lead to them getting paid more.,DrEntschuldigung,e95vgeo,conservative
Hurting other people and vandalizing unrelated property is not going to win you favors in my eyes.,soracrowe,e96bfog,conservative
That's a little ironic when you consider that a number of them are getting paid to riot.,Clint_East_Of_Eden,e960g7v,conservative
Pepperidge Farm remembers!,drift_summary,e9bydla,conservative
[Just a few weeks ago in Portland](https://www.foxnews.com/us/portland-antifa-protesters-caught-on-video-bullying-elderly-motorist-woman-in-wheelchair),DEYoungRepublicans,e9870xn,conservative
They seem to be conveniently forgetting that the synagogue shooter was pretty firmly anti-Trump. Interesting how that detail always seems to be lost on them whenever they try to claim he's a conservative.,Clint_East_Of_Eden,e960a6j,conservative
"My favorite part is how they word it 'holding racist rallies while mowing down peaceful counter-protesters', like it's happened a dozen or more times when they're taking exactly one incident and one death committed by one man entirely of his own volition with no conspirators and blaming the entire Republican party for it.",DMooseJ,e95xrvv,conservative
Lol.,Clatsop,e96dglr,conservative
[removed],,e95vdtr,conservative
[removed],,e95svus,conservative
"Many likes, lol!",Terra_green2,e96o7ae,conservative
Ooooo I laughed so hard. Do you mind if I appropriate this later? ,GladysCravesRitz,e96ik6i,conservative
[removed],,e95uike,conservative
[removed],,e95ujak,conservative
Here's to the red pill.,waffleezz,e95x9ij,conservative
"I usually go libertarian when I dislike the Republican candidate, but if there isn't one I just abstain since I've yet to find any Democratic candidate I could trust(either I disagree with them wholeheartedly or I can't trust them because DINOs and RINOs only care about getting reelected versus implementing good policy).",Mewster1818,e96ez6s,conservative
"Top mind you got there, son",BJUmholtz,e95w3n1,conservative
[removed],,e95tfo5,conservative
"There were actually several polls showing D""s pulling back ahead.  It's an imperfect science and there's a lot of bias.  We'll just have to wait and see.   ",Roez,e95puyl,conservative
"I'm hoping you are right, but logic is saying you are not.  The Dems have to win only 15 net.  The Republicans have essentially given up on 6 already.  I'm not going to say it's a done deal, but things look very very dark",WIlf_Brim,e95rklk,conservative
[removed],,e95vxjz,conservative
"Amazing isn't it?  In order to *justify* all the ever *increasing* violence on the left (a solid upward *trend*) they must do whatever they possibly can to make their opposition *appear* violent.  This is a difficult task however due lack of supply, so they must ultra politicize tragedies and spread false narratives before the bodies are even cold.",PerceivedShift,e95zins,conservative
"[Here you go](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9tayqr/five_days_until_we_decide_our_nations_fate_before/)

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CW_8V5gB6qw

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hUyZl7enxrE

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i4MkwcKI6-I

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q3bZ7SQJe4s

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ky0487qh0V0

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UxoL8tHSa7g

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UxoL8tHSa7g

https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2016/09/29/raw_trump_supporter_chased_beaten_by_mob_in_california.html",tmone,e95w6nk,conservative
"at least /r/conservative doesnt lie to you claim its neutral.  You guys still upvoting murderous comments describing how you would kill a certain politician with a knife? Try not to assault some jew today. 

https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9g1rq5/mcconnell_breaks_senate_tradition_to_obstruct/e615zf9/

https://www.reddit.com/r/technology/comments/8uwxgx/man_charged_with_threatening_to_kill_ajit_pais/e1ji3rr/?

im going to copy your comment so everyone can see it when it gets removed:

>Lol - remove dissenting opinions and someone simply listing statistics. Then label them as non-human.Quality sub you guys got going on here. At least /r/politics doesn't run their sub like North Korea.
- /u/CaptainNoBoat",tmone,e95tkpr,conservative
No stats were listed in the original comment with sources to back them up. Watch I can do it too. There were 5 left wing riots with 18 fatalities in the past 4 months. No credible source to back it up but trust me because I said it. I call garbage on the r/politics thing. That sub should be renamed r/leftististechochamber.,03V6Premium,e95t68n,conservative
All you.,03V6Premium,e96k3xk,conservative
"A direct democracy has never been, and should never be, the goal of America",Mandrag,e95vrc6,conservative
If the majority supports genocide I guess that makes it democratic and okay 🤷,novumtempus,e95uu86,conservative
"Good thing we don't live in a democracy, we live in a federalist republic.",TheKingBrycen,e95vvtx,conservative
Here here,TheKingBrycen,e95xn5k,conservative
No one won a majority of the popular vote. Trump won the EC.... you know the way we have elected presidents since 1784..,Alex15can,e95v6we,conservative
[deleted],,e960nqh,conservative
"There are legitimate questions about voter fraud in California. You won’t see this discussion in the media, and you will see a lot of people dismissing it. The Republican running for SOS, Mark P. Meuser, (and his team) has checked thousands of addresses used as voter registration addresses to find sometimes dozens of people using the same address, or it’s a commercial empty lot, or a Starbucks. He also questions why hundreds of thousands of dead people are still on the rolls. Then there’s the motor voter registrations along with illegal aliens being allowed to obtain driver licenses, of which several thousand illegals admit they registered to vote. This puts into question about 3 million votes by Californians. ",perkysue,e95wbin,conservative
"Yes momentum was all with the R’s then the bombings and so forth slowed it down. Dems have surged. Could be an ugly day have a sick feeling. I do think Trump’s throwing out one controversial thing after another (transgender, birth right citizenship) to see what would stick was a bad strategy. Made him look unstable and fired up lots of groups.",the-divine-comedy,e95rjf4,conservative
Getting flashbacks to the Democratic primaries.... and the presidential election...,ScootyDanger,e95tp1r,conservative
Not at all. We got them through careful policy creation and legislation. You think rioting was responsible for creating those? No riot ever convinced FDR and congress to pass fair labor standards. ,DrEntschuldigung,e95xf8z,conservative
[removed],,e95uoyh,conservative
[removed],,e95tbkf,conservative
[removed],,e95vamh,conservative
[removed],,e95w36r,conservative
"Trump absolutely lost the popular vote. By several million. But you’re right, the EC sealed his fate. ",djta1l,e95vp07,conservative
"If you take into account potential voter fraud then Hillary may not have even won the popular vote legitimately.

Of course we'll probably never know, and the left wants felons, and non-citizens to be able to vote anyways so they'd still support it.",Mewster1818,e96fbh0,conservative
">I do think Trump’s throwing out one controversial thing after another (transgender, birth right citizenship) to see what would stick was a bad strategy. Made him look unstable and fired up lots of groups.  

Not American, and I'm here from the front page, but isn't that exactly what he always does whenever he doesn't own the news cycle?  It's just that this time it's more overboard than usual?

",letmeseem,e95w69h,conservative
"The attempted bombings really put a dent in things.  It undermined the Jobs not Mobs slogan.  It also played right into what the left has been saying about Trump's rhetoric.  90%+ negative coverage for almost two years.  The optics couldn't have been more perfectly timed. 

I realize why people really believed it had to be a set-up, because it was too perfectly timed for any sane Republican to have done it.   Whatever the reason, it wasn't a good counter argument, at all.  The whole thing is right up there with the Comey letter bombshell in 2016.  
",Roez,e95ugc0,conservative
"so the thing is, i reported to not only sub mods but the site admins about it. its still there with ringing endorsement. 

cherrypicked. lol. hold on. 

Heres a whole thread advocating unapologetic violence without a single comment removed.

https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/8u53ws/protesters_confront_mcconnell_chao_over_family/?st=JIWK3Y32&sh=bef08ad1


>As a reminder, this subreddit is for civil discussion.

>In general, be courteous to others. Attack ideas, not users. Personal insults, shill or troll accusations, hate speech, any advocating or wishing death/physical harm, and other rule violations can result in a permanent ban.

and yet...

>""It's working, however minor, it's working. Don't stop, no peace for these fools.""

>""McConnell deserves no peace the rest of his goddamn life.""

>""Good. Fuck both of those pieces of shit.""

>""Why don't you leave my husband alone?""

>Because he is a vile, repulsive piece of shit.""


what about all the threads celebrating when any conservative dies? the place literally goes into calibration mode. fucking vile place/ r/politics. 


Just a few examples of the incivility and calls to violence that /r/politics totally frowns upon and removes...

""that ratfucking sewer-dweller — Mitch McConnell is a thief and hypocrite extraordinaire...He supports separating families and caging helpless children. He supports racism, fascism, and concentration camps. He supports and promotes inequality. He doesn’t want America to have good schools, good jobs, or affordable healthcare...Fuck him til he falls out of his shell and rots in the hot sun of justice."" +246

""Johnson: War on Poverty

Nixon: War on Drugs

GW Bush: War on Terrorism

Trump: War on Humanity"" +60

""Stalk the motherfucker and do everything possible within the confines of the law to hold his feet to the fire.

We need to make this a thing. Make a website, make an app, plan out mass flash mob confrontations. Let him never have a day of peace again."" +102

""The civil war has started."" +17

""Idiot trash republican voters and their Nazi loving GOO are treasonous traitors supporting a coup. Traitors will face justice."" +12

""Mitch and Chao don’t deserve our respect or civility. Run these fuckers out of town and make them think twice before ever stepping foot out in public."" +59

""Fuck it, use violence. The fuckers are already calling for it fucking killed someone at a protest. Let’s stop fighting fascism with one hand behind our back."" +14

""Time to stop caring about rallying up the racist pieces of shit that are assisting the country turning into a authoritarian government."" +100

...and on and on and on. This sort of hateful rhetoric is going to get someone seriously injured or killed. And that sub will sweep it under the rug, while shooting one racist bitch saying racist shit to the top as proof that all Republicans are evil and Trump's words are endangering the country and ""emboldening the racist GOP"". You know who's being ""emboldened"" here? The fuckers who are going to look at Maxine's words as not only permission, but actual direction, to physically attack Republicans. And it isn't going to just be the politicians. It's going to be anyone who dares to be anything but a tow-the-line leftist.",tmone,e95vdce,conservative
"You can't go around listing stats without sources. They have no validity and aren't credible. Surely you can see yhe problem in doing so. 

The other problem is that if these terror attacks perpitrated by right wing extremist you will hear nothing from this sub other than how disgusting amd cowardly terror attacks are. I have yet to hear of these ""right wing terror attacks"". The actions of groups like antifa however are pretty well known and their attacks/public disruption is very well documented. While the right denounces its extremist, the left supports theirs and props them up.

I will also remind you that this subs purpose is not to harbor debate and the mission of the sub states that it is a place for conservatives to discuss things from a conservative perspective. Not, ""a place for everyone to stick their political opinions"". Any comment/post that is made without the spirit of the mission in mind is typically removed for the sake of keeping this sub at its intended purpose.",03V6Premium,e95u46b,conservative
Oh yes please send me the videos of the troops shooting at migrants! But by your own logic the detention centres are democratic since the elected president upheld them! ,novumtempus,e95vjkq,conservative
"No, it wasn't. Thanks for trying though.",TheKingBrycen,e95w441,conservative
[removed],,e95vve5,conservative
Please use np.reddit.com rather than www.reddit.com when linking to an external subreddit.,DEYoungRepublicans,e95waql,conservative
[removed],,e95vrft,conservative
Well why would you care? If democratically chosen the same traditions could be overridden right? Majoritarianism is a double edged sword. ,novumtempus,e95yigh,conservative
"I think the backlash against the polls in 2016 was a bit overblown, anyway. They correctly predicted that Clinton would get more votes. It's also worth noting that polls usually just give a % chance to win, not a definitive prediction one way or another. The fact that Clinton didn't win when given a 75% or so chance just means that something unlikely happened, not that the polls are worthless. ",Maswasnos,e9869uc,conservative
"This is the good aspect of true gridlock.  It will be really hard to get new spending passed in any serious way.  Most of the big, comprehensive legislation they pass is just shit.  So, I am for gridlock.  ",stoffel_bristov,e992hlg,conservative
Wonder if the NAACP will get on this racial profiling?,mattmcd20,e96jkgv,conservative
This is ridiculous!,PurpleAngel23,e97fz0q,conservative
Read the headline. They already have.,AddictedToGlue,e96llon,conservative
"I read the headline and, gasp, even the article.  The NAACP is not even mentioned. ",Ihateunerds,e97f6bp,conservative
"If blacks want to be treated as equals by the Left, they need to be more like bourgeoisie urban whites. ",Trisagion_und_Isolde,e96rbgi,conservative
"Hey Taylor, thanks for pushing the voters towards Marsha by telling them to vote for Phil Bredesen.  Tennessee is not California, and ten years ago, you would have known that.  You've climbed into the Hollywood bubble and blinded yourself.  You and Tennessee are never, ever, ever getting back together.",thatrightwinger,e979kh7,conservative
Thanks Taylor...hope you'll be around in 2020 too,programmingguy,e97bpok,conservative
"TN democrats can be some of the worst. I’m talking Nashville people. Many of which are transplants, but not surprisingly many locals too. They’ve watched Nashville turn into a blossoming tourist city, with jobs galore and record low unemployment. They watched voters strike down the proposition to waste millions on an inner city only light rail. Yet they flood r/Nashville with the kind of ideas that ruined Detroit. 

They’re honestly just angry they’re being priced out by the growing Nashville economy. Angry about the rent I suppose. ",Mattjew24,e97obir,conservative
"The salt level is so damn high. It's almost like TN democrats think you will vote for their party when they  call you racist bigots. Surprise didn't pay off. 
Not a fan of Blackburn but I dislike a rubber stamp Democrat more.",glockedup1,e97f90k,conservative
"The shit people say when you stick a microphone and camera in their face is hilarious. 

Lol saying yes to propositions they have no idea about. 

I hope these people stayed home today ",Chapka69,e96kksm,conservative
We can only pray that these idiots actually don't vote.,optionhome,e96jpqn,conservative
"Fake news. Stick to chicks jumping on trampolines, Jimmy.",fifaislife206,e96rq70,conservative
"Things like Jaywalking and other sidewalk question skits were always funny in the past.  At some point it became apparent that these skits, being recorded on the streets of LA, were full of people hoping for a chance at stardom.  So they will intentionally say the stupidest shit just to get on TV.  It’s like a street casting audition for them.",Lustan,e96pe3z,conservative
"My favorite Kimmel skit is the same segment, but they ask people if they prefer the Affordable Care Act or Obamacare and why. Some of the responses are gold.",Trav_X,e97i1zr,conservative
"young people are dumb, mostly",cavemanben,e97g548,conservative
"> Lol saying yes to propositions they have no idea about.

These are the very same brain dead that go to leftist demonstration chanting shit.  Shit that they haven't a clue about.  Ask any of them one racist or anti semitic action Trump has taken...they never have an answer.  They just repeat what their lefty overlords teach them to say.",optionhome,e96l8os,conservative
"They are far too lazy to get out and vote.

...I hope.",PurpleAngel23,e97g3cf,conservative
They are the epitome of “ my tv said”   These people couldn’t tell you half the things trump as done. Never mind have a reason to pose it   ,Chapka69,e96m1fo,conservative
"They won't pass articles of impeachment. Too many people are looking at the blanket ""D"" next to the name and assuming they're all like Pelosi/Cortez type insane.

There's a healthy batch of ""moderate"" Democrats that are either 1. Reasonable people and realize that impeaching Trump for nothing is stupid 2. Understand the political risk of going to that ledge and are too afraid to do it or 3. Are in a purple state and can't risk losing reelection on an empty impeachment bid.

The dems will have like 225 ish seats in the house, I'd be shocked to see an impeachment bid get above 200 votes (honestly I'd be shocked to see one reach 100, I doubt they'd risk the 2020 election on an empty impeachment bid).",mbarnar,e987koz,conservative
"They might be able to pass articles of impeachment, but the Senate isn't going to convict.",awksomepenguin,e986kz0,conservative
"I doubt the Dems will be able to corral the votes in the House for impeachment. They'll probably end up having 230 or so seats by the end of the counting. In a lot of these battleground districts, the voters may not like Trump, but at the same time they don't want to impeach him because that'll drag them down in 2020. I think you can get probably 180-190 Dems on the impeachment, but not the whole caucus",Marko_Ramius1,e988vza,conservative
"They can bring up and pass articles of impeachment, but the Senate wouldn't vote to convict.

Expect two years of gridlock and democratic grandstanding.",workaccount35,e986k5l,conservative
What documents are they going to use for impeachment? They would expose their own plot.,levinite,e989jfc,conservative
I’m literally shaking right now,phantomcut3,e98h6sw,conservative
I hope the house passes articles of impeachment because they didn't like the outcome of the 2016 election.  There would be a massive backlash.  ,stoffel_bristov,e991nr8,conservative
"There are two types of politicians in the House.

- Those who use it as a platform for national political theater
- Those who use it to represent their constituents as they were elected to do

There are enough of the latter who won't just vote to impeach for no reason. ",Natetendo83,e989a8t,conservative
I dont know...Pelosi is speaker now....which scares me the most. ,callthereaper64,e988fn0,conservative
Good to know.,callthereaper64,e986np1,conservative
The Sentate should help keep the house in check.,callthereaper64,e98hnnm,conservative
"The thing I find funny about everyone that suggests this, it would just put Pence in power and he is more right wing than Trump haha.",callthereaper64,e992l3u,conservative
"meh, speaker doesn't mean much in the big picture.  Only thing of relevance is it's the 3rd in the line of the presidency but if it ever got to that point we as a country got a lot more problems than who is speaker lol",mbarnar,e98a5lc,conservative
I was mocking liberals lol. Besides democratic house investigations everything is fine ,phantomcut3,e98hpny,conservative
"Oh. Haha.  Sarcasm is hard to read xD.

Also i feel bad one of the reasons i really wanted a redwave....was the liberal tears. Guese will just need to wait till 2020 for the next harvest.",callthereaper64,e98il07,conservative
Beta O’Rourke brought a flood of liberal tears and a few tremors caused by their shaking ,phantomcut3,e98io6j,conservative
"I'm in a liberal stronghold, a.k.a. Seattle....so here they are just patting each others backs and talking about how they can stop Trump now etc.

Also why does it always seem its the rich white people that are usually Democrats...",callthereaper64,e98jm3a,conservative
Perfect.,DH5650,e983idm,conservative
"43.6% - Cox
56.3% - Newsom

Only 26% votes counted. Here's to hoping for Cox!",FooLyCooLie,e97n9jx,conservative
I dunno I'm pretty sure majority of California is dems,MyUsernameIsReallyOk,e97mc2o,conservative
"This, sadly, is how some of the young generation get their minds made up for them. Former latch-key kids looking to their profs as parental figures to be followed.",JFGFNY,e98mma9,conservative
She is really using that economics degree. ,Tacothechihuahua,e95oatp,conservative
The way she is portrayed in the media is super cringe worthy. Her photo ops make her seem like mother Teresa. She has no real work experience outside of bartending and activism. I think the democratic socialists use her as a poster child because she's slightly attractive. She clearly doesn't understand economics or business. I hope she gets crushed today. ,bitERRORrate,e95px6q,conservative
"Just remember that this idiot is without doubt going to win today and actually be a US Congressperson.  Think about that the next time you watch the movie ""Idiocracy.""  Leftism has eliminated satire from our culture.",optionhome,e95nxw8,conservative
"Interviewer:How would you pay for it?

OC:With money duhhhh conservatives are so dumb lol💋 but seriously we could ask my dad he pays for shit he can probably cover it",freedomhertz,e95sfxd,conservative
"That's a good line at the end. We need to make sure everyone in America knows that even if you doubled everyone's taxes, it still wouldn't be enough to pay for socialist Medicare for All.",LibertyTerp,e963inw,conservative
"This multi tiered defense the Dems do is really annoying. It starts with, ""it will actually save money."" When that's debunked, the next is ""healthcare is a basic human right! Denying it is tantamount to murder."" Finally it's, ""how dare you complain about the cost you horrible capitalist!""",greatatdrinking,e95xftb,conservative
I'm still bemused at how socialism is becoming mainstream in this country.,mlmack,e95w61o,conservative
"My favorite comment: ""I’d rather pay $1,000 more in taxes within a year, as opposed to paying $3,000 in private insurance.""

Right, because once the government is involved we can get rid of that 300% markup the private insurance market is doing.",synn89,e95wome,conservative
I... was expected this to be from Babylon Bee that title...,mdh431,e968d20,conservative
Even though we know that she's have a 99% chance of winning her seat I would still love to see her lose,game46312,e95sn7k,conservative
"Haha, reminds me of how politicians in my country used to act up until a few years ago.

""What do you mean 'how will we pay for all these refugees?? How is that a relevant question at all? Open your heart!'""",snoppballe,e95teim,conservative
Shes the one girl in class that had to actually wear the dunce hat!,CulpeppperInaMinute,e95yhpc,conservative
">	“No, people often say, like, how are you going to pay for it and I find the question so puzzling because ‘How do you pay for something that’s more affordable? How do you pay for cheaper rent?’ You just pay for it. We’re paying more now.”

ಠ_ಠ

I refuse to believe that she is _that_ stupid. That’s a political dodge. It has to be. Nobody is _that fucking stupid_.

Unless she actually believes that the government is just this endless source of money, and you don’t have to consider its budget at all. Which would make sense; she’s so self-absorbed that she probably has never even considered that everyone else has to pay for these handouts she wants for herself.",HuluForCthulhu,e9706s0,conservative
"""Ok, if we go into a store and you want a candy bar that costs $1 and you have 50¢, can you buy that candy bar?""",Min0taur,e95ucto,conservative
She truly is a tart.,blizzardice,e96bm06,conservative
She’s an imbecile. ,TrumpwonHilDawgLost,e96g2rk,conservative
And they think Trump is bad with the national debt. Just wait....,Nemesis651,e96glac,conservative
She'll have time to answer that question in more detail when she's done studying for her midterm.,fuckeveryone________,e96hy0y,conservative
Why do we even need healthcare when we can just not get sick? Checkmate ,vorcazm,e96jzog,conservative
People in r/politics are praising her joining congress lol. How delusional can you be to think she’s a good candidate?,yoyowatup,e96xefi,conservative
"It's not hard to see why she accuses any qualified individual who challenges her to a debate of ""cat calling"" and refuses to accept their challenge",VoinaYMir,e97d93t,conservative
This idiot won...,superdude411,e97e6ys,conservative
What does it say about the voter demographics and IQ for electing this dummy. ,Wupta,e97gcfq,conservative
"""...just like when I go shopping.  That credit card with dad's name on it just works.""",tehForce,e965hur,conservative
Zimbabwean Economics at it’s finest. ,undercoveramish,e95yxwi,conservative
This woman should not have a credit card.,Otto-Carpenter,e95usmb,conservative
Jesus Christ. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e96awvj,conservative
Fiat argentum!,Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e96nwqg,conservative
The Mind of a Child.,StephenScherer1,e96owhq,conservative
Sadly that is going to be Congresswoman Ocasio-Cortez,allnamesaretaken45,e96pvfr,conservative
"she is so convinced of lefty propoganda that ""single payer is cheaper"" that she doesnt understand all the private expenditures that will now shift to the gov's responsibility

What a total bafoon.",Manchurainprez,e98rp4x,conservative
Just pay for it 4Head,Mr_Tangysauce,e95upze,conservative
"I hate Ocasio Cortez so much, she is the dumbest candidate running. I disagree with lots of people on the Left about what they want to do with the country, but at least they know what they're talking about. Ocasio Cortez is so fucking dumb. I can't believe that someone so dumb is going to win tonight. What a dumdum.",EchoWhiskey_,e973ut1,conservative
Maybe she can just take some extra from the tip jar?,avengingbroccoli,e95yc8k,conservative
Probably the same kind of person that thinks everything you buy at the grocery store is made/grown at the grocery store. ,cbzdidit,e962v9s,conservative
We need to ignore Ms. Cortez. Cant give her views.,coonana,e96j9v5,conservative
"Universal healthcare works in other countries, I don't understand why people in the US think it's impossible. Not saying she has the answers but it is doable.",RCo1a,e96tv45,conservative
"Ah yes, another article stating that Medicare for all costs 32.6 trillion, while conveniently leaving out the fact that sticking with the current system we have costs 34.6 trillion dollars.",mattintaiwan,e95un9y,conservative
[removed],,e9682h0,conservative
Maybe if we didn't spend a trillion dollars a year to bomb poor brown people on the other side of the world we'd have enough money for better healthcare.,thelimetownjack,e9781aa,conservative
Holy shit I had to fact check this one. Seems like the economics program at the BU Arts and Sciences Department is a little more Art than Science.,Rex_Wyatt,e95tlg2,conservative
"*economics and international relations 

Of which she knows nothing/wrong things. It’s really astounding. ",skarface6,e96ew1w,conservative
Her ideas didn't come from Economics books (ither tan being used as bad examples),StephenScherer1,e96p21k,conservative
All 98.6 of'em,AnarkeIncarnate,e96vhqz,conservative
"When bartending, she refused to tip out. Socialism for thee but not for me apparently.",___-III----III-___,e95q9t4,conservative
" She did have a failed business too.  I am a business owner myself, but I have noticed that some of the most ardent socialists our failed entrepreneurs. At least that was my experience when I was living in Northern California. My theory is that they believe that if they couldn’t make it happen, then the system is rigged. However, my observation was that most of them were smart people that made a lot of dumb decisions. They were largely  talented web professionals, but didn’t have the slightest sensitive business competence.  I guess it isn’t that surprising, but I think they were able to do it right then they would have been much more favorable to the free market instead 

 Meanwhile, one of my liberal friends started a business this year that is actually starting to do pretty well, but I was the one who had explain to him recently how the self-employment tax works.  He admitted near the end of the year that he didn’t know anything about it, so he clearly hasn’t been putting money aside for his taxes. Once he gets his tax bill, I seriously  that that he’s going to shift more to the center or right because he will see just how painful taxes are to business owners. ",Justitdo,e964irr,conservative
Pretty sure her district isn't even remotely competitive so she's gonna have a rude awakening when she gets to DC,jaykyew,e96aggq,conservative
The pose in her posters is very Soviet inspired,ReaganChild,e962e3g,conservative
I look forward to her stupidity being front and center. Let her be the poster child for the left.,fifaislife206,e95pk4x,conservative
Demographics is destiny.  ,Asatru_Dat,e95u2hd,conservative
Muggeridge’s Law!,skarface6,e96eyzb,conservative
Good reference ,carrotriver,e96kdle,conservative
She's called a Congresswoman.....,69beaverfucker420,e96c18e,conservative
"Pithy, but her father actually died of lung cancer a decade ago.",Rex_Wyatt,e95to6p,conservative
Exactly!  That's why we have to quadruple the taxes!  /s,Colonize_The_Moon,e96en6j,conservative
"To liberals, Socialism is the ultimate in fairness and caring.

According to Jonathan Haidt, there are six different moral factors that people use to make various types of interpersonal decisions. Conservatives use them all roughly equally. Liberals over-rely on only two factors: care and fairness.",Sideswipe0009,e95yqz6,conservative
"That’s only because liberals have been spinning it as being free or less expensive than the status quo. But reality catches up with them when they have to submit bills. Even California couldn’t get Medicare for All passed. I used to support Medicare for All by believing they spin. But then I read research from even liberal economists like Kenneth Thorpe and the urban institute showing it would cost more and changed my mind real fast 

Remember this: something like 70% of Colorado voters said they supported single payer. Then they went to the polls on Election Day and saw how much it would cost and **only 20% voter for it**. 

Of course, the idea of “free” stuff sounds great to people. Until they have to pay for it",Justitdo,e96d6kd,conservative
"My family is from the Soviet Union, We have a lot of questions. Do not let Soviet propaganda fool you there was no fairness, there was not careing, and plenty of inequality. 

We are Ukrainian so we did not get the shortend of the stick, we got no stick.",zuul99,e96vqhz,conservative
Failure of proper education from both the schools and parents ,StrongmanCole,e95yukf,conservative
"Free healthcare sounds great, until you realise that shit just ain't free. No doctor is going to school for that long to be paid in thank yous and hugs. ",LordStoffelstein,e96qy7z,conservative
"Oh, the markup will invariably disappear. But the inefficiency of government oversight will undoubtedly balloon the cost right back to where we were.

So we'll be left with less efficiency than we have now with the same price and more headaches.",Sideswipe0009,e95z525,conservative
I unfortunately live in her district. The guy running against her was a no-show,ReaganChild,e962c8s,conservative
Which country is this?,skarface6,e96fkxk,conservative
"Well, if you complain to the cashier enough that it is unfair, maybe management steps in and forces the person behind you to give you 50 cents.",sedoneh,e960ab1,conservative
~♪♪♪~ Peaches come from a can.  They were put there by a man. ~♪♪♪~,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e963c2m,conservative
"It only works well in small homogenous socieites and even then state healthcare is literally bottom barrell.

Anyone of moderate+ means buys private insurane and supplemental plans to get more than the state minimum. 

In most countries healthcare is absolute trash garbage,  a whole lot of places in SE asia, Africa S. America and the middle east have ""universal healthcare""  but just because they claim to have it doesnt mean they actually do in practice or that its the type of healthcare you'd ever want. 

Single payer works Denmark and Norway (at immense cost) small homogenous nations that are rich,  How well does it actually work in giant multi-ethnic socieites like Brazil and China? 

Not great unless you have cash. ",Manchurainprez,e98rxjw,conservative
Have a source on that?,snowballtlwcb,e95wx8u,conservative
"> Socialism, the Boogeyman! Which it isn't, at all, unless those nice paved roads in front of where you live are socialist roads..... 😱

No, it's called 'government'.  Which is distinct from socialism.  One can have roads, fire departments, police, etc in a capitalist society, you know.  

> Surely Canada has gone bankrupt already!

No, they just ration healthcare.  Canada's health care system is [literally worse than communist China's](http://www.torontosun.com/2016/10/06/canadian-health-care-is-even-more-restrictive-than-communist-chinas).  Over [one million people need but are forced to wait](https://www.forbes.com/sites/sallypipes/2018/06/11/canadians-are-one-in-a-million-while-waiting-for-medical-treatment/#71737d503e7d) for care.  The average cost in lost wages is $5,600 per person.  The typical patient waits more than 21 weeks to see a specialist.  Rural patients wait on average 39 weeks.  And at what cost to the government?  By 2030, [Canada's largest province will be spending 80% of its budget just on healthcare.](https://www.td.com/document/PDF/economics/special/td-economics-special-db0510-health-care.pdf)

Run along now, little socialist, back to the land of dreams and snowflakes.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e96f8ik,conservative
"IIRC, that study made many assumptions. Furthermore, it still doesn't change the fact that $33 Trillion is still too much . . .

Canada is in debt . . .

Roads are paved, in general, by state governments or cities 

the amount we spend on the military is less than what we spend on Medicare, Medicaid, and Social Security

Americans don't receive worst coverage and care. We fund the lower prices of other countries. Furthermore, rich Canadians come to the US to get healthcare",linklight127,e96apcw,conservative
"Why are you here, honestly? Do you think Ms. Ocasio-Cortez’ answer was appropriate?",FreedomFromIgnorance,e96azse,conservative
I'm pretty sure an undergrad in econ is a joke. I swear I lived with an econ major who complained about A=Pe^RT being tough junior year,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e963veu,conservative
"Please tell me that’s Boston University, not Baylor University.",Willingmess,e963f87,conservative
"Also rich parents which explains the ""you just pay for it"".",gbimmer,e96kt2j,conservative
She really did that?,Pockaden,e95qkq5,conservative
"Small Business Owners can have an absolutely brilliant idea and solid business plan but fall utterly on their faces because they don't swallow their pride and spend a small portion of their revenue on a good CPA or occasionally consult an attorney. Ending up in tax trouble or legal trouble because of stupid mistakes, often actually paying way too much in taxes. A mistake the IRS will happily let you make.",,e96eobx,conservative
"That makes sense. Apparently she was more of a capitalist when she had her little publishing company and then went off the deep end some time afterwards. I had wondered why she’d make such a drastic change, but your explanation clears things up quite a bit. ",skarface6,e96eqkb,conservative
"It’s one of the bluest districts in the US, apparently.",skarface6,e96erp0,conservative
Couldn't agree more. The more attention they give her the more she proves that she can't handle even the most basic policy questions in the most softball interviews possible. Even her Pod Save America appearance was laughable despite the best efforts of the hosts.,jaykyew,e96akm8,conservative
"It’s not that, it’s that she’s basically running unopposed. The guy she’s up against is an idiot himself who beat his wife, has an Econ is degree but doesn’t challenge her on any economic issues, and runs his campaign through old school leaflets. No ads, not even a Twitter account. Republicans abandoned that district long ago so they were totally unprepared when she got the Dem nomination. Then, rather than throw money at an independent and hope he caucuses with Republicans, they just disavowed the Republican candidate and left the election to her. ",_manoftheyear_,e96dpxf,conservative
"Hey, what are you doing?  You can't assume a persons gender anymore.",flippy76,e96cfs9,conservative
Well at least he'll be able to vote for his daughter today. ,AmericanYidGunner,e95w967,conservative
Tell TMOR i say hai,freedomhertz,e95xy2f,conservative
"That's a very interesting perspective, it's almost like conservatives on the moral scale are ""moderate"" in that sense. Really really interesting.",goldrotmgonly,e962d1g,conservative
Link for the interested: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Moral_foundations_theory,PHProx,e96tn9x,conservative
"California, Vermont, and Florida have all flirted with their own version of single payer. Each one realized after running the numbers that they can't afford it. In VT and CA, it would've doubled their entire budget for the year.",Sideswipe0009,e96n01m,conservative
"Well, it isn't ""free"" healthcare, it's healthcare run by the government.  People are still paying for it through taxes.  I don't know the specifics of how doctors get paid, but I don't hear about any problems in the dozens of countries with single payer healthcare.

What I want to know is what happens to the millions of people that work in the health insurance industry that would suddenly be out of work?",mlmack,e96rjvn,conservative
"If the government is just paying private sector actors that citizens decided that they deserve the money in exchange for services, would that be the case? The one thing the government seems to be efficient at is spending money. ",Trisagion_und_Isolde,e96c6uh,conservative
Joe Crowley is still on the ticket under the working families platform.  Any chance he wins because of it?  The voter turnout was so small for her primary win.,Anklebender91,e96by01,conservative
"Sweden

[Our former prime minister literally said we need to 'open our hearts'](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PsAUDshNMmE)",snoppballe,e96gfjo,conservative
"*Millions of benefits, benefits for free...*",skarface6,e96fndm,conservative
Yeah I’m waiting too.,mdh431,e968erb,conservative
"Wow, 80% of the budget in Canada’s biggest provincial economy, too. That’s pretty shocking. ",FreedomFromIgnorance,e96qt4k,conservative
We already ration it here by not allowing poor people to have healthcare. In Canada they have to wait for non-life threatening issues. I'd rather wait than have to pay what we pay here for healthcare. Oh no wait times GRRRR.,RCo1a,e96u4ns,conservative
"I have an undergrad in Econ. I can personally verify that it's not exactly a smart major to go into.  Thankfully I can lean on my MBA instead because an Econ degree isn't exactly impressive.

BTW I took Marxism for an easy A.  If you wanted to see a bunch of students get red pilled this was the class for you.

Marxist Political Economy (ECO317)
An analysis of capitalism as a social system of production and exchange, based on the economic writings of Karl Marx and others working in that broad tradition. The course begins with study of Marx's philosophical method, dialectical materialism, and applies this method to the historical development of capitalism and the operation of the modern capitalist economy. The course explores connections between economic power and political, cultural, and ethical issues.

",Anklebender91,e96bf36,conservative
For the economic illiterate what does A=Pe^rt mean? ,Direwuff,e96wa4a,conservative
Something tells me if she had been studying econ on the other side of the River she’d probably be a capitalist now.,Rex_Wyatt,e96gte4,conservative
It's Boston University. It's a very good university either. A lot of people confuse it with Boston College.,69beaverfucker420,e96c8q5,conservative
That’s the report. There was at least once where she didn’t share her tips. ,skarface6,e96eht4,conservative
Yes.,sirbonce,e96bwjd,conservative
"""The district was no longer hospitable ground for such an old-style pol, though. Even in the 1990s, the district’s white population was down to 58 percent; by the 2002 redistricting, that figure had plummeted to 28 percent. Even with the influx of generally lower-income and less-educated minority groups, however, median-income and education levels edged up, reflecting the tentative beginnings of gentrification in the neighborhoods closest to Manhattan. Redistricting in 2012 merged the old 7th district into a new 14th district, with some 35 percent of its voting population in the Bronx, including some neighborhoods, like Throgs Neck, resembling the bygone white-ethnic neighborhoods in Queens, but with even more Latino communities. Moreover, some of the old “Archie Bunker” areas like Maspeth and Middle Village were eliminated from the new district. The current district is 46 percent Hispanic, 11 percent black, 16 percent Asian, and 25 percent white, and many of the whites are affluent hipster transplants to gentrifying sections of Astoria, Sunnyside, and Jackson Heights.""

https://www.city-journal.org/html/joseph-crowleys-defeat-15995.html

46 percent Hispanic. I hear what you are saying about the Rs abandoning the district, but the reality is that a moron like Ocasio Cortez gets elected because of her ethnicity, not her ideas.",Asatru_Dat,e96ehme,conservative
"lol

Rex will definitely be literally shaking while reading this comment.",Dorian_v25,e96c96q,conservative
"What's also interesting, according to the study, is that Liberals can't understand how Conservatives think, while Conservatives *can* understand how Liberals think.",Sideswipe0009,e96c0af,conservative
Thanks. Couldn't find any other links to his work.,Sideswipe0009,e96wz9u,conservative
">I don't know the specifics of how doctors get paid, but I don't hear about any problems in the dozens of countries with single payer healthcare.

Other that have single payer have had it for a long time, their systems and personnel have long adjusted their expectations regarding pay and work ethic.

In the states, it would be a shock, as Bernie's M4A would strive for a 40% reduction in rates, thus lowering the pay for everyone in the field. 

The streamlining advocates by this plan would displace approximately 2.3 million workers, according to Vox.",Sideswipe0009,e96xckn,conservative
">f the government is just paying private sector actors that citizens decided that they deserve the money in exchange for services, would that be the case? 

This is pretty much what we have now with the ACA. You are granted ""credits"" towards the plan of your choice based on income, and you cover the balance.

So based on your income, you qualify for $200 in montly credits. You find a $300 plan. Government pays $200 (your monthly credits) and you pay $100 directly to your service provider.

The problem with this is that, just like with student loans, the money is guaranteed and, until recently, was mandated by the system - everyone had to have insurance or face a penalty. It's a captive audience. When this happens, prices go up. And we've seen them go up dramatically since ACA went into law a few years ago.",Sideswipe0009,e96cu6o,conservative
It would be hilarious if he wins. ,nothingisover85,e96edn2,conservative
"That is an interesting tidbit! He was supported mostly by working class voters, so maybe he gets a modest showing, but nothing will spoil the anointing of the socialist one",ReaganChild,e96d0bw,conservative
He could actually cause the Republican to win,tehForce,e96pp13,conservative
I think I remember that. ,skarface6,e96imur,conservative
"I’m not u/mattintaiwan, but I assume he’s referring to something along the lines of the [following. ](http://www.businessinsider.com/bernie-sanders-medicare-for-all-plan-cost-save-money-2018-7) 

Of course, this shifts the onus of the bill onto the taxpayers rather than the individual, hence I can understand some skepticism or ethical/ideological concerns over this. ",Gamblor14,e96b6js,conservative
"Indeed.  That's the unspoken reality behind all the socialized healthcare implementations out there.  Eventually you reach a point where you either have to dramatically ration the amount and quality of care you provide - which the NHS in Britain is currently doing, which is going about as well as you can expect - or your budget is devoured by the expense.  

But don't worry, I'm sure that *this time* we'll do socialism *right*.  /s",Colonize_The_Moon,e96re9j,conservative
"It's the accrued interest formula for constantly compounding interest. 

A is the money you have at the end of the period. 

P is principal, how much you had att the beginning. 

e is a constant that needs calculus to derive but econ majors don't need to know how it's derived

R is interest rate. 

T is time.",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e96xrse,conservative
True enough. Baylor is one of the few places the culture actually was pretty conservative.,Willingmess,e96gwl4,conservative
"Actually I upvoted it, I thought it was funny.",Rex_Wyatt,e96npci,conservative
That's impressive. Wow. It really makes me laugh when I think about it. Do you think conservatives tend to be more objective? Or do we have a skewed perspective as well?,goldrotmgonly,e9b9620,conservative
"I really wouldn't be surprised.  If there is a good turnout my expectation is that he would get their votes over her.

I live in Queens and outside of the national media I really haven't heard much buzz about her at a local level.",Anklebender91,e96ens1,conservative
"Ah ok thanks, learned it in high school and forgot",Direwuff,e97csk7,conservative
It’s kind of unfortunate that an Econ major doesn’t even need to learn enough math to even derive the value of e. It’s legit something someone with only pre-calc or calc 2 knowledge could do in multiple ways. ,Trav_X,e97hxgl,conservative
I would say most Texas universities are relatively conservative other than UT and UNT,etibbs,e96t7t9,conservative
"It’s like in South Carolina, after Storm Thurman retired/died people still voted for him (allegedly). 

As much as I don’t want any dem to win, esp in the House, it would be pretty damned funny if the establishment candidate won over the media-hyped progressive candidate who won the primary. ",nothingisover85,e96f419,conservative
"We'll never see a Republican in that seat anyways considering it's NYC, so to me her losing after the hype would be amazing.",Anklebender91,e96gfum,conservative
Anyone going to get in trouble for this?,HissingFauna22,e97emdp,conservative
Democrats don't get in trouble. ,ConsistentlyRight,e97w078,conservative
"I mean, we all knew it would but... I still hoped.",ReallyHotCalzone,e98c0e3,conservative
"This is a terrible article. She is running in Illinois, and she is actually a Registered Nurse. 

HOWEVER, she hasn't worked in a clinical setting in any real sense and her claims of looking in patients eyes and seeing their suffering because of high costs, etc is total BS.",the_barabashka,e97oy0m,conservative
">tfw the official GOP Youtube account is utilizing videos made by 4chan

They're learning.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e969ici,conservative
Excellent.  This really puts a fine point on what's a stake in this election.  If this sort of behavior is rewarded with power we're going to be in big trouble in the future.,Reven1911,e96cg5w,conservative
Here's the one they made a few months ago:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eFRHX6glTSM,Gbcue,e96cwc9,conservative
This is why we have to vote.,TravisKrooks,e96e12z,conservative
They formed a mob outside a gas station for us so perfect for campaign purposes to illustrate the problem. Thanks dems! ,anon20202,e96kx3l,conservative
I still can't get over how Crazy Max says Gas-O-Leen station,goaliepro09,e96kp7u,conservative
Jobs not mobs,yamsHS,e96udb1,conservative
Truth ,squirreltoot,e97asta,conservative
"Don't forget the rest-uh-ron-T!

Dee-pOught-mens-tour!

Listening to her talk is like watching a poorly-programmed undercover cyborg attempting to communicate with humans. ",ClosetFascist,e96sxif,conservative
That's because she's never actually been to one.  Driving and maintaining those automocars is something the little people do. ,LonelyMachines,e96x74c,conservative
"Cruz says Vampires are dead, but any schoolchild can tell you that Vampires are UNdead!",ProducerPants,e963qxb,conservative
"Jim Carrey has gone so insane that he, a comedian, is being out-quipped by a Conservative politician.",Telineye,e96m163,conservative
One of the hallmarks of a good politician is how much he pisses off Jim Carrey. ,link_ganon,e965efq,conservative
"*confusedvoter.meme*

""Anti-vaxxers are horrible people""

""Jim Carrey is awesome""",uniquecannon,e968dtt,conservative
absolutesavage.jpg,CCPCanuck,e96ltmu,conservative
But vampires are undead. Who do they traditionally vote for?,super_ag,e97889j,conservative
Ya but his response was pretty good. https://twitter.com/JimCarrey/status/1059627359718924289,Luke_Flyswatter,e98vw2s,conservative
"Just noticed that O’rourke has a fish mouth. Not surprising, really.",Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e96vxyx,conservative
[removed],,e96wi8u,conservative
Is that like flammable and inflammable?,Gnome_Sane,e96v3aa,conservative
"> Cruz says Vampires are dead, but any schoolchild can tell you that Vampires are UNdead!

Just another example of how putting the letters UN in front of something always makes it worse",Varg_Burzum_666,e970jyz,conservative
"He has gone insane.  He was relevant, now has a failing career and is trying desperately to be relevant again.  He's a miserable POS and is grasping at straws to be noticed again.  ",flippy76,e978651,conservative
Being that this is Ted Cruz its even more baffling. ,zgh5002,e96rgh3,conservative
Lol no,MigzMando,e9711qv,conservative
"Jim Acosta has always been a dickhead. I remember watching an interview with him in which he continuously interrupted a conservative speaker and intentionally ignored the overall point of what the person was saying while honing in on a single point. Once the conservative speaker acknowledged the 2 words that he cared about, he just sort of nodded like ""I win"" or some bullshit. This dumbass should've been kicked out sooner, he has a serious issue with trying to ask followup questions at these WH press conferences if what I've heard is correct.",xJownage,e99yy2z,conservative
Jim Acosta is a piece of shit.  The media will regain some of it's image as a fair and honest press with him out,Mormonster,e9a5lr6,conservative
">At that point, a White House staffer attempted to take the microphone out of Acosta's hands.

Love how ABC conveniently leaves out the part of Acosta refusing to give her the microphone, acting like a spoiled child with a toy he was told to put down. ",FuriousChef,e9ablxd,conservative
">Jim Acosta has always been a dickhead. ... he has a serious issue with trying to ask followup questions at these WH press conferences if what I've heard is correct.

Rumor has it he's not overly popular among his peers for his grandstanding.  In some of the other discussion of his banishment to the lawn, it's noted that the political climate requires that his fellow ""journalists"" speak words supporting him, quite a few are pleased not to have to deal with him for a while.  I can only assume those are the real kind, not the CNN kind of journalists.",I_am_really_shocked,e9a6j1z,conservative
"Hollyweird, we love ya...for entertainment purposes. We can make up our own minds re; politics. Just because you may have played an intelligent person on TV or in a Movie, does not confer some special knowlege or sway.",JFGFNY,e98n5pb,conservative
"Wait wait wait...

Hollywood lefties have minds?  I thought they all share the same single brain cell",Talan1177,e98ctp2,conservative
"It's pretty obvious that this ""believe all women"" thing was a huge joke. I'll never take any Democrat seriously when they complain about how men treat women. ",Maswasnos,e98b8i3,conservative
Enjoy that actual pedophile senator New Jersey. Turns out the #metoo movement was total bullshit.,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e98cph9,conservative
"Must wonder about New Jersey, a high tax state where some won't benefit from the Trump tax cuts. Must be a lot of property owners in NJ.

 Did they vote anti Republican, anit Trump or pro federal income tax deduction. California east.",postonrddt,e98awfj,conservative
"The left's Roy Moore, except they voted him in",unityrootts,e98cv6l,conservative
They dont care. ,lax714,e98b4zx,conservative
"How dare you even nominate Roy Moore, look at everything he might have done - Democrats 


Ignore what Menendez and Ellison have done. Vote for them - Democrats ",Enzo_SAWFT,e98d2dn,conservative
The Democrats are ripping the columnist but he's telling the truth ,game46312,e98cq4z,conservative
"Did he though? Just sounds like coping to me. They took the house, the blue wave happened.",johnson881_,e9869dd,conservative
"It was a very average flip, well within the expected average for a midterm election. Hardly a blue wave at all. The fact that we gained several seats in the senate also cannot be ignored. ",WebSliceGallery123,e989sg0,conservative
The GOP gained in the senate and most of the house. That's no blue wave.,JMB_was_a_god,e98egai,conservative
Flip Wyoming Red!,ReaganTroll,e969gnm,conservative
"If you don't like it you probably have to leave. As far as I can see, NY is a lost cause. Things will just keep getting worse there. ",Maswasnos,e98k794,conservative
"If you can you should leave ... I grew up in the beautiful Hudson Valley and lived in vibrant Manhattan, but that was way back in the day. Like Graham Greene's Secret Agent, now I'm in love with a dead woman (NY).

And now I live on a barrier island in the South, in a beautiful state that just reduced our income tax cap and instituted picture ID for voting ... got a new gal!",RomeoMyHomeo,e98n3ze,conservative
Move. The South is being invaded by people fleeing the North East. Just don't be one of those guys that comes down here and immediately starts turning it into the same poop hole you just left.,SilverHerfer,e98pgwr,conservative
"The states much like our nation overall its actually kind of difficult to pass things.

You arnt screwed, NY has been far left policy wise for decades this has not changed and wont for the forseable future,  Compared to most places in the USA we would tell you you already pay insane taxes and Cost of Living for a shitty quality of life. 

There si a reason why NY state is shrinking and hemoraging people to the South and West. ",Manchurainprez,e98r6rg,conservative
"How the hell does legalizing weed scare you? I'm in a state that has recreational all it's done is given the government something else to tax, and made weed less ""cool"" for teenagers.",smileimhigh,e98lpfl,conservative
Vote with your feet.,_Gardien,e98ndny,conservative
"Look to CA, dems have had a super majority for years and we turned out just fine /s",BrockLee76,e98os7u,conservative
"NYC resident here.  Not screwed yet.  I remember in VT when the Governor ran on single-payer, but when he looked at the actual plan to implement he declined to do so after seeing just how high taxes would have to be to accomplish it.  It's still very possible that this is a lot of Progressive virtue signalling which won't really be able to get passed.

It's also possible that it will get passed, and the reality of how much it fucks the middle class will start to turn the state back toward the right.",My_Sp00n_is_too_big,e98qmjo,conservative
"I am in Washington state and legalized weed is fine.  It mellows the alcoholics and crackheads out.  

In general, taxes and cost of living in New York sucks.  I would think strongly about moving to a no income tax state with relatively low cost of living (Texas, Florida, Washington, etc.) not just because of the outcome of the election but because life in general life is better outside NY IMHO.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9921cj,conservative
Vote with your feet. Move to a swing state and help turn it red.,doobsftw,e98ocmo,conservative
"I've always had an issue with this typically conservative stance. If the GOP legalized they'd win every election. It's such a silly hill to die on, especially for the ideology that generally supports individual freedom.  

  
I still vote in conservatives because I'm not going to let such a trivial issue decide my vote, but damn they make it harder on themselves for no tangible benefit.",diehardgiraffe,e98mxqp,conservative
"Same here it's one of my big issues with the right, there's way too much ""weed is so evil"" rhetoric left over from the Reefer Madness days. Without going into details I work a respectable, white collar, and well paying job, have zero attendance issues, a stable romantic life, workout 5 times a week while engaging in a host of nerdy hobbies, and go to grad school on top of all that. I've smoked damn near everyday since I was 18. Never tried anything harder, never committed any crimes, etc.

Weed doesn't make you a lazy scumbag anymore than alcohol makes you a lazy drunk it's up to the individual.",smileimhigh,e98nkmh,conservative
Old fucks habits die hard. In my state we are mopping up the blood from the courts last night (NC) ,Intimidator94,e98qicy,conservative
We will ironically probably see some legalization now federally. Compromise for something likely. ,Intimidator94,e98yvbu,conservative
"This is not a new issue for Maricopa County. r/Phoenix constantly pushes the Republican voter suppression conspiracy theory yet this happens no matter who is running things. Currently it's a Democrat (Adrian Fontes).

If this got posted there, the prevailing attitude would be ""fantastic news"" even as it was downvoted into the basement.",cipher_six,e972vte,conservative
"Air Claire is grounded.

Good riddance.",chabanais,e97gs9m,conservative
"I mean for farmers like me and my family this sucks, but it's going to be better for America overall with a red  Senate.",SnowHawk3,e97nysq,conservative
This jihad stuff never seems to work out for these dudes,searanger62,e95vk8u,conservative
"Bernie Sanders basically co-signing on Hamas week after largest mass murder of Jews on US soil. 

Where’s the outrage?",anon20202,e95v4xh,conservative
"This cunt is the most anti Semitic bitch on the planet, she hates all of us Jews, yet Democrats are all fan girling over her. The Republican Party needs to disavow the alt right racist, bigoted, anti Semitic bullshit now. It’s no different than the far left platform, it just won’t be overlooked like the shit spewing from Sarsour and Farrakhan.",Lilprotege,e95xra5,conservative
Literally treason.,anuser999,e969jf0,conservative
"Only Imams are permitted to call for jihad

Women are not permitted to be Imams

PoundMeToo 😂",CCPCanuck,e96ntoa,conservative
Right. As if they were *ever* assimilating.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96bkwq,conservative
https://media.tenor.com/images/77798b55748f3bcda55479de2418e06d/tenor.gif,johnrufi1985,e968whc,conservative
Can we try her for sedition?,War-Damn-America,e96mlse,conservative
"She needs to take a visit to the middle east and try to give speeches, so she can get the full Muslim experience. She's such a vile woman. Why no action has been taken against her for things like this post is beyond me. It's incredibly frustrating. I'm a jew so i have a particular hatred for her. It seems antisemitism is fine and dandy if it's coming from the right people, but if it's coming from other people the selective outrage NPCs come out.",BenStillerPhaggot72,e96yxqb,conservative
That socialist son of a b also supports Sharia Law?  What the hell happened to the people in this country?  How can anyone support any of that?  What are they teaching in colleges these days?,mlmack,e965w5z,conservative
"Jihad translates as ""to struggle"" .... maybe plays a role in why it never works out for them.",ATableForOnePlease,e95wnwy,conservative
Apparently he gets a pass because he's Jewish himself? (Atleast ethnically),,e96f3y1,conservative
"What Republicans are pushing a racist, anti-Semitic platform? Where have you seen that on this sub, even? Republicans have disavowed that shit but what more do you expect them to do? Start every speech with ""I'm not a racist""?",Grond19,e971rq6,conservative
"Jewish or not if you are on the side of Jihad you’re on the wrong fucking side! 
Fuck him",anon20202,e96fb97,conservative
He gets a pass because the left likes him.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e96xt38,conservative
"I’ve unfortunately seen a little of it, for the most part this page stays really pro Zionist pro Jew. With that said, if you go to the Republican page, not the conservative page, it’s atrocious.",Lilprotege,e974a1i,conservative
"I know what you mean, therr are online personalities like James Allsup, that are well spoken and bring up great points and know politics but throws out some strong anti-Semitic stuff in a very subtle way.",The_Mighty_Rex,e974ynq,conservative
"Immigration.

There's really no other issue that matters, and it should be the strongest focus and only focus. 

It is absolutely shameful Paul Ryan took focus away from this issue to give wall street another handjob.
",lost_snake,e98lu3s,conservative
"Same as it was before,  he had a GOP house full of do- nothing RINO""s now he has a do nothing congress full of slightly more DNC anti-trumpers over RINO""s

Strategically not much has changed. ",Manchurainprez,e98re9x,conservative
"Immigration. the survival of the country and GOP depends on it. 

Sign the Birthright citizen EO. build the wall with the ACOE. 

As much as we dont like it, It is clear to me that Imperial presidencies are the future. Bi-partisanship has been dead for years. No bills that are on a parties platform will get passed, forcing a POTUS (D or R) to do it with a EO. Sticking to our principles as Shapiro wants too will kill us. We need results and we need them soon because the end is near.",JMB_was_a_god,e98pqpm,conservative
"Yup. Obama passed DACA Amnesty through EO. Not sure if John Roberts realized it when he OK'd it but he forever removed any motivation for Democrats to pass any compromise immigration bill, including the overly-generous one that Trump presented. There is only one move here. 

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",jivatman,e994v5c,conservative
">Not sure if John Roberts realized it when he OK'd it but he forever removed any motivation for Democrats to pass any compromise immigration bill

SCOTUS hasn't ruled on DACA. The Trump administration has been [trying to get them to weigh in](https://www.mprnews.org/story/2018/11/06/npr-white-house-asks-supreme-court-to-rule-on-daca-sooner-not-later).


",PubliusVA,e99gnqz,conservative
"This article summarizes exactly how I feel. Remember the insane amount of social media posts on voter registration day? If any organization posts “Go Vote” it means “Go Vote *Democrat”

I get a kick out of the Conservatives that flood those posts though. Because you know that’s not what they want to see.",DHARMAFREAK12,e9627uu,conservative
Well no crap. There is a reason these campaigns are targeted at demographics that lean Democrat. ,StaphAttack,e95yddt,conservative
"Well, yeah, but vote anyway. ",AyyyGreens,e95ywmo,conservative
"Let's be honest: do you really think we'd be seeing this much ""get out the vote"" incitement if Hillary were in office?

No. Of course not. For two reasons: first, midterms historically cut against incumbents and there's no way that Twooglebook would encourage more of that; and second, the agenda that would have been implemented over the past two years would have worked to insulate the left from electoral accountability. They only want elections to matter if they're not in power.",GameShowWerewolf,e96czrp,conservative
"Of course, considering the sudden ominous emphasis on ""saving our democracy"". The thing is, I actually agree. Just not the way they intended.",jd_porter,e96jwly,conservative
"Yep, on YouTube home page, there's an ad telling me to vote for a democratic Congress. I almost posted it here but eh.",Scozzar,e965z2g,conservative
Lots of virtue signaling white women flooding my social media feed ,IlluminatiJesus,e95ymt7,conservative
I’m curious how long it will take before bragging about voting is considered racist and a micro-aggression? ,8K12,e96icxc,conservative
"To be fair, the Democratic party's ad campaign was simply ""VOTE"" (*and that's saying something about how cornered they are, honestly*). 

I do recognize though that celebrities and all types of media are saying to get out and vote, though. We associate that saying, therefore, with left-leaning politics most likely because the media has already associated with left-leaning politics. ",GGtheBoss17,e96ual1,conservative
"That's okay, because I block all their ads and promoted content anyway. Until the day comes that it's not the principal medium for keeping in touch with family, I can hit them in the wallet.",soylent_absinthe,e9605wj,conservative
"Walked up to my polling place and saw ""Photo ID required"". Love it.",justhere2havefun,e95wp31,conservative
Just posted this in the mega thread over on politics. “Just voted for the first time. Straight republican ticket!” Currently at -101 lmaoooo,OprahSwagfrey,e96jatu,conservative
"I saw a lot of men between the ages on 40-60 at my polling site. Was that the same for everyone else? 

EDIT: Clarification. A lot of men between the ages of 40-60 waiting in line to vote, not working there. ",wonderfulworldofwill,e95vx94,conservative
"Voted in a liberal district in the SF Bay, CA. Let's see if my vote changes CA red! lol",plow_ur_ass,e96xkg0,conservative
"[Me, voting in the Virginia 11th district for Jeff Dove...](http://weknowmemes.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/12/that-should-do-the-trick.jpg)",jimbofisher2010,e96oetg,conservative
"Straight R for me, as usual.

My Libertarian husband voted straight R, something he has never done in the 20 years we have been married.

The Kavanaugh hearings were the final straw for him.  ",spookyghoststuff,e95srzc,conservative
"Went in at 7:30, no line at my polling place (blue county in an R+9 district, so i'm hopeful), joked around with the poll workers about all the signatures required (we use electronic voting machines, but they are strict with the results and how they're handled), voted, left. Today was a good day.",bigkr88,e95z7h3,conservative
I’ll be voting in about 15 minutes... I’m crawling over broken glass to get there right now.,Clatsop,e95ngjo,conservative
"Voted at around 11:45 this morning at my neighborhood election poll. I was the 300th ballot according to the machine. This is in a suburb of Dallas, where I believe most people voted early. Glad to do my part to keep Beto out of the Senate. ",NakedPizzaParty,e96nr82,conservative
I voted in Michigan! Come on Bill Schuette and JOHN JAMES!!!,sydazzles,e96su25,conservative
Voted in California! It is always shocking to see the dearth of Republicans on the ballot.... ha.ha. Ugh. I’ve been voting since 2004 and this is the most crowded I’ve seen it. ,neemarita,e96uo9d,conservative
I posted that I'm voting straight R in the /r/politics megathread to see how far I'd get downvoted. -97 after 13 minutes and I've been accused of being Russian twice. It's actually kind of fun to see how far down I can get voted with an innocuous comment.,an0nymous_bosch,e96hth2,conservative
"California, voted by mail two weeks ago. Don’t think John Cox has any chance against Gavin “The Suit” Newsom, but voted anyway.",remybob78,e95trj9,conservative
"Heading down during my lunch break. Not the first time I've voted and will NOT be the last!

I strongly recommend if you haven't voted to look up sample ballots and read up on any amendments that might be up for vote in your districts. For example, Florida has 12 amendments up for vote and if you go off just the summary of the Amendment, you might not get the full picture. Hint: FIND OUT WHO BACKS THE AMENDMENT!",-Kerosun-,e95z2i9,conservative
"Just voted in western PA. Not too optimistic about my district flipping red though, especially after the shooting.",unityrootts,e96lvp5,conservative
"This was the first time since I started voting that MI dropped the straight ticket option, which is a shame, as this was the first cycle I was inclined to use it. Generally I vote GOP for major races, Libertarian for those pointless trustee positions, and Democrat for AG and/or Sheriff when applicable (we had neither this year). This time I voted only for Republicans, because as underwhelming as many of the candidates are, the Democrats have gone off the rails nationally. ",gprime,e96r34q,conservative
"i voted a straight red ticket. i recognized one of the people on the ballot as somebody i worked with at my job. he was registered as a democrat, but i think i'd have voted against him anyway because he's a dick.

it felt good to go to the ballot box and vote against joe donnelly. i got sick of seeing his smug face on youtube ads.",fireball3k,e96s40a,conservative
Did my part for governor baker in MA! ,crash94,e96x27p,conservative
"A pleasant, quiet, drizzly morning with polite voters.  We are friendly neighbors.

But my Republican House guy got 10% in my bluest-of-the blue NYC district.  At least I'm part of that 10%.",paulbrook,e97lsqu,conservative
"I live in PA, Norristown area. I had to show ID. I was shocked. Good thing that isn't a problem for me.",UberDuperDrew,e96a7n6,conservative
I early voted last week. At 20 years old this is the first midterm election i was eligible for. Hoping to make every single one during my lifetime!,UsernameChecksNotIn,e95uyq2,conservative
So realistically when should we start seeing results? From what I’ve seen most polls close between 7-9 EST,mm1255,e96ybuo,conservative
"Had an apolitical friend text me asking who to vote for, so I bagged an extra Republican vote for Congress and governor in NY",tja_1478,e95vbz0,conservative
Wife and I voted absentee 3 weeks ago. In one of the toss up states. Straight R's my dudes. ,Chapped_Assets,e95nitl,conservative
Voted in Upstate NY. Pouring rain - low turnout - hope it's the Dems staying home. Fingers crossed for NoMoCuomo!,JFGFNY,e95xslt,conservative
"I voted two weeks ago in Austin TX. A huge number of people have voted early in Texas. 
The polling location was filled with people mid-morning on a weekday, which is unusual. 
I voted all Republican. I was in and out in about 20 minutes. Sadly, Austin being what it is, there are no Republican candidates in several of the local races. I'm also concerned that the polls regarding the Senate race (Ted Cruz vs. Beto O'Rourke) are all wrong; there is an enormous amount of enthusiasm for Beto, and I'm not sure that the polls reflect what the actual turnout will be. It's going to be an apprehensive evening for me. Hopefully, I'll feel like going to a Republican victory party later tonight. ",zobix,e95y01j,conservative
Voted in NJ. Was going to wear my MAGA cap but after perusing the NJ laws and the recent SCOTUS case concluded that it is not only illegal but likely to be upheld. Rooting for Hugin to be the first Republican NJ Senator in decades.,,e96ncvs,conservative
Voting now in Ohio and the polls are packed! Red all the way baby! ,colinpail,e96umq2,conservative
"NJ 11th district here, voted all GOP

Just saw a Fios 1 broadcast, the anchor was surprised that so many women admitted that they stayed with their registered party rather than voting for Mikie Sherrill, this district has been safe republican in the past.

This is a red leaning suburban district in a deep blue state that the media has been holding up as an example. I voted at lunch around 12 and saw an older crowd, only one person that I would consider millennial.",BatmanofSteeI,e96uwd2,conservative
Folded up my ballot. Sealed it. Signed it. Walked it across the street and dropped it in the box. In and out in <2 minutes. God save the Republic.,kaioto,e96vnbr,conservative
"Voted for the first time ever. I sincerely hope I didn't screw it up. I was nervous and in a little bit of a rush because I was with my dad so I didn't read the top of the ballot. Most of my votes on the front side are black balls with little tails because I check-marked them, *then* noticed I'm supposed to fill them in. Yes, I realize already that I was stupid and should have just taken the time to read it. Hopefully it still counts. :(

There were like five other people there but this is a smaller town. The ladies at the check in table (is that what it's called?) were so kind and helpful. 

For my first time voting this has also been the first time I've really paid attention to politics. I did my homework before going in because I take voting seriously. Thing is, it just left me frustrated. I lean further right than left but the Republican things I disagree with are things I feel are harmful (our Republican candidates don't really seem to give a shit about the environment whatsoever and don't support gay marriage. I think the world needs all the love it can get, both among its people and literally). Whereas the Democrat things I disagree with are shit I didn't even think people *really* fought for. Common Core standards, letting illegal immigrants vote, and no death penalty? *Really,* Pritzker? Plus the whole ""guns are bad mkay"" thing the left relentlessly pushes. I'd say I voted about half and half - not by choice. I was surprised to see multiple boxes where Democrat was the only choice.",littlecatladybird,e96w3tk,conservative
Voted NJ-27th. Menendez can go burn in hell.,Chao-Z,e95ofy6,conservative
"California voter here.  Life is rough as a Red Guy our in this world, but I’m doing all I can to make my stand.",Xerethor,e9661cv,conservative
"I voted straight Republican this time around in Michigan, and researched the judges for the non-partisan section. There were only contenders for the Michigan Supreme Court. Usually I'll vote for 1 or 2 U.S. Taxpayers in the more local State election section but I didn't bother.

I'm excited to see how well John James does against Debbie Stabenow but I'm not too optimistic. Unfortunately I'm not in Justin Amash's district this time. We're likely getting a Democrat governor. I'm not sure where to find stats on the MI Legislature.",RightMillennial,e962fr1,conservative
Voted. Longest I have ever had to stand in line. Deep red district and huge lines ,Enzo_SAWFT,e966ush,conservative
Voted in downtown NYC straight red. Probably won’t do anything but oh well. For a while only 1 of the 4 scanners was working so the line was a little crazy.,WDKJokerr,e95u2a9,conservative
"Voted in Missouri. 

Buh-bye Claire. ",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e95xl93,conservative
Straight red in Texas. What are the odds now that Cruz can pull it off? ,Iam-The-Yellow-King,e95ymuw,conservative
Voted. Ballot box drop off. ,Littlebigman34,e95tf1h,conservative
"Voted by absentee ballot two weeks ago in California. I like voting from home due to being able to research every single candidate and measure as I cast the vote. I got conned 6 or so years ago by a measure that literally did the opposite of how it read. I don't know how that is legal, but it is California...

Small chance John Cox can beat the fake smile, ""free healthcare for all illegal immigrants"" Newsom. But it would be nice to see the craziness of the left slowed down a bit by a Republican governor. State legislature is pretty much foobared though.",ultimis,e95yprz,conservative
"Walked into my location with zero line. Kind of a surprise since i live in the city. First time i ever voted straight ticket. Hated it but sometimes you have no choice but the lesser evil. 
Also saw a bunch of kids outfront posing with campaign signs for instagram. Don't know if they actually cared enough to vote or just wanted to show off on social media. ",caffienatedjedi,e96nxt0,conservative
voted today for the first (and certainly not the last) time. i just turned 18 a few months ago and was more than happy to be able to support the republican party all the way down the ballot,TheOnlyCDB,e96t3l9,conservative
Made sure to vote red and vote out all the snake oil salesman in my small town abusing their power.,ANotSoFriendlyPerson,e96u811,conservative
"GA voter here. In a swing county, voting straight R. Stacy Abrams is a left wing loon. ",KrimsonStorm,e9667n4,conservative
I voted this morning.  R for everything except a local election where the incumbent (an R) is a 2-faced weasel and I know the challenger is a good guy. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e96ehbd,conservative
"I voted. They had cookies at my polling station, which was nice",Marko_Ramius1,e95qkku,conservative
"First time voting in AZ. Weird ballot. You use a marker to complete an arrow that points to your choice. I found it very odd. 

EDIT - Forgot to mention there appears to be some pretty strong voter ID laws here. Back in CA you simply walk in, verbally give your name, and take a ballot. Here they take your ID, confirm your name, scan it into a computer, confirm your ID and name again, confirm your home address, then you must sign an electronic affidavit stating that you are who you say you are. It was kind of refreshing! 

Also, I was by far the youngest person voting, which was also kind of odd...",SexAddictRecovery,e96atsz,conservative
"I did not vote today.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

 I VOTED LAST WEEK THROUGH THE MAIL WITH NOTHING BUT R'S ON MY BALLOT. 

&#x200B;

RED WAVE, BITCHES",Iwishiwasachad123,e960psr,conservative
"I usually vote straight R but I typically dig deeper into issues before just doing that. This time, though, the Democrats made it very easy to simply avoid them altogether. Even a good Democrat is still going to caucus with Democrats and be an official member of the ""resistance"". Even a bad Republican still counts towards the caucus and committee tabulations, and will still vote on judicial nominees. While that's usually not the only thing to consider, it sure as hell is this time.

Where I live, we were handed a sheet of paper that gets fed into the touchscreen. The voting machine prints a barcode and plain text on the paper showing how you voted. This is really the only good way to do electronic voting: there's a paper trail, it's easy to count electronically, and it's easy to recount by hand if the machine is in question.",aboardthegravyboat,e95yug6,conservative
"Voted for my man Ted Cruz.

Love that man.",Bobthejoe,e95z7w2,conservative
*Magathread,MyCustomUsername,e96537r,conservative
"I voted for the first time since 2000, feels good man.",Caldain,e95sur3,conservative
Cant vote till after work. Gotta get my John James vote in. ,wtfmynamegotdeleted,e96dmls,conservative
I voted. MI-4,Atrocitus777,e95ss4c,conservative
"Voted in larimer county, Colorado! I love mail ballots.

Jared polis is going down!",TrumpsTwitterIntern,e96net5,conservative
"I vote in a republican-leaning precinct in Alabama. I immediately noticed the large early turnout for a midterm election, and this applied to both parties. As I drove into town, I noticed that there was a large turnout at every polling location, with police having to direct traffic outside of one of the locations. ",Parsons37210,e96r5tb,conservative
"Just drove by the same voting places I passed this morning - turnout is even higher now, so I suspect it will peak after 5 pm. I believe this turnout is going to be unprecedented for a midterm election. Conservatives absolutely positively have to get out and vote today. ",Parsons37210,e96ryy3,conservative
Voted first week of early voting in NC. R down the ballot!,SLIPSthenfalls,e96sb4c,conservative
"Voted for Denver Riggleman and Corey Stewart in Charlottesville today. About 30 signs for Cockburn and Kaine, 2 for Denver and 1 for Corey on the walk into the polling place. Va-5 gonna be a close one, hope Riggleman can pull it out. ",yankees012,e96wnl9,conservative
Just voted. 👍🤠,LumpyWumpus,e96xn00,conservative
In line in to vote in Chicago. First time I had to wait in line to vote. I have no idea if governor race is close. ,Nightshade37,e96xzqe,conservative
In and out in Omaha in about 10 minutes. Even got a chocolate chip cookie on my way out.,Dtrain323i,e96y5gs,conservative
"I voted to remove Fauxcahontas from office today. Feels good, man. ",soxfan90,e95r0sg,conservative
"Voted straight red (as red as you can get) in California. Voted down any increase in spending and no on keeping any taxes or whatever. Probably didn't cause a dent, but you do what you can.",gizayabasu,e95x2j3,conservative
"Voted for not Elizabeth warren, the rest I researched thoroughly before mailing it back. May be hopeless when it comes to Warren but idc.",Patsrul,e95um50,conservative
"California.

Absentee ballot. Voted straight red (almost, see edit) (like it makes a difference in this state). No on all spending propositions and yes to repeal this ridiculous gas tax.

EDIT: Forgot to add that I had no choice but to vote for Feinstein because De Leon is far worse. I had no choice but to vote for one Democrat. ",Scozzar,e95w3yo,conservative
"It was surreal voting for just Republicans.  
I was a Bernie supporting Democrat last election, and since have flipped 180° thanks to guys like Crowder, and Ben Shapiro.

I never intend upon simply 'voting party lines', but after actually researching my ballot and choosing candidates based on their stances, I ended up voting nothing but 'R's.

It's been a crazy ride, but I've encountered nothing but civility, openness to debate, and moral consistency on the right, and I'm grateful for it.",waffleezz,e968hmh,conservative
Have been in the hospital since 10/30 with a broken leg. FL Board of elections allowed my mom to pick up a last minute absentee ballot for me which I filled out all republican down ballot and my mom returned it later that afternoon. So the whole voter suppression line is bullshit. Also this keeps my 10 record of not missing a single election of any kind streak going.,pdawg43,e95pbmd,conservative
"Voted solid red, just like my GTO. Doing my best to keep Gillum out of the governor's mansion.",ScarFace88FG,e95ygyn,conservative
"I voted. Very easy process. I just gave my name and they pulled out my voter card. No ID required in Pennsylvania. About 6 people were in line ahead of me, but it was building. 

&#x200B;

My advice? Go early. ",CandidLanguage,e95ndj5,conservative
"I voted straight red for the first time. It's something I never believed I would resort to.  
  
I *want* a reason to vote for someone other than the GOP, but the Democrats have made it clear to me that they're downright dangerous in their current state.  
  
I'm glad that the senate seems safe. I'm hopeful that the house will end in an upset.   
  
I want them to wallow in their misery for their actions over the past few months. ",OrwellianLiberty,e95t3a7,conservative
"Voted early, looked like a ton of conservatives and a first time voters, in Texas",texanSTH,e95s696,conservative
"Arkansas voter checking in, straight R and also voted for a state constitutional amendment to require IDs at voting. Let's get this thing back on track!",imbalanced,e95teme,conservative
"Voted in Dallas, GA this morning. Took maybe 10 minutes tops. Voted red and libertarian if there was no republican candidate. Feels good!",BambutuOMalley,e95u4u7,conservative
Voted straight red in the philly suburbs for the first time in my life. Before this I always split my ticket. Hope it matters,iwasthebeaver,e95v0r7,conservative
Washington voter in Seattle here. Red ticket. Mail in ballot. Washington actually provides a pamphlet with candidate info with the mail in ballot too,RedLanceVeritas,e95wx5h,conservative
"Straight red in NJ, hopefully hugin can upset ",flaamed,e95y0oi,conservative
"Uneventful. Voting here in CA has always been relatively smooth and quick for me.  I notice a lot of the time I'm waiting behind someone who doesn't know why their recent move might require a provisional ballot, much less what ""provisional"" means.  Always suspicious they're putting my paper ballot in upside down so it's not scanned or something. 
Voted for Omar Navarro, so I did what I could to push Auntie Maxine out, and for Feinstein because Kevin ""Ghost Gun"" De Leon is terming out of state senate and better to sit through one more term of Feinstein with potential censure looming over her, than jumpstarting another CA lefty senator similar to Kamala.",pfildeez,e96dgtx,conservative
"Straight R the whole ticket. It's New Jersey, so I'm, not sure it'll help but I have to keep faith. ",Jerseydevil556,e96qfqw,conservative
Voted in Twin Falls Idaho! Brad Little for governor!,inconspicuoujavert,e96nph6,conservative
"I put in my vote to get Mia Love and Mitt Romney to Washington. Mitt is a slam dunk, while Mia is probably going to be a 1% margin race either way. Utah polls close at 8 MST.",Centauri2,e96xuyh,conservative
Just got back from voting. Now we wait to see the results.,TheGeek100,e96yazn,conservative
Voted to out the incumbent senator Heidi Heitkamp (D-North Dakota) and leagalize recreational MJ. I'm positive at least one will go my way.,CaptainMustardo,e96yjm7,conservative
Just voted. My precinct is being run really well. Now for the waiting. ,Username4418,e9711q0,conservative
"Voted in Michigan today for John James. The poll was the busiest I've seen in any midterm or POTUS election since I've lived here.

Also, really hoping Prop 1 passes to legalize marijuana. We've had medical marijuana for 10 years, we're overdue for legalization.",ShillinTheVillain,e972xy4,conservative
"Voted straight red in PA. Not too many people in line at the time I went (mid-afternoon), but I heard it was packed in the morning.",Nora_Durst,e972yod,conservative
Cruz got my vote!,craig80,e95zosu,conservative
"Voted a mix of R, D and U (unenrolled, aka independent). Also voted in favor of repealing the “gender identity” anti-discrimination law that was passed two years ago in Massachusetts. Even though I consider myself a moderate, gender identity is one thing that I lean way conservative on. I don’t believe that “thinking” you are a woman makes you one. ",freshpicked12,e95p4ge,conservative
"Voted last week in early voting here in TX. Thankfully not too many Beto signs, mostly local candidates. Straight R ticket as usual.",Oceansevan,e95v6db,conservative
"Voted early in north Texas. Born and raised here, always voted Republican. We are voting for our governor and a senator... you may have heard 🙃

I actually went to a Cruz rally over the weekend and actually felt inspired, hopeful, and encouraged for the first time in a long time. 9/11 was one of the first major events I can remember (I was 10 at the time) and no matter how scared our country was, everyone was so patriotic and supportive. That’s the same feeling I got at the rally. 

My mom is a lifelong Democrat, raised in Michigan, voted for Obama twice. She didn’t think America was ready for a female president so she actually took the time to research the candidates and ended up voting for Trump. She went to the polling place on the first day of early voting and voted straight red for the first time. So proud of her! 

Pray for us, y’all. ❤️",fitnurse6,e963dcs,conservative
I voted 3 times! JK I'm not a democrat ,Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e95tog5,conservative
Voted in my first midterm election. One more vote for DeSantis and Scott ,America4653,e96o53i,conservative
"I voted Saturday in south Florida and I’m scrambling across the district all day herding the volunteers for the campaign I’m working on (humans are a logistical nightmare in times like this). It should be a good night for our campaign regardless, but I won’t be happy unless we hold the House and pick up 5+ in true Senate (and keep that communist Gillum out of the governor’s mansion)",YankeeBlues21,e95v6lk,conservative
"First time voting in Midterms. 23 year old Californian. When asked who I was voting for I said ""Not Feinstein or Gavin Newsom"" that was the only criteria I had for myself before voting.",The_Mighty_Rex,e9632gt,conservative
[Straight Red here in Nebraska](https://i.imgur.com/GiODYYG.jpg) earlier this morning.,theinfamousjosh,e96jot9,conservative
"In Indiana, I voted straight Republican with one exception (a friend of mine was the Libertarian candidate for a county council seat and there was no Democrat candidate against him and the Republican).",Ryan_Holman,e96k3ss,conservative
"I went from being a Democrat and voting for Bernie Sanders, to going all R today.  My voting experience was surprisingly smooth.  I expected the polling place to be packed, and that I was gonna have to wait a while to vote.  I also thought it was weird that nobody asked for ID.  Maybe they do things differently in NY, but I just showed up, signed my name, got the papers and folder, and filled out the circles.  ",Orbtecc,e96r3d1,conservative
"I voted in Commiefornia, and it was... strange to say the least. This was my first general election since moving here, and I previously lived in two red states. 

Showed up to Ventura city hall 15 minutes before the polls were set to open. Everything was locked, and no one was around. At 6:50, someone finally opened up and told me there had been confusion about the room, so they would be late setting up.

The poll workers had assumed it was supposed to be downstairs, but it was supposed to be in an upstairs room: the same room noted on the voter information guide that was mailed to me. It was sad how in the weeds they were. Some poll worker was wearing open-toed shoes and dropped some sort of machine on his foot and had to go clean his wound. Another poll worker stepped outside the room, and said, “here’s the flag,” and put the flag onto a stand that could not accommodate the pole it was on. So the American flag was basically propped sadly up against the wall. 

A line started forming behind me, and there were a bunch of middle-aged men and women gabbing it up, and they started talking about the portraits/photos on the wall. 

""Look at all these old white guys""

""Gosh so many old white guys""

""Little did they know how their patriarchy would crumble""

""When women run everything, remember who was your friend!""

It was so weird to see that these NPCs actually exist. I couldn’t believe that they could be so unashamedly racial, in public, in line to vote, no less! Bizarre.

36 minutes after the polls were supposed to open, I was the first one in to vote. 

For the first time ever, I voted for all Republicans and no Democrats. Don’t get me wrong; I’m not a moderate or a centrist or a WalkAway. I’m a lifelong Conservative whose conscience has led me to vote D in some races, some of the time. 

But today, I was out for blood... as much as one could be when the only senate candidates are Diane Feinstein and Other Democrat (seriously, look it up. For all the brouhaha on the Left about voter suppression, I can’t even vote for someone from my own major political party for US Senate). 

One thing stuck in my head as I walked to the voting booth: “God y’all want power. I hope you never get it.”

The Democrats tried to completely destroy a man's life and career with lies and innuendo because of what he thinks about the Constitution, which is more-or-less what I think about the Constitution. It could not be any clearer that the Democrat-Media complex hate me and people who are like me, and there is no line that they will not cross in service to their hateful, totalitarian ideology. That's what did it for me. 

I didn't vote for any nonpartisan seats; I hadn't bothered to inform myself about them and so chose not to choose. Besides... no Republicans, no dice. 

I turned in my ballot, and the cherry on top was that all of the “I Voted” stickers they had were in Spanish.

So now I’m at work in my bright red button-up, proudly wearing my sticker. “Yo Voté”",Commiefornication,e96bew8,conservative
Voted. Keeping one of the only red counties in Southern California Red.,Hello_34,e95nxy2,conservative
Voted here in Ohio. First time ever went all R down the ticket. ,ProjectBadass,e95wsfn,conservative
First time voting in person and first time voting as a DC resident (was registered in PA until last year). Adding a conservative voice to this liberal city. ,BrobiWanKenobi69,e961sqg,conservative
"First time voter. Even with some trouble over my registration, I was out of my house and back within 35 minutes. Voted straight R where applicable, voted for the incumbent justices since I’ve never heard of any problems and I would prefer some experience in those positions, and abstained from voting on local school board members since I didn’t know they were up for election this year and couldn’t really make any judgements from names.

Hopefully I helped turn Michigan a littler redder. This state could use less Democrats driving it down the hole. “Let’s just raise taxes to pay for better roads!” How about you put some weight limits on all these trucks crossing to and from Canada, hm? They’re like a plague of locusts.",VirulentVoid,e961vle,conservative
"I voted last week. Straight R. But to be honest, I get annoyed by vote bragging and sticker wearing. ",8K12,e963enq,conservative
"Voted straight R just outside of Pittsburgh, PA. I did have to write myself in for 2 unchallenged spots though. ",purgman8,e968qb1,conservative
"Voted Kemp for Governor in GA, Republicans or Libertarians for the rest. Wrote my own name in for a position that nobody was running for. Maybe I'll get elected to be the dogcatcher or whatever.",haplogreenleaf,e96bu3l,conservative
Voted straight ticket R in Indiana. I'm still holding out hope for keeping the House tonight. If they manage to hold shouldn't the big story tomorrow be 10 out of the last 12 house cycles going R. Pretty dominant. One more big push in 2020 state houses could set up for another 10 years. ,KobeInTheCut,e967my8,conservative
"Heading to vote soon. In Virginia and we have voter ID, so you have to vote in person. My vote won't matter, but I am still voting!",Zac1245,e95p5fw,conservative
"Pittsburgh, PA checking in. 2nd one to cast my ballot at my polling station at 7am but a good line formed as I left. Unfortunately Mike Doyle (barf) is running unopposed in my district, as is my state rep who is a Dem, though hes not too bad really. Voted for Barletta and Wagner, but I'm not so sure.",WienerTurds,e95pufl,conservative
Voted straight republican today though unfortunately mike doyle and summer lee are unopposed in my district. Ugh,Paranoidexboyfriend,e95rnmp,conservative
"I got off the night shift and went straight to the polls. 
Let’s get out there and vote R people!  ",Tactical-Tea,e95uy9v,conservative
"Unlike most of you here, I didn't vote straight R ticket.

Row C for the NY Conservative Party! (They're practically the same in NY, but NY has 8 parties FYI)",from_gondolin,e969vte,conservative
"First time voting, I turned 18 after the most recent election (I think), and wasn’t 100% sure on my views for the 2016 election. 

I voted today though, red down ballot. ",BigStinkyFeet,e96q4dd,conservative
"Voted in CA, even though I'm moving my family out of state at the end of  the month. It will be oddly satisfying to see the stupid gas tax repealed before fleeing the state for greener pastures... :)",Alces7734,e96tzlm,conservative
FL exit polls showing Trump at 51% approval in the state....,RedDevil5,e96vizn,conservative
Mailed straight R’s into the abyss of the Manhattan liberal machine,Kuzcos_Poison_,e95quzp,conservative
Woke up at 730 to go vote before class! Straight R tickets baws!,LSU_BAW_2020,e95r4gp,conservative
"Straight red in Tennessee, first thing this morning. ",BillionCub,e95zc74,conservative
"I voted in Pennsylvania, all GOP down the ticket. ",HappyBelichick,e95zgja,conservative
Voted R for the big seats but I have not been happy at all with our tiny Town council so I voted one D and one R for that. Both of them were new candidates. The members have been there for a while so I don't know that they have a chance of losing. ,thorvard,e95zvr3,conservative
"Voted straight R this time around, in WA. Did it early. I gave a good-sounding Dem candidate my vote during my first voting experience (my Dad also voted for him), but I didn't have the pamphlet with the candidates to go with my ballot this time around, and I was kind of already gonna vote straight R anyway after what happened with Kavanaugh. I'm at college, so I had to have the sucker mailed to me.

It was just quick and satisfying, honestly.

WA's pretty Liberal, so it probably won't do much in the way of getting any Reds out there (not the Commie kind), but at least I won't feel complicit in getting anything I didn't want.",Bigbluebuttonman,e965ztt,conservative
"I voted Republican Straight ticket.

My city official races are non partisan and I decided to give my incumbent mayor one more shot.

The parking lot was crowded, but it wasn’t busy.",x_R_x,e9665bk,conservative
Had the honor to vote at the Ronald Reagan Library and paid my respects. Great way to start my day :),TheEsophagus,e96aym6,conservative
I voted R down the line. ,PopTheRedPill,e96h3k8,conservative
REPUBLICANS ARE AHEAD IN INDIANA IT'S HAPPENING AGAIN,top-perro,e96w4lu,conservative
"One thing we cannot forget to watch is the local and state legislature races. Some of this could flip ending complete Republican control in some states or ending it completely in other. Arizona, Iowa, Wisconsin, Nevada etc. ",Zac1245,e9679df,conservative
First time ever voting! It was pretty quick and painless. Parking was a bit of a hassle. ,squidneyforau,e96ovjr,conservative
Voted Larry Sharpe and straight red in Ny... let’s see how that goes...,Jbocajs,e978qnq,conservative
Voted last week. Had to show ID (Good!). Straight ticket Republican. ,mfisch4,e97azhv,conservative
"How does voting work for states/locations without id? At my voting location, they scanned the ID which printed out a sticker which you had to sign to confirm the information was correct and a code to use for the machine.",void216,e97hzre,conservative
"As I was leaving my house this morning, my wife said to me, ""John James is the reason I'm looking forward to voting.""

 This is her first time voting, I didn't tell her who to vote for. I would never do that. She made up her own mind. She hated the way Kavanaugh was treated. We have 2 sons and couldn't imagine having to go through false accusations.
",bullbolony,e964lme,conservative
Voted R all the way except for the county commissioner who is an asshole. ,kshebdhdbr,e96epz9,conservative
I just did my part! Eddie Edwards for Congress. Straight red ticket. ,link_ganon,e95nlsi,conservative
I voted first thing this morning. Arrived a few minutes before the polls opened. There was about 50 people already in line when I arrived. Process was smooth. Only took about 20 mins to get in and out. ,raccoonbandit13,e95norn,conservative
Voted in PA. Straight R. ,hlpe,e95r2md,conservative
Voting Red in the great state of Wyoming...not really gonna help nationally as Wyoming is a very red state but we all will do our part to M. A.G.A,diablo-wy,e95rm2g,conservative
"Wife and I voted in early voting nearly two weeks ago. Speaking for myself, (R) ALL THE WAY!! And I'm pretty sure my wife voted (R) all the way also. We both were sickened by the spectacle of the Kavanaugh hearings and LOVE the great work President Trump is doing and want to see it continue. I shudder to think what would happen if the (D)s get their fangs into the House and/or the Senate....",LVDave,e95sf0e,conservative
Live on a barrier island in South FL. No lines at 7am! Straight R's here! ,TravisKrooks,e95tu5b,conservative
Voted for less taxes in WA across the board (FUCK YOU SEATTLE) and (R) all the way down the ticket,Jizzlobber42,e95ugik,conservative
Voted to keep Tennessee red ,Kspresent,e961pxc,conservative
Voted first day it opened which for Washington was Oct 19th.  Let's see them leftist tears tonight! I may drown though since I work in Seattle.,callthereaper64,e961z0i,conservative
"The sherrif of my parish is trying to use children as an excuse to raise taxes. Hopefully people see through it. 

Other than that, I saw a lot of first time voters in line.",blizzardice,e96bucn,conservative
I live in Oregon in vote by mail I got my ballot two weeks ago and turned it into days after I received it. This may be the first time in my 25 years of life that we have a Republican governor,Vrael22,e95p3wz,conservative
"I voted on the 24th of October.  Lines were packed, it was almost impossible to find a parking space at the early voting location.  When I got into it there were around 200-250 people in line.  At least they knew what they were doing and I was in line, voted and out within 30 minutes.  ",1amF0x,e95qnma,conservative
“I voted” - 2 weeks ago.,abuigues,e95qq2y,conservative
I voted.,Grungus,e95r7pi,conservative
"Rural area near central Ohio (Union County).  Polling station was busier than I've seen in 16 years, even compared to presidential races.  Normally park in the first row near the entrance,  I was 4 rows back.

Volunteers were awesome (as usual), there were about 25% more of them this year.  Voting time from parking to leaving was less than 15 minutes.

&#x200B;

Edit:  Every time I look at this comment, it's been downvoted more and more.  Is there something controversial in this post?",bardwick,e95rw3m,conservative
Voted a few weeks ago by absentee ballot in CT.  Voted mostly Republican with some libertarians where there where no Republicans. This is both my first midterm and first election voting in since turning 18 earlier this year. I'm honestly excited to see the end results of this election. Now here's hoping that stefanowski manages to win and begins to steer this state in the right direction after the disaster that was Malloy.,LDSmk9pig,e95sswq,conservative
"Northwest New Jersey voter checking in, I was #79 in my district! I cast my vote about two hours ago and just got back from some morning errands. I don't recall ever seeing the parking lot at my polling place this busy unless it was a presidential election. Straight-R ballot for me, and ""no"" on the question.",katouhayato,e95vwjz,conservative
"Voted straight Red ticket in Tennessee last week thanks to early voting. 

More people than I expected, and they all looked pretty happy so they must be conservatives also. ",TearsForPeers,e95xylu,conservative
"Plan on leaving work a little early to vote before heading home. I'm in Mass but plan on voting straight Red. I know it most likely won't matter in my state, but as an Independent, I tend to focus on the issues that align with my beliefs, not the political party. This will be the first time I'll be voting all Republican because of how toxic the Democratic Party has become. I can't even be a moderate without some liberals insulting me. ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e95xzyc,conservative
"Voted with absentee ballot in NY-24, straight R.

Fingers crossed

",gster50,e95y09l,conservative
Straight red in TN-1. Line was long but worth it!,ENEB1487,e95yayj,conservative
"I voted straight red in Indiana.  Donnelly tempted me, but I still think Braun will be better.  On one hand I want Democrats to moderate because that would be better governance, but on the other I want them to stay extreme and get wrecked.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e95yf3y,conservative
Vote R.,Colinm478,e95yxgl,conservative
Voted two weeks ago. Early voting FTW,cons_NC,e95zzxc,conservative
Voted for Bob Hugin today!,nowthatsrich,e964qmv,conservative
"Voted 2 weeks ago, was in and out in 5 minutes. ",DH5650,e967mo4,conservative
Mailed my colorado ballot in a couple weeks ago!,orange_hamster,e967oto,conservative
I voted here in WV. It was super quick and easy after I got to my polling place. ,skarface6,e96dep8,conservative
Does voting early count? Last week.,Nemesis651,e96gsz9,conservative
"Voted in North Dakota.  Super easy.  No registration or anything.  Just show up with an ID and you get your ballot.  One polling place in town (in my case the Rec Center).  Wrote our current governor in for Senate because I'm not voting for Heitkamp after voting no for Kavanah and I (well, my wife) had personal experience with Cramer where he was an ads and I couldn't vote for him on principal.  I actually got a bit informed on some of the smaller local elections and met a few of the people running.  I'm hoping they get elected.  It's hard to get informed on all local positions unfortunately. ",Nats_Enough,e96mtfs,conservative
I voted.  What do I win?,ravenswin,e96nhl9,conservative
"anyone watching the midterm coverage on CNN? 

while they were waiting for the exit polls, they were being all objective and fair

when the exit polls results came out they got all excited and kept over analyzing the results and saying a blue wave is going to happen",top-perro,e96s5tf,conservative
Straight R in Ohio last Saturday,TacticalPepe,e96vr0d,conservative
"Voted Straight R in Tennessee, we will deliver Marsha Blackburn.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e95pzw6,conservative
"Voted all GOP, except I wrote-in Gritty for mayor of my town because the asshole that's flushing our town down the drain runs unopposed every time. And I voted for my friend's dad for council (a democrat). Otherwise, all GOP. Hoping the terrible rain kept turnout low, and that Hugin has a shot to beat Menendez. ",RPwhitefrost,e966khw,conservative
"Just voted for my first time. Straight republican ticket. In New York so don’t know if it really matters but if everyone had that attitude here the dems would always win, but your never know!",OprahSwagfrey,e96i01r,conservative
First time voting in PA. Pulled the Republican ticket.,HauntingStomper,e96dmbw,conservative
"I did my part, and now we brace for impact. If there's going to be a blue wave even after low unemployment and historic economic growth, the blame lies squarely on the shoulders of President Trump.

Make no mistake: Democrats are voting today as a referendum on Trump",weeaboo_swordsman,e95o3w2,conservative
Just voted for Dave Brat and Corey Stewart here in VA. ,SpikeC51,e95p405,conservative
Voted early straight R.,___-III----III-___,e95qfw6,conservative
"I voted before work this morning! I feel strangely upbeat about it too, haha. Glad to do my civic duty. I voted Republican all the way down.",Sketch_Crush,e95qiau,conservative
My wife and I voted last week. Straight R's,Mr_0pportunity,e95r93t,conservative
Voted for Kobach (R - Governor) and Yoder (R - representative) up in Kansas's 3rd District via mail-in ballot a couple weeks ago,ecfreeman,e95rqvq,conservative
Will be voting after work. Two years ago I voted for Clinton. Straight red this time.,_yuengling,e95rror,conservative
"This is the first midterm election I voted in, but I had to do my part to help get some change here in this dumpster fire called Illinois.",She_Likes_Cloth,e95samc,conservative
"I voted. It's always easy where I live.

My voting experience was ""Fuck Keith Ellison and fuck Tim Walz.""

Ellison is a garbage candidate to be my boss, and Walz was once an asshole to my face.

Hope they both lose.",Moonthrower,e95swuq,conservative
"Mail in ballot. Florida.

Received confirmation last Friday. Real easy process and wish more people used it. Also gave me time to refresh my memory on the amendments and local races.

Oh, and of course I voted DeSantis. Hopefully Florida does as well by the end of the day.",bipartisanscreeching,e961nkc,conservative
Voted in a very red county but in the blue state of Wisconsin.  God I hope Walker stays and Evers slinks back to his school yard.  Sadly I think Baldwin will win today as Vukmir rarely ran ads in my area which is part of the Milwaukee broadcast area.,Lustan,e961oat,conservative
"I voted two weeks ago by mail in Oregon. Voted no on taxes, yes on expanding run rights. All my candidates were meh so I voted libertarian. ",InquisitorThorn,e9629zh,conservative
"Well, I cast my (mostly useless) votes in the Chicago burbs this morning... took me 45 minutes because of people insisting on using the only electronic machine while there were 10 paper stations set up. Voted mostly R, with a Libertarians for Comptroller, SoS, and Treasurer.",wingzfan99,e965xcm,conservative
"Hoping for a repeat of 2016. Bovada has Republicans holding the House at +225 which implies a 30% probability of occurring. Not ideal, but higher than anyone gave Trump two years ago and significantly higher than what Nate Silver is giving Republicans (~13% probability). 

I expect a blue wave but suspect it will be too geographically concentrated to win the House. 538 has dozens of competitive districts getting more votes in 2018 than they did in 2016. Good luck with that. ",Bhangus,e96a3r9,conservative
"Dropping off my and my roommate's mail in ballots today. I'm under no illusion that this does anything, but it's still the right thing to do anyway.

I didn't want to vote straight R but ended up leaning that way (in one election, there were only Democrats running.) I just can't budge on guns.",Rytho,e96l69s,conservative
"TX. Voted early. Straight R. Poll workers weren't messing around when it came to having a valid photo ID, moving those without one out of the line and off to the side. Interesting vibes because the poll workers were mostly black women and the voters I saw without photo IDs during my 15-20 minutes there were *all* Hispanic. ",jd_porter,e96pj3i,conservative
"Gonna be hella late for work... 

Jobs not mobs ",i_floop_the_pig,e95oltf,conservative
Voted straight R here in the socialist hellhole known as Seattle. Can’t just let fools on the other side win without at least putting up a fight. ,Lillt61,e96j1ft,conservative
Voted straight red with a couple libertarian picks for local elections here in TX. GO AWAY BETO!,Mercennarius,e96jzdg,conservative
"Grandmother had her votes switched from R to D in PA.

Second time in a row. And yet still, they act like they aren't doing it.

Edit: downvoted *here*? ",Penuwana,e96rthx,conservative
"Votes like two weeks ago, Texas early voting.",Snorkel378,e95nveb,conservative
Pretty decent line outside this morning. Voters are motivated! ,DEYoungRepublicans,e95op8z,conservative
"I voted early last Tuesday.  One person in line ahead of me, one behind me.",Khalinov,e95plr9,conservative
Mail in ballot completed and sent ,beedubbs,e95pnl3,conservative
Standing in line as we speak. Showed up before polls opened. ,LegionBaby,e95ps3s,conservative
I drove past my polling area on my way to run an errand. Even in the rain at 8 am there was a line. I'll be standing in it shortly. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e95qjeo,conservative
"Woke up early before work to get out and vote, I was somewhat surprised that there was barely any one there.",WenchSlayer,e95s675,conservative
[my really good friend's ballot](http://magaimg.net/img/6ngf.jpg) slightly photoshopped so as not to run afowl of anything,JohnChrissy,e95s6i2,conservative
Went to the voting location near my house. I’m registered in the state just not where I live now. Waited in line with my husband for 20 twenty minutes got to the front and asked for a limited ballot. They told me I had to go to the main office in the next town over. Go there wait for 30 minutes for my limited ballot and voted. Totally worth it. ,godzillaeatsasians,e95siro,conservative
My wife and I voted last week. Way easier than waiting in line today.,allsystemscrash,e95sptm,conservative
I voted in a Houston 'burb last week. It was busier than usual for early voting in a mid-term election.,JaneTheThird,e95t3oz,conservative
"I voted an hour after polls opened, straight R's.  It was busy, but not as busy as I expected.  In previous years there was a long line in the mornings.  The greeting lady did say something about me having good timing though.",Yosoff,e95ubb9,conservative
I voted this morning.  NC has some very important amendments but no senate races. ,NCSUGrad2012,e960jpx,conservative
"Voted R for Governor, D for senator, R for state senator, D for AG, D for judges. Mixed entirely.",IntentionallyWalked,e96e2au,conservative
"I dropped off my ballot in the ballot box a couple days ago. Dropped off my neighbors yesterday. (she is moving and too busy). I did a ccw class last week and told the instructor to remind everyone to VOTE. He did so. I feel I contributed.

edit: R ofcourse !",geekwithout,e96grsd,conservative
"Walked in, voted and left. No waiting. Was happy to hear that I was 114. Higher than normal for my area. Even more should show up in the next couple of hours as my neighbors get out of work.",FuriousChef,e96l64p,conservative
less than half an hour until the first exit polls are out!,top-perro,e96ousc,conservative
"I may be wearing all blue, but I just voted straight red.",MuricanStephen,e96pqay,conservative
"20 years old, voted straight red in GA. Line was short and I was definitely the youngest there at the time.",activetaway,e970r8h,conservative
Just got off a 12hr night shift and went to vote right after. Voted straight Republican except in a few local races where it's just a Democrat and a Libertarian (I voted L). Also voted against all local tax increases and for city office term limits. ,ConsistentlyRight,e95nuhq,conservative
"I believe I was witness to someone taking down Republican candidate signs.  

I'm 90% certain but had to get to work.  I'm going to go confirm at lunchtime when I go to vote and report it when I confirm.

",tehForce,e9600b8,conservative
"Early voted two weeks ago, voted straight R here in Texas. I've seen a lot of beto sign, but there's a whole lot of support here for Cruz that people love to forget about. I have faith that we'll hold the line.",wasr_woes,e968b2h,conservative
Voted for the first time by absentee voting from Oregon. Straight R. I was one day too young to vote last election. ,AMollenhauer,e96aq1o,conservative
"Voted in Southeast Ohio for Jim Renacci, Steve Stivers, Jay Edwards who is my local rep he's strong on 2A. Really feel like Renacci is gonna need a miracle.",ethanrules3,e96dlrc,conservative
[deleted],,e96dvqm,conservative
"Voted in WI for Walker and Vukmir last Saturday (straight R).  Local positions didn’t even have R candidates so didn’t bother to vote those (Madison, WI). ",mm1255,e96e09a,conservative
"I voted for every Republican I could. In Texas there were a lot of uncontested D's (judges) and there was even one position for which there was no D option, which was neat.",doubleplusaverage,e96e9a5,conservative
Get everyone you know out to vote this afternoon! This is a close race and we can't afford to have the Democrats ruin the economy!,Mercennarius,e96kij6,conservative
Voted! Go Republicans! ,molon-labe7,e95q9di,conservative
"Just voted in Albany County New York. It was mostly hopeless, but I did it anyway. Straight R",STFU_Donny724,e95r4xv,conservative
"CT. has an opportunity to break the cycle of tax and spend politics (Lamont and Stefanowski are within the margin for error). If Stefanowski wins the proof will be in the pudding, of course, as with politicians of all stripes.  


Nutmeggers:  Pretty simple choice...more taxes/smaller Gov't OR more taxes/larger Gov't. Vote the entire Republican line.",okwhynot64,e95rh50,conservative
"In GA, haven't voted yet. Will do so when I get off @ 5. Straight R's. ",XGuntank02X,e95s5kl,conservative
Don’t forget to watch out and condemn any trump shaming of black trump supporters at polls. Yes it’s a real thing Democrats do. ,anon20202,e95s9de,conservative
"I participated in early voting about two weeks ago.  It really could not have been easier.  There was a bit of a line, but that wasn't a problem.  The only thing I didn't like was the electronic voting.  But I was told that, beginning in 2020, the balloting would *also* create a paper record as a back-up.  That'll be cool.

I primarily voted for Marsha Blackburn.  It was too close for too long, and when Taylor Swift told Tennesseans to vote for Phil Bredesen, that pushed it over the edge for me.  I think it did a bunch of other Tennesseans, too, as the polls, which were trending for Blackburn, moved even more.  Voting against Hollywood is fun.",thatrightwinger,e95sq5b,conservative
"Voted straight R in Wisconsin - this is very much a battleground, but in rural WI at 7am there was very short lines, which is troubling.",bionic80,e961uf6,conservative
"Voted straight R in NH. Had to park about a quarter mile away and walk the rest of the way, but the lines moved pretty fast. I don't remember having to do that last midterm, or even during the 2016 election, but I usually go either earlier in the morning or later in the afternoon and this time I went in right around lunch time, so it could have just been the time.",nateious,e96337h,conservative
Straight R early voting on the first day! Felt so good. ,ErtzHurtz,e9636wp,conservative
"Voted straight GOP in PA this morning. I’m nearly 30 and have been a registered Republican since the day I turned 18. However, I’ve always considered myself open to Dem or 3rd party candidates who can convince me they would be better for the county/state/nation than the Republican. I voted Libertarian in 2016 because Trump’s big-gov’t liberal past scared me away, but the results he has delivered while in office are undeniable. Between that and the Kavanaugh circus, I just don’t see how I could vote any other way this year.",rab211,e9647z7,conservative
"Floridian, voted straight Republican, the Kavanaugh debacle solidified my decision.",tmv4,e964nxd,conservative
"Tennessee here.  Voted Republican straight down the ballot.  I don’t agree with several stances taken by Blackburn and Bill Lee, but compromising on a few issues is better than letting Pelosi, Schumer, and the rest of the Democrats control our nation’s future.  ",CompoundRapture,e9667mv,conservative
"Voted straight ticket republican. First time I ever voted for a republican outside a primary. My vote was more about culture, freedom, and pro-life than anything else. ",StJohnTheSwift,e967jqo,conservative
"Sitting in class waiting to get out and vote...Nervous, but feeling better looking at Rasmussen having republicans +1 in the generic ballot. ",Juve94,e96bkba,conservative
TN here I voted for the D (The Donald ),wingmanmachete,e96hovl,conservative
"Voted in Arizona, walked in with my early ballot and dropped it off and walked out. I'm impressed!",TheKingBrycen,e96ndf6,conservative
Voted a while ago through the absentee ballot,flyboy1994,e96phbe,conservative
"Voted absentee here in Maine. Looks like King is gonna hold, as much as I’d rather have Brakey. Still holding out on Moody for governor but it’s not looking good. ",Hntr1,e97hn2p,conservative
I just banned from Facebook for posting a joke about democratic voting. The bias is real. Voting red from now on. ,Stormtideguy,e9606jc,conservative
Voted when the polls opened in my swing district PA-01. Lots of Republicans on the voters page when I got there!,lion27,e95nx1p,conservative
I voted R all the way except for Kay Granger who hasn't been in her district in 10 years. ,Madstork1981,e96fyrd,conservative
"Never got my absentee ballot, pretty pissed. My district is pretty damn red but still",curlbaumann,e95nq2j,conservative
"Voted a few weeks ago via mail in ballot in AZ. Straight red ticket. Hoping the candidate with open disdain for Arizona (Sinema) goes down in flames. Otherwise, I'm sure it will be all sorts of ridiculous legislation and grandstanding. ",UncleRedGreen,e95pnxz,conservative
"It’s rainy here in PA where I’m standing outside our polling place. Trying to stay warm working the polls and getting info out on candidates, particularly our state representative, Mark Gillen.

I’ve had few people ask me if the candidates I’m supporting are democrats. Not a single republican had to ask that question, they all seem to know who the candidates are, right down to the most local level. Funny how that is.

I’ll be going in when traffic dies down myself to vote straight GOP. ",Savant_PSU,e95pz5h,conservative
"Voted early last week. My first time voting early ever. There was a line of roughly 20 people and about 10 machines. Voting took such a short time the parking lot didn't even charge me. Voted straight R, I want Donnelly gone. Got a special 'I voted early' sticker too.",aCreditGuru,e95q625,conservative
"Voted a few weeks ago absentee, not expecting my vote to do much here in Maryland except maybe keep Hogan in office. Maybe a miracle will happen and we'll oust our terrible AG, but that's not likely at all. 

Such is life in a deep blue state... ",Maswasnos,e95q7tf,conservative
"Decent line, in and out in twenty minutes. Voted for every Republican.",xKommandant,e95qr1h,conservative
"I voted straight R in Illinois! Around 7:15am I was the 60th voter in my precinct which is crazy because I live in a really small town. I noticed the voters were in a really good mood. Talking, laughing, etc. In ‘16 it was quiet and not as big of a crowd. Not sure if it means much, just an observation.",DHARMAFREAK12,e95rt9k,conservative
"So I got to the polling place at 7:25 thinking polls opened at 7 in my state (NE). Turns out they opened at 8. :(

But I voted straight ticket Republican to avenge Kavanaugh and because I am generally tired of the childish behavior on the left. I don't even like our incumbent Republican governor and the Democrat candidate is pro-life and fiscally conservative, both things I look for, but I voted R there too.

I woulda voted for Deb Fischer anyway. I love her, she is a really good person. She didn't deserve all the shit she got after she voted for Kavanaugh.",14thAndVine,e95s24t,conservative
"Straight GOP in Illinois. I'll be honest, no high hopes for the Governor race at the moment, but hopefully enough people in Chicago understand what's at stake for us as a state. ",wickerlark,e95zuiw,conservative
"Voted as red as I could in California. Yes on 6, No on pretty much everything else.

Left the ballot blank in Feinstein vs. Deleon, because fuck top-two primaries.",GameShowWerewolf,e960hms,conservative
Voted straight Republican.,AT_Finn,e964hmy,conservative
"I had to vote absentee this year, as I’m away for college. But I voted straight Republican, helping to keep my guy Larry Hogan in office. He’s up like 20 points from what I’ve seen, but you wouldn’t know that taking a look at r/Maryland",NotUrAvrageFish,e965evm,conservative
"Got to vote against two politicians that voted to close a recreational area I have used for 30 years. Felt good.

I voted straight r for the first time in my life. Nevada is turning into California but at least I'm trying to stop it.",TheShakinBacon,e965ilp,conservative
"Voted here in Texas a couple of weeks ago right after early voting started. The turnout where I vote was pretty good, I had to wait in line for probably about thirty minutes whereas normally I barely have to wait at all. The lines didn't bother me though, my younger sister came with me and it was her first time voting so she was a bit nervous/excited. We both voted straight (R), I think Ted can fend off Beto but it's going to be close. ",Trevor_awesome,e968qu0,conservative
Pretty easy voting on Saturday morning in NE on account of game day. Easy choice for Don Bacon over a Bernie loving socialist.,MDemagogue,e968yrm,conservative
Illinois here. Wish us luck. We need rauner out unfortunately there was a conservative a libertarian and a Democrat running against him so I don't see the conservative winning,pastagains,e96eb3l,conservative
Just voted straight R,DEFCON_TWO,e96jf68,conservative
"I just voted in the Alabama general election. I voted straight Republican.


On Amendment 1: 

> A ""yes"" vote supports amending the state constitution to authorize the display of the Ten Commandments on public property, including public schools, and establish certain religious rights. The amendment also contains a provision preventing any public funds from being spent to defend the amendment in court. 

I voted yes.

On Amendment 2: 

> A ""yes"" vote supports this amendment to make it state policy to ""recognize and support the sanctity of unborn life and the rights of unborn children, including the right to life"" and to state that no provisions of the constitution provide a right to an abortion or require funding of abortions. 

I voted yes.

On Amendment 3: 

> A ""no"" vote opposes amending the state constitution to make changes to the membership of the board of trustees of the University of Alabama, thereby leaving leaving the superintendent of education on the board and basing the board of trustees districts on congressional districts without freezing them as they were on January 1, 2018.[2]

I voted no. This Amendment is put forth so that Paul Bryant Jr can stay on the Board of Trustees at the University of Alabama. I'm an Auburn fan so I stick it to Alabama fans any way I can.

On Amendment 4: 

> A ""yes"" vote supports amending the state constitution to establish the following: if a vacancy in the state Senate or House occurred on or after October 1 of the year before the regular election, the seat would remain vacant until the next regular election, and vacant seats could be filled without an election if only one candidate is running for the vacant seat.

I voted yes. I do not want a repeat of the Doug Jones situation. Further, special elections do not come cheap and having one isn't fiscally responsible. 

[Source for the Amendment info] (https://ballotpedia.org/Alabama_elections,_2018)",chaotic_zx,e95tw3d,conservative
Voted on the way in.,brogarn,e95ni1r,conservative
I voted. ,etherealsmog,e95nwpc,conservative
"Number 17 at my local polling station. It's an uphill battle here, but you can't win if you don't show up. ",smokejaguar,e95p2ma,conservative
Voted Roger Marshall through in KS. First time voting as well!,leafytheleaf,e95s1nt,conservative
"Voted absentee almost a month ago, unfortunately couldn't vote for Kim Reynolds for governor because she's really fucking up my education (Sorry, college student) but I sure as hell wasn't voting for Fred Hubbell. Other than that it was all red!",IowaHogize,e95t587,conservative
"In my state, pretty much everybody gets an absentee ballot. Yes, I sent mine in. Yes, I voted conservative (as much as I could, anyway). Here's hoping our D incumbent Senator loses his seat!",Narratron,e95vhw1,conservative
"I voted, it was pretty bland, given that I'm in a red portion of a purpling state, I don't consider it will affect much, but at least I can give a hearty fuck no to the list of tax increases everyone tried to float.",TwelfthCycle,e95voxg,conservative
"I lost that envelope you need to sign, where to get a new one? I am in Washington and there is a gun initiative that needs to get put in, I don't expect Dino or Susan to win, but that gun control initiative is important. ",checkingsumthin,e95vtb1,conservative
Voted R and a few L. Can't wait to see the D's lose again tonight. ,Ihavealittlequack,e95zbwk,conservative
Voted in Ga. Mostly red a few blue. Most of the blue were running unopposed. ,datworkaccountdo,e95zpwl,conservative
"Pleasant experience in suburban PA.  In and out pretty quick, polls weren't as busy as 2017 but I'm hoping I just got there at a low time (I was able to get out before most usual lunch breaks).  Had been debating on a few local positions but ended up going about 50/50 on party split.",NovaX81,e964wgu,conservative
I voted. First time I used a ballot drop off box. Usually just absentee vote.,socandrewcer,e9674e6,conservative
NOVA checking in.  I noticed slightly more GOP sample ballots in the trash than DEM ballots. I wonder if this is a good sign...,halofan321,e9677r2,conservative
"I voted conservative and republican (that's what it said on the ballot), and I'm in New York. I just need to make sure I made the right choice. ",ZekeTheFreak0825,e96l59n,conservative
Voted!!!!,drillersroc,e96l6ax,conservative
Thank god for mail in ballots. Should be available every state if it's not. Make today a federal holiday so that there is no excuse to not vote. Every citizen should vote regardless of party affiliation. ,imtoolazytothinkof1,e96mw0x,conservative
Just got done voting in Downtown Cincy. No line and only a few other people were there ,Shinglings,e96rq3o,conservative
"Planning on leaving work around 4 to go vote in NoVA. I really don't like Corey Stewart and I think the fact that he's the GOP nominee is absolutely embarrassing, but I can't bring myself to vote for Tim Kaine either. Probably will end up writing in for Senate and R everything else.",jaykyew,e95wd83,conservative
"Voted a few weeks ago. I think Republicans will keep the Senate, maybe even gain a few seats. Sadly most like lose the house. Hope I'm wrong. ",valmeister,e96atsx,conservative
"I voted by not voting...


Or at least that's what it feels like being conservative in California. ",Kaptain_Konrad,e96u2y7,conservative
I voted on October 15th by absentee ballot. Straight Red to keep the MAGA train going! We can't afford to have Nancy Pelosi as Speaker of the House.,getupkid1986,e95ovdw,conservative
"[From a metal show last night to voting straight R in a red county in a pitifully blue state today. Rainy day here in Upstate NY, got this little gift to spend my day off with!](http://imgur.com/gallery/uH8KKfM)

I'll add this: my polling place asked my name (obviously) and address, and needed a signature, but did not ask for ID. Always interested/curious to see how it varies state to state. ",Nong_Eye_Gong,e960916,conservative
Voted R in Missouri.,mlmack,e960pfq,conservative
Currently in a long line. Going to vote R down the line with an exception for one local guy. ,doodlechester,e961fvi,conservative
I voted a mix of R and L. Lots more early voting than I had seen before.,SewTheStone,e963k53,conservative
"Voted straight R for seats that allowed party affiliation, and when straight pro-life for all of our Judges. 

This was my first time voting in my new State of residence. It was vastly superior to my previous state... by a long shot.",ca_scott,e9651qy,conservative
In line at school. Straight R,captainthomas69,e96jini,conservative
"Voted today in VA in a pretty swing district. Hope that Dave Brat can hold on to win VA7, he seems to be a solid conservative. I couldn't bring myself to vote for Corey Stewart though, he's just awful. Kaine is gonna win huge anyways, and I hope Stewart leaves Virginia politics forever after another loss.",AmIAManOrAMuppet,e96mn54,conservative
Eric Brakey will upset Angus King.,xvult,e963uae,conservative
"Well, I had to drive about half an hour out of my way to vote since my DL still has my old address on it. Completely worth it. ",xJownage,e96pvto,conservative
LESS THAN 1 MINUTE EXIT POLLS,top-perro,e96qqvp,conservative
R down the ballot in suburban illinois. Hoping roskam can keep his house seat. Doesn't look good for rauner though bases on earlier polls. ,Nerevarine76,e96zzfo,conservative
"Voted 2 weeks ago in Cali, straight R except (ugh ugh) Feinstein since she's against DeLeon. Hoping my district's tight House race turns red.

I'm fully expecting a shitshow today-- with emotions running so high-- which is why I voted early (Though my middle class area tends to be pretty quiet.) ",Terra_green2,e95ol4p,conservative
"I voted this morning in Minnesota with the distant hope that I can keep the Democrats from keeping or gaining office. It's a long shot, but I can't sit out this election.",houseoftolstoy,e95s46k,conservative
I voted early for the GOP 100%.,BirchSquid789,e965ddz,conservative
"WY 14-1. Woke up at 6am to beat the rush, walked to the polling station from campus. Voted straight R other than the Constitution Party candidate for governor. When I turned my ballot in the man supervising the ballot box asked me if it was my first time voting, and when I said it was he shouted ""first time voter"" and a bunch of people cheered (yeah yeah r/thathappened, but Wyoming people are really just that friendly). Stuck the ""I voted"" sticker on my forehead and have been wearing it ever since. Very positive experience, 10/10 would vote again.",meticulous-11566,e967li1,conservative
Voted for Massie in Kentucky today.,B_God,e96ck1e,conservative
Voted R straight ticket. Oregonian here. Yes on every measure.,unionssucktrustme,e96i7as,conservative
Voted here in the Tampa Bay area. Unfortunately looks like Gillum is gonna win it....but you never know till the end! ,Uller85,e96j683,conservative
"Only democratic I'm voting for is Amy Klobuchar because I've met her in Washington DC and she is amazing!

Jeff Johnson and Karin Housley.",JumpyPorcupine,e95ouj6,conservative
Voted absentee ballot. Didn’t like some of the judges but no one was running against so I wrote in Ronald Reagan for those. Straight R the rest.,Ilikeminewelldone,e97do9f,conservative
"Hubby and I went down and voted tonight. Stuck to Republicans. There were several propositions on the ballot. We voted against all of them. Now we’re back home celebrating with ice cream and hard cider.

Cheers! 🍨🥂",PurpleAngel23,e97gfbb,conservative
Local lib paper shows Upstate NY solidly Conservative. Don't blame us for Corrupt Cuomo and Silly Gillibrand. ,JFGFNY,e98mx37,conservative
Straight Dem from Michigan’s 6th.,nevergomainstream,e96alrc,conservative
Voted straight Rs except for Congress. I wrote my Named in,game46312,e96j5it,conservative
Couldn't vote in 2016 because I moved and can't vote this time because I moved. Sucks :/,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e96ym5l,conservative
Disappointing lack of republican candidates in Boston,guitmusic12,e96z896,conservative
"Early voted Saturday because I'm on travel this week.

Fingers crossed boys",Menhadien,e96z8lb,conservative
"Just back from voting. Busiest I have ever seen my polling place. Mostly older workin' class folks. Where I live is ""the workin' class Hamptons."" Quite a few fruity little soibois I guess dead set on trying to cancel out their Dad's Republican vote. Little fagz. I'm surprised to see them frankly, it was pouring here all day. They barely show up on a sunny day for midterms. I hope everybody got out to vote today. No reason to let them have a win for lack of opposition. 

I got a couple of dirty looks for my ""no step on snek"" shirt. I just smiled. 

That's pretty much it. That's my polling place report. 

",Odoacer476CE,e975neh,conservative
Voted for Beto! 🙌🏻,atxdevdude,e96oqjs,conservative
[deleted],,e967ttd,conservative
Walked up to the volunteer with my ID in hand (only my second election) and all they asked for was my last name and gave me my ballot. It's crazy. What's stopping people from driving all over and voting dozens of times? ,PresidentPlate,e960hhw,conservative
Ahhh you poked the NPCs! 😲,Terra_green2,e96osep,conservative
"GET OUT AND VOTE!

(unless you are a republican, than don't)

There needs to be a word for when lefty websites and celebs all tell their (lefty) audiences how important it is to vote (for democrats).

Vote-U signalling?",bejeavis,e96rl3z,conservative
"Fellow Jets fan, do you live in NY or NJ?",JasonJBL,e96p4d8,conservative
"And the top response is implying you're a Russian bot.

Good times.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e96ybjq,conservative
"One guy older than me (I'm late 30s), and about 2-3 women. All senior women working the polling place though (which is typical since they usually are retired and have the time to commit). I also voted right after it opened at 8am.",justhere2havefun,e95wscn,conservative
Every bit helps!,HappyGunner,e96xy5x,conservative
">The Kavanaugh hearings were the final straw for him.

Hearing a lot of this! Hopefully it drives turnout across the board",ReaganChild,e95z5n8,conservative
"I would have voted for the Libertarians on my ticket if not for three things:

1. The Libertarians in my area put in almost no campaigning effort
2. The Republicans on my ticket are very Libertarian on the issues that I feel they should be (marijuana legalization, and keeping the government out of marriage)
3. I live in a state that needs every last Republican vote it can get, and in the gubernatorial race specifically, there's a real shot that my vote will make a difference.",waffleezz,e96964m,conservative
Similar thing with my mom. As a mother of 4 boys what happened in that hearing terrifies her,duckfallasbdn,e96todi,conservative
"You voted left??!?

/s",tico_de_corazon,e96qk2i,conservative
I voted. ,Clatsop,e95p49p,conservative
The decision to get rid of the write-in option really gets me. How am I supposed to express my disgust with our two choices for senator?,HOB_I_ROKZ,e973b4a,conservative
"Well, you poked the NPCs 😅",Terra_green2,e96oyne,conservative
Just goes to show that when they say get out and vote they man get out and vote democrat. Cunts. I hope there is a flood of tears this evening.,severeneckpain,e96p52r,conservative
LOL. ,Mercennarius,e96k4rc,conservative
You should have to show ID.,blizzardice,e96byfq,conservative
"really? I'm right outside norristown, lansdale area and they didn't ask for anything. ",iwasthebeaver,e96ai43,conservative
"It might be a little passive-aggressive of me, but I *always* have my ID ready, even though I know in PA they aren’t going to ask me for it. ",atarimoe,e96ksxf,conservative
Results are already showing up for Indiana and Kentucky. House race in Kentucky 5 was called already for the republican (expected). ,BrobiWanKenobi69,e96z5lw,conservative
polls in IN and parts of Ky closed at 6pm and are already starting to report https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/06/us/elections/results-senate-elections.html,aCreditGuru,e96z9ml,conservative
"> I bagged an extra Republican vote for Congress and governor

Sweet!!!

> in NY

Oh...",lion27,e95xkzh,conservative
"I wish I could do straight R’s but California is straight corrupt, so I voted the non incumbent for my senator.",Hello_34,e95qms7,conservative
same,GIMME_TENDIES_PLS,e95oknt,conservative
Same,PSI_Rockin_Omega,e95vf0o,conservative
"Pouring right now in the Hudson Valley.  I’m not optimistic for Molinaro, but maybe with low turnout we can get rid of Sean Patrick Maloney.",joozian_,e961a1f,conservative
Almost did the same. Was about to walk in with mine but switched it to my border patrol hat. Didn't want to not be able to vote over some techinacility.,Nong_Eye_Gong,e96okdn,conservative
"i saw someone wearing a maga hat when i went by work after voting. i thought about wearing my own or my nra cap to the ballot box, but i decided against it.",fireball3k,e96sbey,conservative
Hey man hats off to you for doing voting right. I share your frustration with political parties. ,JustAnotherJon,e96y5n3,conservative
NJ-5th. I'd be very happy to not be embarrassed by just one of my Senators.,powest02,e95s142,conservative
"I think we've got a chance to boot him. It's been sad to hear my lefty friends who are all about character excuse his awful character.  
  
Character only seems to matter when it's convenient.",OrwellianLiberty,e95t65h,conservative
"NJ-30th, I hope most people are embarrassed by Menendez.",nowthatsrich,e964x41,conservative
"You're not alone. There's dozens of us, DOZENS",Scozzar,e966fl1,conservative
Same here in Virginia! I feel your pain!,Zac1245,e967l9n,conservative
"California (mostly) Democrat here.

I love my amazing, insane, lovely and confused home state.  I'm also, over all, proud of our 'experimental' approaches to governance, fully acknowledging that a big chunk of it has been objectively bad.

We need more conservative voices.  A lot more.

So I'm glad you're here, Red Guy, and I would like you to bring many of your politically aligned friends!


PS: In my near half century of experience, I think the current Democratic party is now more pathological than it's ever been, in California and elsewhere.  I believe the same about the Republican party.  It's a big damn mess, and I have neither ideas nor suggestions about how we might get ourselves out of it.
",diederich,e96e2fz,conservative
"I'll be voting for Schuette and James after work. I really, really don't want Whitmer running our state. She'll be worse than Granholm.",ShillinTheVillain,e9643gl,conservative
what state?,iwasthebeaver,e9672nk,conservative
Respect for a fellow NYC Conservative!,ReaganChild,e95yuuu,conservative
"I was really pulling for AP, but he didn't do well in the primaries at all...",Relevations,e95yafn,conservative
over 80%.,aCreditGuru,e95ynww,conservative
"It would be a massive upset if he lost. I haven't seen him dip below ""tie"" this entire race. He is well liked and Beto's policy would be better suited for California rather than Texas. ",molon-labe7,e960uhx,conservative
Cali voter by mail here too. It was easier to research judges etc. So I feel it's a good way to do it.,Terra_green2,e96h7aa,conservative
"Was it one of the propositions that let out criminals for ""non violent"" offences despite them being quite violent? Prop 47 I think?",Scozzar,e967ps6,conservative
"Same here man, I voted for Kemp just because Abrams is so far left. It's the 2016 election all over again.",fappydab,e966nh2,conservative
"Same. I’m not a fan of Kemp, but I’m *really* not a fan of Abrams. ",LeaderOfTheBeavers,e968b3s,conservative
Now that I like! Everyone should vote for the best. I voted straight R to punish the Dems' current insanity but in a normal political situation you'd think everyone would be able to vote for the BEST candidate since that's the best for the nation... Hopefully this will be an option again someday.,Terra_green2,e96p89h,conservative
"the username checks out......*tears*
",wingmanmachete,e96hltz,conservative
"Instead of water and salt, they were baked with liberal tears. I hear they’re more delicious that way. ",fitnurse6,e96430u,conservative
They bribed you with cookies!?!,ultimis,e95s4c8,conservative
"There's a similar process here in Texas. I voted over lunch and there were a couple of people younger than I, but I'm 40 now, so that's not saying much...",usesbiggerwords,e96dn99,conservative
I went to one of his rallies and felt so inspired and hopeful! Even got my mom to vote for him (she’s a democrat). ,fitnurse6,e963kao,conservative
Democrats will probably be ahead until all the republicans get off work,evwilliams,e96dt1x,conservative
Crossing my fingers for him!,Terra_green2,e96f40x,conservative
"In El paso county, huzzah! How about all those amendments to raise taxes for other peoples kids? ",BootStiefel,e96wl63,conservative
Are you dead?,mm1255,e96yg3r,conservative
I am not even in your state and I celebrate your vote. ,datworkaccountdo,e95zrzi,conservative
Yes on 7? I just did it cause I am tired of changing clocks.,TheEsophagus,e96b7pv,conservative
"Kudos, former Sanders supported here too.",Terra_green2,e96frme,conservative
"I'm curious, what was responsible for the shift?

I'm a two time Obama voter myself. Also voting straight R today. Just wondering what specifically got you to change sides.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e969np9,conservative
When you were a Bernie supporter were you informed on the issues and over time your beliefs evolved into what they are today or did you just think that’s how you were supposed to vote based on what everyone else told you? I was surprised to hear that so many Bernie voters switched to trump after Hilary won the nomination because they represent two completely different ideologies. ,Ravens1112003,e96gtld,conservative
"Welcome! I myself used to be very liberal in college (8 years ago now!).  It wasn't long after leaving school that my views started to change.  Part ""getting out in the real world"" and part the hippocracy and lies from the left that I started to see. ",Nats_Enough,e96n7cz,conservative
Welcome!,lion27,e96joxr,conservative
"Thank you. I can't believe the polls are this close. Rick Scott had a very high approval rating, so I am hoping his high approval will carry him to the Senate and the Rick Scott approvers will keep a Republican in the governorship.",-Kerosun-,e95zd0n,conservative
"Go back and use friends names.


/s kidding. We aren’t democrats lol",HolsterOfNuts,e95p8op,conservative
"Non-ID states are stupid. My state doesn't require ID, which is weird cuz it's solid red, and literally all they do is ask for your name and address. Not hard to vote multiple times.",14thAndVine,e95s6at,conservative
">No ID required in Pennsylvania. 

I had to give ID today when I voted in PA-01. I think it's because I just moved from NY though.",lion27,e95xtx1,conservative
"""I *want* a reason to vote for someone other than the GOP""

I'm deeply concerned by what has happened to the GOP under Trump and was briefly flirting with the idea of voting straight D just as a message ( I don't live in a competitive district anyway), but the Kavanaugh hearings really reinforced for me how unhinged the mainstream Democratic party has become. I don't like Trump and I wish congressional Republicans would do more to try and keep him in check, but the Democrats haven't even come close to earning my vote.",jaykyew,e95vufb,conservative
"> Always suspicious they're putting my paper ballot in upside down so it's not scanned or something. 

You dont insert it yourself there? shady...",Zac1245,e96gw4i,conservative
Voted for Feinstein as well just to prevent De Leon from getting a foothold in Congress. ,imtoolazytothinkof1,e96nwih,conservative
"Sup brother, know that you're not alone. Straight R from CD4 ",beachmedic23,e96utvj,conservative
I voted early last week. My second midterm. I've voted for Scott more than anyone else.,SendixBunny,e96ohb1,conservative
"> keep that communist Gillum out of the governor’s mansion

Think he will lose?",Zac1245,e961kwl,conservative
Tbh I voted for Feinstein because De Leon is way way worse. She's probably going to win but I fear for how much worse California will become when Feinstein kicks the bucket and De Leon takes her place. De Leon is such a piece of shit. He changed his name so that people wouldn't bring up how his entire family are illegal aliens. ,Scozzar,e967knn,conservative
Same!,Scotychyscotch,e96lxbl,conservative
Wow that’s 10 lbs of crap in a 5 lb bag. ,skarface6,e96dose,conservative
"I'm not surprised. It's California. Also Ventura, in general? I'm near you. I've always heard comments like that from 2004 onwards, which was the first election I voted in.",neemarita,e96nr6w,conservative
Top two vote getters from the primary is such horse shit we should get rid of it but the ruling party would never do that and risk more people challenging them. ,imtoolazytothinkof1,e96octz,conservative
"Voted by mail, but tried to do same in a narrow house race. California is just that way.",Terra_green2,e95obks,conservative
Doing the lord's work,peeves91,e95uy38,conservative
"I live in Alexandria, so same situation here but not quite as bad as you guys in DC haha. ",Zac1245,e967uik,conservative
What will you do if you win?,Ravens1112003,e96b8b6,conservative
"I wrote in some people from my church for a spot like that, haha. ",skarface6,e96dg23,conservative
lol good luck.,Terra_green2,e96f9zg,conservative
So did I. Apparently the Senate race is polling close now. Here's hoping it made a difference.,ngoni,e96f8gm,conservative
"Did you vote Molinaro?  One thing I hate in my county is the crossover coverage. They have a disgusting habit of running candidates not just unopposed, but on every line. Makes me sick. ",Odoacer476CE,e96ic7l,conservative
"I must have put up 10 Yes on 6 signs around my town. 

God i hope this passes. ",PM_ME_YOUR_SPICIEST,e96u1qj,conservative
I really hope it does pass but worried that enough people will buy the stupid ads that this will stop any road repairs and we're stuck with the tax. ,imtoolazytothinkof1,e970uqg,conservative
don't trust exit polls is the lesson we all should have learned quite frequently in the past.,aCreditGuru,e96vx07,conservative
And a no on I1639 I hope! Law abiding citizens do not need more infringements to get between them and personal self protection!,ShallowSwimmer,e9679bb,conservative
I loved being able to vote there when I lived in Simi Valley!,neemarita,e96ntdg,conservative
Still early but slightly optimistic ,Enzo_SAWFT,e96xupo,conservative
I hope so. The early coverage and exit polls do not look good to me. But I said that two years ago.,JustAnotherJon,e96xrxs,conservative
"Some polls have James within 3. We can only hope. I wish I lived in Michigan so I could vote for him. I absolutely love the guy, and, even if he loses, I hope he sticks on the national stage for awhile. ",RPwhitefrost,e966oa5,conservative
When in doubt I'd go libertarian.,unionssucktrustme,e96i8iy,conservative
Same for me in FL,DPistola,e95suxb,conservative
A SHeriff is trying to raise taxes?,Zac1245,e96gxqr,conservative
Hello fellow Massachusetts independent voter! ,freshpicked12,e96a25m,conservative
Good luck on that governors and state senate race! Think Republicans can hold the state senate? ,Zac1245,e9699iw,conservative
Think Manchin will lose?,Zac1245,e96gwsu,conservative
last time we won the Trump presidency :) ,mado55,e96r2l7,conservative
Nah. I am waiting for the Daily Wire stream,Shinglings,e96shb6,conservative
they did the same shit in 2016. ,iwasthebeaver,e96sk8f,conservative
"Just got back home an hour ago. Straight R except libertarian for auditor. And a big, resounding NO to issue 1.",dicaparly,e96z2ji,conservative
It always matters. ,FuriousChef,e96lbhw,conservative
"It definitely matters! In NY as well, state assembly and other local positions are just as important! ",Nong_Eye_Gong,e96oufe,conservative
I voted R in PA as well!,Harbinger1129,e96fsj9,conservative
"Also voted straight R in PA. Good turnout at polls, but that could go either way at my precinct. ",atarimoe,e96kf65,conservative
Yup. He's done more to energize their base than any Dem activist could've dreamed.,jaykyew,e95tml0,conservative
Think Brat can pull it off? Also in VA but in a non-competitive district. Stewart sure as hell isnt winning lol. ,Zac1245,e95w9wo,conservative
Ditto!!!,jedichric,e95rcmo,conservative
">  I cast my (mostly useless) 

Same here in Virginia, I feel your pain. Voted Republican where I can. Only 2 of the 9 candidates from my city council are Republican. Can't stand the rest so I just voted for the two Republicans and one independent. You can vote for up to six. ",Zac1245,e967r76,conservative
"I could be wrong, but I don’t think we can read into Bovada’s line like that. I would guess they care less about the probability of something happening, and more on how much people are betting on each side. They just want bets to even out, so that the losers pay the winners, minus the vig that Bovada keeps.

If Bovada was making odds on a coin flip, both sides would likely start out somewhere around +95. Bovada assumes that both heads and tails would have roughly the same amount bet on each side. In this hypothetical, let’s say that assumption holds true and Bovada extends bets totaling $1000 for each side of the flip. The coin is flipped, and lands on heads. Bovada takes the $1000 bet on tails, pays $950 to those that bet heads and pockets $50. Not a bad way to make a buck. 

However, because people don’t understand probability, when Bovada extends a line for the next flip, a large number of people bet tails, expecting there to be a greater chance for that outcome. In this case, Bovada extends $500 in bets to the heads side, and $1,500 in bets to tails. If the coin lands heads again, Bovada is happy, but if it lands tails, we don’t have enough cash on the losing side to pay out the winning side. 

Luckily, Bovada can adjust the odds in an attempt to alter the action. If they simply adjust the line such that heads pays +115 and tails pays +75, they can hopefully push a lot of the action to the heads side so that the wagered money balances out, and the risk Bovada has to shoulder is lowered. 

This doesn’t imply that tails is more likely on the second flip, or even that Bovada thinks that tails is more likely on the second flip, only that Bovada has to adjust the odds to reduce their own risk. 

Similarly, extended a line of +225 on Republicans holding the house doesn’t imply a 30% probability of it occurring, only that Bovada has to set the line there to get some action on that side. We can’t really read into it one way or the other. ",cetamega,e96cmej,conservative
I wonder why. Hopefully the left doesn't get its mobs of illegal immigrants voting.,xJownage,e96pule,conservative
"i miss seattle, laughing at those spoiled lefty Udub students protest for no reason on MayDay on my local news was fun",top-perro,e96q86g,conservative
"Your vote is more important for all of the initiatives they are trying to pass here, I-1639, 940 , and the energy tax one. I voted straight R as well. ",timis8,e96jddd,conservative
he needs to come to Cali. We like our empty lefty pretty people. And he probably be at least better than Newsom or De Leon *eyeroll*,Terra_green2,e96op0c,conservative
how do you know if they switch your vote? In our machines in PA it has red arrows next to the choices and then it disappears as soon as you hit the cast vote button. ,iwasthebeaver,e96sejl,conservative
A few months ago I would have been nervous but after the Kavanaugh bullshit I think Republicans are just as motivated to vote as and Democrat out there.,lion27,e95qqjr,conservative
"Damn, thats a big ballot lol. ",Zac1245,e961t54,conservative
A mixed vote!? Those don't exist on /r/Conservative!!! /s,Godsdj,e96mjxo,conservative
You in a conservative or liberal area?,ravenswin,e96nlkf,conservative
They will predict Dems take all 435 seats in the house and 35 up for election in the Senate. ,iwasthebeaver,e96pa7u,conservative
Sleep tight o7,snoppballe,e95o5xy,conservative
"I did something very similar, Texas 28th?",Snorkel378,e95nxwy,conservative
"So you just voted Anti-Democrat. Not for a Republican or Libertarian, but against any Democratic Candidate.",LrdCheesterBear,e95rllc,conservative
"Even if it did happen, at this point, most people probably know who they will vote for.",molon-labe7,e960o90,conservative
Just look at the results of the primaries for senate. [That says all you need to know.](https://www.nytimes.com/elections/results/texas-senate-primary-election),zgh5002,e96r0e3,conservative
">  Jim Renacci

How did Ohio vote for Trump by a respectable margin but will not elect Renacci?",Zac1245,e96guda,conservative
"Hell yeah, love Steve. Not a huge fan of Renacci but I voted for him, doesn’t make much of a difference, if he wins than the whole damn country is going to turn republican",TadKosciuszko,e96ej0v,conservative
You think he loses?,Zac1245,e96gpid,conservative
Any bit helps! From a fellow Upstater in a red county just outside Albany.,Nong_Eye_Gong,e95w3xt,conservative
"that's weird, this whole election I've never seen republicans up in the generic ballot.",Rytho,e96v74j,conservative
I’m in the seventh district of pa. I’ll be going directly after work ,Chapka69,e95o8d9,conservative
"Hey, that's my district! ",Marko_Ramius1,e95qlgs,conservative
"Try to vote provisional! I never got my ballot in the mail either, but I did early voting and it counted according to my county’s registrar. ",VaultAir,e95o2i5,conservative
I went to college in Nebraska. Loved voting there! Hopefully you were first in line since you were so early :),fitnurse6,e963yl6,conservative
"Formerly from Schaumberg and with family still in Illinois, I really hope people see what that state has become and try to change it for the better. It looks rough right now. It might be time to get out before a collapse if the GOP does not win some seats there. ",Iwishiwasachad123,e960yf2,conservative
Did you even notice the conservative candidate?,pastagains,e96ei0p,conservative
Fellow NE native.  I boo every time I drive by a Kara Eastman sign.  ,theinfamousjosh,e96al3b,conservative
"Out of curiosity, what was your reasoning for voting yes on Amendment 1? I'm a Christian but I don't think the state government should be making such an overt endorsement of a specific religion. ",jaykyew,e95ve7v,conservative
I'm curious as to what Reynolds had done to hurt education.  Would you mind giving me some info or a link?,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e95uejh,conservative
I would go to your designated polling station and ask there. ,ultimis,e95xwmv,conservative
"Good luck on Chabot! I'm in a different district, so I got to vote for Renacci. As much as I don't like him, I've hated Sherrod Brown since long before I moved here, so it'll be nice to watch him lose, and know that I did my part.",dicaparly,e96zfk6,conservative
"Dude I'm from Texas and don't see Cruz winning. Not only does he have the front yard signage game won, he's got all the soft college kids too",necktits_,e96awux,conservative
You went from California to where?,Scozzar,e967cg5,conservative
"Yeah I voted for Stewart, but definitely not my favorite. My friends dad worked with Dave Brat and said he’s a good dude. Voted for Riggleman in Va-5! ",yankees012,e96wyo2,conservative
"I hope so! r/EricBrakey is one of the races I'm watching closely, he seems like a great candidate.",DEYoungRepublicans,e9641bl,conservative
Good job.  Now get that license updated!,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e96rh9r,conservative
i feel like exit polls should be illegal. It can swing too much influence. ,iwasthebeaver,e96qxiy,conservative
I really don't envy you California gun owners (and voters in general) who have to pick between Feinstein and DeLeon. That is just terrible and my heart goes out to you and your Frankenstein AR-15s,WienerTurds,e95q07e,conservative
I don’t think so man. There is a systemic polling error this year that severely underestimated the number of conservatives who are voting. DeSantis and Scott will both win,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e96nkeq,conservative
She did great at accusing kavanaugh of being a drunk and a rapist. Do you not like conservative justices and want a repeat at the next confirmation?,Paranoidexboyfriend,e95riwx,conservative
And I once met Chris Coons and I'm sure he's a decent person. Doesn't mean he deserves a vote. ,latotokyo123,e95sptf,conservative
[deleted],,e95r39k,conservative
Must have missed her on the Senate Judiciary...,Moonthrower,e95t80i,conservative
Congrats on your losing effort.,severeneckpain,e96ow02,conservative
">I hate all the SJW shit too but truthfully, men shouldn't be able to vote on that.  
  
For someone who hates SJW shit you sure do hold a pretty strong SJW-derived view.  
  
Should men be the exclusive voters for men's issues?",OrwellianLiberty,e9685w3,conservative
"The pro-life position views conception as the beginning of human life. It follows then that terminating a baby after conception is killing a human life. Killing a human life is murder. 

What does being a man or woman have anything to do with that?",LavenderGoomes,e9686ij,conservative
"In that case, should you be able to vote on how much others taxes are spent and collected if you yourself don't pay taxes? ",GMLOGMD20,e969hbn,conservative
"https://gloria.tv/video/Eqmrqja911Mu2qmMiX2V8KzpH

Everybody come look at the sacrament of the left.

Virtue signaled.",gster50,e968eq5,conservative
A felony if you're caught,Mr_0pportunity,e968t5n,conservative
Long Island brotha ,OprahSwagfrey,e96q7qu,conservative
https://i.imgflip.com/2lw51q.jpg,plow_ur_ass,e96y874,conservative
Nothing has done a better job of discrediting Democrats recently than Democrats.,waffleezz,e969cjr,conservative
Voted R on the big ticket races (especially governor bc close here also) but L on the locals that had one available.  My feeling is that Libertarians need to make more inroads locally before they can be effective nationally so I support them there when I can. ,gt4674b,e96qspc,conservative
"Agreed 110%, my friend.

I voted for Feinstein as the alternative is even worse.",neemarita,e973jjp,conservative
Agreed ,UberDuperDrew,e96dhsj,conservative
I moved a couple of times this year so that might be why. They weren't asking everyone. It specifically said in their book by my name that I had to show id.,UberDuperDrew,e96alpb,conservative
"The reason so much money is flowing into many elections across the country is that Democrats have California and NY locked down and they know it. Those media markets are expensive, if Republicans can make it competitive Democrats will be less willing to focus on other states.",ultimis,e95y1nn,conservative
True but my district is red and we have a great representative.  She’s the youngest woman ever elected into congress and is running against a left wing loon.  Her opponent’s voters have been really nasty especially in the letters to the editor of our local paper. She deserves a major smack down,tja_1478,e967u90,conservative
"Can’t stand Feinstein, the only other option was De Leon - there was no R choice.",remybob78,e95tg8g,conservative
You vote for John Cox?,YaBoiRexTillerson,e95t8i5,conservative
They probably would have just asked you to remove it. I posted my exact comment above on r/politics. -100 points in 15 minutes. Why do they bother calling it r/politics?,,e96p8si,conservative
"It really felt...I guess empowering is the word? Like hey, I get to have a say in stuff now. Especially cool since I couldn't even do this 100 years ago lol",littlecatladybird,e96z77m,conservative
The problem with California is you are starting to vote in communists and other leftist types that don't even accept the free market.  It could get absurdly loony down there before too long.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9673vf,conservative
"Both our parties in the past few years have become a mess.  Riots, Lawsuits, Scandals, Media Bias,  etc etc.  I grew up here, love this state, but seeing it become what it is now? I’m scared to keep raising my family here.  

It’s sad to think that it will take us til rock bottom to realize the folly of our choices, so hopefully both parties can come to an agreement somehow, and soon.",Xerethor,e96msn1,conservative
"What would it take for an Independent candidate to make it to the ballot, I wonder?",remybob78,e96rejy,conservative
Texas,Enzo_SAWFT,e968ye5,conservative
But reddit told me he’s a “piece of shit”! ,PM__ME__STEAM__KEYS,e96ptz8,conservative
"Took me a couple of hours to complete my ballot as well, I had to google each one of those judicial candidates to get an idea where they stand - wasn't easy! ",remybob78,e96rkqq,conservative
I went before work! My polling place is one block away on my drive to work.,GoldenShadowGS,e96e3c5,conservative
Marked my ballot for him!,ShillinTheVillain,e972lyt,conservative
"Phew,  barely got out alive. ",Nightshade37,e96zcb8,conservative
"> I am not even in your state


Good. You don't want to be here. ",soxfan90,e95zwnh,conservative
"It started when I saw the Democratic Party bury Bernie and push a flawed, untrustworthy canidate. That caused me to resent the Democrat establishment and opened my mind to change.

After that (unrelated) , I became a fan of a comedian, Dave Smith. I heard that he had a Libertarian podcast called 'Part of the Problem', and checked it out. 
The anarco-captialist argument struck me as more morally consistent than any political argument I'd heard before, which caused me to 180° on a bunch of issues.

As a full anarco-captialist libertarian, at that point, I saw some of Ben Shapiro's debates. That caused me to question some of my newfound beliefs, and look deeply into every political issue I had opinions about.

All of the sudden I found myself agreeing with conservative values more than Libertarian values... Suddenly I'm pro-life, I lean conservative on defense and border security, and I start loving my country and the ideas it was founded on.

Hundreds of Ben Shapiro and Louder with Crowder podcasts later, I am where I am. A Libertarian-leaning conservative, CCW permitted, proud American.

Once I understood where I stand politically, it was amazing how many things started to make sense in my life. The fact that I revere Judeo-Christian values even though I don't believe in god, I understand why family is important, I dont feel bad anymore about ""wasting my early 20s"" by staying in a monogamous relationship with a girl that I ""met too soon, before I could try the single life as an adult"" (I seriously believed that), caused me to suddenly have a moral clarity that I unknowingly longed for before.

Now I don't stand with any specific politician or political party, but I know what I do stand for, on every issue I care about, and today that caused me to vote for a bunch of Republicans.",waffleezz,e96l4s6,conservative
"I thought I was informed on the issues, but I discovered an opaque wall between all the political sources I was exposed to, and legitimate conservative arguments.

I liked Bernie because I understood that there was something wrong with the establishment, and Bernie came across as someone who really believed what he said.

I see the abundant flaws in the 'democratic-socialist' argument now, but Bernie was, ironically, my first step towards conservatism.",waffleezz,e96llg2,conservative
Remember to put on a new disguise every time you get back in line.,DMooseJ,e95qann,conservative
"I never remember which side is supposed to be up, so I ask the guy standing there. I did the actual insert, so I know the thing is in there. ",pfildeez,e96jbbz,conservative
I hope so. Was on the phone with one of the main people on DeSantis’ campaign last week (conference call) and they had internal polls showing 47-47 with a 1% D bias and the assumption that the unusally high 6% undecideds were hiding shy R voters. They seemed cautiously optimistic. ,YankeeBlues21,e964xtq,conservative
"How can taking the name of a Spanish dictator in Florida in the 1500's possibly be seen as politically correct?

/s",Juxen,e96g6le,conservative
"Yea we only had 3 republicans on the ballot in my Ward.  I voted for all 3 and then voted for any Libertarians running against a Dem haha. 

Hate that the DC overflow has turned VA blue. ",BrobiWanKenobi69,e96967r,conservative
"Well citizen that's an excellent question and I thank you for it. I think it's great we live in a town where you can ask questions, because without questions we just have answers, and an answer without a question is a statement.",purgman8,e96ldbq,conservative
I always write in my dad to preclude this possibility.,Rytho,e96w4xg,conservative
Stewart is polling close to Kaine?!,Zac1245,e96flfx,conservative
"I did. I am from Dutchess county, where he is the current County Executive. 

I don't care for him too much, but a vote for him is a vote against Cuomo.

I didn't have any unopposed candidates for my area, except for 3 or 4 supreme court judges",from_gondolin,e96jeb3,conservative
"Oh yeah, I definitely voted no on the gun control BS, and all the taxes as well. There's already enough taxes in Washington as is, we don't need more of that shit...

Of course, Lefties will say it's for a good cause, but you know, everyone says that.

They want my money because they want my money, and that's it, lol.",Bigbluebuttonman,e968dz2,conservative
"i still doubt Republicans are gonna win, i was just kidding 

they have some leads in Kentucky though

",top-perro,e96xxcw,conservative
I feel like there's a halfway decent chance they hold onto the senate majority. I don't think there's a chance at all of Stapleton winning the governors race unfortunately though. ,orange_hamster,e96bwz9,conservative
No clue. He’s made it here in a number of roles so he does win a lot of elections. I tend not to talk much politics day to day around here.,skarface6,e96itnd,conservative
When does that come on? I can't wait (also do I need to be a subscriber),Ovechkin103,e96utv8,conservative
"Same here, unfortunately I'm in Pittsburgh and my D congressman is unopposed. Still pulled for Wagner and Barletta though",WienerTurds,e96gjrb,conservative
Yeah I think Dave can win. Our district is pretty red. But yeah I don't have much faith in Stewart. Northern VA kills us. The rest of the state (except for maybe the Norfolk area) can be red but that bit of heavily populated blue in NoVA kills us. ,SpikeC51,e95wef1,conservative
In OH we are still using paper ballots ,Shinglings,e96sp1q,conservative
"After finalizing your selection it shows you what you selected on a seperate screen. In my grandmothers case, she did a straight R ballet and it switched Barletta with Casey. ",Penuwana,e96sofn,conservative
In a very liberal city but in a mixed political section. Higher turnout is usually a good sign for Republicans.,FuriousChef,e970025,conservative
And?,Moonthrower,e95t12y,conservative
"Yeah but...

Cuomo, Gillibrand, Tonko, Dem majority in both chambers of state legislature. All I can say is ugh.
",STFU_Donny724,e95wz2e,conservative
"Hello, neighbor! Just moved into the area from NYC. Love it so far.",lion27,e95qnbx,conservative
How do you do that?,curlbaumann,e95on47,conservative
Ha no. I went back to my car cuz it was cold out. I love voting here too. It's really expedited. In 2016 I voted at noon and there was no line. None of the shit that Florida puts up with.,14thAndVine,e9643sn,conservative
">  I'm a Christian but I don't think the state government should be making such an overt endorsement of a specific religion.

Interesting question and I have a complicated answer for you. 
 
I don't believe the state should be endorsing a specific reason either. As a matter of fact, I cannot stand Roy Moore for this very thing. I feel he was doing it for show. The wording is what gets me.

>  including public schools

In [this article] (http://www.trussvilletribune.com/2017/10/25/organization-sends-complaint-letter-to-trussville-superintendent-on-prayer-over-loudpeaker/) from last month it states:

>The Freedom From Religion Foundation has sent a letter of complaint to Trussville City Schools Superintendent Dr. Pattie Neill saying there has been a constitutional violation regarding prayer being broadcast over the loudspeaker before football games at Hewitt-Trussville.

I don't have a dog in that fight. I'm not connected in any way and I'm not overly religious. What I have a problem with is a Foundation being set up to seek these situations out and get the schools to stop it. If I've learned anything over the past 2 years is that you must never give an inch to a liberal. To me this was taking an inch from them(if passed). ",chaotic_zx,e95xqxb,conservative
"[Link] (https://www.desmoinesregister.com/story/news/education/2018/04/03/undergraduate-tuition-increase-iowa-board-regents-university-iowa-iowa-state-northern-iowa/474447002/)

Her budget cuts deeply hurt the state's general fund towards it's 3 public universities (I attend the University of Iowa) and my tuition is being raised by 3.5%. U of I also had to cut I believe 30 positions due to the slashed budget.",IowaHogize,e95uqmn,conservative
"From Texas too, but you forget that not many texan republicans openly advertise their politics. The political signs and bumper stickers were all liberal in 2016 too.",yackippo,e96bm43,conservative
Cruz is looking more and more likely to win. Why don't you think he will?,valmeister,e96b0uh,conservative
Thankfully most college kids don't vote.,Grond19,e96bn1o,conservative
"From TX, voted Cruz.",Mercennarius,e96ka05,conservative
Kavanaugh was quite rude in that situation but at least he apologized.,JumpyPorcupine,e95xove,conservative
Thanks!,atxdevdude,e96ox08,conservative
[deleted],,e9688x0,conservative
People have risked worse for less.,Unbalanced_Life,e96s0ud,conservative
"Yeah I just didn't cast a vote for senator.  There was just no way I could see myself voting for either of them.  I'm pretty sure Feinstein will win though, I don't really think anyone takes Kevin De Leon seriously.",HOB_I_ROKZ,e9789k2,conservative
Yep I had to show ID. Probably because I just moved to PA from NY.,lion27,e96jidq,conservative
"Very true. Unfortunately, I see zero chance of those states getting competitive again in the near future as long as the cities of NY/LA/SF dominate those states politically.",lion27,e95y5b4,conservative
There was no R choice because the CA GOP is a dumpster fire and couldn't organize 1 unity candidate. Instead you had a handful of squabbling Rs splitting the vote. California Republicans need to get their shit together.,0ttervonBismarck,e95wh6z,conservative
"I picked De León, because he was a super Socialist, not because I support that but because I know he will never get anything passed and if he does it’s ruin California more which will hopefully wake up Californians for once. Also it’s bullshit that there are no R’s the reason is because in the 90’s when the Democrats voted that be the way our elections go. Want to see the heart of Democrat corruption? Look at California.",Hello_34,e95u4ax,conservative
"Yea I voted Cox the only Dem I voted for was the dude running against Feinstein because we only have a choice between two Dems. I picked León, because he is going to ruin Cali more and hopefully it will wake Californians up, to how stupid the Democratic Party is. Also want Feinstein out.",Hello_34,e95u8oz,conservative
"Yea, I'm in a rural red county too so it probably wouldn't have been an issue, just didn't want any hassle. Had it on all day before and it went right back on after. 

r/shills is no place for any type of logical discussion.",Nong_Eye_Gong,e96pq5g,conservative
Yeah it's getting crazy here. My parents are moving to a red state and I am as well. Tough finding work out of state though,Scozzar,e9696wo,conservative
"The two sides are so afraid of each other at this point that there's this almost frantic sense of ""we have to vote for our team no matter what, or else.""

To answer your question: I have no idea, but it seems pretty unlikely in the current climate.
",diederich,e96tfbm,conservative
Cruz better beat Beta.,iwasthebeaver,e968zbh,conservative
Same. Ten minutes after polls opened. ,smokejaguar,e96fkbs,conservative
Was making a “dead voters” joke about Chicago but apparently it didn’t land ,mm1255,e96zg2i,conservative
"Wow. Talk about a huge fucking evolution.

Well kudos to you for having an open mind and being receptive to opposing viewpoints. That kind of shit is how we grow as human beings.

I still hold many 'left wing' beliefs- I'm pro choice, pro marijuana legalization, pro environment (though environmentalism should always have been a staple of right wing ideology imo.)

>Once I understood where I stand politically, it was amazing how many things started to make sense in my life. 

It's crazy isn't? Like things just sort of click all of a sudden.

Regardless, glad to have you aboard. We need more people willing to dive into unfamiliar ideological territory and question their own beliefs- even if it means someone ends up going from conservative to liberal. It is weird though, isn't it? I remember when I was back in high school watching the Daily Show and thinking all Republicans were idiots and bigots. Yet here I am today.

Also, thanks for taking the time to explain your transformation. I appreciate it.
",JuliusEvolasGhost,e992500,conservative
"That makes sense. I was just curious because if someone is a new voter and they go by what they see on the news, hear from professors, and hear from celebrities without actually looking into the issues, then of course they are going to vote democrat. This is why I think the get out the vote campaign is crap. All it does is get low info voters with little knowledge of the issues to the polls to inevitably vote for democrats. ",Ravens1112003,e96m1vt,conservative
"City council election here only had two Republicans and an independent. I only voted for those three. Could vote for six but I can't stand the rest so I just did three. 

VA will never be red again I fear. Especially since the GOP keeps running the same failed candidates over and over. ",Zac1245,e969etz,conservative
You have my vote. ,Ravens1112003,e96lfn8,conservative
Well it's what Stewart's radio ads are saying. Doesn't seem like it based on the public polling data though.,ngoni,e96l2aw,conservative
"True enough. I'd vote for a pine cone dipped in dung and sprinkled with razor blades over Cuomo. But frankly, that's how I feel about all members of the democrat party. Here in Suffolk they have a rage-inducing habit of cutting backroom deals and plastering one dipshit across the whole ticket in return for some favor. 

Rep. - Dipshit

Dem. - Dipshit

Cons. - Dipshit

Work.

Fam. - Dipshit

Libert. - Dipshit

Any other party - Dipshit

Drives me insane. On general principle I do not vote, or write in a candidate for, whatever office they do it under. My wife's family has been involved in county level politics for generations. This place, despite trying to seem like bucolic country livin', is so backroom, crooked dirty it's ridiculous. 

 ",Odoacer476CE,e974pu6,conservative
I might be moving there. So I don’t want to overrun with leftist policy lol. ,Zac1245,e96c0fo,conservative
8 PM ET,Shinglings,e96uz9a,conservative
Whats with PA voting for Trump but gov and senator races polling so much in the dems favor. ,Zac1245,e96grm0,conservative
The Virginia GOP also needs to do some investment into the State. We cant keep running Stewart and Gillespie for every state wide election. ,Zac1245,e95wmfj,conservative
as it should be,iwasthebeaver,e96sq50,conservative
"You're not choosing based on policies or who may be the best, you literally are just mindlessly checking a box because R. That is the definition of brainwashed",LrdCheesterBear,e960xd2,conservative
"I called in advance to see, but honestly just who up and say “I never got my absentee ballot, may I please vote provisional”. I dunno if they can turn you down.  ",VaultAir,e95u6zq,conservative
"For me, I just went into the town hall last week and voted absentee. Took all of 5 minutes. ",peeves91,e95v3fa,conservative
"I actually see where you're coming from. I grew up in Maryland and a similar organization called the American Humanist Association has been trying for years to tear down a war memorial honoring soldiers KIA in WW1 because it is shaped like a cross. An appeals court ruled against the cross because they thought it entangles government in religion, but SCOTUS just granted cert in the case so I'm hopeful that they'll reverse the appeals ruling. If you're curious, [this article](https://www.baltimoresun.com/news/maryland/bs-md-peace-cross-supreme-court-20181103-story.html) summarizes the whole thing.

It's just crazy to me that there are people out there who think they are doing a service to the world by getting a nearly 100 year old war memorial torn down because it ""offends"" them. Makes my blood boil.",jaykyew,e95yee0,conservative
"> Last week, Gov. Kim Reynolds signed a bill authorizing $35.5 million in mid-year cuts to balance the state’s budget. Thirty percent, or $11 million of the cuts, were to the University of Iowa and Iowa State University’s budgets.

Yeah, you weren't kidding.  I'm a pretty big supporter of a balanced budget but I need to do some more research on what areas of spending didn't get cut because I'm also pretty big on educating people.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e95vn6i,conservative
Yup. Liberals are crazy. I don't want entice them to vandalize my property.,GoldenShadowGS,e96gls2,conservative
"Even if he wins this time around, it's looking bad for future elections if Texas is even remotely in play.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e96db11,conservative
"I hope Cruz wins, but I spend all my time in Austin and Dallas, and the amount of enthusiasm for Beto is overwhelming. I'm not sure that polls will reflect the change in enthusiasm since the last election.",zobix,e96elui,conservative
Strictly observation. Not looking at polls because look how that went for Dems,necktits_,e96bflf,conservative
"What about a man that wants his daughter to be born. Does he have no say?

I'm pro choice myself, but men should have just as much of a say in this kind of thing.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e969u2n,conservative
What **is** your viewpoint on abortion then? I can't seem to grasp what your beliefs are,Mr_0pportunity,e96964v,conservative
"As a woman, being pregnant was actually the thing that made me understand the pro-life side is things. Feeling a living human inside of me made me realize how precious life actually is. I still identify as pro-choice because I understand that abortion is a grey area when it comes to certain situations like rape, incest, illness, etc. but I understand now why so many people are pro-life and have much more respect for their beliefs. ",freshpicked12,e9694bq,conservative
Then don't tell anyone how you feel about the holocaust or slavery because it didn't involve you.,blizzardice,e96c1zv,conservative
"I'm not sure about NY, but California has some serious issues that even Democrats are concerned about (housing prices, cost of living, homeless, etc). Democrats have been failing on these issues for over a decade, so it's possible to start seeing it become a little competitive. But maybe I'm just optimistic.",ultimis,e95yben,conservative
"I regret voting Feinstein, since I skewed towards ""less bad"" option rather than blow everything up. Getting De Leon into Senate would be a complete riot.",gizayabasu,e95wygi,conservative
Feinstein sucks but house democrats are better than radical socialists ,YaBoiRexTillerson,e95x5tg,conservative
We got you fam,craig80,e96lf6l,conservative
I was trying to decide from either that or a violence against conservatives joke.,Nightshade37,e96zm70,conservative
">This is why I think the get out the vote campaign is crap. All it does is get low info voters with little knowledge of the issues to the polls to inevitably vote for democrats.

Hit the nail on the head.

Why would the Dems be so desperate to push people to the polls who are apathetic towards voting? That tells you everything right there.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e96y5xf,conservative
Yeah i don’t know if I believe that. Kaine will probably win by at least 10% but I’ll take an upset and getting rid of goofy time Kaine. ,Zac1245,e96lqlu,conservative
"I grew up in PA, most of the state only cares about the presidential election and doesn't give two shits about what they're doing in Pittsburgh or Philly. ",zgh5002,e96qjyc,conservative
"I'm not totally sure. I lived in WV about an hour from Pittsburgh and finally moved here last summer so I'm fairly new to the political landscape here. I'm not sure if it's an issue of unions or what exactly, but Pittsburgh and Philadelphia are pretty liberal. ",WienerTurds,e96hj9o,conservative
My guess is we aren’t being polled (I wasn’t) or people only show up for presidential elections.  However the turnout today is much higher than the midterms in 2014.  ,Harbinger1129,e96hdxe,conservative
Yea I like physically filling out my ballot ,Shinglings,e96st8v,conservative
"He definitely voted on who he thinks would be best. 

NOT the party behind the Kavanaugh conspiracy. ",Moonthrower,e96mcva,conservative
"Sorry for the continuous questions, but who did you call?",curlbaumann,e95upnf,conservative
"I’m a pretty staunch conservative, but sometimes you gotta look out for what’s best for you and that wasn’t it.",IowaHogize,e95vpjc,conservative
Well Cruz honestly isn't the best candidate for the Republicans...and Beto has had the backing of the national media and countless rich democrats around the country. The Republicans just need a better candidate and better coverage next time.,Mercennarius,e96kg0m,conservative
"Go outside of the blueberry. No one outside of Austin, Dallas and parts of Houston are voting for Beto. ",zgh5002,e96qoh3,conservative
"> I spend all my time in Austin and Dallas

That explains it then",lion27,e96jele,conservative
[deleted],,e9697ga,conservative
NYC has the exact same issues. My wife and I moved from NYC to PA a few months ago because of the extraordinary cost of living.,lion27,e95yls0,conservative
Exactly!,Hello_34,e95z0l5,conservative
"No, you have it wrong. Only way to save California now is to let it ruin its self with socialism. It’s to far Blue to turn back. Let it collapse on its self like Brazil. They are so fed up with their Socialist Party they now have a far right leader.",Hello_34,e95yydd,conservative
"I hope so, if we lose texas we might as well just go right for the ammo boxes. ",iwasthebeaver,e96llmg,conservative
I think they should mandate electronic machines print out a receipt that you sign and return to the poll volunteers to verify your selections. ,iwasthebeaver,e96svo7,conservative
"Google your county registrar, probably. If not just try showing up and asking! Cheers to a marginally beneficial red wave 
Edit: county, not country ",VaultAir,e95yb6h,conservative
"As a alumni just wait until you graduate and they keep asking you for money :P Maybe if I could direct what it would go towards. There was just so much waste even when I was there. Also, screw that walk to the art building on so many levels.",aCreditGuru,e95wwv7,conservative
"Do you think women should be able to vote for the commander and chief even though they can’t be drafted? 

Do you think you should be able to vote on highway funding provisions if you don’t own a car?

Do you think the unemployed should be able to vote on income tax?

No other issue is treated the way abortion is treated by you. There are tons of reasons to vote pro-choice but the disenfranchisement of men for one specific issur is absolutely asinine. 
",yackippo,e96as8g,conservative
"Yes, I think men should have a say. Men are an important part of procreation. ",freshpicked12,e96ayvv,conservative
Do you draw line based on where in the pregnancy the abortion is occurring? An abortion at 8 months is indisputably a disgusting atrocity and I highly recommend you watch this procedure before you take your stance.,gster50,e969wgs,conservative
"Everything is a pendulum regardless of how far it goes. We had carter, then we had Reagan and Bush, then we had Clinton, then Bush, Obama, Trump etc. it’s best not to let the pendulum swing to far to one side, because once it does, it swings harder back, only increasing in size and force with each motion. Keep things moderate, so the pendulum stays in the middle.",YaBoiRexTillerson,e961g0h,conservative
I’m a J major so I don’t have to worry about that thankfully ,IowaHogize,e95wyrg,conservative
[deleted],,e96a6vk,conservative
I was engineering so most of my time was spent in the engineering building and old capital (math building). I still had to take some stupid electives over across the river.,aCreditGuru,e95xcz8,conservative
So men should have no say on the life that they had a part in creating? I don't understand that thinking process,Mr_0pportunity,e96aqj4,conservative
"Here’s the thing, does an argument become more valid based on who is making it? 

If I say late term abortion is wrong and a woman says the same thing, is she more right than me? Do you have to understand what it’s like to be pregnant to say late term abortion is a monstrosity? Clearly not, because you just said so. And if you think it is a monstrosity, why would it matter who votes against it?

It’s admittedly more grey earlier in the pregnancy, but the issue still hinges on whether it’s okay to violently kill a baby in the womb. Cutting it apart and then sucking it into a bottle, leaving it to die after inducing early labor... and those methods are used in trimesters 1 and 2.

Everyone really needs to read about and watch what abortion entails, there’s a reason nobody talks about it.",gster50,e96bvx3,conservative
[deleted],,e96e8j4,conservative
"Thanks, I was pro-choice myself until I read more about it. Now I’d say I lean pro-life, but it’s a complicated issue

",gster50,e96jv5u,conservative
"I will always remember election night 2000, when Tom Brokaw couldn't find New Mexico on a map.",Martbell,e96neyr,conservative
Im sorry but NY voted in the economically stunted Cortez yesterday. So this shouldn't be a surprise. ,Wiseguy2013,e97vjvm,conservative
Those of us in the red part of the state are annoyed this morning. I wish NYC would break off and float off shore and become it's own island community or something. ,Natetendo83,e9863pp,conservative
"Being born and raised in upstate, I completely agree. Their(NYC) views and needs are much different than those of us not living in NYC. Id say NY politics are 70% of the reason I packed up my shop and moved to a tax friendly state. ",Wiseguy2013,e98ahzp,conservative
"*The 2018 midterms were about personality. Whether or not voters liked Trump, whether or not they liked Cruz, whether or not they liked the Democrats’ behavior regarding Kavanaugh, etc.
The election was determined by the perception of character, and very little appeared to be about policy or agenda.* 

Good news for the MSM. Their ability to define ""good and evil"" with terms like racist/Nazi seemed to work. What strange times we live in.",fifaislife206,e985f80,conservative
"A friend of mine on Facebook posted about Beto signs right up to the polling place door and a Beto volunteer inside, IIRC. He’s reporting it, but still. ",skarface6,e96w2gs,conservative
"To be fair, it was probably a typo. I bet it was suppose to read:

“VOTE *STRAIGHT,* DEMOCRAT”",PurpleHouseSlippers,e96dj6o,conservative
"> Any other person or voter not in the process of voting, campaign workers, 
signs and all other electioneering material must be located at least 10 feet 
away from the entrance to the room where voting occurs.

https://www.dos.pa.gov/VotingElections/OtherServicesEvents/Documents/DOS%2520GUIDANCE%2520ON%2520RULES%2520IN%2520EFFECT%2520AT%2520THE%2520POLLING%2520PLACE%2520ON%2520ELECTION%2520DAY%252010-16.pdf


",tehForce,e96x8y7,conservative
"Does that include leaflets?  My polling place totally had several leaflets for a D candidate on a table they had set up to contain the PA basic voting info.  Idk if they were placed there intentionally or not (someone handing them out outside earlier in the day and people discarding them on the table inside?), but there were about 2 piles of 6-ish and no one was keeping them orderly.",DeadWater27,e96z9jh,conservative
"> Does that include leaflets?

Absolutely.",jd_porter,e971c5y,conservative
The guidlines are linked above but apparently no.  You can take them with you but they should leave with you.,tehForce,e972ozn,conservative
Add that to the list of disorder at my rural polling place I guess. ,DeadWater27,e972r9r,conservative
"The concern for Texas is a little exaggerated. I would be much more worried about the Rust Belt in 2020 than a red state. Beto was a formidable candidate because of his charisma and he had plenty out of state help. Why did Abbott win by 14 points and Cruz only 3? People turnout more in a presidential election, Texas may have a problem with Californians coming in and making their state shitty, but I think Trump will win by the same margin as he did in 2016. ",latotokyo123,e97nmi7,conservative
"It was a national level campaign to elect Beto. Cruz has done a Great job for us, the big fear for me was that the election was being purchased to out Cruz. Which it was, it just didn’t work. ",sambo2366,e97npzs,conservative
Wish we’d unseated this guy.,the-divine-comedy,e98u1pw,conservative
"Is this the same guy who helped confirm a Trump-nominated ""rapist""?",unityrootts,e98u7cl,conservative
That is not what the FBI report says..  ,ozric101,e98vx9y,conservative
Hence the quotations,unityrootts,e98xrak,conservative
"why, they don't sound like authoritarians at all!",SKWM3000,e96fvst,conservative
The Right to Vote comes with another Right that people may not be aware of; the Right **not** to Vote at all.,Jizzlobber42,e96hino,conservative
"If you think it is your job to tell your neighbors how to live their lives, you are part of the problem. ",ozric101,e96glvf,conservative
"Received something similar in the mail, showed my name and neighbors names along with a ""voting grade"", not cool.",PerceivedShift,e96pm3e,conservative
This was exactly an ad I saw on Crunchyroll for Beto O’ Rouke in Dallas. I could not even believe what I saw. Literally a threat ,xPineappless,e96uru1,conservative
Wth?,Terra_green2,e96imut,conservative
I live in a ghetto. My neighbors don't give a shit if I didn't vote.,SpecialistParticular,e97c133,conservative
"Got some junk thing in the mail, saying that if i vote is public record and that someone at my address didn't vote in the last three elections. I know I voted in 2016, so bullshit. ",DirtyBastard13,e97o95x,conservative
Are you in PA? My family members received the same thing and it listed their neighbors and whether they voted or not,rpm3311,e96u1il,conservative
Can they do that?!,mfisch4,e97b8ef,conservative
"Nope, south of you in VA",PerceivedShift,e96w8f9,conservative
I’m not in PA anymore but my parents have told me I’m still in the book. I don’t want to contact anyone to have my name removed because I’m afraid they’ll just send someone to vote as me. ,rpm3311,e96x5ck,conservative
And what does that tell you about the IQ of that district? ,StillANNONin,e97wazc,conservative
Good. She’ll make an absolute fool of herself.,Kutepov,e97zyvn,conservative
"What a surprise, NY sends a socialist without a clue to DC. Seems to be a repeating pattern with sending people with a IQ smaller than a snail.",dayylin,e98peiu,conservative
"I'm just shocked that such an idiot has won just shy of *80%* of the vote!

I know plenty of Democrats that think she is full of shit... so this just makes my jaw drop.",DeadHeadLibertarian,e98upo1,conservative
The downstate dummies are also the idiots who re-elected Cuomo the Corrupt. Cuomo's campaign (such as it was) was based on opposing Trump rather than doing anything of substance for NYS. I guess as more of us move away he's hoping to fill the state with illegal immigrants and others looking for a handout.,JFGFNY,e99h384,conservative
Wouldn't be surprised if she turned out to be Sacha Baron Cohen's latest character. What an utter clown. ,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97z30j,conservative
"On judgement day if you are barred from heaven, your two choices are the traditional hell or living for eternity in this district in NYC.",optionhome,e97wapt,conservative
I am hoping that one of us posts every speech she makes in Congress.  They will all be LOL funny. ,optionhome,e97wf7f,conservative
"> he's hoping to fill the state with illegal immigrants and others looking for a handout.

Was just watching the beginning of Tucker tonight.  He reminded me of something we always forget.  50% of the country pays zero in federal taxes.  And we keep forgetting that if you are in that category you don't care about a roaring economy or reduced taxes.  You are only concerned about more free shit.  And that is why 50% of the country votes and we think they are nuts.",optionhome,e99kbqn,conservative
"Good point! Illegal immigrants aside, we have a sizable population of generations of citizens getting every conceivable taxpayer supported benefit. Raised from birth to expect everything from food stamps to toy handouts at the holidays, the only way they'll vote is to keep those benefits. Stir in that some of this thinking is supported by the public school system and it's easy to see how that type of thinking has overtaken the rugged individualism and push to be self-sufficient that was the hallmark of the American citizen.",JFGFNY,e9amixq,conservative
"Not terribly unexpected, what only 2 parties of sitting presidents have gained house seats?

The senate is where its at.",SuperFunMonkey,e97bxr7,conservative
Fuck.,McKnight36,e97a1fp,conservative
Thought it would be closer. This sucks but looks like were doing well in senate races. Need to maximize senate gains to protect for 2020,pk3maross,e97b5ts,conservative
any other major network following suit?,SKWM3000,e97a3qp,conservative
"I take solace in the fact that the Dems had to outspend the GOP something like 3 to 1 to get this victory.

They can't help themselves ... they just gave Trump someone to counterpunch.  For two years.

We hold the Senate, we get the judges we want for the foreseeable future.  Partially lost the battle, and we won the war.",AM_Kylearan,e97ka0i,conservative
"Great, now all I will get to hear is how this is proves the country really didn't like Trump.

&#x200B;

edit :OMG Pelosi!  I think I want to just puke",nooneuknow42,e97c7qh,conservative
"Totally normal.  The question is by how many.

Let them have a little rope...",chabanais,e97arac,conservative
"So the giant blue wave turned into a wee splash? I can live with it as long as we have the White House, the Senate, and the Supreme Court.",SoThisIsItMyFriends,e97d80t,conservative
"Seriously, this isn’t bad long term. First, it’s a pretty common result mid term for the House to flip against the sitting President. Second, the Senate is still Republican. But when Pelosi and company come off as obstructionist, especially with respect to the economy, this will be an easier sell in the Presidential election in 2020. If the Republicans held it all, and the economy stalls, there is no one to point to. Trump can now have his obstructionist scapegoat. 

This is not my analysis. I heard it on Armstrong and Getty this week. I think it makes sense. ",Triumph-TBird,e97f7cw,conservative
Shit.,8CruzControl0,e97gtkx,conservative
"Weren’t we projected to lose the senate and keep the house?

Edit: REPUBLICANS WILL KEEP CONTROL OF THE SENATE

Edit 2: sorry not sorry for caps ",PurpleHouseSlippers,e97boeg,conservative
Not that I’ve seen.,MigzMando,e97a59o,conservative
Seems like the Dems are out spending us every election. Where is the GOP's money and why don't they have any?,ultimis,e97qc8t,conservative
Bitch.,steampunker13,e97md8n,conservative
"No, it's pretty much always been lose House/keep Senate. In 2020 it gets *bad* for us in the Senate, we're defending a fuck ton of seats",SouthernTrumpVet,e97c9rn,conservative
3 months ago we were going to lose both,BrockLee76,e97buay,conservative
We don't have as many billionaires ready to funnel money into our campaigns through questionable means.,Hillary_For_Prison,e97yfmy,conservative
Damn,tredeh,e97p1u1,conservative
"Most of the seats we are defending are safe R. It looks like we will get 53-54 tonight so Dems need 4-5 pickups (and Doug Jones will probably lose), which will be tough.",1wjl1,e97enry,conservative
So stressful. We shouldn’t be voting our consent for people to rule our lives. Suck it dems and RINOs,PurpleHouseSlippers,e97d3j9,conservative
"But, ""party of the rich""",GoldenShadowGS,e981rhv,conservative
Well bless their hearts.,Hillary_For_Prison,e97yd5e,conservative
So we lost Nevada so are at 50. Gained three so 53. We are waiting on AZ which would keep it at 53. Montana may be a pickup which would put it at 54. Is this right?,the-divine-comedy,e98crw6,conservative
"Nevada was lost, we picked up 4 so far (IN, ND, FL, MO) with a possible 5th (MT) but also another possible loss (AZ looks like a hold to me but nothing official yet.) Mississippi is headed for a runoff but I don't see a possible loss there, I'm counting it as a hold for now.

That puts us at 54, Montana would make it 55.",Martbell,e98fbda,conservative
There's a point where I have to recognize I'm being pandered to so hard by something that it becomes patronizing and that's the feeling this guy's stuff tends to elicit.,DMooseJ,e95qshb,conservative
>Implying Republicans are in any way Liberty minded and not also statist and big government.,nathanweisser,e95nxjv,conservative
Is that supposed to look like that one guy who makes garbage videos for Vox? Because it definitely does lol,The_Mighty_Rex,e963emi,conservative
"As others have stated, Republicans aren't exactly the most faithful with the whole ""liberty"" thing either (for example, Bush was pretty bad), and even now, they still kind of disappoint a bit (Trump wanting to ex-or. a change into the constitution, and Republicans ramping up spending...).

That being said, I prefer them to Democrats right now.",Bigbluebuttonman,e968s2c,conservative
Being anti globalism is not conservative. It's populist and it's stupid.,kevkev667,e95oail,conservative
Trading freedom for false securities breeds tyranny.,cons_NC,e95oro3,conservative
"Didn't Trump mention a 10% tax break for middle income citizens just 16 days ago?

This cartoon seems deliberately hypocritical.",JakNomad,e95qzlp,conservative
"I wish it was this way, but voting Republican seems like just the start of recovery, not the fruition.  There seems to be inklings of actual recovery rather than ""just don't make it worse"", but boy is there a lot of work to do.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e95o3u1,conservative
Ha! Joke's on them. I'm only voting straight D just for the free stuff. Little do they know I'm actually a Republican! The fool and his stuff will soon be parted!!,oak_lander,e95ezn4,conservative
The losers at life will never turn around their lives if they don't learn the first law of economics.  Nothing is free.  People vote for free stuff when they live in a fantasy world like a child thinking just wishing for something can make it true.,optionhome,e95hwuw,conservative
"lol, some of these political cartoons are pretty intense",Stevienines,e95ry7w,conservative
Boomer tier,Bellinelkamk,e95tw2d,conservative
this one takes the cake https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Gzw65Dgy_TY&t,CreativeRoutine,e960iy7,conservative
"This is actually pretty tame and focused by his normal standards, usually he tries to pack like 18 different messages in (see [here](https://grrrgraphics.com/trick-or-treason-halloween-cartoon/))",jaykyew,e95t9zm,conservative
It’s like punting on 4th down or throwing a pick 6 in overtime. Baby steps ,curlbaumann,e95pca3,conservative
"> in any way

Republicans are more liberty-minded than Democrats. For example, we tend to support economic freedom much more than Democrats do.

That being said, there are still many ""big government"" Republican policies that I don't like.",NakedAndBehindYou,e9646yq,conservative
"Bingo. Globalism isn't some boogeyman that means we cede sovereignty to some intergovernmental agency or something. It acknowledges that the economy has become less regional and more global over time. Trump and his tariffs are a harmful product of a new populist branch in the party. We used to be mainly free traders, and the populists were Democrats (see the Occupy movement and all of the 99% garbage). ",pharmermummles,e95qs76,conservative
Is this a joke?,TheReaper9456,e95p8gm,conservative
"Globalism is when, for example, our gov leaders decide to enter a deal in which we pay other countries money so that they can continue to have their economies boom while putting regulations on ours that hinder business. Then turn around and have the audacity to tell the American people that the reason for this is because, although we are constantly competing with these countries, they are not ""developed"" so it would be wrong to ask them to slow down their economic growth, but totally fine to slow down ours. And put a cherry on top by pretending that in the future, this deal will bring some utopia that has no effect on the environment. That thinking is the epitome of globalism. The thinking that citizens of other countries are more important than ours because one day our gov leaders plan to open businesses and sell things in foreign places, so a policy of appeasement has to be given to these countries and their citizens. All while not even considering the citizens of this country.",tmone,e95u8uq,conservative
"Giving away your sovereignty is not very conservative. And that's exactly what globalists are promoting and doing. Nobody should fall for the ""we get cheap shit from China and that's the best thing ever, thanks globalism"" idiocy. International trade is not the same as globalism. Also, opposing something because it's ""populist"" is pure elitism, and definitely not conservative. 

""We the global overlords"" or ""we the people"". Patriotism or globalism. ",rankaisija,e969pci,conservative
hahah...what a classic comment. you actually believe that tax cuts are the government giving you free money. holy shit. ,tmone,e95uceb,conservative
"Lower taxes is perfectly in line with the point he is trying to make with the cartoon.

&#x200B;",dallens,e95v0aj,conservative
How is a tax break hypocritical? You keep more of your own money. ,Tico117,e95rgx2,conservative
"No one on the left thinks its ""free"" though, that's a right talking point. The left understands how taxes work and has a different idea of how taxes should be used to better a country.",AndrewCamelton,e95qt16,conservative
"This is my favorite thing relating to voting in the midterms so far:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OdNNjCHGixE](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OdNNjCHGixE)

SNL was actually kind of funny with this one...",Bigbluebuttonman,e969g59,conservative
"Wonder why there is a noose around the O. Hmmmmmm, what could it mean?",BreakingBadRules,e95ybtf,conservative
"It's always overtime though, according to everyone. Every election is the most important election.",nathanweisser,e95q6la,conservative
"That's absolutely true. It doesn't invalidate my point, though.",nathanweisser,e964tf5,conservative
"Globalisms goal is to have a global government. This idea that tariffs are always bad doesn’t understand that other countries have a shit ton of tariffs on our goods, free trade goes both ways ",Dranosh,e962w6a,conservative
wanting free trade is one thing.... but we can't pretend that we were remotely close to a free trade environment before Trump.,dallens,e95vea5,conservative
"No, it's the common understanding of conservatism pre-Bannon.

Do you remember protectionism being part of the tea party platform? Lol

",kevkev667,e95qey5,conservative
"Free trade is a conservative principle.

Trade imbalances do not matter.",kevkev667,e969y01,conservative
They fucking vote and drive.,BJUmholtz,e9602vv,conservative
I’ve seen plenty of people on Reddit that think the “rich” are going to pay for their healthcare and college education. They have no clue. ,better_off_red,e95uoo8,conservative
You’d be surprised. They also think the lunch cafeteria at the office  is “free food!” or “free gym!” etc,HoustonWeHaveUhOh,e95rkb3,conservative
"I've seen tons of Lefties say ""free healthcare"" though, and then say ""yeah, I know it's not free"" after being corrected.

And I'm just sitting here like ""Why'd you call it free then?'""",Bigbluebuttonman,e9699s0,conservative
"That's part of the strategy to get you to vote against your beliefs. Make it seem urgent that you do so or things get worse... all the while nothing really changes and no one really represents your values. (I say this as someone who flirts with libertarianism). 
",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9630c1,conservative
Then we're talking about different things. Nobody is calling for global government.,pharmermummles,e963e7v,conservative
How would you define free trade while allowing for different countries to be governed differently? ,WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9634s6,conservative
Thank you! It's like the president is a populist and suddenly everyone on this side of the aisle pretends they have always held these views too. It's ok to be a conservative and not love EVERYTHING about the president. You can be a conservative and think populism is stupid. That used to be the norm. There are plenty of reasons to vote for Republicans and for Trump. Populism is not one of them.,pharmermummles,e95qzfw,conservative
"A sudden, government facilitated trade imbalance is hardly conservative.",faint-smile,e978dc0,conservative
"There are a lot of kids on Reddit. 

I think people like Bernie or other liberal leaders are more like ""the rich should pay their fair share"" which they imply is more... but it's not implying that everyone else pays nothing (unless you try to paint them in a bad light, obviously). ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e963b9p,conservative
So every shitty coworker is a liberal? ,WonderBlarbleGlarble,e963cet,conservative
"You didn’t address his point; in fact you dodged it.

Free trade can’t mean ‘for thee, not for me’. Then we’re simply getting fucked and you can call that conservative all you want - I’ll pass.",faint-smile,e978i6q,conservative
To allow international trade without restrictions or distortions.,dallens,e96alz2,conservative
100% agree,kevkev667,e95x95o,conservative
"No, didn’t mean that, and I’m not even saying that liberals are bad coworkers.  It’s that they rave about “free” perks, not realizing that we’re all actually just paying for it.  It’s voluntary (though undisclosed) socialism on a smaller level. The workers in the office who are more libertarian or conservative minded tend to recognize that. ",HoustonWeHaveUhOh,e964mcm,conservative
"What do you mean by ""restrictions or distortions"" like tariffs and subsidies? ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e96ayrj,conservative
"Sorry, misunderstood I guess. Have a good one! ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e96530c,conservative
"Correct. I think the oxford or wikipedia definition is fine "" international trade left to its natural course without tariffs, quotas, or other restrictions. ""

 Free trade policies generally promote the following features:\[[*citation needed*](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Citation_needed)\] 

* Trade of [goods](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Good_(economics)) without taxes (including tariffs) or other [trade barriers](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trade_barrier) (e.g., quotas on imports or subsidies for producers)
* Trade in services without taxes or other trade barriers
* The absence of ""trade-distorting"" policies (such as taxes, subsidies, [regulations](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Regulation), or laws) that give some [firms](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Business_entity), households, or [factors of production](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Factors_of_production) an advantage over others
* Unregulated access to [markets](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Market_(economics))

I do realize that others use a different definition that allows for some tariffs.",dallens,e96bwwh,conservative
"Awesome. Thanks for the info. I will read on. 

Have a good one! ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e96ed7r,conservative
"Aggressively mediocre article.

>**More Will Get Done, Instead of the status quo.**

>The Republicans took their advantage for granted. Now with loss nipping at their heels, they will be forced to deliver results. And these results will have to be bi-partisan, allowing more work and policies to become enacted. Unless Republicans want to lose again in 2020, it’s important they make efforts to enact bipartisan legislation for the people, instead of their most vocal base. After initial posturing, these congressional members will start to make grasps at the olive branch.

That's a lot of words to say... nothing at all.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97z98i,conservative
"> their advantage for granted. Now with loss nipping at their heels, they will be forced to deliver results. And these results will have to be bi-partisan, allowing more work and policies to become enacted. Unless Republicans want to lose again in 2020, it’s important they make efforts to enact bipartisan legislation for the people, instead of their most vocal base. Afte

thank you for your critique. i will change it.",lawandordercandidate,e980t1v,conservative
"Lol. You can't win, can you?

Edit: also, I agree that there should be a *Boy* Scouts and a *Girl* Scouts. Having young men and women socialize within their own gender is extremely important for their development. Not only do you learn how to socialize within you gender, but you learn things from older members to the younger members. I know this sounds sexist or something now of days, but me being in boy scouts was important and it was partially because of the ability to be with just males. There's a comradery that is associated with it. ",molon-labe7,e96recf,conservative
"don't get why the girl scouts just don't let boys in so that they can get all the badges faster than the girls do. that's the point of all this gender neutral stuff, right? to create a cohort women who defend the gender binary because they never won anything because some transfem beat them all the time?",SKWM3000,e96y743,conservative
[deleted],,e96uzfp,conservative
Theres nothing sexist about this. There are times when both sexes need to be with their own.,goldmouthdawg,e97s6qz,conservative
Boys by and large won't join.,StraightNewt,e96zulw,conservative
"Oh I agree! It's good for a ton more reasons than I said, but was more talking about allowing girls (or not) into the boy scouts. ",molon-labe7,e96v1td,conservative
"Further, GSUSA *specifically rejected that idea outright*.",AM_Kylearan,e97k5pv,conservative
[deleted],,e96vzrz,conservative
Yep! ,molon-labe7,e96zpua,conservative
"I'm no fan of Pelosi, but I'm definitely hopeful that she will at least attempt to work with the president to get things done through compromise.

She mentioned unifying the country and get things done, I just hope she practices what she preaches.",TheFluzzy,e97iz7n,conservative
"Don't let her fool you. She is diabolical. This is lip service to the other Dems so she can become Speaker again. She is going to leverage the house to try and destroy, or make ineffective, the Trump presidency.

She said the same stuff in 2006.",mastaxn,e97j8t6,conservative
We might actually get something done.,paulbrook,e97ikea,conservative
"""Pelosi, who formerly served as House speaker from 2007 to 2011, stressed ""we have all had enough of division,"" and vowed to seek ""unity"" and ""bipartisan conversations"" in the chamber.""

From an article about the Dems going to request Trump's tax returns now that they control the house. 

Unity. Suuuuure........",MajesticMulva,e97mrkb,conservative
She’s riding the high of winning an election. Just give it a few days ,AyyyGreens,e97lxfi,conservative
"She cannot, they planted the seeds of crazy in the party, they demand what they were grown an vote harvested for.",Racheakt,e97jmgl,conservative
Nancy's idea of unity is you not fighting back when Antifa hits you with a club.,StraightNewt,e97phpm,conservative
Hey if she becomes the Tipp o’Neil To Trump’s Reagan more power to her. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e97jcjp,conservative
"She knows damn well they didn't get the huge upset they wanted.  I still think her party will be obstructionists though when all is said amd done.
Trump needs to fire sessions now. Legalize week close to 2020",MaddSim,e97jg3s,conservative
"They will do anything to end trump. they cannot and will not do anything bipartisan. if you think there is going to be ANY ""reaching across the aisle"" you are ignorant of reality. this a duel between parties, and losing means the death of your ideology. 

Pelosi is doing this to get the speakership. she will not do anything.",JMB_was_a_god,e97lbe9,conservative
"""Flipped?""",GizmoRazaar,e98sjc4,conservative
I bet she said the same thing in 2006. Some unity that was. ,soxfan90,e97jvei,conservative
She is bipolar 😀 she will be talking impeachment tomorrow,SeekhSikh,e97j6up,conservative
Don’t depend on her or her PC speeches ,cbzdidit,e97p9mk,conservative
"Democrats said that in 2006 (when Pelosi first became speaker) they lied. They said it again when Obama became president, they lied. 

Their idea of ""unity"" is Republicans rolling over and doing everything that they want.",ultimis,e97q3gc,conservative
"Exactly. She knows a lot of the people putting the Dems over the edge are people who had to campaign against her becoming Speaker. The long knives will be out for those new congressman, then on to being psycho Nancy. ",etherealsmog,e97jjgs,conservative
doubt it.,JMB_was_a_god,e97l3w9,conservative
"""we have all had enough of division"" Ironic coming from her LMAO",CantBeStumped,e97nzs5,conservative
That is the accurate caveat.,paulbrook,e99ymeq,conservative
"> Legalize week close to 2020

There's no way Trump can legalize week. The month lobby is way too powerful.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e97vm56,conservative
"She will be beholden to Republicans.

She is a soulless pragmatist and will shift with the wind.  It's a fairly strong Senate-backed wind the Reps have.",paulbrook,e99yhks,conservative
So to speak!,paulbrook,e99y57n,conservative
"Sadly, you're probably right. They won't really be able to do anything besides obstruct Trump though without control over the Senate. If the dems and Pelosi truly want things done they'll attempt to compromise with the president and try to head into 2020 as the party of compromise.",TheFluzzy,e97jbvq,conservative
Senile is what we use to call it when I was a kid. ,ozric101,e97ldjy,conservative
Exactly,cmiller1225,e984prb,conservative
"
**Don't forget to vote...show America these idiots aren't worthy of victory.**",chabanais,e95r2xn,conservative
"Lmfaoooo sad sad lefty

Good news though!

Early voting turnout for once has a GOP lead of a point. ",Intimidator94,e95r68o,conservative
Just another troll.,Kutepov,e95rkqt,conservative
"I woke up this morning not feeling overly racist thank God this guy was nice enough to remind me how racist I am. I almost forgot to raise my fist up and say ""gosh darn minorities"" after my shower, would have totally broken my morning routine.",Oneshoeleroy,e95xb6l,conservative
I'm practically giddy. It's gonna be a good month for hate mail,LumpyWumpus,e95rth3,conservative
Living rent free in these crazy peoples heads. If it wasn’t so funny it would be sad.,War-Damn-America,e96270l,conservative
The Democrats are going to get stomped,Hplayer18,e95s80z,conservative
So “cheating” is the next talking point. How do they all get this info? Is it a mass text?,RanchRelaxo,e95ze9y,conservative
I love his post history,NoFatChiqs,e95t0z1,conservative
My insurance through work just skyrocketed. Glad I voted this morning before coming in. ,oQ_Qo,e9612tn,conservative
69 upvotes  ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) ,Pro895YT,e962fq4,conservative
What a hero,circuitcrash,e962hso,conservative
12 day old account... just trying to stir shit up.  Ignore the bullshit. ,SquatzPDX,e96td7s,conservative
I don't this is ok showcasing a troll post on the top of the subreddit and then using that post to paint the picture that all leftists are like this.,KarmaWhore757,e95st13,conservative
Voted this morning! Didn't like any of the red candidates so I voted all blue as a lark. ,ChiaMcDouble,e95uq83,conservative
"Get out to vote regardless, until it’s confirmed we still must fight ",Wittyusernameman,e966hue,conservative
I know! I’m so racist that I (first generation Hispanic immigrant) forgot to say to my husband (Indian) how much I hate minorities. Thank god this guy reminded me how racist I am. ,pugmommy4life420,e96flfk,conservative
Idk.. I’m a little worried about Texas. I really don’t want to see ted leave,lead_oxide2,e95ueip,conservative
Subscribe ,skarface6,e96egao,conservative
Gotta cover yourself just in case the blue wave doesn't materialize. ,stanleythemanley44,e96nxv1,conservative
A disturbing many are though.,HispanicTrumper,e95td7z,conservative
"Yup.

Don't trust anything in regards to who's gonna win.

Just vote, and wait.",Bigbluebuttonman,e96ahu4,conservative
He'll win.,chabanais,e95wwel,conservative
"I am terrified. Like a 1 in 4 chance the mans career is over. I really hope he wins, I think im the only person on earth who actually likes the guy ",thereisasuperee,e95uxcd,conservative
Check out r/pics lmao. There is a photo right now of some stupid selfie saying he is the only Democrat in his area and Republicans will not suppress his vote! So if the poling station is being moved and you are the only Democrat in your Republican area then are you saying the Republican vote is being suppressed?? Congratulations to that dumbass he played himself. Oh also he says it was a 21 mile round trip...so 10 miles there 10 back.......repressions!!!##$%% lmfao. They're not sending their best,Hplayer18,e96ic5y,conservative
"Yeah we see *so many* it's a fair conclusion. 

Notice I said *Leftist* not *Democrat*.",chabanais,e95th7c,conservative
"I agree, many (especially on Reddit) are like this",KarmaWhore757,e95tgbx,conservative
In a landslide,tehForce,e963ayt,conservative
The zodiac tweet he sent out sealed the deal for me. Huge fan of a man who has a little self deprecating humor. ,Kemaro,e95x61i,conservative
"> mans career is over

Doubt this. If he'd lost he'd either be up next for SCOTUS or end up somewhere else in politics. Probably in the executive branch, which he already has aspirations for.",synn89,e95vyaw,conservative
Definitely not. ,skarface6,e96iuyi,conservative
The fact that is was even close at all should give us pause.,chabanais,e963yga,conservative
Elections (especially this one) are weird. Everyone begging each other to vote on social media and virtue signaling. Even reddit just sent a pop up. If you really need to find your polling place the morning of Election Day are you really gonna have an informed vote?,stanleythemanley44,e95p53v,conservative
"(I tend Liberal, but I'm interested in your thoughts)

I'm curious what you all think is the most important election, as seen on election night (as opposed to the later consequences). I feel like it's probably 2004, where there was a lot going on with the country, and a clear decision if 'staying the course' was the best choice.",howeman,e95ctc8,conservative
Recently though this saying seems to hold water with the far leftist actually wanting socialism.,Kung_Pow_Penis,e95bs1z,conservative
"It's just bullshit designed to get people riled up. It's weird that seemingly both sides, but especially the left, has failed to realize about 2/3rds of our nation doesn't vote, and it's mostly because of the ridiculous vitriol in our modern day politics. Most of them either aren't interested or don't want to get involved for fear of being persecuted by peers that disagree with them. Sad that the left has been the catalyst for this. ",xJownage,e95112w,conservative
"Like the old adage... 

We live in interesting times... ",ozric101,e952e1n,conservative
And this election and the next several will get half a paragraph of mention in the next generation’s history books.,killiburnbrae98,e95f8t1,conservative
"98% of statistics are made up on the spot

The actual number us 116341%",TrooperPilot,e95k0qp,conservative
I don’t think liberals politicians are known  for targeting the educated.,Nolkso,e95t7m4,conservative
Its even on Craigslist home page. ,gtrdundave2,e96qylz,conservative
Google’s front page says “Go Vote.” Blegh,8K12,e963hk3,conservative
"I think it's definitely 2000. The close margin (like 500 votes in Florida) was a big catalyst of a lot of the polarization we see today; especially since it was coming off the Bill Clinton thing. This was compounded by the fact that Bush winning put him in the presidency during 9/11, which is the most event of the past couple decades in America. It can't be overstated how much the US response to 9/11, both good and bad, has shaped the modern world. ",Faraday314,e95fzb0,conservative
"i think for people who care about this massive divide in the country, the most important was 2012. not so much who won, but how it was played. 

mitt romney is a damn boy scout and he was dragged through the mud so awfully, people were pissed. then obama and the democrats were extremely divisive during the next four years. they played identity politics and brow beat conservatives into a point of saying “fuck it, we want someone who isn’t a boy scout and who’s gonna say the shit we want to hear without fear of being called a racist/xenophobe/bigot/you get the picture” 

since then, the media has just lit the damn flames and i think we’re in a bad spot. right and left hate each other and it doesn’t look like it’s getting much better. for the current social fabric of our country, i say 2012. back in the day, at least we had religion or the flag to all get behind but it seems ever since we elected trump, the dems (and certainly to an extent the republicans) have said fuck all that, winning is more important. ",swampyboxers,e95fu4m,conservative
"The economy (specifically jobs) was biggest in my mind because it impacts so many things.  Crime, mental health, general well being, mobility....     

For example.  We know that a lot of inner city violence is related to economic situations.  Black unemployment at historical lows can (start) to address that issue.  Not a solution but a very good thing.    

I didn't see that democrats had an actual platform.  Economy, jobs, taxes, illegal immigration, etc.  Trump (like him or hate him, agree or disagree) has issues platforms.  ""Here is what I want to do"".  The democrat message was ""Trump is bad"".   What little platform they did have was all based on non-US citizens.  No message on how they were going to help/support/improve the lives of the actual citizens they are elected to represent.     

Just my general impression.  We'll see.    

Cheers!",bardwick,e95q6l5,conservative
1860 election,vorpalsword92,e96dapt,conservative
Their embrace of socialism is troubling but it’s the identity politics that drove me to the right. They’ve created a situation where people who disagree can’t even talk to each other. ,Upasaka-paul,e95mkrn,conservative
"Didn't the 2016 election have near record turnout, at around 60% or so of the voting population?",Sideswipe0009,e959n55,conservative
"> It's weird that seemingly both sides, but especially the left, has failed to realize about 2/3rds of our nation doesn't vote

What's weird to me is that the Left is trying to spin the historically likely outcome of the party in the White House losing in the midterms into some miraculous victory.

Surely this thing that has been happening for decades is only happening *this* time because Trump!",Telineye,e96mjyb,conservative
Well said. Simple as that.,mrhammsack,e95gzgw,conservative
Historians find things that happen because of elections more interesting than elections.        ,tau_decay,e95rl7m,conservative
I think that could be said for both sides...,ShamooTheCow,e95v874,conservative
Lmao not the strongest argument for conservatives.,mtl_economics,e960nxd,conservative
"I think you're right that in hindsight 2000 was the most important. However, I don't think it was at all clear how important it was when we were actually in November 2000 (and so claims at the point of 'this is the most important election' may have appeared overblown)",howeman,e95oeox,conservative
"It also led to the near deification of Al Gore with many liberals deluding themselves that if only they hadn't been ""cheated"" out of the right President that we'd be living in a golden age.  ",codifier,e95loz5,conservative
"And I hate when people say it is both sides. I can name many Democrat leaders who have embraced the far leftist nut jobs and socialism.

Name me 1 republican official in office right now who has supported any right wing mobs, which there hasn’t even been any in the past while, or embraced fascism.",Kung_Pow_Penis,e95s4ap,conservative
"Yes, but such turnout so far has proven to be the exception. Honestly, however, I expect very similar turnout for these midterms. ",xJownage,e959xdc,conservative
"History major here, can confirm. The fact is only a small piece to the puzzle. Most of what Historians do is centered around “why” and “how,” rather than “what” happened",killiburnbrae98,e968gab,conservative
That happens every election. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e95lx3v,conservative
"Steve King, arguably. ",TBSportsFan1254,e96msok,conservative
"Kinda what I'm thinking as well. After all, this is the most important election ever...lol",Sideswipe0009,e959zh1,conservative
"I'm in a pretty rural area near central Ohio.  My polling place was PACKED this morning.  I've been voting in the same place for about 16 years and I have never seen it that crowded, not even for presidential elections.    

Anecdotal but I believe the turnout is going to show some pretty big numbers.",bardwick,e95olg7,conservative
"It really doesn't. Nobody cares about John Kerry or Mitt Romney now, and to the degree that anyone cared about McCain it had a lot more to do with his Senate career than bis presidential run.

The closest I can think of to it happening again was 2016, except that all of the Hillary cultists had already been Hillary cultists going in to the election.",wolfman1911,e95tt63,conservative
We're getting to an impasse in politics. The people that are on the left are staying on the left. The people that are on the right are staying on the right. The moderate voters are being alienated and are pulling out of politics. And half of the population just doesn't care. ,xJownage,e95ax99,conservative
"Eh.  I for one would be very interested to see where we'd be right now if Romney had been elected.  He was a well qualified contender who I think would have been able to convince more Ds to work with him than Obama could Rs.  Not that I think it would've somehow led to some golden age of reasonableness, but it's possible that without the right frothing at the mouth against Obama, and the left headlining Hillary as the crowned successor (she still likely would've been the 2016 candidate but with less of a ""continue the run"" spin), we might've ended up in a much healthier political landscape.",NovaX81,e966wj2,conservative
"Mitt Romney can still make headlines by being opposed to the current administration (or he was able to a year ago). John Mccain was the same. John Kerry was the same as well (also he became sec state). Honestly, of the past few losers in presidential elections, Al Gore has been the most removed from politics and elections. He's a one-issue guy now, and not even the loudest voice with that issue anymore. ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e96g7rj,conservative
"Being able to get cameras to point at you by bitching at the Trump administration isn't any great accomplishment. Hell, after spending eight years deriding George W Bush in every way they could think of, the media is willing to say nice things about him when he criticizes Trump.",wolfman1911,e96ocbh,conservative
"The left can't handle losing, so now they're trying to blame it on ""voter suppression"", since they already used up the Russia excuse back in 2016.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e97gbif,conservative
"He's also claimed we had proof of Russian collusion for the last 2 years. Why not just release it? What else is there to investigate?

Dems will truly say anything knowing that the media will never call them out.",orangeeyedunicorn,e96bdgl,conservative
The silver lining is that it would certainly help 2020,BeachCruisin22,e968wz3,conservative
"I've no doubt that *if* the Dems take the house, productivity will grind to a halt and the House will be locked up in a quagmire of investigations that, eventually, bear no fruit. What a colossal waste of time and taxpayer dollars. I wish we'd get back to the time when serving in the House and Senate were not supposed to be your primary profession.",GFZDW,e96d3zc,conservative
"Why has Meuller been wasting tax dollars for 2 years, then?",mlmack,e96jlzj,conservative
Why not? Look at all the proof of Russian collusion the investigations have found thus far...,Romarion,e96etds,conservative
"You can tell by the guy's eyes, he must drink tons of covfefe and stay up late at night worrying about Trump...",DEYoungRepublicans,e968gt4,conservative
"Go ahead and do that, Schiff. You’ll only be wasting time and money. You can do that or MAGA. Up to you. ",runs_in_the_jeans,e96in3i,conservative
He has crazy eyes.,MisterMouser,e96yc2d,conservative
"He said Tucker Carlson was an agent of the Kremlin he's insane.
",chabanais,e96bwko,conservative
"More to the point, he told CNN that he had proof of *direct conspiracy between Trump and Putin* the day after the 2016 election.

Am I out of line in demanding to see that proof?  I mean, is it just me or does it seem odd he's been sitting on the biggest bombshell in modern political history for two years? ",LonelyMachines,e96l7iy,conservative
"He hasn't though. He's already made back everything he's spent by taking Manaforts apartment, etc. The investigation is actually making our country money lol",iTzJME,e98pyy9,conservative
"He was a nobody before he became CNN's pocket chihuahua against Trump.  His whole shtick is harping on the President.

It's sad, really, how dependent Schiff is on the man he professes to despise. ",LonelyMachines,e96lde3,conservative
"That's obviously untrue. Anyone who disagrees with a Democrat is a nazi, not a russian.

--cnn",mysql101,e96ghyj,conservative
"Now that you mention it, it *does* seem a bit suspicious...",PurpleAngel23,e97h6og,conservative
"[Serious] Instead of trying to find fault in their views, try and explain to them the positive reasons and points that cause you to support the GOP. It will come across as less of a personal attack . Also maybe ask them in an approachable way,  what causes them to support Democrats. It's not a whole solution to your problem but it's a step in the right direction. ",SlikFifty,e985v34,conservative
RemindMe! 1 week “reply to this thread”,Dchash,e985zbu,conservative
"Makes sense, thanks for the advice. Maybe let me rephrase as, is there an objective and cited summary of the GOP’s positives somewhere? In this political climate I seem to only be able to find hyperbole on both sides. ",StrongAffordance,e9860vf,conservative
No surprise. And the democrats will say “conspiracy theory”,PurpleHouseSlippers,e976dym,conservative
"If they vote Sinema in after she called the entire state stupid, then she was right and they deserve her. ",shelzmike,e97on38,conservative
"I still cannot believe Sinema has a chance there. 

Are there really that many fucking Californians in Phoenix?",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e97os75,conservative
I fear that there are enough Californians in Arizona to turn the tide. Arizona used to be a nice state. The illegals and Californians need to go home.,ShadowTH277,e97noop,conservative
"Oh hell yeah dude. I always hear people at ASU, Flagstaff and odd jobs I work talking about how Arizona is messed up like a football bat and needs to be more like California, New York, etc.",ShadowTH277,e97pday,conservative
I’m a transplant from Cali...and I’m never going back. We’re not all anti-straw tree hugging snowflakes ,BlueCrew3434,e97p8ip,conservative
Looks like Maricopa County voted blue for the first time in years. That’s shocking. But on the other hand Ducey was elected by a healthy margin. ,Zac1245,e980ku5,conservative
Ducey is a spineless punk though. I heard him talk on the radio for his campaign (same station Rush is on). His rhetoric is a stark contrast between his actual policy. I *really* hate that trolley we built and now it's expanding. What a waste of millions of dollars.,ShadowTH277,e98kvqi,conservative
I feel like he’s gonna run for senate one day. ,Zac1245,e98lc6p,conservative
*shivers*,ShadowTH277,e98lxd4,conservative
I have no idea.  Oregon has mail ballots.  ,gtrdundave2,e96kige,conservative
I’m in very liberal area of Virginia. It was pretty empty but it always is. I’ve never seen a line. It’s a non competitive area. ,Zac1245,e96mpld,conservative
 mine had no line (12:30pm). ,doobsftw,e96ybre,conservative
"T_D is super HIGH ENERGY at the moment. 

A lot of people getting out the vote!",mikeygio,e96rxl4,conservative
Just make sure you vote!,CuckSlayer1984,e96kk1f,conservative
I miss those! I called Mama and Daddy and talked to them. They were able to vote a couple of days ago. Hubby and I rushed down to the ballots this evening. ,PurpleAngel23,e97hcq3,conservative
Thanks for the info!,CuckSlayer1984,e96mx54,conservative
Yup!! I’m so excited. Staying up all night for this shit! Can’t wait for the red wave to wash over the Dems!,genegerbread,e96x8wu,conservative
Oh yeah been done for awhile.  ,gtrdundave2,e96laa3,conservative
Good! Thank you!,CuckSlayer1984,e96lf2y,conservative
"But I don't get a cool ""I voted sticker. """,gtrdundave2,e96lk0l,conservative
That's lame. Why not?,CuckSlayer1984,e96llkv,conservative
"*oh, right - you voted by mail.",CuckSlayer1984,e96lmab,conservative
Because applicants should be judged by the content of their character not on the color of their skin.,chabanais,e9a1iyg,conservative
"Because most of us don't  believe in white privledge,so the privledged argument  holds no water for us. I don't  care  if you're  unrepresented.
A policy  based on discrimination is what I'm  against.",ArctiClove,e9a29vl,conservative
"Racial minority doesn’t always equal underprivileged.

Do you really think Obama’s kids need an advantage when applying to college?

Or a poor Vietnamese immigrant actually has to get higher scores than a rich white kid.

At the very least the program should be tied to income, not race.",gster50,e9a2rfw,conservative
"It's a strange problem now because colleges want to ""promote diversity.""

Would you allow colleges to pick a minority over somebody more qualified by their own choice?",LibertarianP,e9a2qlv,conservative
"Applicants with more ability being denied places purely because of their race - it's a real head scratcher to think of practical and moral downsides.         

Maybe asians students should just be outright banned from colleges for a few years because of their massive overrepresentation?",tau_decay,e9a1yax,conservative
"These spots aren't infinite. To let one student who isn't qualified in will lead to leaving out a qualified student/worker. It's possible the difference could be more than 1:1, because you end up having to spend time and resources bring those unqualified students/workers up to speed.

You also create a culture of lower expectations and excuse making. ""He can't read because he's a poor minority,"" rather than ""he can't read because we pushed him through rather than holding him to the same standards.""",SendixBunny,e9a2f3w,conservative
">especially since it helps out those that aren't privileged

Therein lies part of the problem.  You **assume** privilege and hardship based on a wholly arbitrary and immutable characteristic that has nothing to do with the sort of the life the applicant has had.  

Diversity is not a virtue.  ",DevonWeeks,e9a3rwf,conservative
Because it gives people who aren’t skilled enough something they shouldn’t get and it discriminates based on race.,Yulsar,e9a4fsm,conservative
It's racism,RomeoMyHomeo,e9a81yn,conservative
It is unconstitutional.,DarthRedimo,e9asd0p,conservative
"For the ones who didn't need AA to get in: it makes it harder to get the same credibility as their peers, because some people wonder if they got in by merit or by special treatment.

For the ones who did: giving college spots to people who wouldn't be competitive on their own merits sets them up for failure. If someone gets into somewhere that's a bit too rigorous for them, they'll have more stress, lower grades, and a higher chance of dropping out. If they go somewhere more in line with their abilities, an average college instead of a tough one, they're better positioned to succeed.

AA might have had a good benefit:downside ratio in the beginning - I'm not sure - but we're well past the time when being a minority or a woman would make it harder to get into college on its own. It's outlived any usefulness it once had.",ZarahCobalt,e9bqwfi,conservative
"Giving people preferential treatment based on the color of their skin is racism, no matter what colors were talking about.",Tomcat_AL200,e9adhze,conservative
This. This is all that needs to be said.,FuriousChef,e9abfh5,conservative
"i thought this was obvious, so I’m confused about why people like op doesn’t understand this. ",gt2xs,e9b5t9x,conservative
"> It's a strange problem now because colleges want to ""promote diversity.""

Isn't is racist to maintain people of different races have different opinions?
",chabanais,e9a2u60,conservative
Programming. ,chabanais,e9b6r7z,conservative
"In the words of Dan McLaughlin, ""Amateurs ignore early exit polls. Professionals ignore early voting data."" ",frasierfonzie,e95upno,conservative
"Doesn't matter. Don't let this get you over confident and thinking that you don't have to vote today. If you have not voted, GO OUT AND VOTE",LumpyWumpus,e95rvtk,conservative
And!? Gotta keep this up or we are screwed. At least in my state (NC) all those votes are in heavy Democrat areas.,Intimidator94,e95rkgv,conservative
"I think between positive early voting results and bad weather in key states, things are looking good for Republicans. Don't know if they can hold the house but it should be close. ",See_No_Chytil,e966nbv,conservative
"If things go our way, prepare for 2 narratives from the  Dems:

(1) Voter suppression/disenfranchisement 

(2) Russian hacking
",joozian_,e966593,conservative
How about Dems?,coonana,e96jcr4,conservative
"I regret not early voting this year. My voting location only had like 15 parking spots. I just moved here, and now I know that for the 2020 election I'm voting Trump early to avoid that crap.",DogBirdLizard,e96n6ev,conservative
"Isn't it a good sign, if you compare it to 2016 and 2014? I don't assume the final vote will match this, but if early voting looks similar to the last two elections, which we won, that makes me hopeful. I'd be nervous if I was a Democrat.",LibertyTerp,e963umy,conservative
"Yeah, every year the early voting turnout gets higher. It's not even necessarily a sign of higher overall turnout, maybe the people voting early were gonna vote anyway.",Martbell,e96nw4d,conservative
"My wife & I voted early for the first time this election. We went at 9AM on a Saturday and it was a breeze. Plenty of parking and hardly any line. Way better than getting up at 5:30AM on a Tuesday to stand in line for an hour in cold darkness, which was our voting experience in the last couple times.",Martbell,e96o2ih,conservative
"It's hard to say. I'm not an election expert, which is why I quoted Dan, who I trust on these issues because he has a lot more experience than I do. From what I can tell, early voting is becoming more widespread, even in the last 4 years, and older people (more Republicans) are more likely to vote early. Personally, my parents (boomers/gen x) both voted early whereas my wife (a millennial, as am I) said she wouldn't want to vote early because she likes the experience of going with everybody to the polls. Since younger people tend to lean left, if there are more young people voting today it could cancel out all the gains from the early voting. I hope it's a good sign but again, I'm no expert. I'm speculating and tempering my expectations. ",frasierfonzie,e964er6,conservative
"From what I gather from reading around, the problem is that early voting doesn't necessarily predict the overall voting share.  R's might show up early, but it doesn't mean they will maintain that edge come election day. 

There's also the issue with independents.  Early voting by R's doesn't mean the Independents will vote for an R candidate.

",Roez,e96aplr,conservative
"I actually am a bit of an election expert. I worked in national politics for years, pretty high up. While I haven't written studies on elections, I have followed and researched thousands of elections. 

You can't make any assumptions about who votes early, you've got to look at the numbers. And so far, more Republicans are voting early than 2014 and 2016, which is one concrete data point suggesting Republicans will perform better than those years. Most of the polls contradict that however, pointing to Democrats being about 7% ahead, which is what they'll need to take the House with all the Republican gerrymandering.

I still expect Democrats to get more votes than Republicans, but probably not 7% more. That could be enough to keep the House, just barely.",LibertyTerp,e967sus,conservative
Work on improving Health Care without uprooting and restarting the entire system. The FDA has approved a record number of Generic alternatives to drugs in the last two years. Cutting red tape and increase competition should make incremental improvements and stem the massive inflation is Health Care costs.,guitmusic12,e98ltf2,conservative
"Mandate was already repealed. There has to be a way to cover pre-existing conditions while not raising healthier peoples premiums through the roof, but at the same time not bankrupting those people with pre-existing conditions. Its a tough one, it really is. Unless you completely do away with health insurance aside from Major Medical and have the doctors directly bill the patients, insurance and healthcare companies are going to keep charging as much as they possibly can to make as much profit as possible. Its a mess with a well funded lobby on both sides of the aisle. ",iwasthebeaver,e98lze0,conservative
I hope the Free Market is the future of health care. I also think that if all the mandates are removed from the ACA that it will shrivel up on its own,RomeoMyHomeo,e98mkmo,conservative
"Well, the individual mandate has already been repealed - 2018 is the last year it’s in place (aside from some states which enacted it at the state level)... but loosening hardship exemptions definitely helps for this final year.

",niresangwa,e98lub5,conservative
the GOP will move to wanting pre-existing issues covered. the winds are already going that way. I believe POTUS has said as much.,JMB_was_a_god,e98pg6b,conservative
"It’s easy to place the blame on the providers, and I think there is a lot that can be done in regards to lowering drug prices.  However, I think the overall unhealthy lifestyle coupled with the massive amount of people in long-term care provides inconvenient measures we have to factor into the American system, along with those lobbyists and regulations which are anti-competitive.

What sucks is that if Republicans don’t have an answer, Democrats are eventually going to run away with it until there’s a substantial economic effect.  I think there’s a lot that can be changed to encourage direct billing and make it less of an insurer’s market, but those ideas are going to have to be agreed upon and emphasized if they’re ever going to compete with socialized alternatives.",t3ch21,e98o8yy,conservative
">There has to be a way to cover pre-existing conditions while not raising healthier peoples premiums   
    
There is no SUCH way,  Insurance covers accidents pre-existing conditions are no longer that.     ",ozric101,e98mivg,conservative
"Oh wow, I missed that somehow.  I know part of ACA is that Democrats insisted it needed a mandate in order for the numbers to work, which makes sense because healthy people buying in is essentially free money for the system to run on.",t3ch21,e98n7h5,conservative
"Has there been a lot of backlash?  I think it’s a smart move considering a lot of people could potentially be dropped, but it certainly goes against conservative and libertarian orthodoxy.",t3ch21,e98pt59,conservative
">There is no SUCH way, Insurance covers accidents pre-existing conditions are no longer that.

thats why I'm on board with just getting rid of health insurance altogether. Like if I want to go see a general practitioner for a well visit, I shouldn't have to get the insurance company involved. The doctor should have a price, around what normal co-pays are, and then I just pay them directly. Adding in the extra layer of paperwork and time for coordinating with the insurance company is what drives the prices up. Theres has to be a market based solution that would work better. ",iwasthebeaver,e98mz75,conservative
"Yeah, it’ll be interesting, but they definitely undercut the ACA by doing it.. supposedly means a 10% increase in premiums to account for it",niresangwa,e98o8yr,conservative
"I have not seen much, but i dont pay attention to this issue much.",JMB_was_a_god,e98q52d,conservative
"Well, it is all on the Democrats now.... lets see what kind of 'good' ideas they have(lol). /s

",ozric101,e98o97b,conservative
">Like if I want to go see a general practitioner for a well visit, I shouldn't have to get the insurance company involved. The doctor should have a price, around what normal co-pays are, and then I just pay them directly. 

You *can* do that, there are plenty of doctors out there who will give you a cash-on-the-barrelhead price for a well visit. It won't be as cheap as a co-pay because with a co-pay the doctor also gets some reimbursement from the insurance company which is paid for by your premiums, and there ain't no such thing as a free lunch.",PubliusVA,e99gath,conservative
Yeesh.  I’m all for repealing the mandate but something needs to be done about that cost.,t3ch21,e98pgzh,conservative
Id rather pay $100 to the doctor for services rendered as opposed to $580 per month every month in perpetuity for insurance i may never use. ,iwasthebeaver,e99h07z,conservative
"It does, but the popular selling across state lines isn’t the answer. 

There’s actually provision for it in the ACA, but it forces states who do it to homogenize their state regulations, which is the big hurdle - states don’t want to surrender their sovereignty over regulating.

If your neighbor eases regulation, everyone will buy their policies there with looser rules.. not hard to see how that can harm the consumer and start a race to the bottom.

It would also mean the biggest providers get bigger and smaller providers vanish.. I’m sure no one really wants to see healthcare go the way of cable companies for example.

In reality you can’t control the companies without regulation, and when they’re regulated they increase prices.

I’d be happy if they just brought catastrophic plans back, and be allowed to handle the little things out of my own pocket.",niresangwa,e98q6d9,conservative
"Yeah, we should be encouraging most people to get catastrophic coverage for major unexpected expenses and pay out of pocket for routine care. The tough question is what to do about people with chronic preexisting conditions.",PubliusVA,e99i2dr,conservative
"Doesn’t the ACA already come with its own set of standards?  Out of State competition may undermine States’ ability to add onto those, but I think there’s at least the amount of separation where consumers can say, “Alright, I understand that by going with that cheaper out-of-state plan, not as much is going to be covered.”  I think that really goes well with the “open marketplace” the ACA is said to provide.

Oddly enough, catastrophic plans are still there, though there are limits to who qualifies, and I’m not sure how those limits compare to what was in place before the ACA.  I would definitely opt for one if I were only providing for myself, and didn’t have better options.",t3ch21,e98r4bg,conservative
"Pre-existing conditions are typically managed through prescription medicines, so getting the cost of those down is imperative. ",iwasthebeaver,e99ivng,conservative
"It does but it doesn’t account for price differences based on location, plus it’s not as simple as whether something is covered or not.. regulations also affect reimbursement rates and specific denial limits etc..

Would the free market model sort these things out in time? Maybe. Yet of the three parties (providers, insurers and consumers) its never the first two that get screwed...

...Healthcare is a commodity with inelastic demand.",niresangwa,e98wkhp,conservative
"Just to clarify, I did earlier say providers when I meant insurers.  With that being said, I do think providers get screwed oftentimes, particularly when it comes to private practices.  There’s a reason we’re seeing less doctors, and the cost of medical school is only part of the equation.

With that being said, I agree with your last point entirely, and that’s how insurance was able to come into existence.  Insurance was created to mitigate unavoidably high costs, and so better policy needs to be implemented to ensure that it continues to serve that purpose.  ",t3ch21,e98xj6h,conservative
"Has the history of failed socialism changed their minds? It's going to be ""the nay sayers are sabotaging us, we just need X to reach the socialist paradise."" Then when it fails, it wasn't real socialism. Rinse and repeat.",snowballtlwcb,e98p5mj,conservative
"This is a result of the massive polarization of the country. The same is happening on the right as well. 

Birthright citizenship was something that would get you silenced 5 years ago. Not wanting amnesty would have done the same. the GOP used to be the ""War"" party. look how far we have come.",JMB_was_a_god,e98pxsb,conservative
"Millionaires buy nice cars, billionaires buy countries. This is the result of selling our education system to just one person.

There are so many things I love about Bill Gates and the wisdom he can share, but when it comes to government issues I think he's just totally in his own little world.",Sketch_Crush,e95qx30,conservative
Goal Achieved.  Slogans have been memorized and any skill that would allow thinking for yourself has been erased.,optionhome,e96jeyf,conservative
Hang on....let me put my surprise face on.,nooneuknow42,e962grr,conservative
I knew it! ,grovelmd,e96gr79,conservative
"It's tough to blame him. I cant imagine having that much money and *not* using it for what I believe are good causes.  
  
Gates isn't a bad dude. His AIDs work in Africa is fantastic, so while I feel disdain toward CC, Gates gets a pass. ",OrwellianLiberty,e96vfb6,conservative
A 60/40 split amongst Latinos and that's evidence of a white nationalist? Lol ok. ,MajesticMulva,e981vbz,conservative
Good for The Huron Daily Tribune! They did the right thing. Though WaPo or NYT will hire her most likely.,JdPat04,e96enot,conservative
"Worth notifying the department of elections as well, they usually have a hotline for reporting bad behavior at a polling place.",DEYoungRepublicans,e95wjqs,conservative
Good idea. I will do that.,Csa94,e962go2,conservative
How did it go?,skarface6,e96e6zn,conservative
"We ended up letting the County GOP's office handle the issue. I am not sure of any actions they took or the results. Unfortunately, we did not get the name of the woman who stole the ballots from the volunteer in the morning so going to the Department of Elections would not have made a difference I think. I ended up volunteering from 1 to 7pm at the polling place. I had no issues handing out green colored ballots and I still had plenty of Republican sample ballots to pass out. ",Csa94,e97b1jb,conservative
"Isn't this the new playbook for the Dems? Accept democracy, except when you lose. If you lost, it's because the system must be rigged against you.",nmj95123,e97t7ay,conservative
She seems fun. ,justhere2havefun,e97ql50,conservative
They never lose.  Elections are taken from them.  In this race and in the Florida governor race they would simply like to overturn the results by ruling those who voted republican as racists because of black candidates.  Sound absurd?  Well that is exactly how the lying liberal media is portraying it.,optionhome,e97wdds,conservative
"Better than rolling over like a dog when obvious fuckery is afoot is it not? Kemp shouldn't be allowed to hold his position over the elections that he is taking place in. Furthermore it's very possible he used that power to steal it, that ""the Dems tried to hack!"" accusation two days before voting day could have easily swayed voters. The runoff would allow us time to figure out his accusation, and get rid of the other candidates so it's simply abrams vs kemp. Needless to say I'm excited to see how this plays out. In the spirit of transparency I'm an abrams supporter, so if you guys don't like me posting in your sub lemme know I'll understand and politely leave.",IntroSpeccy,e97rbdt,conservative
">when obvious fuckery is afoot is it not?

Problem is, there was nothing of the sort.  Certainly no ""obvious"" fuckery.  Only an accusation of it unsupported by any evidence.  And when actual evidence came to light regarding the claims, the evidence debunked the claim entirely.  

>it's very possible he used that power to steal it

Uh huh.  Based on... what exactly?

>the Dems tried to hack

No, not hack.  Commit outright voter fraud, because that's what they were essentially trying to do by trying to include people on voter rolls who didn't live in the district, who were not yet actually old enough to vote, or that were (shocker) dead.  Because that's what happened when the 50-something thousand votes she claimed were being ""suppressed"" were actually examined.  They weren't being suppressed at all.  They weren't eligible voters in the first place.  And when you are fighting to have ineligible voters take part in an election, you are advocating voter fraud.",DevonWeeks,e97smjb,conservative
"We generally allow liberals to post here, so long as they're polite and obey the rules. Just don't start parroting talking points, or become combative to other users here, or to conservative policies/ideas. This is a forum *for* conservatives after all. ",GuitarWizard90,e97rvgi,conservative
"Thank you for contributing. Although I don't agree with you, I'm glad you are able to voice your opinion here without being deleted.",gusto911,e97vcxe,conservative
"And the voter suppression claims were also super dumb. 

http://fmshooter.com/ap-claims-of-georgia-voter-suppression/
",latotokyo123,e97roa1,conservative
"Conservatives are open to intellectual diversity, we arent like /r/ politics.  You are welcome here as long as you keep it simple. ",a93818,e97rnws,conservative
Is there a good source for this? I could never find an article that explains what the context around Kemp’s purging of voter roles was.,Hotwater3,e9aen1l,conservative
Where is the public outcry? The marches? The hypocrisy is ridiculous.,steampunker13,e95ta0c,conservative
"Not even comparable to the flawless reputation that Kavenough had. 

These allegations are credible and may be under statute of limitations  ",anon20202,e95sma6,conservative
#BelieveWomen,mlmack,e95xc5e,conservative
"As much as I dislike the man, we have to uphold innocent until proven guilty, just as we did for Kavanaugh.",mdh431,e95p8hr,conservative
"Voted for Wardlow today.

Fuck you Keith.",Moonthrower,e95tecl,conservative
Libs started this. Bunch of idiots,Just_a_Drunk_Gambler,e95vvw5,conservative
That's a Pulitzer Prize winning article title.,mlmack,e96ikxd,conservative
Smack A Bitch Ellison is at it again. I guess that's what the Nation of Islam will do to you. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e96xc1u,conservative
Do we? Kavanaugh's baseless 35 year old accusations versus Ellison's documented medical and police reports the day off?,Moonthrower,e95tdhp,conservative
"I’ll be voting Wardlow in about 30 minutes! 

Edit: all done. That felt good. ",DudeCaptain,e95zq3n,conservative
I voted for Wardlow a month ago.,zwiebelsaft,e97p0tc,conservative
Keep in mind that the victims son is also a witness to the abuse. I have no reason to believe that these accusations aren't credible. His victim did everything right by leaving the relationship and seeking help; yet the left wing media is trying to sweep this under the rug. I'm obviously not saying that Ellison is guilty (yet) but there needs to be an investigation into these credible domestic violence claims. ,DeviatoricStress,e95xavu,conservative
Update: he was elected ,zwiebelsaft,e97p0bm,conservative
It should bash him for being an unfunmy tool. He would be bouncing around pizzarias off the Jersey Turnpike if his dad weren't killed on 9/11,orangeeyedunicorn,e96qp7s,conservative
"I don't see a ""war on men.""

What I *do* see is the Feminist movement, having achieved many of their goals, being hijacked by hacks who think scapegoating men earns them some sort of credibility.

Gender equality can be advanced without resorting to that sort of foolishness, and it's only going to make the movement look bad. ",LonelyMachines,e96ln1b,conservative
Vote GOP because is makes fucking sense. ,anon20202,e95uxf3,conservative
"There’s most definitely a war against men. And if you’re male & white, you’re the lowest life form of all. Ugh. ",CherryChipCupcake,e96uzvj,conservative
This guy makes fucking sense \^,Iwishiwasachad123,e96fctv,conservative
Actually I'm at the point where I always assume an alleged hate crime is a hoax until proven otherwise. ,ConsistentlyRight,e95nzht,conservative
"James Polite, suspect arrested for anti-Semitic graffiti at NYC synagogue, is a former City Hall employee who worked on ‘anti-hate crime’ issues and is a Democratic, LGBT activist",rpm3311,e964nfs,conservative
Don Lemon must have missed this story,Rudeirishit,e964u2q,conservative
Good find. You won’t see this on mainstream go figure ,nivey2009,e95jnt6,conservative
Add it to the list. http://www.fakehatecrimes.org,chicitybender,e96fdc7,conservative
Which is exactly why we need to stop treating everyone as their ethnic group and start seeing them as individuals. ,FeelThePorn,e95uw30,conservative
He ain't white and he ain't polite.,scungillipig,e96lt1x,conservative
Obligatory r/hatecrimehoaxes ,Armageddon_It,e974wbc,conservative
"""Hey James, watcha doin?""",FiveHits,e96mpvy,conservative
It's a pretty safe bet. The demand for racism exceeds the supply ,LumpyWumpus,e95q7d3,conservative
Any crime that could score points for a political party is a hoax unless I see solid evidence. ,Youbetripping,e96mkr1,conservative
"> who worked on ‘anti-hate crime’

When the victim is a jew or a conservative there is no such thing as a hate crime.  What a fucking douche this guy must be.  His adoptive parents must be so proud of him.",optionhome,e966inq,conservative
"I like this, I'm gonna steal it for political arguments/conversations",davetn37,e95s0vd,conservative
"no, they'll do a much better job of leaving than britain did. if the poles leave, they're going to make sure they're not still taking orders from brussels.",SKWM3000,e969bzx,conservative
Doing it for the memes ,DropBearRick,e96l9wu,conservative
"> like Britain 

As in, they haven’t.",BrighamYoung,e96jux6,conservative
Unlikely. The benefit economical quite a lot and they've been pretty good at maintaining their sovereignty. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e96xi8u,conservative
Rest of visegrad may follow poland,Dank_Cartographer,e96afej,conservative
"The fact that this election is so close, and yet the two parties have such different visions for America, should be extremely sobering to people.  

We have an abyssal divide between 'Left' and 'Right'.  Now sure, on average voters are much more similar, but that's irrelevant because of who they elect to represent them.  We are not a direct democracy voting on each issue with plebecites.  We are a Republic - we elect representatives to vote on our behalf.  Half the country is voting for socialists who want to sabotage the economy, throw the borders wide open, and coddle China and Iran.  

I'm not sure how long the nation can survive a political divide of that magnitude.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e96fhsx,conservative
"I gotta hand it to them, Results not Resistance is almost as good as Jobs not Mobs!

This should be every campaign ad.",Gnome_Sane,e96c9m1,conservative
"If only this was the message from Republicans from the beginning. If only Trump could stay off Twitter for a few days. Unfortunately neither of these things happened, and now instead of a demoralized Democratic party, we have an enthusiastic Democratic party dragging themselves through broken glass to get to the polls while many Independents and suburban Republicans are sitting this one out.

Imagine how easy this mid-term season would have been if Trump learned to stay on message for once in his life? Now, we're facing an impending Democrat sweep of the House while Republicans try to hold-on to the Senate.",weeaboo_swordsman,e96i1gw,conservative
"Man, I was not a big Pence fan until the past couple of years, but now I freaking love this guy.",fatt_maddison,e96oqu2,conservative
"I voted for judicial appointments and potential Supreme Court nominations.
",tehForce,e96nhfm,conservative
"Say what you will, they come up with some damn fine campaign slogans!",JeantheDragon,e96gc5n,conservative
"Why, oh why, would people vote this man back in? God, I can’t wait to move out of NJ!",Otto-Carpenter,e96c5dz,conservative
No he isnt. Will win by 10.  Sadly,hipsterdufus84,e9658p3,conservative
"Of all the races today, I’m completely torn on whether I want a Hugin or James upset more",CCPCanuck,e96maw6,conservative
How can people be voting for some of these leftist candidates?,mlmack,e96mgyx,conservative
"Agreed,  Ted Bundy would win NJ right now ",dudeman4win,e967r97,conservative
"Yeah, not expecting anything here",link_ganon,e965ast,conservative
Probably but we will see in a few hours. ,Zac1245,e96l4qk,conservative
"I’m bullish on Hugin.  I don’t think he wins, but I think the margin is less than 5.  People in NJ really don’t like Menendez.",joozian_,e96od6c,conservative
I prefer james.  ,hipsterdufus84,e96onk8,conservative
If he was a Democrat. ,PubliusVA,e9683u7,conservative
"Yes for 2 reasons,  1. He’s dead, so atleast he could vote for himself 2.  He’s ted Bundy",dudeman4win,e968yk6,conservative
Super HIGH ENERGY right now in T_D,mikeygio,e96rnou,conservative
"I thought she was mentally ill, broke and living I a hotel according to recent reports?  I see the mentally ill part was accurate. ",Tacothechihuahua,e95vr02,conservative
"I’m trying to figure out why she has to cover her hair, when she has no hair",searanger62,e95v7sy,conservative
Who cares?  ,ozric101,e95uczc,conservative
What a great voice for the Islamic people. ,anon20202,e95uw6o,conservative
Self righteous cunt. ,Adhlc,e95u5dr,conservative
"Islam is a religion, not a race. You can convert to a different religion if you want, but that does nothing about the color of your skin or whatever ""privilege"" you may have gotten from that.",VecGS,e961sdx,conservative
"""Outrage""? She isn't worth getting outraged about.",PubliusVA,e95zw0s,conservative
So edgy. ,CASunDevil24,e95vpfl,conservative
"Probably best leaving her alone, she’s really not well in the head and hasn’t been for years. You have to feel sorry for her honestly ",anto_mck,e96ij40,conservative
"That looks like a man, baby.",lax714,e95vkjq,conservative
The religion of peace.,Lustan,e965zzn,conservative
"Sad. She's clearly been hurt by the catholic church. Hope she comes to realize that while our churches are imperfect, Jesus is perfect",Glsbnewt,e96s26z,conservative
It's ALMOST as if she believes being a Muslim defines the color of your skin...,Romarion,e96eobc,conservative
"Mutual.

Her and Lindsay Lohan man...",HiGloss,e96fb1z,conservative
Who?,MaxPeq,e96fzk6,conservative
Isn’t she the singer Screech mentioned is Save by the Bell? I thought he was making up that name lol ,Dmfconrad,e96gl47,conservative
Does this stupid bitch now realise she is white lol ahhhhh I really do think women who are stupid enough to give up their rights when they convert to Islam their brains automatically disappear lol ,funkyfiona25,e96mc3q,conservative
"Yeah, let's spend time with boy fuckers instead.",myshl0ng,e96rk9q,conservative
Call in an airstrike,indrid_colder,e960o36,conservative
Hmmm thought she was dead ,nooneuknow42,e962vtf,conservative
Yeah it seems pretty clear she's off her fucking rocker. I'm really not even mad about her nasty comments since it seems like she's just raving.,stultus-futuo,e96b148,conservative
"I'm trying to figure out why she's still relevant...

&#x200B;",okwhynot64,e96mukw,conservative
Ditto. *Ditto ditto ditto ditto.*,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96c424,conservative
Ditto. *Ditto ditto ditto ditto.*,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96c4j4,conservative
Nothing compares...,Lustan,e965ni2,conservative
Yeah I was going to comment the same thing. Conflating a religion with an ethnicity is inherently racist. What about Arab Christians or African Buddhists? Who’s stereotyping whom here?,justhere2havefun,e963six,conservative
Arab supremacy is very prevalent in the Muslim world. Don't be naive and think this one religion is tolerant of you the second you convert.,myshl0ng,e96rp1n,conservative
"She’s worth a laugh, that’s about it.  She is quite a joke though.",BigAl265,e96ud1l,conservative
Yeah. Piece of shit.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96c77t,conservative
Give it a couple years. She's in a race to the bottom with Lindsay Lohan,trollradar,e97sva0,conservative
"She wasn't, that's why she had to jump on the ""white people bad, praise me"" train.",XYZ-Wing,e96qyrd,conservative
"Billionaire Irishman, Robert Francis O’Rourke— Democrat Rockstar. ",mikeygio,e96ttrm,conservative
"same with john james on our side, i think, though he probably doesn't have nearly the warchest that o'rourke does.",SKWM3000,e96xps2,conservative
This is what they say when they think their guy (or gal) is going to lose.,mastaxn,e96ur30,conservative
"""moral victory"" as always, according to dems",Zac1245,e96uz3t,conservative
Imagine if John James received a generous fraction of the attention Beto has received.,art36,e96yb97,conservative
"James more so I think. Because he wasnt treated and promoted like a rock star by the media or hollywood. He will likely lose, but even coming close, he should make a name for himself and run for something else in the future. ",MaddSim,e96xwe5,conservative
yup! and that's why he didn't.,SKWM3000,e96yjg5,conservative
i hope so. i've been impressed with him from interviews i've seen. ,SKWM3000,e96xytz,conservative
"Bruh,  Mcsally is by like .9% with 70% of the vote in. It looks like it she will pull it off, but plenty of the vote left to count.",XMAGA_1776X,e98yhh2,conservative
It says 99%,trs287,e997hgc,conservative
Then hopefully they’ll call it soon.,XMAGA_1776X,e99rg14,conservative
"look at these results. i mean, you might as well move to california, holy shit. 

https://www.cnn.com/election/2016/results/states/nevada",tmone,e981r3o,conservative
The fact that they're getting a competitive amount of votes (while going full asshole) says otherwise.,BrighamYoung,e9775gn,conservative
"Dying is a little strong of a word.  I think it's more accurate to say that they're finally being openly and seriously challenged.  

The Left, predictably, is reacting to any questioning of its dogmas by employing mobs, violent rhetoric, and name-calling.",Colonize_The_Moon,e96vpqk,conservative
Yes please.  The texts and calls asking for money are beyond ridiculous. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e975ocd,conservative
"Hey CBS, shilling for the enemy of America is the behavior of the enemy of the people. Don't want to be called the enemy of the people, then stop acting like it.",PhilosoGuido,e97vxze,conservative
Mob rule anyone?,postonrddt,e988rj6,conservative
"Why do these people have jobs,  I, a literally who, have been saying slight house DNC win and Pubs expaning in the senate.

Its these peoples jobs and they are always sooo wrong?  What the hell?",Manchurainprez,e98jjak,conservative
They won the house and flipped 7 governor seats. They won and we need to accept it,johnson881_,e987cb3,conservative
">her penis


Fucking clown world. ",CAGUnion404,e96yrll,conservative
Not many years ago she would have universally been viewed as insane and she would have been treated for her condition.  Now she will be enabled ensuring her mental issues continue and her chances of suicide are astronomical.  But she is part of the new victim group created by leftists and excepted by the brain dead useful idiots.,optionhome,e96zh8k,conservative
"if society did not tell these mentally ill people that being like this is fine, this would have not happened in the first place",theofficalstrangeman,e97tmsf,conservative
"If you have a penis, depending on hormone levels it can still be functional, so they shouldn't be housed with the females, but probably the best solution is to put them into a restricted area not general population. There have been cases in the UK where partially transitioned individuals have raped whilst incarcerated in women's prison.",nharding,e9d4agw,conservative
Honestly have a question. It says “trans woman”.  It just seems to me it’s a “trans man” or a man trans dressed to appear a woman.  “trans woman “ makes me think a woman dressed as a man.  What am I missing? So confused with this stuff. Anyone have a logical explanation I am failing to grasp. ,swanspank,e97em83,conservative
I laughed harder at this than I should have.,ShadowTH277,e97n9ys,conservative
Penis.... he.,Lustan,e973q9h,conservative
"Here's how I remember it. When you see the word ""trans"" read it as ""not a"". So ""trans woman"" reads as ""not a woman"" ie, really a man. ",ConsistentlyRight,e97wdz9,conservative
He/she transitioned to a woman?,MisterMouser,e97h6p1,conservative
"Ok, I can remember that. Thanks. ",swanspank,e982za7,conservative
"And 2020, wow, that's gonna be a big one too!",Reven1911,e95mbl4,conservative
"2014 was absolutely huge - 52 seat majority in Senate AND took the House! '16 just carried that over, and now '18 is going to cause the Donkeys to reform their entire platform. Red Wave!",ohNole,e95plvv,conservative
"2008 and 2012 apparently weren't that important based on who the GOP ran. 

My most reluctant vote ever was for McCain-Palin. I should have written myself in.",soylent_absinthe,e95zztw,conservative
"We are locked in a duel, and losing means you and your ideology die.",JMB_was_a_god,e95yzld,conservative
"I mean if they get more and more important, that remains true.",AnnualThrowaway,e95uj0p,conservative
This is a big election.,coonana,e96jjwh,conservative
"I just don't see 2018 being more important than 2016. Probably a bad thing to say today, but honestly.",Robo1p,e9665yw,conservative
Lol how? How in the world does the Dem.have a chance,MaddSim,e97ktpm,conservative
Especially this one. ,chabanais,e97l9x8,conservative
AZ has elected Dems before. Janet Neapolitano cane out of there. Sinema put on a very moderate front publicly. ,Zac1245,e980nvn,conservative
Politically outraged daughter protestor as well,HowRememberAll,e972bi2,conservative
"Chab that's not nice to compare the Democrats to Orcs.


 It really gives Orcs a bad name.",callthereaper64,e962hd4,conservative
being at a super liberal college this is too real,stompr0,e96688d,conservative
So it begins.,SlapaDaBass2731,e962qo6,conservative
"Clearly we need a change in leadership around here. I’m willing to make that sacrifice.

\#Void2020 #EmbraceTheVoid #TheVoidStaresBack",VirulentVoid,e963hqu,conservative
"Remember this one?

https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/8aqr3f/letthem_in/",chabanais,e962x8v,conservative
"If we hold them to 51% in the House Popular vote, it looks like we keep the majority. Any less than 51% on their part looks like a loss ",Intimidator94,e965591,conservative
Is this it?! Is this all you can conjure democrats?!,Rarth-Devan,e9662om,conservative
I never saw that one. That is amazing best fake news ever.,callthereaper64,e967gyx,conservative
"Yeah, I was just making an LOTR reference haha",SlapaDaBass2731,e965nik,conservative
"""So many mobs...What can men do about such hate?""",SlapaDaBass2731,e966bca,conservative
Well go on. Throw me! Just don’t tell the Elf. ,Intimidator94,e96a69p,conservative
It would take a constitutional amendment. And how are you going to get a 2/3 vote of the House and Senate followed by approval of 3/4 of the state legislatures? What small state is going to voluntarily vote to make itself irrelevant in presidential elections?,SilverHerfer,e96o621,conservative
"There is a movement to have state legislatures pass laws that say they will pledge all their electors to whoever wins the popular vote, if enough states pledge electors in this manner.  This would be a practical way to abolish the electoral college, but would obviously be more brittle as the census or state laws could disrupt the strategy. ",timbowen,e96slc6,conservative
So Sean Hannity and Jeannine Pirro are going to be fired next after appearing on stage at a Trump rally?,aristotillius,e97eu6c,conservative
We all know that they are working for the liberal ideology and have nothing to do with dispensing news and facts to the public.  This was just one of the more dumber ones who doesn't even know how to hang up a phone.  You can be sure that the kind of things she said that was recorded is said by 99% of those in the lying liberal media.,optionhome,e95i2aw,conservative
She'll be famous now and get hired by any number of leftwing publications.,Reven1911,e95mdim,conservative
"I heard what she said, it wasn't that bad. I don't think she should have been fired. This is getting ridiculous regardless what ideals you have. ",Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e95xx0k,conservative
"The real story here is how comfortable she seemed to be when venting to another or others in her newsroom. Can you imagine if you were a reporter and had disliked candidate Obama and had turned to other reporters and said something similar? Firstly, it would have never happened because no reporter would have felt comfortable sharing their feelings in that manner. Secondly, they would have been fired immediately and her coworkers, instead of the candidate, would have made it public.",pathfinder452,e95wqwe,conservative
So when’s Sean Hannity getting sacked then?,Schumeister,e98c2xm,conservative
"This reflects badly on the Huron Daily Tribune, yikes.",goldrotmgonly,e962lml,conservative
So... she’s a white supremacist... right? ,TrumpwonHilDawgLost,e96gj6v,conservative
Of course she looks like that.,fluffyfluffyheadd,e96d306,conservative
She still has myspace for goodness sake,freedomhertz,e95q4mm,conservative
"What is getting ridiculous?

Firing a person for being incompetent at their job and making a fool of themselves on the company dime is not ridiculous. Nor is it in any way equivalent to, say, firing someone based on a one-sided accusation without proof or firing someone after finding out they voted for someone you don't like.",Mr_Trumps__Wild_Ride,e961pu2,conservative
Of course she should have.  I'm just surprised she was held accountable.,mlmack,e96036h,conservative
"That she thinks it surprises me not at all.  That she said it out like surprises me only slightly: that she was dumb enough to do it on a recording is also totally unsurprising.

What was very surprising is that she got shitcanned for doing it.  Plenty of reporters have said far worse and gotten away with it.  (e.g. ""Kill all white men"").  ",WIlf_Brim,e96fmwd,conservative
"She thought she hung up, and she spoke her mind not knowing she was being recorded. This easy could happen to anyone regardless of your ideals. Just don't think its fair. I'm not a liberal so I believe in fairness.  ",Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e960jg4,conservative
"If your job is to objectively interview John James and you get caught saying ""Fuck John James"" it's  clearly showing you have biases that will prevent you from doing your job properly.

It'd be one thing if she was like a teacher or an engineer or a doctor and said ""Fuck John James"" but her job is literally predicated on the idea that the public believes she (and that news org) are giving objective, unbiased viewpoints for their stories and interviews. If that sense of trust is violated, you're fucked as a journalist.",mbarnar,e961ond,conservative
"She was fired because she made her company look bad.  She's not the first, and she won't be the last.  She'll probably make sure she hangs up the phone from now on, though.",mlmack,e961sj6,conservative
The irony in this thread... ,specialspartan_,e97n02l,conservative
"Honestly the main reason I want Republicans to keep the House is not for the schaedenfreude of watching Democrats melt down, but because I honestly do not trust them at this point in time to be responsible stewards of government.  They have no interest in governing sensibly or for the benefit of the United States; all their efforts are being bent on destroying Trump (and the Republicans by association), along with ensuring a permanent grasp on Congress and the Presidency.  

If we - meaning normal Americans, not partisan conservatives or liberals - could rely on the Democrats to govern with a strong economy, an effective (but not bloated) military, and a sensible approach to the budget (no massive deficit spending in peacetime etc), things would be different.  But even the Democrats of 2008-2010, who gave us the abomination that is the ACA, look to be not awful compared to the Democrats of 2018.   I am legimitately afraid for our nation if today's Democrats ever gain control of Congress and the Presidency concurrently.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9642nv,conservative
"I fully expect to keep the Senate, as do most people. And I fully expect to lose the House, but hope a miracle happens. If they do, it will be interesting how Trump handles things going forward. We know he isn't going to get any help at all from the Dems. Curious to see what he can do with the power of the pen, which is all he may really have. ",MaddSim,e95zfxr,conservative
"I'm with you.  
  
I disagree with a lot of GOP policies. I *wish* the Democrats could give me a reasonable message to get behind. I expected to vote Libertarian (my preference) or Democrat (based on some pipe dream of them getting their shit together at the time) for this election, but since September they've given me every reason not to.  
  
I didn't vote Republican for the sake of promoting Republican ideas. I voted Republican because this is one of the few cases where I've felt compelled to vote against the greater evil.  
   
It's less than ""Reps support X which is bad, but Dems support Y which is also bad."" Its become ""Democrats want to gut this country and the Republicans want to stop them.""  
  
I want them to lose terribly tonight. I feel like it's the only hope for a reformed left. They've gotta burn their deadwood, chill the duck out with the identity politics, quit catering to the socialists, and form an actual fucking message.  
  
If the last 2 years are any indication, I think they're in too deep. They'll only continue to push bad policy, run on a hatred of conservatives, and I'll be left with voting for fucking trump in 2020.  
  
The Republicans should jump on this opportunity. Balance the deficit. Promote legalization. Adopt some more libertarian views. If those things occur they'll be unstoppable.",OrwellianLiberty,e96vv3x,conservative
"Keep or lose the house by just a handful. It won’t be an overwhelming gain if Democrats win it back. 

And I’d rather not abuse presidential power that is unconstitutional. I mean the right complained when Obama did it. The left complained when Bush did it. Let’s end it, even if that means we get little or nothing done. Less consolidated government power is better. ",justhere2havefun,e963ca7,conservative
"Oh and I would like to add:
As I said my brother is going to be a surgeon. He is in a very exclusive program that only admit the top 1% of applicants, and his education is therefore fully funded by the government. I would like to thank the hard-working American taxpayer for making his education possible and hope his research contributes to the health of the public and does much good for many years to come. Thank you again and God bless.

ETA: Thanks for all the replies-- Going to sleep, it's 6 am. Hoping for great results when I wake up! 🌞",Terra_green2,e95p377,conservative
"Good post, thanks for sharing. Why do you think Jews vote Dem?",FlingbatMagoo,e95kq3r,conservative
"> That said, the democrats had gone too far. The discourse have become positively nasty. They need a harsh lesson. So I want them to lose, and lose BADLY. 


I agree with this completely. After the election I was shocked that they doubled down the way they did, and if they win the house i fear they will just point to that as evidence it worked. I’m hoping if republicans hold the house they take a step back and really look at how far left the party has shifted. ",churninbutter,e95nv0v,conservative
"Love it. 

Will you vote Republican this time?

Your vote is needed. ",Jasonberg,e95bbnf,conservative
"I’m with you. Some of the same reasons as you, some other reasons not mentioned. I also consider myself a moderate, and this will be my first election voting straight Republican. Democrats have gone so extreme that they no longer speak for me or represent my interests. State-level Republicans seem to recognize this and it’s as if they’re compromising with themselves to represent their own constituents as well as the rest of us whose Democratic representatives are ignoring us. So, Republicans have earned my vote. Good luck to your candidates, and cheers to sanity!",GreenEyesClementine,e95n2wu,conservative
"Right there with you dude.  It was a slow progression for me over the past 2.5 years, and I ended up voting for a couple republican candidates for the first time in my life this election, and voted for no democrats, definitely for the first time in my life.  I ended up voting for libertarians and Republicans.  The democratic party and pretty much the entire leadership of the left has completely gone off the rails, and we have allowed nutcases to take over humanities in top colleges all over the coasts turning them into extreme left indoctrination factories that seek to divide everyone up by race, class, and gender, and when that isn't good enough, they fabricate entirely new divisions. These are the types that idolize Sarsour et al. No fucking way am I voting left wing again, at the very least until we get some candidates who will address that shit with some backbone and stand up to the people with a completely warped view of the history of socialism and communism.  I get that divide and conquer is used by both sides, but the left wing today literally seems so be playing divide and conquer among their own constituency, it's absolutely baffling.  I'd like to just go sit at the Winchester, have a pint, and wait til this whole thing blows over, but instead I did my part to help vote them out.",fuck_im_dead,e95hfco,conservative
Welcome aboard! The conservative tent is big enough for all because we want you to live and let live.,CrazyJedi63,e95tkk2,conservative
"It’s funny, you are I are totally different but the reasons kind of ended up being the same.

I never ever thought I’d be voting republican but the Kavanaugh hearings did it for me.

I voted for Bernie in 2016 as well. Voted D for many years before that. But the D party is the party of war now. They hate peace, they hate the Korea detante, they hate that the Syria war is winding down. They want abortion and dissolution of culture. ",ChuanFaFist,e95qfmm,conservative
Walked away 6yrs ago.,imbackwards,e95lh9z,conservative
"This is clearly a Russian bot account.

/npcbeepboop",Moonthrower,e95gahn,conservative
Bravery= thinking for yourself these days.,nooneuknow42,e9624ta,conservative
"Yay, another female moderate conservative! Let's be friends! ",neemarita,e96qifg,conservative
[removed],,e95ji8m,conservative
Thomas Sowell is your next step on the path to the dark side. You will find Democrats have been doing this stuff for a very long time.,jeff_the_old_banana,e95qufy,conservative
Demonization of Rs as racist. Association of neo nazi s with the Right wing.,Terra_green2,e95lvhg,conservative
"Orthodox jews usually vote Republican. ""Hollywood jews"", the non practicing type, vote democrat. They are about as jewish as jackie chan is African. Source: im jewish",BenStillerPhaggot72,e95xjf2,conservative
To support religious scholars who rely on social services.,nanmart,e95pgre,conservative
Exactly. They need to learn a lesson. 😕,Terra_green2,e95ooqj,conservative
"Yup, see post. (ETA: voted by mail.)",Terra_green2,e95lt87,conservative
She’s voting straight ticket Republican.,xKommandant,e95lz3a,conservative
"Agreed and Thank you, same to yours! It's good to see other moderates recognize these issues. ",Terra_green2,e95osjb,conservative
Cheers! Moderates unite to restore sanity. :),Terra_green2,e95p5q8,conservative
"Yup. Even as a Sanders voter I was shocked to see the extremism that resulted. Now I realize even his best intended programs won't work. Also, he voted against Kavanaugh AND MADE ME SUPPORT KEITH ELLISON before I realized what Ellison stood for. So screw that.",Terra_green2,e95pdn5,conservative
"Thank you! I got my first hate mail So I guess I'm officially a conservative in terms of experience! As if anything some troll can say scares me one tenth as much as the left's support of antisemitic islamists.
",Terra_green2,e96eyf4,conservative
Kavanaugh hearing angered a lot of people I believe. The attacks were so ugly.,Terra_green2,e96blht,conservative
"Beep!
As expected, this post is being brigaded. But I knew it was coming. :)",Terra_green2,e95m026,conservative
"Haha, I'm actually moderate centrist. But it does not preclude friendship!

There's actually some women around here if you look carefully :) they're much more prevalent in the Walkaway FB page though- the majority in fact.",Terra_green2,e96vky4,conservative
"I know about him, will check him out!",Terra_green2,e96cwes,conservative
"Yeah, I’m not happy about it either",churninbutter,e95pzfq,conservative
"My long term assumption, not being an expert myself, was that someone had done the math, and I had put my fingers in my ears whenever people who HAD done the math were talking (typically GOP or libertarians), and whenever anyone asked Bernie where the money was going to come from and he didn't have a straight answer, I chalked it up as regular politician-speak.  Over time, he was never able to produce a clear answer,  because the math just doesn't add up, we can never afford all those programs.  They work in small, culturally homogenous countries in Europe, and the places it does work are beginning to have their systems greatly strained through mass migration.  I never liked Ellison, but yet another huge indicator for me that the Democrats are not a party I can support is the extreme unwillingness to call out Ellison with the same fervor they call out any similar bad behavior by someone in another party.",fuck_im_dead,e9699os,conservative
"Shocked.

SHOCKED I TELL YOU!",Moonthrower,e95saf5,conservative
Interesting! I’m more of a centrist these days myself but definitely a right leaning one. It’s nice to see other women posting here. :),neemarita,e96yv5w,conservative
"Yeah, you just listen to what feels good without thinking over the rationale... Which is how the left operates in many things.",Terra_green2,e96dqnn,conservative
"It's so sad that so many people today don't understand ""Shocked! Shocked, I tell you.""
My brother is walking in the same direction as the OP, for a lot of the same reasons.",Upnsmoque,e96nbzg,conservative
I'm shocked. /s,d_grizzle,e9754xn,conservative
" I mean, its NoVA. I don’t need to have a crystal ball to say thats the first seat to flip.",Dank_Cartographer,e975ql8,conservative
Brennan is such a putrid failure,BeachCruisin22,e96j4qq,conservative
">“Can you imagine [CNN anchor] Don Lemon campaigning for Stacey Abrams?” 

HE was the example they went with to showcase their neutrality? Don ""white men are terrorists"" Lemon. ",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e96lpkh,conservative
"The day Hannity gives a candidate debate questions beforehand, I'll be concerned.",fifaislife206,e96iml1,conservative
Hannity literally says every single day on air that he is biased and a conservative talk show host - he has never claimed to be unbiased or neutral ,buffalo_chum,e96diq3,conservative
Hannity is not a Fox News journalist...he is a contributor. He is a conservative radio and tv talk show host. That is his profession. ,Jesterslore,e96el5q,conservative
valid point though.,SKWM3000,e96e102,conservative
LOL. Right? ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96jh09,conservative
I’m not arguing Fox News is unbiased. I’m calling out the irony and stupidity of CNN acting like they are unbiased and have a case  ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96e36x,conservative
So by your logic that means even less for CNNs case. ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96ezto,conservative
The irony of CNN trying to be the virtuous unbiased moral authority is hilarious. ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96epn2,conservative
"Iagree, sorry, I wasnt directing that at you, I was just sayin ",buffalo_chum,e96fsyh,conservative
"yes, but it's a fair question. seeing media organizations get this cozy with a president does undermine the image of the brand regardless of who the president is.",SKWM3000,e96f45x,conservative
"Oh yeah man no worries. I understand their point, it’s just the irony of them trying to take a moral high ground is funny. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e96fy3i,conservative
"I'm pretty sure Hannity often says that he is an independent media pundit and his opinions don't reflect big FOX.  I've never thought of Hannity as a representative of Fox news, like say the guys on Fox & Friends.

",mbarnar,e96l32a,conservative
"Wasn’t CNN pretty chummy with Obama? They sure showed him in only a good light. 

CNN doesn’t have a leg to stand on. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e96f8u1,conservative
[removed],,e96kl81,conservative
"i'm not weighing in on the answer, i just think it's worth discussing under what circumstances media personalities should be chummy with presidents. i think there are degrees of ""reporterness"" and thus degrees of acceptable closeness. where the line gets drawn is, i think, an important discussion.",SKWM3000,e96lk46,conservative
but the question ... is still ... a good one. regardless of who is asking it.,SKWM3000,e96fjiz,conservative
I’m confused. What do you mean?,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96neny,conservative
Did you not read his explanation or do you just WANT to be angry?,Dmfconrad,e96m063,conservative
"I'm not exactly sure what you're saying here tho and how it pertains to this story...

I dont think anyone has an issue (outside of political ideologies of course), with Hannity being chummy with Trump.",mbarnar,e96nf4c,conservative
I disagree. CNN asking the question ruins the question ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96fnq0,conservative
I’m not angry...this is just a silly thing to complain about. ,hinglemckringle91,e96mxq0,conservative
what you're doing is called the genetic fallacy,SKWM3000,e96fu5t,conservative
Welcome to Reddit lol,Dmfconrad,e96qqo8,conservative
I disagree with that too as their history of biased reporting is exactly why their statement is ridiculous. ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96g2dg,conservative
biased reporting doesn't make a question important or unimportant. you're dismissing a valid question about the proper relationship between media and the president simply because you don't like who asked it. that is a near-perfect demonstration of ignorance.,SKWM3000,e96h3az,conservative
"Thanks for calling me ignorant. You sound swell. 👍

This post is about the irony of Fox being biased. Regardless of your feelings on the matter, which isn’t what this post is about. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e96i4hz,conservative
"didn't call you ignorant. characterized your argument as ignorant.

also, i'm more than swell. i'm fucking awesome.",SKWM3000,e96lfbu,conservative
I have no doubt you are awesome. Never denied that. I just said you’re also swell. ,Legendary_Hypocrite,e96naqv,conservative
"well, in spite of our disagreement, i have no doubt that you are also awesome.",SKWM3000,e96y108,conservative
"Thank you kind, sir. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e97ay6v,conservative
"I’m Hispanic and although not the same I can understand where you’re coming from. Best advice is do it speak loudly. People you care for will avoid you, you’ll lose friends, family will question you. But it’s all worth it. You will find people that understand and will support you. You will find, that you’re not alone. I feel bad for people in your shoes cause we don’t have a racist phrase like Uncle Tom, but remember if that is used against you that’s not company you wanna keep anyway ",F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e9850ly,conservative
"No, that's not what it means.  Yes, I'm still going to say it.",BrighamYoung,e97ei2j,conservative
How do they feel about 'love you long time'? /s ,ozric101,e978ur3,conservative
And yet no one in DC has any interest in investigating Chinese influence on elections or politicians.  I find this spectacularly odd and more than a little disturbing.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e96wdtu,conservative
"if you are a conservative voting democrat in 2018, you have some serious issues.
",anon20202,e95unat,conservative
"This title is decisive. Can we actually post things that are relevant to the ideology, not just us v them, and that divide us. ",SF100789,e96p5wf,conservative
That's why I hope the Voter ID amendment passes.,DH5650,e96a93p,conservative
DC literally publishes a list of every voter including address and voting history (whether or not they voted). Easy potential source for fraud.,somepapist,e97d030,conservative
"Yup is Virginia you hand them your ID, you have to verify your name, address, and date of birth to them while you can’t see your ID. ",Zac1245,e96mvbx,conservative
Weird how their opinion on anti-Semitism seems to change depending on the race of the anti-Semite.,FelixFuckfurter,e95ub8a,conservative
Intersectionality causes many a crash. ,justhere2havefun,e963vwk,conservative
New York has been having a lot of issues recently with black anti semites.,TwelfthCycle,e96bi7t,conservative
"Yeah, and they bring their shitty politics with them :/",ConsistentlyRight,e95eq1j,conservative
The cancer that is Regressive Progressivism is metastasizing. ,GlenGanges,e95ii31,conservative
"Well, legal residents anyway. That’s why they are importing illegals. ",StillANNONin,e95hagg,conservative
And their voters are moving to your state....,Haolepino1975,e95ymw6,conservative
I just wish they’d stop moving to Colorado ,beedubbs,e95pg76,conservative
"That's not good. They are leaving California because leftists have destroyed the state, and then they vote for leftist wherever they move to. ",LumpyWumpus,e95q117,conservative
As a California who migrated to Texas in 1999. CALIFORNIAS GO BACK TO CALIFORNIA IF YOUR GONNA BRING YOUR HALF ASSED POLITICS TO THIS GREAT STATE. I spend most of my time trying to convince my dad to move out here with his girlfriend. California’s bad y’all. ,godzillaeatsasians,e95t3xo,conservative
"My city, Bakersfield, was one of the largest takers of Dust Bowl Migrants. We've seen a reverse of that in the last 10 years or so, a lot of folks here are going back to where their roots are. However they're getting replaced pretty steadily by Bay area and LA folks looking for more affordable living, and they bring lib policies with them.

Last year, or this year, my county went from majority registered R to majority registered D, so I'll be heading out after I'm married next year.

What's a good place for a young conservative to move to that's got good work lol",CrazyJedi63,e95usbl,conservative
">lost more residents

*Legal* residents. Likely gained *plenty* illegal.",NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96bz9e,conservative
Not if you believe Ann Coulters estimates for how many illegals are actually coming here.,computergroove,e95ngw4,conservative
But it stil likely grew due to births,Manchurainprez,e95ycvq,conservative
"the problem with that is those people will still vote ""California."" 

We need a wall. A big beautiful wall. From Mexico to Canada. And California's gonna pay for it.",Odoacer476CE,e966f78,conservative
"What's funny is a prop on the ballot wanted money for housing for all the people entering the state. I wonder who are these ""residents"".",Kaptain_Konrad,e96cumu,conservative
"Of course, too many immigrants.",mlmack,e96np5m,conservative
Generally true but myself and a lot of other Californians moved to get away from the liberal policies and insane expenses/ traffic.,hungryhungryhadrian,e95gl8p,conservative
"Wife and I were considering moving to Missoula, MT until we found out how many Californians have moved there recently and brought their shitty politics and PC bullshit with them. Now Missoula is called ""the San Francisco of the Rockies."" Needless to say, my wife and I have reconsidered",Mr_0pportunity,e95swxl,conservative
I promise I won't! We're conservatives. (Moving to the Carolinas.),neemarita,e96qleg,conservative
Not for long.  Once they get out of the echo chamber they tend to wise up.,booblitchutz,e95kmzc,conservative
"For all their """"""education"""""" they still seem to fail at the basic task of cause-effect analysis and simple logic.  If they were capable of those they'd vote the exact opposite of how they did in California to prevent having to flee again in the future.",anuser999,e965qt7,conservative
Similar effect in the suburbs surrounding Democrat controlled cites.,postonrddt,e95z12i,conservative
It’s already too late,TooMuchSauce91,e96ltb9,conservative
Or to New Mexico. We’re getting bluer and bluer sadly. ,Jazzkevin,e96skcr,conservative
Yup.  They're like a virus.,anuser999,e965tzn,conservative
"If you're in the IT field, Des Moines, IA is growing pretty steadily. ",TipoBajito,e961ua0,conservative
This is about Americans leaving and entering the state. California's net deficit has been negative for years. It's population has continued to surge from both legal and illegal immigrants.,ultimis,e95tcrq,conservative
As long as you let me out first. ,Kaptain_Konrad,e96cnad,conservative
"They move to cities like Austin, TX and make it worse. The only reason why Texas is fighting to stay red is because of dems moving to texas, not texans already here changing their mind and becoming dems. I know Greg Abbott loves to boast on job growth, Texas GDP and companies moving to Texas but it is also bringing an influx of dems as well. ",TxScarletRaider,e95qaah,conservative
I know alot of Californianas who left and vote Republican theybleftndue to heavy Dem control at least ones that movedbto TN,Trun,e95hyq4,conservative
That has not been the case in my experience. California communists moving to Texas and turning this state more and more purple is a serious problem. ,ConsistentlyRight,e95nky7,conservative
They never leave their echo chamber.  They move to places other liberals move so they don’t have to have their beliefs challenged.  Then they act like they’re the the real Texans or Coloradans trying “fix their state”,acada,e95qrn8,conservative
Locusts.,Hillary_For_Prison,e96ezu3,conservative
"There'll still be ports of entry, and you'll be able to apply for asylum. You'll need an ID, voter registration card and proof of how you voted for the last three presidential election cycles. 

Automatic disqualification: verifiable votes for any Clinton, Che Guevara t-shirt ownership, liberal arts degrees, having ever quoted Nietzsche",Odoacer476CE,e96fi2s,conservative
That’s why I’m ok with having moved to Alabama.  Smaller population and my fellow Californians cringe when they hear the name.  I feel safe for the time being.,acada,e95qols,conservative
"It's not Californians that are changing Texas as much as it is illegal immigrants from various banana Republics and their broken governments. The dirty truth is that they breed like no other and, because of our ridiculous constitutional interpretation, their kids are all automatic citizens.",Pontius23,e95rb1d,conservative
">Republican theybleftndue to heavy

You good? Looks like you had a stroke my dude. Lol",dlc_protocol,e96aai7,conservative
I'd be good then. Does being an NRA member get me a fast track?,Kaptain_Konrad,e96h1np,conservative
"I'll concede that some of the issue is immigrants but, by and large, in places like Dallas and Austin, Californians are fucking shit up.",GFZDW,e95s9ft,conservative
"How do you figure birthright citizenship is a ridiculous interpretation?

I'm honestly curious. The text of the 14th amendment seems pretty clear to me.",NotActuallyOffensive,e970dpt,conservative
"You bet. NRA, GOA, NSSF membership, ccw/ltch/whatever your state calls it, current service ID/ DD-214, gets you right to the front of the line.",Odoacer476CE,e96imel,conservative
"Simply put, it was not intended to extend to foreign citizens through the phrase ""subject to the jurisdiction."" Explains it better than me:

&#x200B;

[https://www.nationalreview.com/2018/11/birthright-citizenship-14th-amendment-does-not-mandate/](https://www.nationalreview.com/2018/11/birthright-citizenship-14th-amendment-does-not-mandate/)",Pontius23,e975aob,conservative
This is why I vote by mail.  ,HowRememberAll,e972o86,conservative
"This is the most compelling argument.
",anon20202,e95v8lh,conservative
"Curious, in what ways can we use a larger Senate majority to our benefit, if we lose the House?  Are there any benefits to it without having the House?",MaddSim,e96bbyk,conservative
"They should. A House majority can be won back in 2 years. We would have to deal with ""moderate"" red state Dem senators who vote like they are from California for 6 years. ",soxfan90,e96rn8a,conservative
"In what way should it be seen as a positive considering that when Republicans had the House, Senate, and Presidency, but they still had problems getting things done?

Perhaps and maybe it is just me, if they would have accomplished the things they were voted in for they might have kept both the House and Senate. ",chaotic_zx,e97tjs1,conservative
Judicial Confirmations and Cabinet Confirmations. ,iwasthebeaver,e96bibr,conservative
impeachments start in the house. they are tried in the senate.,SKWM3000,e96d3pz,conservative
Member how McCain killed healthcare reform? Yeah a larger majority mitigates issues like that.,orangeeyedunicorn,e96fbn5,conservative
"Indeed; reduces reliance on RINOs.  This is especially valuable if Thomas retires or Ginsburg dies.  (Be honest, she won't voluntarily retire while Trump is in office.) 

Losing the House will still be painful though, in that budget negotiations are going to be an ungodly nightmare, Democrats will be running 2399481284 investigations targeting Trump, and absolutely no legislative progress will be made on national - not solely conservative - priorities such as balancing the budget, reducing the deficit, and paying down the national debt.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e96bxs1,conservative
"Black Sparticus tried to make me pick up the soap in the gym shower.

\#believeallaccusations",TheComedianGLP,e94w877,conservative
"I haven’t forgotten, and I never will. Looking forward to bringing about the red wave tomorrow morning.",paulbrevik,e94goda,conservative
He's right on this. Just remember all the politicians and media that touted the number of accusers  let alone a specific one. Then line up their commentary and stories right beside the recent revelations that at least 2 stories were made up. ,postonrddt,e94glbw,conservative
"They’ve burned into my mind what they did to him, what his face looks like when he’s racked with tears of rage.

The means they will go to are unforgivable.",DocMilk,e94kst6,conservative
"Also don't forget the ensuing investigations into those that accused Kavanaugh of misdeeds - many are under federal investigation, including Avenetti for conspiracy.",Sideswipe0009,e94xkpj,conservative
">You f**ked up so bad, you made Lindsey Graham into a cool meme.

>Lindsey f**king Graham.

>Let that sink in.

-[PJW](https://www.twitter.com/prisonplanet/status/1048366057948434434)",BitchesMan,e950fuq,conservative
"It was an extremely horrible event, no one will ever forget except of course for Democrats, it's convenient for them.",PapaGeorgio23,e94nr7z,conservative
"One person remembers, and he will remember when he gets a ""All men are evil"" case before him. ",BlueFreedom420,e94y6zu,conservative
I’ll never forget what they attempted to do to a good man with an excellent track record. Karma is a bitch and they will all be dealt with accordingly in the end.,Lilac_Fumes,e94zyhg,conservative
Is it safe to say everyone on this sub is voting conservatively? Shouldn’t this message get to those whose minds need to be swayed?,Hopsingthecook,e952fr8,conservative
I'm still mad at what they did at the state of the union.  Their behavior during the last two years is something I will never forget. ,sjsharksfan12,e94zaaq,conservative
"Better yet, don’t forget any of the other disgusting displays that have taken place this year alone. ",1994spaceodyssey,e94s40q,conservative
Criminal charges should be on the table for those who involved in the false allegations. ,anon20202,e95scrx,conservative
I sure won't forget.,goldrotmgonly,e956a3a,conservative
I was going to vote for the republic candidate for governor until he lied in the debate. :-/ this is the first year i have had to vote d in that spot.,EatsFiber2RedditMore,e95f71z,conservative
Democrat here. I don't want you to forget. Although I see it more as Kavanaugh being a bad justice pick than a smear campaign.,wuddupdude,e956u94,conservative
"Accusing a SCOTUS pick of being a serial rapist with zero evidence was really something I never expected from the Democrats. It’s so comedically villainous I still shake my head at it from time to time. How do these people see themselves as the heroes in a situation like that? Really, how? I don’t understand it.",VirulentVoid,e9627h4,conservative
"One of the most despicable acts I've seen in my lifetime.

Anyone curious why the media stopped reporting on Ford once K got confirmed?  Something tells me that woman has a bunch of stuff that would not advance her victim narrative much.  The Senate intel report is pretty damning as well on her.  Oh, well, good try Democrats, I'm sure you'll think of an even more loathsome strategy when Trump nominates Barret to replace Notorious.",puddboy,e95sqi7,conservative
"Remember when they were going to make Kavanaugh a campaign issue?

Pepperidge farm remembers",ChuanFaFist,e94tngi,conservative
"Yup, still pissed about it. They basically waged war on any decent man who has any sort of aspirations. ",imbalanced,e94jasy,conservative
"They’ll remember only when it’s convenient, ie to call conservatives anti-woman/anti-rape victim and point to this fuckery as an example.",Lilac_Fumes,e9500gq,conservative
Congrats. You just voted for Pelosi and Maxine.,tmone,e96j315,conservative
"Yeah, he's gonna judge cases based on the Constitution as written. 

What a horrible fucking Justice. ",Moonthrower,e95fpa8,conservative
Pepperidge Farm remembers!,drift_summary,e9bxzmt,conservative
"Unless you are a leftist, in which case anything can be swept under the rug.
",nited_states,e94kvzl,conservative
...who isn't a Marxist.,TheComedianGLP,e94w936,conservative
"Like Keith ""drag that bitch out tha house"" Ellison?",MacTCarnage,e95e2n2,conservative
Can't wait to put my liberal punk friends on blast if he fucking wins. ,Moonthrower,e95fn8f,conservative
"Or Bill ""Better put some ice on that"" Clinton.",nited_states,e967mhf,conservative
"It's inherently a poor policy. It baffles me that the left thinks it should be kept yet they don't want illegal immigrants to be separated from their children. Moreso, I feel like half the left opposes this policy just because Trump is for it. ",xJownage,e955cvr,conservative
"It's not legal for ambassadors, so why is it legal for illegals? ",Trisagion_und_Isolde,e95beam,conservative
"I don't know any Dems who like it either. Mostly just politicians and people making the usual ""If Trump is for it then I'm against it"" arguments that they don't actually believe.",HiGloss,e95f3i0,conservative
Yes.,rojindahar,e950wk0,conservative
"idk about ending it. I fully support that anyone born on American soil is inherently and undeniably an American citizen. That said, this affording of ""sponsorship rights"" as a result needs to be scrutinized a bit more so that that freedom does not abuse the nation.",cons_NC,e95pbhy,conservative
I don't just want it ended - I want it to be *retroactively* ended.  Don't just stem the bleeding - actually repair the damage.,anuser999,e965x90,conservative
"Pretty “leftist” here. I oppose the policy because he is trying to include people here on visa’s (l1a, h-b, etc) in it. Those people are here legally and pay taxes, their children are Americans. If it was ONLY illegal immigrants, I’d have much less of an issue with it. ",PTLove,e959zs0,conservative
Because ambassadors specifically come over here not subject to our jurisdiction. Illegals are.,MegaBlastoise23,e95xujm,conservative
Because they don't want to send their Hispanic voters back.  It's a lot harder to send back illegals who are the parents of citizens.  Remember Obama's coalition of minorities that was supposed to carry Democrats to a thousand year Reich?  This was based largely on the assumption that Hispanics and blacks would continue to grow demographically and continue to vote Democrat.  Ending birthright citizenship for illegals is a broadside against that plan.  Millions of these imported Hispanics will never translate into voters because their children won't be citizens either.  At the very least we will get another generation of actual American democracy.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e95ok0l,conservative
"I fully support it too, as long as one or both of the parents have some permanent legal status in the United States.  If someone from the US went down to Mexico on vacation and had a baby, I wouldn't expect that baby to be a Mexican citizen.",mlmack,e96like,conservative
"I don't see a reason for a non-immigration visa to convey citizenship on a child.  The H1 is not a step in the green card/citizenship process, so procreating shouldn't be, either.  The child should have the same visa status as the non-H1 family members. ",I_am_really_shocked,e95cff6,conservative
Why would they not be put on visas as well? ,xJownage,e95ay0x,conservative
"> I oppose the policy because he is trying to include people here on visa’s (l1a, h-b, etc) in it

Have you seen a quote that mentions that? My suggestion would be to wait and see what a policy actually would look like.",popfreq,e95p9vz,conservative
There is a lot of debate over what under our jurisdiction means. ,Trisagion_und_Isolde,e96y3ty,conservative
"Yeah... otherwise there's essentially no point in having a gap between visas, greencards, and citizenship. You're essentially giving people permanent residency status with no waiting period.",Robo1p,e95h1xh,conservative
"The H1-B visa is not supposed to be used for immigration. If you check out any of the immigration discussions on Hacker News, you'll find all of them use it as a stepping stone to gain permanent residency (green card). So even if you're not supposed to treat it as a path to immigration, it's used that way. See [H1B to Green Card Process](https://www.path2usa.com/h1b-to-green-card-process).",RightMillennial,e95nyfm,conservative
"I respectfully disagree. If your parents are in this country legally, working and paying taxes legally, you should be born American.  You were legally born upon American soil.",PTLove,e95eiiz,conservative
"I respectfully disagree. If your parents are in this country legally, working and paying taxes legally, you should be born American.  You were legally born upon American soil.",PTLove,e95eldq,conservative
Constitution ,GorathThorgath,e95kimz,conservative
"And?  How it's used doesn't have anything to do with what it's supposed to be used as.  Oxycodone is supposed to be used for pain; people are using it to get high.  Does that mean we throw out all the prescription guidelines on it? The problem is the willingness to ignore the intent.  Just like anchor babies, the purpose is ignored.  That doesn't make it right.  If they want to immigrate, go for an immigration visa. Otherwise, you're just here to take American jobs and drive down wages, and get the hell out when you're done.",I_am_really_shocked,e95pr3r,conservative
"They aren't citizens. They're only here for work. Their children, if born here, will be citizens of whatever country their parents are citizens. This is just commonsense.",GFZDW,e95rk9z,conservative
"You missed the most important part, they are not a citizen. Pretty cut and dry.",IHaveAPersian,e95nkj4,conservative
I completely agree with you. I'm a little bitter about H1-Bs because they're highly abused in my field. They're used by large tech companies to suppress American wages and hire cheap foreigners they can control just save a sliver of their already massive profits. I also suspect it's used for nepotism: why hire an American when I can bring someone over from my home country for half the price and they'll be beholden to me?,RightMillennial,e960gt5,conservative
"That’s so sleazy, but I don’t expect any less from the media",al_davis_dad,e95jb5j,conservative
They are clearly monkeying around.,rojindahar,e955w51,conservative
Voter fraud confirmed.,TakeMeToTheArch,e958a86,conservative
http://archive.fo/ZKVoo archive link in case it gets deleted,Delta_25,e956v3o,conservative
"I never understand the theory behind the idea that inflating one sides poll numbers helps that candidate.

If you were going to distort polls etc to improve your sides chances of winning Surely it makes more sense to actually report a lower figure for your guy to perhaps a) get people on the other side to think they have it in the bag so the don’t bother voting and b) your side gets more motivated to vote because your guy is ‘behind’

Seems like all the polls saying Hilldog was going to win easy helped Trump quite a bit",b50willis,e95lcu1,conservative
Smell fishy,goldmouthdawg,e95elvl,conservative
Good ol' voter suppression,BeachCruisin22,e95ogyh,conservative
Holy shit. This wasn’t even close to looking accidental,anon20202,e95qthl,conservative
What if whatever party wins and everyone is told those are the official results?,HowRememberAll,e973ut5,conservative
I’m guessing they had no explanation  ,anon20202,e95qqhe,conservative
This is just odd. Test numbers? ,SuperMarioKartWinner,e95jysk,conservative
People like to back a winner.  Many times the skewed polls are there to discourage people on the fence about voting.  Why bother going if your candidate is losing so badly?,BeachCruisin22,e95oimg,conservative
In states like New York a lot of republicans stay home because they think it is a lost cause. If the polls showed Cuomo and Molinaro within the margin of error those people might wake up and flock to vote but when it is double digits out they don’t see the point,billswinthesuperbowl,e95puns,conservative
"I agree with this and it’s something I’ve thought about quite a bit. Nearest I can figure it has more to do with the pollsters having an inherent liberal bias when trying to determine turnout. I think they’re more likely to project how much more angry and motivated they are to vote on their study and as a result they expect slightly higher turnout for dems than reality, and thus the polls tend to lean left. It isn’t necessarily on purpose, but more that voter turnout is hard to predict. Like I don’t see how the Kavanaugh thing doesn’t drive republicans to the polls so I might expect higher turnout than normal, but that might also be me just projecting my personal biases on the sample. Also discourse has become so toxic that I don’t think many people give their true feelings to pollsters. 

Then again I’m not a statistician or anything so who knows. ",churninbutter,e95o8eu,conservative
I will give them a pass and assume they displayed a test graphic.  Still hoping for some good memes out of it!,PM_UR_PROD_REPORTS,e95ngzo,conservative
Happens every election.  One or two of these networks will accidentally air a test of their system.  It's always the D candidate winning. ,Roez,e95pmzz,conservative
"I voted, fuck Cuomo.",kaltsone,e95rr3k,conservative
"Illinois here; incumbent governor Bruce Rauner (R) came thru the area over the weekend. One thing he mentioned is, ""I won 101 out of 102 counties, but only received 50.1% of the total vote."" *Every. Vote. Counts.*",Juxen,e95zd12,conservative
its a test graphic unless thats how the vote totals end up exactly. ,iwasthebeaver,e95p502,conservative
"Me too so depressing because Upstate comes in and it is like 60-40 republican, than one bureau of NYC comes in and it is 80-20 democrat and just wipes out the votes from upstate ",billswinthesuperbowl,e95rzuy,conservative
"borough, just fyi",ValidMakesnake,e95v57b,conservative
"Freedom with no moral foundation is pretty hard to hold on to, just saying. ",ozric101,e95vvqu,conservative
"Unpopular opinion: voting isn't for everyone. If a billboard needs to tell you to vote, you shouldn't be voting. A majority of the American public don't know enough to vote.",dwoods105,e96bdyx,conservative
"Well, I voted against it. 

Generally, I vote ""NO"" on state constitutional amendments, as they're doing things that should be done legislatively, and NOT be put into the constitution.  The state constitution should be the rule book for how government works, not the repository for crap that people couldn't get their elective representatives to do. ",r4d4r_3n5,e96lg3s,conservative
"How about that ridiculous off-shore drilling amendment?

""Vote yes to prohibit off-shore oil drilling AND prohibit vaping indoors.""

Why am I voting for offshore drilling and vaping in the same amendment? ",LavenderGoomes,e96me85,conservative
Seriously?,Lustan,e96pjv7,conservative
Yeah that was a silly one. I might've went  yes on offshore drilling but you need to present some decent proof that vaping is as bad as yiu claim it is. I think vaping is dumb and looks dumb but I'm not about to fight people over their alternative to cigarettes which we know are bad.,goldmouthdawg,e97sccf,conservative
I present to you [Amendment 9](https://www.floridatoday.com/story/news/2018/10/29/amendments-florida-ballot-vote/1805486002/),LavenderGoomes,e96pvfx,conservative
"For which I voted, ""NO.""",r4d4r_3n5,e96ygmo,conservative
"The House originates financial bills and provides some amount of oversight.

They will obstruct through investigations and sending DOA budgets to the Senate.

They might also vote to impeach as promised, but that too is DOA.

Meanwhile, when RBG retires, Trump's next SCOTUS nom will rocket through confirmation and stymie leftist judicial activism for generations.",expendable_Henchman,e982hmv,conservative
"Overall, it was a red drip and a blue splash.
We picked up several seats in the Senate. The Senate controls the judiciary, so we will not have leftist judges.

The House will probably start impeachment trials, but they won't be able to do much with their slim majority.
Basically it could have been better and could have been much worse.
",DEYoungRepublicans,e981yvy,conservative
It means get ready for non-stop 24 hour MSM coverage of trump investigations and subpeonas for the next 2 years.,scrubking,e984c1k,conservative
I’m one of those people who a lot of people would disagree with because I don’t fully take either side (I’ve gotten attached for this many times lol but not so surprisingly it’s always been those super liberal people who claim to be tolerant that get at me for this) but anyhow I really hope that time isn’t wasted over pointless investigations into Trump when there are far bigger issues in the US and the world. ,girlcrush1,e9892o6,conservative
"Pulling out Obama at the last minute to try to garner support, show how extremely desperate they are ",anon20202,e95u8yw,conservative
"It will be a short, simple entry. It will say ""Literally Hitler""

But seriously, you or someone could always eventually self-publish an e-book documenting what's happening now. Start curating reputable sources to reference, news articles, speeches etc.",MisterMouser,e97hibu,conservative
"Academia writes the history books. Trump will be remembered, but not for reasons that are factual or favorable to his legacy. ",mikeygio,e974gqu,conservative
"Remember ever sitting and last republican president is viewed as the worst by some people.

Years after Trump is done and the next republican goes in Trump won't be considered so bad.  Its happening with dubya right now,",SuperFunMonkey,e97c8ik,conservative
Books: iT wAz oBamA's eCOnOMy.,ShadowTH277,e97nbtv,conservative
I don’t know man... W was pretty terrible. He was better than Gore or Kerry would’ve been but as far as self serving interests go W was pretty transparent.,poltergeist007,e97dcgq,conservative
I’m sure they’ll get that straightened out... in about 36 hours or so,churninbutter,e94wfom,conservative
"If anyone want's to hear this guy's ideas, listen to some Glenn Beck podcasts where he is featured.  I think he has been on the normal show 2 or 3 times and once on his Saturday podcast for an hour and a half interview.  Guy is incredibly articulate about some awesome, out of the box ideas.  ",Jar_Squatter,e94uosn,conservative
"Leftists gonna Leftist

Edit: Lol looks like the Leftist Ministry of Truth downvoted me already",VoinaYMir,e94r85p,conservative
"""Just a russian bot. not a real human being""",CreativeRoutine,e950e3h,conservative
To think that the Dems are talking about Pubs trying to suppress voters and silence the opposition.,DocMilk,e958s0v,conservative
Delete Facebook,BasedBastiat,e960f1q,conservative
"It would not be complicated for them to identify public officials engaged in elections and provide extra scrutiny for reports prior to suspending them. You know, since they’re so “concerned” about undue influence in elections. Yet they don’t....
",gt4674b,e95ivok,conservative
"The first time I had heard of him was a few months ago when he was on the Rubin Report. Seems like an interesting guy and I appreciate his enthusiasm for getting a viable 3rd party option on the political stage.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RTj8ZoCiM4E
",MooMooCudChew,e954owu,conservative
I heard him on Joe Rogans podcast. It was a bit frustrating listen to Joe not able to comprehend.,Odin043,e958mqf,conservative
Yea Joe was a bit dense during that podcast. It was a little strange to hear him not comprehend that federal funding of education came with strings attached. To be fair though Larry should have been ready to answer those questions. He did not articulate his viewpoints correctly in my opinion. He did much better when discussing other parts of his platform.,JustAnotherJon,e959wjz,conservative
Joe can't understand anyone that's not a Cali leftist. It's annoying as hell. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e95m14u,conservative
Larry proclaimed the disconnect was just because Joe was a democrat and got extremely butt hurt and didn't really try to understand him anymore. It was a really tough listen. ,madhguru,e95z6en,conservative
He's mostly right.,TomorrowBelongsToUs,e953x39,conservative
Black trump supporters are among most publicly demonized  people in our nation. Think about that for a second ,anon20202,e95rnda,conservative
Is there anything I can read regarding his policies?,Themusician67,e953x3t,conservative
Is there anything I can read regarding his policies?,Themusician67,e953xhd,conservative
Hadn't thought about this til now.,ethanrules3,e97c6gx,conservative
"Most politicians have something on their website. I didn't read this, so I hope it helps. 

https://johnjamesforsenate.com/issues/",frasierfonzie,e9593w3,conservative
"https://johnjamesforsenate.com/issues/
",SteelSpire,e9758z3,conservative
Thanks much for that. It helps some. ,Themusician67,e95pmvq,conservative
[removed],,e9588f6,conservative
"They've certainly killed more people, and mostly for believing the wrong thing. The two are extremely similar when you break it down. ",BeachCruisin22,e93wfb3,conservative
"Because communism represented by the hammer and sickle is a philosophy embodied by several different groups, cultures, and countries led by different figure heads across different generations.  And the philospophy as conceptualized isnt a genocidal occult although it easily leads to such.

The Nazi Party and its swastika was one entity led by one figurehead during one point in time.  It never represented any other demographic or function political philosophy, and its legacy are one in the same the atrocity.  

Had the soviet union been subjected to a nuremburg trial type of exposure the legacy wouldbbe different, the spread would be different; but the symbol...the symbol would have the same ambiguity.



",MalakaiRey,e955px1,conservative
"The difference between the two is that US troops never overran Soviet death camps and televised them for the world to see. American leftists were never embarrassed over, and forced to backtrack on, their support for communism like they were for their early support of fascism.",SilverHerfer,e943ahn,conservative
100 million genocided in the name of communism. It deserves to be as demonized.,TheMormanTrump,e942rab,conservative
"motherfuckers walk around with pictures of chairman mao on their shirt. 

yeah dude killed like 90 million people can we not have his face around thanks. ",machine667,e94wkh8,conservative
"I think what is lost on a lot of people is the saturation of the Soviets' murderous regime. The Soviets every day sent regular people to the gulags for any reason that could possibly be made up for seventy years - 90% of the population was subject to imprisonment at the drop of a hat, and the peoples of the Soviet Union lived in constant fear. As someone who is studying the former Soviet Union as a part of his degree, I read the first-hand accounts of the evils of the Soviets, whereas someone who has a general education normally only learns about the Soviets from the bipolar/Cold War/ideological standpoint without regard to the real human costs. In contrast, everyone is taught about the Nazis' concentration camps. It is absolutely asinine to not equate the destructive nature of Nazism/Marxism-Leninism. ",EasternEuropeHoe,e94fwxj,conservative
[removed],,e959kd8,conservative
"The Soviet Union had better a better PR/Propaganda machine than the Nazis. The Nazis directed their misinformation campaigns inward to their own people, while the Soviet Union directed their both inward and outward to the rest of the world. The result is that, when World War II ended the Nazi belief system imploded and (mostly) disappeared, while the end of the Cold War did not bring an end to Soviet misinformation.  
  
Also, the fall of the Soviet Union left behind a Mother Russia with a lot of its institutions still intact, while post-war Germany was reborn into something entirely different.",Cyphierre,e94xyhd,conservative
"The problem with Communist thought is that it's not immediately self-evident as to why it's so evil. 

The idea of a classless society sounds good in the ears of those who have nothing. ""To each according to his ability, to each according to his need"" *sounds* great until you apply human nature. Only then, once it's played itself out, and the bodies begin to pile up, does it become clear that to be completely classless, it would need to be done by force. Each person's ability and need will eventually become everyone trying to get the most out of the system while contributing a little as possible.

To bring about the utopia, everyone needs to comply. After all, who are you to stand in the way of ""progress""? If you're overheard speaking poorly about the great leader or the revolution, you're subject to imprisonment for your political crimes. If you don't like the food shortages  because the government decided that funding is better used elsewhere, you'd better keep your goddamn mouth shut lest you want a visit from SMERSH. ",BruceCampbell123,e958eb9,conservative
"The line ""because communism has never been done properly."" Haha.

Lord Acton himself said ""power corrupts and absolute power corrupts absolutely."" Communism can never work after leaving the hypothetical of paper because of the very fact that humans are easily corrupted creatures.

Edit:  was wrong on the person who said quote.  Corrected.",callthereaper64,e949ztc,conservative
Communism is evil for two central reasons. 1. It renders citizens powerless by removing all motivation to be productive. 2. It puts *all* and *absolute* power into the hands of the government.  It's just slavery under a different name.,tenshon,e95xo9y,conservative
"A perspective from the left, I think the largest difference is when people use the Nazi Swastika, they're only purpose is white superiority and many of them aim to recreate these atrocities. Those who claim communism generally don't do so with the aim of killing many people again

The difference isn't in the regimes, but in the actions of those who associate themselves with communism vs nazism. If you had a majority of self-described communists pushing for dictatorship and gulags then you'd have something completely different.

Another factor is China, even though we aren't on great terms at the moment we can't actively vilify the ruling party of the 2nd greatest world power.

Overall I'd say, maybe. I believe the that they would be at an equal level of vilification if:

Communist regimes attempted to conquer Western Europeans,

AND 

Most of those who continued to support communism were violent in their aims.

This isn't the case, so I don't see the Hammer and Sickle seeing any serious censorship or taboo around it, and honestly while that's not ideal it's not a problem that really makes a difference.",Cartesian_Currents,e95xy39,conservative
Im surprised the official seal of Berkley is not a Hammer and Sickle. ,BlueFreedom420,e94iwve,conservative
"The fact there is a single adult in the world that thinks communism isn't just as bad as fascism is unbelievable. They are two sides to the same coin, one spent to cross the river Styx as entrance to the underworld. Just because one is shiny and promises harmony via teamwork and features unicorns and rainbows doesn't mean it's not a ticket to hell. In the end, it will do more damage because of its deceptive nature, but only because people continue to be deceived.",Zadien22,e958v7l,conservative
"Fuck yes.

And Che shirts should be treated like Hitler shirts.

And their wearers should be pinatas.",TheComedianGLP,e94fuqq,conservative
"100\^ million deaths. how many more have to die until they ""get it right""?",crypticSmyles,e953cd3,conservative
The swastika was (I’d hate to use this word but it’s completely true in this case) culturally appropriated from the Buddhists and Hindus as it was a symbol of seasons and balance for a much longer time then it was for the Nazi regime.,HowRememberAll,e957npa,conservative
As an East-european: yes plz,Krondon57,e95g4m0,conservative
"Maybe we should just agree that as a collective, humanity is a huge pile of steaming shit.   Every nation has done horrific things to other people.  If everyone would stop being dicks, the world might just be a better place.",Cytorath,e95jkyj,conservative
The quotes they used are probably pulled right front r/politics comments.,tehForce,e9483uc,conservative
"Fun fact: Stalin killed far more people than Hitler. Yet Socialism/Communism remains popular among young leftists in the U.S.

Then we have kids wearing ""El Che"" shirts, as if he wasn't a brutal murderer as well.

This is literally the epitome of, ""Those who have not  learned from history are doomed to repeat it."" ",Ovedya2011,e94w0w5,conservative
[removed],,e952p09,conservative
"The swastica was derived form a Hindi symbol for peace, except rotated 35°? The original one is even demonized for no good reason. This is what happens you call everyone you disagree with a Nazi. 

The hammer and sickle have always been synonymous with communism. Communism has killed 100 million+ I cannot fathom why anyone would support such asinine beliefs.  ",thisiswhyicant,e94kc3r,conservative
"As the one, who has a family that survived Holodomor somehow, I'm fucking agree. ",NiceGuyArthas,e95dwks,conservative
"More people died under the banner of the hammer and sickle than the swastika.

Not counting war casualties because then the numbers get more complicated ",Stained-Glass-Window,e94t9av,conservative
Because the media in most western countries have actively ignored or covered up the atrocities of communism. ,Spudzzy7s,e94ojc2,conservative
"The Hammer and Sickle is worse than the Swastika, which was at least originally an auspicious symbol in Hindu culture. The Hammer and Sickle have always been terrible.",Daoist_Hermit,e94rge7,conservative
[removed],,e94pblz,conservative
"I know I’m useless but 

Your karma. Oh my god ",nightwulf76,e94iw94,conservative
Bitch please,GaRGa77,e95c793,conservative
"I am curious, this is a genuine question, is the hammer & sickle used by any specific hate groups like the swastika is by some extreme antisemetic(etc.) groups?

I know there is still some of that going on in various Western countries and former Soviet states, but most of what I've heard or seen has new/other symbols or sticks with Nazi symbols.",AnnualThrowaway,e95u31s,conservative
Because being critical of capitalism is 100% the same as wanting to exterminate people because of their race.,KaosEngine,e95ygc2,conservative
"Jordan Peterson put it about the best I've ever heard it when he compared people's reactions to USSR communism vs. Nazi fascism: ""The Nazi is the guy who pulls a knife on you in the alleyway and steals your wallet, while the Communist is the white collar criminal who rips off your bank account."" The second guy in this scenario probably does more damage, but it's the first guy who you remember. Psychologically, our caveman brains are primed to react more strongly to immediate short-term threats than long-term threats. We react viscerally to the sight of a swastika, but I don't think the hammer and sickle get our blood pumping nearly as much. I'm not saying it's right, but I think similar psychological principles apply.

Both were evil, but the Nazis are the more easy-to-define evil of the two: they were villains in a very black-and-white war, the genocide they committed happened over a short time frame and has a name (the Holocaust), and most of their evil was relatively visible to their enemies. Meanwhile, the Cold War was a bit more nebulous in its morality, a lot of bad came out of the fight against the Communists (McCarthyism, the Vietnam War, the Bay of Pigs invasion), and America was a lot more divided about the Cold War than World War II (especially post-Pearl Harbour). 

Then, of course, you have about 70 years of media celebrating the defeat of Nazism, which is about as good a story about the triumph of good over evil as the modern world has ever had. The Cold War and the defeat of the USSR isn't as much a media darling - for one, America lost half the associated conflicts (the aforementioned Bay of Pigs and Vietnam). The country was divided on the morality of the conflicts: many conflicts claimed to be ideologically driven, but were just as likely economically driven (such as the Suez Crisis). Most battles were fought indirectly, with the US or USSR acting as third parties (e.g. with the Cubans, the Vietnamese and the Afghanis). And, finally, there was no grand climactic battle to end the Cold War. The USSR just sort of peacefully dissolved. In sum, the Cold War would make a terrible movie.",Harold3456,e967cd5,conservative
"Completely idiotic to ban a symbol at all.. the Nazis didn't create the swastika, they just perverted it. If a symbol offends you that much you are giving it far too much power.",doseofbullshit,e969oha,conservative
Amazing article!,CrunchyPoem,e94uykm,conservative
"It shouldn’t. The swastika shouldn’t be treated how it is either. If it’s black in a white circle on a red background being waved by a real neo-nazi, then it should be seen negatively, if not there should be no stigma towards either. People need to learn to communicate rationally with each other, rather than attempt to force the other to feel objectively wrong morally or ethically.",weedlepete,e957udf,conservative
Damn right.,martiro45,e94qd7x,conservative
I know this is a serious topic but don’t you mean the hammer and pickle,BaneLegionKillr,e951ohu,conservative
"They represent two strains of the same ultimate evil, atheist socialism.",mayargo7,e94lhot,conservative
"The hammer and sickle is and should be treated *__WORSE__* than the swastika.

Change my mind",Odoacer476CE,e94u55v,conservative
"The two ideologies are not equally bloody...nazism is dedicated to domination and subjugation. Communism? It wants there to be no income inequality, no homeless, no starvation. What a joke this board is, go back to conservapedia",advancedlamb,e94tg4u,conservative
It’s so ironic that groups like antifa or a lot of protesting liberals that protest nazis and fascism tote soviet flags.. ,OprahSwagfrey,e94mijb,conservative
"I think that most people don't have a clue about the horrors of communism, makes what the nazi's did look like a minor thing in comparison.",Draegoth_,e95mqwf,conservative
Define leftist.,filthysanches,e9551yz,conservative
"Uh oh better change the subject before someone criticizes communism too much. The point is people carrying Confederate flags are attacked all the time by people and the media, but leftist groups that are constantly carrying the flag of one of the most evil countries of all time get a pass. At the very least you could say Americans from the South see it as a heritage symbol. The same can't be said for freshman philosophy majors carrying the flag of the Soviet Union. ",Hrendo,e95gd0w,conservative
Do you normally bring up the Confederacy when people are talking about communism? Seems like a weird connection.,Brandwins,e95k436,conservative
"In a way. They were  complete rivals of and hated each other, but yes both of them were horrible regimes that killed countless millions, suppressed basic freedoms, committed genocide, had a lower standard of living, didn’t tolerate any form of other thought in any way and punished that harshly with infamous work camps, etc. so it is understandable to associate them in their despotism",HotDogs19,e93y8yg,conservative
both collectivist oppresive goverments with a leader cult trying to make a classless  society.,David_Stern1,e95ggsg,conservative
"Specifically the Nazis were making order out of the emasculated mess that was the Weimar republic to get back to something stronger and more stable.  Thus Germany wanted some centralization and pride.  Russia on the other hand had a Republic phase that only lasted a few months coming off a somewhat repressive monarchy.  So Russians were ready for economic changes especially more equity between peasants and nobility.  Unfortunately the revolution's winner was the Reds who found that they need a lot of power to implement socialism.  Thus Russia backed into what Germany set out to create: a totalitarian government.  More specifically a materialistic, identity-centric utilitarian government based on German philosophy that maximized its own power, had an eye on expanding, and didn't think much of Polish sovereignty.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e94dh5s,conservative
They are both post-feudalism attempts at recreating a despotic system of government. The very roots of both ideologies are the same but their methods and tactics are completely different. This is why so many people are fooled into thinking communism is just poorly implemented while also believing fascism is inherently evil.,Dyeredit,e94jhj7,conservative
"Yes, they are pretty much the same concept when pushed all the way.",goldrotmgonly,e958d1u,conservative
Same withMcDonalds and Burger King too!,mattibbals,e95s8qu,conservative
"Most of the Nazi's victims weren't killed for what they *believed*, they were killed for what they *were*.",DamnedDemiurge,e95xw8j,conservative
"Yeah but one was the reason the allies won WW2. Both ideas are rubbish, but the USSR for many, especially Russians and other eastern Slavs still holds a special place. The reason Russia is Russia. Mostly the older generation I assume. ",Truly_Ineffable,e954nme,conservative
"The hammer and sickle explicitly represent Russian Soviet communism, a regime that frequently targeted ethnic and cultural minorities for removal/extermination. Just like every country that uses that symbology. If it were represented properly by our media and taught properly in schools people might actually know this stuff and shame the far left accordingly. 
 ",Hrendo,e95gluh,conservative
That's a really excellent point.,TheComedianGLP,e94fw3m,conservative
"American leftists openly cheered for, supported, and defended genocidal communists throughout history and got off without consequence. The NYT denied the holodomor while it was happening. Bernie Sanders praised Hugo Chavez. They get away with it because they own the media.

Nobody ever made a Schindler's list about the gulags. ",aDAMNPATRIOT,e94h2lh,conservative
"Seriously. The Truman administration left American POW's in soviet occupied territory stay behind the iron curtain, almost certainly they were sent to gulags and never returned home.",MartinLutherCreamJr,e94hiqt,conservative
Very well put. It's allowed a socialist hipster culture to develop while fascism has largely been condemned in most parts of the Western World. ,TRACKSUITMAFlA,e94h2cc,conservative
"Leftists, in general, refuse to even acknowledge that  Stalinist USSR was running death/labor camps before their involvement in WW2 or that they also invaded Poland to help Germany. Or that when big mean Hitler waged war on them, they were caught off-guard  because they had just purged their best military officers who weren’t completely loyal to Stalin. And I don’t know if it’s an issue of knowing or admitting that to defend themselves they used people from labor camps to push forward on the lines, with the standing order being that if they retreat then kill them. 

I made the mistake of saying Stalin was worse than Hitler. Which is, of course, a debatable statement. But they’re at least in the ballpark of each other, I think. I can respect people who think Hitler is worse. But not those who would say that Stalin isn’t even at least comparable. Sure, Hitler was evil. But Stalin was a violent psychopath. I think I’d honestly prefer living in Nazi Germany where I know if I’m a target or not, versus Stalinist USSR where I could be declared an enemy of the State just by shit luck. ",OMGorilla,e951sq6,conservative
[removed],,e94l7vx,conservative
Nazism is fascism ,pastagains,e96jdhg,conservative
But unfortunately it won't be because the left is stupid and think Karl Marx and Che Guevara were smart decent people.,mikebets,e94g1d5,conservative
"Buh-buh-buh muh ""communism has never existed.""",Vorocano,e94hbz1,conservative
[removed],,e952g50,conservative
[removed],,e952iae,conservative
"My wife is from the Soviet Union and learned at a young age to be very careful about the things she says outside of the home.   

My mother in law has a friend whose father was at a party and made a joke about Stalin. Someone snitched, he was sent to a gulag, and she never saw her father again. Such an evil place.",CKings,e94sv19,conservative
"Who's the ""we"" in that sentence? You're a liberal who never posts here. You realize you guys are the hypocrites in this situation right? Freaking out about flags but completely ignoring people on your side flying the symbol of one of the worst regimes in history. ",Hrendo,e95ghrj,conservative
That was Lord Acton....,CherryCokeNixon,e94hmey,conservative
"That's the thing about a communist system: it can't tolerate any opposition or dissension, because as soon as it does, it's not communist anymore.",rebelde_sin_causa,e94l5y9,conservative
"While the economy may have been... somewhat communist, Stalin(and to a lesser extent some of those that followed) were basically fascists. Extreme censorship, state police, political purges, outright purges of populations. Obviously it wasn't a right-wing political ideology in public, but the authoritarian aspect certainly fit fascism.

Communism never would've worked on that scale. But really Stalin(unlike some of his successors) was not about communism, just like Hitler wasn't about socialism, well not for long at least.",AnnualThrowaway,e95tqbg,conservative
Nah. We let the libs solve their problems w violence. Karma is our bitch,GoodWillPower,e94g8o6,conservative
"India:

> Ran by socialists since the founding until the 1990s

> Capitalist reforms are implemented in the 90s

> Finally starts to move out of (literal) shithole status

\#FuckCapitalism ",Robo1p,e95gswx,conservative
"Sources?  This idiot would like to know more.

Edit:  As far as this idiot can tell, capitalism has vastly increased the wealth of Sub-Saharan Africa.  African countries imposed great central control over their economies only a few decades ago. (what does that sound like eh?)  Not to say things are good yet as many of their governments are still very corrupt and the path to freedom is still long.

What hey, I'm and idiot so what do I know. ",PerceivedShift,e95kmdv,conservative
"The swastika is used in Hinduism yes, but it was also a Norse rune (possibly representing Thor) which is why the Nazis used it. 
",original_walrus,e9504p2,conservative
You’re giving modern nazis way too much credit. ,KilliamWallace,e957rq9,conservative
"I’m no fan of socialism, but calling naziism socialist is just horribly intellectually dishonest ",Schumeister,e95057r,conservative
Hitler was very much a Christian,DasFunke,e94zomi,conservative
"Why? You are correct.
",viverator,e953pmb,conservative
Are you fucking retarded? Communism makes Nazism seem like an afternoon at the carnival when it comes to death and murder. ,Odoacer476CE,e94u8ry,conservative
"That’s a tad of an over-exaggeration. Yes, I agree the flags are carried for different purposes but if we’re going to start criticizing symbols for having bad history we should be consistent. I don’t think the “freshmen philosophy majors” carry the hammer and sickle flag (which I as a college student at a fairly liberal college have never seen) are doing it because they support killing thousands of people just as those carrying the confederate flag don’t do it because they want to enslave an entire race. I would argue both sides are being a tad naïve about what their flag stands for and if we’re going to criticize one side let’s set an example.",jobonso,e95yk9g,conservative
Yeah. I totally agree with you friend. 🇺🇸,FloridaGator13,e95q9x3,conservative
"> In a way. They were complete rivals of and hated each other,

A lot of the people who were put in the gulags by the soviets were slightly different flavors of communists to the ones in power.  So the whole ""rivals who hated each other"" thing, while completely true, doesn't really indicate that much of a difference.  ",foot_kisser,e94l242,conservative
"To be clear, the Nazis weren't capitalists either.  Hitler's ultimate aim was a form of socialism that was obtained without an October Revolution, which tore Russia apart.  Lenin wanted worker drones (according to Hitler). Hitler wanted individuals committed to a united cause.  Both leaders wanted centralized, government controlled economies.  ",Roez,e94i4t6,conservative
"Leftist ideologues are often bigoted, so them being rivals and hating each other doesn't mean much. Church of England and Catholics killed each other en masse even though they agreed on 99% of their faith.

edit: in mass -> en masse",ultimis,e945eek,conservative
They are twins.,TheComedianGLP,e94fxtw,conservative
Actual history? In *my* /r/conservative thread?,rotenKleber,e94nly1,conservative
Religion is a belief ,BeachCruisin22,e964a8r,conservative
The hammer and sickle was also used by the Chinese. Also what ethic cleansing are you talking about?,Relatable_Teen,e963oei,conservative
Thats factually incorrect...you’re bashing media over proper reporting but you are misrepresenting facts and history...you see you are part of the problem right?,MalakaiRey,e97yzh9,conservative
"Even though Hollywood would never make a Schindler's list for communism, just the idea is really sad. Shit, there's enough known information to make several seasons worth of content. I'm listening to the audiobook of The Gulag Archipelago by Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn and it's about 67 hours long. I'm about 25 hours in so far and for 25 hours I've heard nothing but mass roundups, mass disappearings and mass genocides. The way the book is written, it doesnt always go into extreme detail about specific events because there is just no records sometimes so a great many events are just glossed over. It never feels good for me when I think about the fact that there is a 67 hour audiobook that just barely glosses over various mass genocides because of the sheer amount of genocides that occurred. Anyone who says communism or socialism is good or achievable should be sent to the free YouTube audiobook and tell them to listen to 67 hours worth of death and then only after they have finished, ask them if the cost of utopia is truly worth it. Over 200 million corpses became food for worms in the Soviet controlled territories and the Asian territories because of an idea. How many more might die to see that farcical idea turned into a grim reality?",for_the_meme_watch,e94niv6,conservative
"> Nobody ever made a Schindler's list about the gulags.

^ a real rabbit hole to go down",lost_snake,e94l62u,conservative
[deleted],,e94k8eg,conservative
"As a leftist, and fellow Californian, I just wanted to give you the peace of mind that I also this from time to time. Tankies are a problem, Stalin was a legit monster, and while leftists in the 50s and 60s could get away with maybe not trusting the existence or prevalence of gulags, how many other things were made up that were ""communist plots"" there has been no excuse for it at all since 1989, and arguably much sooner. It might also be important to note that most leftists may not refuse to acknowledge, but simply don't see the relevance. They by and large have no intention or interest in supporting totalitarianism or dictatorship, hell, most American leftists don't even care about Co-Ops which are kinda the spiritual height of actual socialism. Most of them would be overjoyed with some welfare state attached to capitalism.

Regardless, I hope you have a good day!",PonderFish,e95k7ib,conservative
"A lot of us on the right have started using Leftist as a term to identify people on the far left, including Socialists. Where we use Liberal to identify the more moderate to little left of people on the Left. 

Theres definitely plenty of us that just straight up say Liberal or Leftist for everyone on the Left, but enough of us dont to the point where the guy you're responding to may very well be using the more specific one. ",Ledcookey,e94nt54,conservative
Yes .... the German  national socialist workers party was fascists. Is there a point beyond this?,SilverHerfer,e96oz5y,conservative
"In my experience, Guevara is viewed quite critically by many people-the times where large parts of the population had a romanticized view on him and saw his crimes as justified certainly are over (except for some actual socialists, not US-Bernie-Sanders-style-socialists).  

Marx was first and foremost a philosopher, so I wouldn't lump him in with the later communist ideologues, revolutionaries and dictators he inspired. In Berlin in 1947 a major street in the American sector(!) was named after him, and the German railway company named one of their new high speed trains after him, simply because he was one of the most influential German philosphers.",reallyspecialdude,e94hnrz,conservative
"[Here](http://archive.is/u6Fyf)

Mao: 60 million

Stalin: 40 million plus Holodomor

Rest of communists: Many more millions",TheMormanTrump,e959agl,conservative
"“We” as in us Americans.  And I may lean left, but that doesn’t mean I agree with everything theft does.",Akosa117,e95uaxk,conservative
I stand corrected...I've been saying the wrong quote for years.  Thank you.,callthereaper64,e94i8hf,conservative
Then its socialism at that point right?,callthereaper64,e94ll2s,conservative
"Anyone who says ""violence never solved anything"" has no grasp of history.

Violence has solved more problems than all other approaches combined.",TheComedianGLP,e94gcxk,conservative
"Oh wow, I didn’t know that. Thanks for the information man, I got some more research to do now! ",thisiswhyicant,e9508ph,conservative
"Hitler was most definetly not a Christian.  He was born of a catholic and Jewish parents if I remember right, but was not a Christian and definately not a practicing jew.",Kiyal101,e96kt3e,conservative
The only reason Nazism didn’t kill more than communism is because Communism lasted almost 5 times as long. If the Nazi’s had been given the same amount of time they would have killed far more. Generalplanost was to depopulate almost all of Eastern Europe. This is not counting the plans of killing all “undesirables” and political prisoners in the rest of Europe.,original_walrus,e950c1e,conservative
"No one has to die during the class war. Regardless, the change from monarchy to democracy was bloody too, guess we shouldn't've done that eh?",advancedlamb,e94uc11,conservative
Yeah that’s why they were such big fans of privatization and corporatism ,Lion-of-Africa,e96iogw,conservative
Yeah but the Nazis viewed Jews as a race that had to be exterminated. They didn't care about what a Jew believed or not believed. ,WorkingCantaloupe,e964mqo,conservative
"Well, there is *Bitter Harvest.* [*https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bitter\_Harvest\_(2017\_film)*](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bitter_Harvest_(2017_film)) *.* I haven't seen it, and the reviews aren't great, but at least there's something. I agree with your point, though. The tragedy of communism doesn't get the recognition it deserves.

&#x200B;

Edit: fixed link",LeadingAmbassador,e94rquy,conservative
You should read A Day in the Life of Ivan Denysovich. It's about a guy serving in a gulag. It really captures the brutality of the gulags in a sarcastic russian way,cashmeirlhowboudat,e94whfp,conservative
You damn right ,aDAMNPATRIOT,e94ntet,conservative
"> genocidal capitalists

This might just be the single most delusional thing I've ever read.  ",foot_kisser,e94kug1,conservative
🤣,aDAMNPATRIOT,e94kd2z,conservative
"I can't wait to see the mental gymnastics used to call any form of genocide ""capitalist"".",the1egend1ives,e953idf,conservative
[removed],,e94pfv7,conservative
Sorry I meant communism is fascism therefore I feel they should of felt equally embarrassed ,pastagains,e96txgr,conservative
As a college student I can honestly say there isn't a week that goes by where I don't see a Che Guevara t-shirt on some jackass Bernie bro. Not to mention someone with as extreme ideas as Bernie would of course be supported by the most radical people such as the Che Guevara loving socialists. That is not to say he agrees with them but that crowd supports him. And Marx was a moron who failed to understand the simple fact that human beings are inherently selfish even though that's not necessarily a bad thing. Not to mention the fact that if everyone is equal under communist rule who the hell is enforcing the rules? The one who keeps others in line would automatically have the most power amongst the community.,mikebets,e94icto,conservative
"So just to be clear, we are talking about logos and shirts still right?

Am I a bad person for mentioning that violence is the lefts go to post-Trump election and we shouldn't have it be a thing we do too?

I'm cool w violence solving global conflicts and whatnot, but we're talking about shirts... Y'all get that, right?",GoodWillPower,e94jzh1,conservative
"“Violence, naked force, has settled more issues in history than has any other factor.” ",Menhadien,e94iyw5,conservative
"""If you can't solve a problem with violence, you simply haven't used enough.""",cybercipher,e94hukl,conservative
"No problem! It’s super interesting (in a morbid way) to read about Nazi symbols and where they got them from. 
Everything was designed with a purpose; an incredibly propaganda machine if there ever was one.",original_walrus,e950ynu,conservative
"In 1928 Hitler said in a speech: ""We tolerate no one in our ranks who attacks the ideas of Christianity ... in fact our movement is Christian.""

Edit: the nazi party had people in high positions that were very anti-religion and overall widely believed that religion should come second to nationalism. ",DasFunke,e977x62,conservative
"""No one has to die during the class war.""

Ha Ha

Oh Wow

You don't even understand your own ideology. Go take a nap kid. We'll be sure to get you some apple slices and milk after your nap. ",Odoacer476CE,e94uoyd,conservative
"The point was that they both would serve to eliminate people that didn't fit into their box of acceptables, be it race, religion or thought (nazis killed more non jews than jews, ftr). ",BeachCruisin22,e964w16,conservative
You can't succeed if you kill your market. ,chabanais,e94wbi9,conservative
"Not many, I wouldnt be able to throw out an accurate guess, but id say <15% maybe. But I think the biggest issue is that while the vast majority of people who identify as Democrats wouldnt be considered Leftists, their politicians and policies they vote for often are. ",Ledcookey,e94xxef,conservative
"Communism and Fascism are both socialist ideologies. There are just a couple of important differences between them: 

Communism is globalist. Fascism is nationalist (and the sole source of the left's claim that fascism is right wing)

Communism believes in direct government ownership of the means of production. Fascism believes in private ownership of the means of production but the government controls every single aspect of the businesses. The owners are simply caretakers on the government's behalf.

Other than that, there not a bit a difference between them.

&#x200B;",SilverHerfer,e98d923,conservative
I bet you're a sweet girl.,TheComedianGLP,e94k8aj,conservative
Fact.,TheComedianGLP,e94j6d8,conservative
I'd like to know more,Stained-Glass-Window,e94tfz1,conservative
"They're right. No one *has* to die. The rich are always free to peacefully give up power. The only reason communists believe in a revolution is because they believe the rich *will not* give up that power.

But sure, go all condescending on them. Way to keep things civil.",Echks,e955eyo,conservative
"You seem like the kind of person that is all talk, no action. I bet you've never beat up anyone for wearing a shirt but acting like a badass to pump your ego.",No_Need_for_Beef,e94mae9,conservative
"Looking at your post history you're a hyperintellectual that gets his kick off reactions to your wit.

Also I taste like fucking heaven.",GoodWillPower,e94ll97,conservative
You'll fall in the streets. ,ZackTheGuy,e953wpi,conservative
"I suppose no one *had* to die under Nazi Germany either, eh? The non-germans could have just left and Poland could have given them territory, right? Surely you are not foolish enough to believe that either idea can even be *attempted* without violence. ",Buddha_Punch,e9571de,conservative
"You, on the other hand, are an ugly, fat girl with shitty dress sense and no friends.",TheComedianGLP,e94mjue,conservative
"You're exactly correct.
I don't know about the taste but I believe you.
:D",TheComedianGLP,e94mlyr,conservative
"What, by your limp-wristed hand?

LOLOLOL",TheComedianGLP,e96tubi,conservative
"Lol, I'm a guy and id say I'm in shape. Also have a few friends, but it's true, my ""dress sense"" (don't think that's even a term) is terrible, you got me there buddy.",No_Need_for_Beef,e94mrtu,conservative
How long have you been a guy?,TheComedianGLP,e94mwki,conservative
"Probably as long as he's been kicked around, which if it's even close to the Bee Gees, was most of his life.",Godsdj,e94yfgo,conservative
I just dont understand why it is believed by people on the left that America shouldnt take care of itself over any other country.,mydude0940,e96gxq1,conservative
"Because they are convinced that since their method comes from a place of kindness, that it MUST work, and any failures can thusly be attributed to someone else.  They view it as altruism, but the truth is that it's short sightedness and spinelessness that ends up hurting more people than it helps.  I can get thinking you're still the good guys if you aren't able to see and quantify the results of your policies, but the evidence is readily available, and it's not a coincidence that Democrat led cities are also the nation's leaders in homelessness, shootings, and probably a whole bunch of other terrible shit.",fuck_im_dead,e95hzb7,conservative
"Nobody cares about homelessness because it's a male problem. 
",higmage,e95ka6o,conservative
"> But the beginning wisdom is to consider the status quo intolerable, and resist the advocates who want to normalize panhandling and camping, and the associated drug abuse, petty crime and disorder.

Always remember that the liberals that allow this to continue are the elites who never are bothered by the problem in their own lives.",optionhome,e95hqjd,conservative
"Their policies DO work. They are intended to reduce standard of living to 3rd world levels, wipe out the middle class, and create a dependency hellhole ruled by democrats in their gated enclaves ",expendable_Henchman,e95xt3w,conservative
Because that would require admitting they were wrong. When was the last time that happened?,TruthfulTrolling,e961rx6,conservative
well they won't acknowledge the drug problem with the community for one. you can't have an honest conversation about homelessness and pretend like drug use has NOTHING to do with it. it's ridiculous. ,madonna-boy,e965oei,conservative
They’ll never admit they’re wrong about anything ,213_,e968tk2,conservative
What are some conservative homelessness initiatives? I think we could do a better job articulating a conservative plan for helping the homeless.,petitereddit,e95xers,conservative
Two sentences with a complete and accurate explanation.  Excellent.,optionhome,e95i3ik,conservative
"not to mention that the ones more cynical amongst them don't want a solution. Because if the problem is solved, what are they gonna complain and take money for 'solving'?",Galven327,e95iot4,conservative
"Half of the nation's homeless are in: 

California (D), Washington (D), Texas (R), Florida (R) and New York (D)

and those are also the five most populated states.",Fry_Philip_J,e96ikui,conservative
Reminds me of the “1 in 4 homeless people are women” ad.,superdude411,e95v7yq,conservative
"There are no ready made solutions to homelessness because what works for one neighborhood may not work for the next one and could even make the problem worse by subsidizing vagrancy or drug abuse or disincentivizing job seeking. I don't think we need homeless initiatives at all, we should support our local charities who best know the people they're serving.",username2239,e96ok9n,conservative
"Well, yes, there are some who will capitalize on it, but I'm referring to the run of the mill liberal voter and most everything the left of that, not left wing leadership.  Left wing leadership is definitely chock full of cynics and opportunists.",fuck_im_dead,e95ixji,conservative
"It was 1 in 7, actually.",higmage,e99bka4,conservative
Of course. It’s all they got nowadays. ,Kutepov,e95rouk,conservative
Civility for thee but not for REEEEEE.,ngoni,e95rlco,conservative
"At this point it’s not even civility, it’s lunacy ",phantomcut3,e969ctc,conservative
Uh... because I said so???,chriztee,e95q574,conservative
Yeah it’ll just magically sort itself out. ,Kutepov,e95rw0w,conservative
"Like, when I was in college, my dad paid my maxed out credit card bill so I mean, it's like that, right?",cavemanben,e95zvnn,conservative
"I wonder if she's ever taken the most basic of economics classes. It doesn't appear so.

This is another nut that's running on emotion and emotion alone. Unicorns won't pop up and provide the money needed for the magical utopia she has in her heart of hearts. They're about as likely to exist as the US having the means to provide for her dystopian utopia.",GFZDW,e95vezp,conservative
we'll pay for it the same way we pay for things now. by making more debt.,SKWM3000,e961q6b,conservative
"> I wonder if she's ever taken the most basic of economics classes

She has a bachelor's degree in economics and international relations.  Right from Cracker Jacks University ",Jizzlobber42,e96a6e2,conservative
Like the anti-Trump reeeeesistance has been sleeping for 2 years.  Oh lordy ,Jizzlobber42,e96ym8u,conservative
As opposed to Comey's sleeping at the switch half of his tenure as FBI Director? ,psstein,e972v2k,conservative
I wonder how many people in hollywood feel like I feel at work. “Just play along so you don’t get fired but then vote straight Republican” lol,HolsterOfNuts,e95na7r,conservative
I am not at all surprised. The leftist Hollywood-mafia has clearly proven that they will tolerate no opposition to exist.,Kutepov,e95rzrc,conservative
[deleted],,e960tmx,conservative
"Um, lets not gloss over that fact that Gimli son of Glóin is Conservative. ",Lillt61,e96wp5c,conservative
The ‘great silent majority’ idea didn’t come out of nowhere.,superAL1394,e96cn0f,conservative
What happened in the end?,phantomcut3,e96925b,conservative
Please primary him in 2020.,XMAGA_1776X,e96lm5z,conservative
This dude is off the rails. ,soxfan90,e96qjct,conservative
"This dude is insane, surprised his neo-nazi views & rheroric are tolerated. ",DullPencil,e97daph,conservative
"Haha imagining them eloping to Cuba would be hilarious, and really convenient.",War-Damn-America,e96n7r9,conservative
He may lose reelection today before needing to be primaried. I know it’s gonna be a close race for him. ,Zac1245,e96mn6u,conservative
">After Vogue promoted Ocasio-Cortez in October with a photoshoot by the industry's best photographer Annie Leibovitz, Teen Vogue tweeted, ""Can't #endpoverty without ending capitalism!"" 
Somehow, the same editors who were pushing 5 oz cremes for $330, an act of sheer capitalism, are now telling us that socialism is the key to prosperity.


I'll take Irony for $1,000 Alex",MajesticMulva,e96gec6,conservative
None of these rich leftists realize that their ivory towers are going to come down if they get what they think they want,BlueJeansBlackShirt,e96yawj,conservative
What exactly is wrong with John James?,AgreeableEnergy,e94vcor,conservative
John James. Sounds alliterative... hi frozone!,AnIntellectualPerson,e955jv5,conservative
"The reporter was fired shortly after - https://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2018/nov/6/michigan-paper-fires-reporter-bias-against-gop-sen/
",AD_1172,e95mjc2,conservative
"The lying media is all over ""rock star"" white guy turned latino O'Rourke, but doesn't cover Mr. James.",ChunkyArsenio,e95fwe0,conservative
lol liberal democrat scum. I hope John James pulls this out.,Dorian_v25,e94vdzh,conservative
Holy shit Bad Axe made national news.  I did some freelance photography for the Huron Daily Tribune like a decade ago.,wengerlight,e95khkf,conservative
Racist!  Pure white trash racist liberal reporter!  Obvious she doesn’t want him to win because he is black!  She needs to lose her job!,mattmcd20,e94vu2p,conservative
">Bad Axe, Michigan.

 I wonder what's behind the name of this place.",JustAnotherJon,e95b42d,conservative
"Michigan is interesting right now. We voted for Trump and have a very red state government.  But keep electing Democrat senators. 

The anti John James adds are just Trump saying he supports JJ. They must believe that Trump is no longer that popular here. I know a lot of Conservatives who are not Trump fans mainly because they are so religious.  Also the im not sure how the anti illegal immigrant stuff plays here because it really isnt a problem. If anything I know farmers and apple farmers who have a hard time finding enough seasonal help. ",Nonsenseism,e95kkq0,conservative
"It says a lot to me about the paper, that she was comfortable both criticizing James and dropping an F bomb. It's extremely sloppy and unprofessional.",JaneTheThird,e95n7z4,conservative
"[Direct link to call. ](https://youtu.be/LiFl8yr5gr0)

This is unacceptable Michigan.  Let's fly",puz23,e95qthc,conservative
God I wish I could vote for John James.,steampunker13,e95tiq8,conservative
He’s a Constitutional Conservative from what I understand— a Leftist’s nightmare. ,mikeygio,e94vhph,conservative
"He's a black conservative. Which is their worst fear, the democrats can only win because the African American community votes 95% democrat. If the Republicans can get even 15% of the African American vote, there wouldn't be a democrat elected to the presidency for the next 30 years.",Notalent13,e9563cz,conservative
"He's a black, conservative, Christian, West Point grad, Army Captain with combat deployments",beachmedic23,e95bepv,conservative
Doesn’t have a D next to his name.  No real issues I’m sure.,booblitchutz,e9553nn,conservative
"> What exactly is wrong with John James?

Well, he's a black conservative.  That is literally all the Ctrl-Left needs to hate him with the fury of a thousand suns",Jizzlobber42,e95ur3m,conservative
Is... is that... journalistic integrity?,snowballtlwcb,e95x728,conservative
"Farm fields, mostly",mm1255,e95mmds,conservative
Obviously the tomahawks missed a few too many ancestors back in the day,ProngleReady2Mongle,e95db6i,conservative
"My middle school history teacher was from Bad Axe. You can imagine, middle school boys thought that was pretty bad axe.",LegionBaby,e95ykgb,conservative
[You forgot the worst part he's a *black* constitutional conservative whose betrayed his own people. ](https://youtu.be/FG-91Rj6B0Y),puz23,e95qh1i,conservative
Not to mention he’s incredibly successful with an MBA from Ross ,Mmm_Hmmmmm,e964hnn,conservative
Yeah. He’s a walking refutation of their rhetoric. ,mikeygio,e95tmi8,conservative
No but if the FBI just stretched it out for the next 5 years evidence would magically appear. John Oliver told me so.,orangeeyedunicorn,e954i6w,conservative
Just like the Russia investigation.,Galven327,e959z5y,conservative
"I can't believe that the left has embraced a ""just believe"" mantra about sexual assault. It's so topsy turvy and it's deliberately designed to put blind trust in women to be the truth, as if they are something more than human. If they we're really concerned about equality, they wouldn't be pushing for a ""just believe me, ok"" platform.

 It's so surreal what has happened to the democrats. It's like watching the plight of David Wallace in the Office. Right now is about the time where Democrats are trying to sell us the ""suck it"" machine.",4KDoritos,e944f4z,conservative
I had literally never heard Judy Monroe-Leighton’s name until this story surfaced. ,senorbiloba,e94uwot,conservative
In God We Trust- all others pay cash,teezer145,e94hj1c,conservative
Sad to see due process had to proven to matter and just seen as a given,letmeim,e94mz2r,conservative
"I think common sense is enough to prove due process matters.  I used this scenario on a ""believe all victims"" person.

Lets say a gas station was robbed and the clerk was shot at 2:30 A.M, the robber had a ski mask on and no video footage.  I call the cops and say it was you who did it.  Now it is up to you to prove you were in bed sleeping and not out robbing that gas station.  Now lets say this was an unsolved crime that happened 10 years ago and I accuse you of this.  You are guilty unless you can prove you were sleeping in the middle of the night 10 years ago.",flippy76,e95knzb,conservative
"Absolutely. Had he been prevented from being confirmed due to allegations that were provably false, he should have had some legal recourse against that accuser. That being said, I don’t know that ramming through SCOTUS nominees is what the founders really intended. And based on his testimony alone, I didn’t really want him on the court. ",VXMerlinXV,e94396n,conservative
[removed],,e948k7i,conservative
libtards gonna pay.,methos04,e95l2zt,conservative
"It's a social shaping tool.  A push-the-pendulum as far as possible to one side thing.  Where people don't really buy it, but will go along with it to see change they like.  The problem of course is it takes on a life of its own, has unintended consequences and creates new victims.   ",Roez,e94sz14,conservative
"Because that’s the flattery tactic they’re trying.  Democrats don’t REALLY believe that, it’s a tactic to try to woo women to vote for them.  Same with the flattery they throw to blacks, gays, etc.  Anyone who feels like a victim who isn’t white and male is their target.  Flatter, then shackle with shame if they question.  In the meantime implement policies that keep them down and dependent.  Rinse repeat.",booblitchutz,e94u5sw,conservative
Feminism is about equality between men and women as much as lupinism is about equality between wolf and sheep.,AnarkeIncarnate,e951gxr,conservative
"Most credible experts just want accusations taken seriously, not to blindly want one party’s statement taken as absolute truth. ",VXMerlinXV,e946t3q,conservative
the truth doesnt matter.  ,polerize,e951e24,conservative
"Yes, ""just believe"" is ridiculous. ""just believe"" God exists, ""just believe"" all environmental scientists are wrong. On topic: these extreme immoral tactics are not new, the Republicans invented them and are by far most proficient with them. See gerrymandering, Gorsich etc. ",JessePinkmanAnswers,e95dkrg,conservative
suspicious that the believe the victim media always focused on the allegations of the nice middle-class professor rather than the increasingly crazy 2nd and 3rd allegations such as witnessing gang rapes.,jimrosenz,e94yad0,conservative
"Really great book, and I highly recommend it to just about everyone.",somegaijin42,e951c9w,conservative
24/7 video surveillance is the only answer.,fifaislife206,e95payl,conservative
"His confirmation was not a ramming in any sense of the word. I might only appear that way due to the hysteria the left produced, which was rightly ignored in favor of reality.",HandsumNap,e94sxav,conservative
"One of the accusers admitted to lying

Edit: it's the second sentence of the article...",ColePatrol,e949if4,conservative
"Isn't the burden of proof on the one making the accusation?

She has to prove he did it, not the other way around.",YeahOKWhateverDude,e94n7xp,conservative
"Please enlighten me on sufficient due process (for you, personally) when there is no crime scene, no physical evidence, and no witnesses.",bigjilm1275,e94ljmk,conservative
See: French Revolution and Salem Witch Trials,Juxen,e94ukfr,conservative
"I feel like the idea that ""Democrats"" (pretty big generalization of a lot of people) don't just want you to believe them. They want them to all be taken seriously.",LrdCheesterBear,e94k2ha,conservative
"That actually seems like good journalism, no? Like don’t lend credibility to the more outlandish claims until they have been substantiated? The “don’t believe the victim media” could learn a thing or two. ",senorbiloba,e94yn6x,conservative
"I disagree. Had we not had the midterms looming, I would have preferred a more in depth FBI investigation, to clear his name more thoroughly. The federal government can’t order pizza in a week, let alone vet multiple sexual assault allegations. ",VXMerlinXV,e94vvn1,conservative
[removed],,e94a8cj,conservative
[removed],,e94m8ui,conservative
Is that on Netflix yet? It sounds awesome.,fifaislife206,e95p7ws,conservative
Absolutely. ,VXMerlinXV,e94ks9p,conservative
"Absolutely. But that’s not limited only to the left. Working with that population, getting the ball rolling on an investigation can be an uphill battle to say the least. ",VXMerlinXV,e94l4j4,conservative
"I think the issue is more that media said there were multiple accusations, but only focused on the few details there were regarding Ford. They didn’t go into detail on the more outlandish claims, but good journalism would be not mentioning them at all. It was obvious even to dem senators that the other claims were ridiculous",Tony_Cappuccino,e958se1,conservative
"He passed six background checks BEFORE they made up the allegations.

It goes without saying that if the guy who raped you is being investigated by the FBI, you don’t wait until AFTER he’s cleared before you mention the rape.",FI_Guy_NC,e94ww9d,conservative
"[https://globalnews.ca/news/4628088/brett-kavanaugh-rape-accusation-lie/](https://globalnews.ca/news/4628088/brett-kavanaugh-rape-accusation-lie/)

&#x200B;

[https://www.wsj.com/articles/a-kavanaugh-accuser-recants-1541371466](https://www.wsj.com/articles/a-kavanaugh-accuser-recants-1541371466)

&#x200B;

[https://www.ksn.com/news/national-world/kavanaugh-accuser-admits-to-fabricating-rape-story/1572629195](https://www.ksn.com/news/national-world/kavanaugh-accuser-admits-to-fabricating-rape-story/1572629195)",Godsdj,e94esn5,conservative
But not all have said they were lying.,Vancocillin,e94gmci,conservative
"I guess the question is how you would expect to prove the allegations false, or true, in this case, regardless of ""due process"".  You seemed to imply that due process would potentially provide some alternate outcome.",bigjilm1275,e94q7x5,conservative
Had the FBI spoken to any of those women prior to his nomination to SCOTUS?,VXMerlinXV,e9503x9,conservative
[removed],,e94hf7f,conservative
Other people present have...,monkeiboi,e94m5it,conservative
"Of course not. Feinstein kept the letter a secret until AFTER the background checks were complete.

How naive does a person have to be to fall for such a pathetic stunt?",FI_Guy_NC,e95184f,conservative
"Hey, all I did was point out that one of the accusers recanted because she pushed a story that either wasn't her's, or she fabricated. I saw you asking for a link and thought I'd oblige.",Godsdj,e94l7qe,conservative
"shh. winning. proven false, you know, like this was a trial, like there was allowed to be an investigation, like the allegation was actually about sexual assault, not rape.

Just push headlines. ",JustForThisSub123,e94khti,conservative
"Feinstein absolutely grandstanded the event and tried to leverage everything she could get out of it. I still wouldn’t have confirmed him, had I had a say in it. His behavior during the hearings was inappropriate, and unbecoming of a justice. ",VXMerlinXV,e9564c5,conservative
">His behavior during the hearings was inappropriate

I've heard this line repeated quite a bit, and it's entirely subjective. For someone falsely accused of heinous crimes, I'd say he conducted himself just fine. ",snailspace,e958qzh,conservative
"It is 100% subjective, yes. ",VXMerlinXV,e958zgq,conservative
Jim who? ,foodVSfood,e96hpjh,conservative
I think he hosts the Price is Right...,CASunDevil24,e96jkzf,conservative
Sssssmokin!,Themusician67,e96zdmq,conservative
California is one race away from a super majority in both legislative chambers last I checked. When it rains it pours ,KnightofFaith26,e97t738,conservative
"Government officials countered the repeal by calling it the elimination of road maintenance funding. The counter should've been what the state was already getting and spending on roads. And of course pull money from somewhere else if actually needed, not desired. But that's fiscal responsibility. 

",postonrddt,e98aa49,conservative
"False: Fearmongering on the Left has been integral in 2018 coverage. Fearmongering has been the strongest from CNN, MSNBC, NYT, WaPo etc. ",burtmaklin1,e969jbj,conservative
Vote(for me) or I will publicly shame you.,postonrddt,e960liw,conservative
In Cincinnati they’re mailing these documents that show your voting record and your neighbors voting records. So all my neighbors now know how frequently I vote,HawkeyeFan321,e96d6yw,conservative
Only reason it’ll be an upset is because for weeks the Dems have been reporting fake numbers to call races to dems early ,anon20202,e95u4uu,conservative
"Only if we get out there, though.",LethiasWVR,e95u0ta,conservative
Just like in 2016?,awksomepenguin,e95uvk9,conservative
I would remain cautiously optimistic. Its possible for a upset in the Dems favor.,Dank_Cartographer,e95u8ar,conservative
Conflating republican with Christian is where you messed up. They are not synonymous. Preserve your Christian values in your home and community. Preserve the Constitution that guarantees your right to do so at the ballot box.,justhere2havefun,e9654r4,conservative
And our masculine values.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e96cbpj,conservative
"New post from a 1 hour old Reddit account with nothing else


🤔 ",posidonius_of_rhodes,e968kgy,conservative
Troll,nampster6,e9774zq,conservative
"As a catholic, I agree I don’t want my or other’s beliefs forced upon one another",F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e96962f,conservative
God bless those lib trolls. They’re like stalkers to r/conservative.,DarthNaseous,e96gg53,conservative
Move. I speak from personal experience. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9847es,conservative
Leave ASAP.,scrubking,e984flr,conservative
Fox News called Dems taking house too early. 130 seats to go,ENEB1487,e97i17o,conservative
Gavin up by 400k now.  No surprise,BrockLee76,e97j8zv,conservative
"Nah, man. Once the bay area and LA/San Diego counties are all counted, Cox is going to be down 7-10 points. There's not a lot of hope for Republicans in statewide CA elections anymore.",mastaxn,e97kntu,conservative
CNN did that.  WTF.,chabanais,e97hv1s,conservative
"They must have done it on exit polling, crazy Gavin has pulled ahead by a substantial margin now.",ultimis,e97q7vq,conservative
They also tried to call the Wisconsin race at 80% when Evers was up by 13k votes. It’s been ~2-3k vote variance since then. ,cronikk12,e97o2ap,conservative
I don't think Republicans have a chance. Do you?,CentrOfConchAndCoral,e97j91p,conservative
They did the same thing to Bernie voters in 2016.,FooLyCooLie,e97hytj,conservative
"Yeah, what a bummer that he's governor after the shit condition he left San Francisco in. A real do-nothing.",FooLyCooLie,e97qc5b,conservative
"I've been keeping up with the Senate races mainly, and there is plenty of potential for MI to be pulled red, Arizona retains, and a surprise pull in keeping House. But we'll be up til 3AM EST just to see the results",ENEB1487,e97l8hb,conservative
Dems are pulling ahead right now. ,CentrOfConchAndCoral,e97m0fc,conservative
"Controversy aside, this is an honorable and fantastic monument that could not have come soon enough. Those soldiers were heroes. They saw the glorious ideal this country was destined to be, even in the face of horror and adversity, and put up their lives to start the long and difficult process of achieving it. God bless them and may they Rest In Peace. ",paulbrevik,e951whr,conservative
Worst Racist Ever,Vrael22,e951jwi,conservative
"Insane story from CNN explaining how this is actually racist, in 5....4...3..2.",BigAl265,e955g8e,conservative
"Orange Man is bad! Orange Man say bad things of Blacks... Sarcasm and idiocy aside, this is incredible! ",ENEB1487,e953c8r,conservative
But CNN told me he was racist. ,Artstra,e956g9x,conservative
Exactly what a Communist White Supremacist Nazi racist bigot *would* do! ,Jizzlobber42,e95zxs1,conservative
"He does a really shitty job at being a white supremacist. The other right, Mr. Trump!",nampster6,e9778so,conservative
"Isn’t that funny?  The left said he was racist, Nazi etc etc ad nauseum.  Yet here he is! ",Wysiwyg25,e951nid,conservative
"If for some reason the media decides to cover this, they’ll flip it around somehow.",EvenGotItTattedOnMe,e95km7a,conservative
But of course.  They can’t have our president looking like a good guy when they’ve played him as a villain this whole time. ,Wysiwyg25,e963trb,conservative
"“If you want to be a political operative, get out of journalism....”

Wow, that is rich coming from the left.",bumpy-meyers,e94wsbw,conservative
Are they ever pleased? ,Havebaconwilltravel,e94sx6s,conservative
"Damn, she really stuck with it also..unapologetic nor tweet deleting. Not that she had any reason at all to do either. What in the serious hell is wrong with these people. Like..I mean. I know liberals and deal with them in my daily life but they are nothing like these psychos.",shelzmike,e955fmt,conservative
"I love the ""So what you're saying is..."" comments and it's *not at all* or even close to what the person is saying.",longrifle,e95di4t,conservative
Wonder if that is a #walkaway moment,HowRememberAll,e95e5xe,conservative
"Pete Davidson is a drugged out, hateful, steaming pile of shit. I recall Rob Lowe’s roast where he is calling Ann Coulter a bitch to her face on television as he’s shaking with unwarranted hate and anger. I’d love to spit some Beechnut in that dude’s eye...",goat_nebula,e95hiep,conservative
The last thing you should want to do is please the Left.,Otto-Carpenter,e95lyqf,conservative
"The left is in a lose/lose situation.

If they win today they unleash a mob that will be hellbent on destroying everything that makes America great and it will turn average Americans off before 2020.

If they lose they will triple down on Russia and say they need to go more left to the point where only one of their socialist darlings can win a primary.",highonstress,e95uq6g,conservative
"The saddest thing is Hunt responded to the wingnuts with explanations of her original tweet. There was NOTHING wrong with her original tweet. It was an example of free thinking, free expression. Harmless. Responding to ridiculous counter tweets only legitimizes them and empowers those making them. We need to start telling people loudly and firmly when they say and write b.s. to SIT DOWN AND SHUT UP.",Coolbreezy,e964bc3,conservative
It's amazing the irony the left walks itself into repeatedly. I feel like half the reason they're so pissed at us is because we laugh at them so much. ,xJownage,e951doi,conservative
She could always get a job at CNN.,Coolbreezy,e964hb9,conservative
Only if they are 110% right and never wrong.,Enzo_SAWFT,e94u827,conservative
I'm actually kind of proud of her for not walking it back. So many would just fold. ,rkreutz77,e95mem5,conservative
"It is the very reason they hate the NPC label so much. 

And one of the many reasons it makes me laugh so very hard.",bumpy-meyers,e9536td,conservative
"Which literally never happens. So no, they are never pleased.",AgreeableEnergy,e94v7mm,conservative
The 110% right person will harass the 100% correct person for not being right enough ,b50willis,e95l39c,conservative
Libertarian Party or Libertarian Philosophy?,ReaganTroll,e96id1y,conservative
"Libertarianism and conservatism overlap on a lot of issues, but aren't the same. I usually disagree with libertarians when it comes to things like abortion, foreign policy, immigration, etc. They tend to be pro-choice, favor isolationist foreign policy, and some want very loose immigration laws. I know some libertarians who lean conservative on those issues as well, but in general, they don't. I'm just basing this on my own observations. All in all, I usually get along with libertarians, as they're usually an ally when it comes to things like gun rights. 

If you're talking about the Libertarian Party, my feelings are more negative. I don't think they represent libertarianism very well, and their candidates often end up taking votes away from Republicans who are more libertarian than the Libertarian Party candidate. They effectively aid the Democrats in important elections, and that's unacceptable. ",GuitarWizard90,e96ihyg,conservative
I'm sorta libertarian on certain issues but the Libertarian Party is completely insane.  It says a lot when John McAfee was the least insane candidate at their convention in 2016.,tja_1478,e96kr7t,conservative
"Libertarians are good people; unfortunately,  libertarian candidates help elect Progressives. ",ErieHog,e96k0gn,conservative
I'd beg you not to judge us based on the libertarian sub.,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e96ldrs,conservative
"I prefer Libertarian Conservatism, so something more in the vein of social freedoms, fiscal conservatism, but still pragmatic policy as opposed to blanket ideological dogma. For instance, the idea of open borders is absurd in the context of nation-states.

It is a purist ideology that isn't wholly practical, kind of like socialism. Where there is the freedom to do so (like deep red areas) it may be fine to vote for one but on the national scale the right is already battered and under constant fire as is so a vote for Libertarians is a waste and shooting yourself in the foot.",MackMizzo,e96oluy,conservative
"TLDR: ok with libertarians, love their ideas, wish they could present them better and not be as dogmatic as they present themselves. A marriage between the parties could be the best thing to happen to both parties. 

I'm a constitutional conservative, but I would probably be right in the middle between conservative and libertarian. Libertarians have a tendency to not like the ""conservatarian"" title, so I'll stick with constitutional conservative.

That being said, I like a lot of the philosophy of the libertarian movement and have become much more libertarian myself and have read a lot of the thought leaders in it. Now I basically want somewhere close to a 75% reduction in government. This is largely due to me reading about the constitution and its Founders and how massively the progressives from the early 20th century fucked up out constitution and out laws. 

For example, the Commerce Clause was effectively destroyed and perverted to its current interpretation. This was all based on a Supreme Court decision that said a citizen could not cultivate wheat on his own property because it competed against the wheat market, therefore the government could regulate the Commerce to the level of the individual (or something along those lines, I don't have the text in front of me). The original purpose was to stop states from starting their own forms of currency and placing tariffs against each other. That original interpretation is a far cry from what it is today. Now, we have entire departments built on this improper interpretation that are effectively regulatory cancer (meaning non-stop and ever growing). If we had a proper interpretation of that clause alone, I can almost guarantee you would see 25-50% of the government vanish overnight.

I see what individuals can do. I see what the government can do. I would bet on the individual 99% of the time.

I am not a libertarian because I see a need for the government and I have noticed that there are a lot of libertarians (maybe its the most outspoken ones) who effectively want anarchy, even if they do not consider themselves to be ancaps. Just take the ""muh roads"" argument. I believe the government should make and maintain roads. In the civil war, one of the big problems the south had was different track sizes of their trains, which made it extremely difficult to transport supplies. If we were to have a land war on American soil, it would make sense to have roads regulated (or built and maintained) by the federal government. Even if the roads only have private owners, it is extremely important militarily to regulate the roads so military vehicles and aircraft can use them. Now, roads are maybe 1-2% of federal budgets, so clearly the taxes we have are significantly too much and this argument doesn't justify the other 98% of spending. More making the argument for some kind of government being needed. 

I wish that libertarians would be warmer to conservatives and vice versa. We are clearly not enemies or even opponents. Conservative and libertarians break down on what government should be/do and what our place in the world is. Even then, we can easily discuss these differences   because they are arguments that occur within each of the two parties as well. Conservatives could become even less pro-government and more pro-individual by listening to libertarians. Libertarians could understand the necessity of some restrained government and need of a cohesive culture from listening to conservatives. If the parties could merge and retain the best of both, I would never vote for a different party.

Additionally, the guy who stripped on stage did massive damage to the libertarian party. So did the people booing at the candidate saying that 5y/o shouldn't buy heroin. Having this kind of stuff happen makes it look like you don't take yourselves or your ideas seriously when they should be taken very seriously. ",molon-labe7,e96kgo2,conservative
Many conservatives are libertarian...they share many of the same values.,Mercennarius,e96oqbi,conservative
"I can support a lot of libertarian ideology, it's always the candidate that I usually end up having a problem with. 

That can be said about a great number of politicians though. ",MajesticMulva,e96r8y8,conservative
"According to their sub. Memes, weed, and taxation is theft.",zeldaisaprude,e96s8id,conservative
"It's known that [Democrats Fund Libertarian Spoilers](https://spectator.org/democrats-fund-libertarian-spoilers/), and some of their party is [pro-abortion](http://pro-choicelibertarians.net/) and [anti-voluntarism](https://fee.org/articles/must-a-jewish-baker-make-a-nazi-cake/).

However, there is another sect that is [pro-life](http://www.l4l.org/) and [voluntary](https://www.newsweek.com/must-jew-bake-cake-nazi-same-sex-marriage-lakewood-mullins-craig-447427). Most of that sect has joined the [Republican Liberty Caucus](http://rlc.org/).

In principle, I agree on some issues including social liberties and fiscal responsibility. As far as the party, I feel like they threw away their chance to get serious when they [danced around naked](https://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2016/may/29/libertarian-party-chairman-candidate-strips-stage-/) and elected Gary Johnson as their candidate.",DEYoungRepublicans,e96jh94,conservative
Thanks to everyone contributing to the discussion! ,hajjr6,e96k8v1,conservative
"A quick way to tell a conservative from a libertarian:

[0761: What differentiates conservatives from libertarians?](https://www.quora.com/What-are-the-key-ideas-beliefs-that-differentiate-conservatives-from-libertarians/answer/Dennis-Pratt-3)",DenPratt,e96q7w6,conservative
"Yeah, there’s a big difference. ",justhere2havefun,e96k442,conservative
"The libertarian philosophy. The party is... odd... at best. By definition, everyone in it is super individual so naturally they’re gonna have a hard time working together.",hajjr6,e96l2x0,conservative
"Funny, I was told that voting for Gary Johnson was what helped elect Trump. ",justhere2havefun,e96kg2u,conservative
Yeah I’ve got that problem. I’m super libertarian but the bad part is voting libertarian takes away votes from republicans. If I’m being honest I’m not too keen with the Republicans right now because of the amount of spending they’re doing. I ended up voting libertarian and republican today though.,hajjr6,e96k7kv,conservative
Nah I more frequently go on that sub than this one actually. As shitty as that sub can be I love the free open debates,hajjr6,e96vmk5,conservative
The sub can be a shit show sometimes lol. But overall I love visiting it,hajjr6,e97di3g,conservative
"Okay just out of curiosity, what’s wrong with being pro abortion? I think abortion is morally wrong but I think that’s a decision everyone should make for themselves.",hajjr6,e96jx8o,conservative
"I love libertarian Philosophy. Mises, Rothbard, Hayek, Dr. Ron Paul, Thomas Dilorenzo, and a ton of other authors are all really good. The libertarian Party has become a husk of its former self though. They had bill weld as their VP candidate, the dude is a joke, and don't get me started on the clown that is Gary Johnson. ",iwasthebeaver,e96lhv3,conservative
"This is why conservatives and libertarians need to get involved in primary elections. Help nominate *Republican* candidates that align with your libertarian or conservative views, instead of voting third party and helping the Democrats. ",GuitarWizard90,e96kp4g,conservative
"I am a regular there because of free speech. I just find anarchists (very common over there) to be insane, and impossible to talk to",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e96xm14,conservative
"Ron Paul said it best:
> Today, we are seeing a piecemeal destruction of individual freedom. And in abortion, the statists have found a most effective method of obliterating freedom: obliterating the individual. Abortion on demand is the ultimate State tyranny; the State simply declares that certain classes of human beings are not persons, and therefore not entitled to the protection of the law. The State protects the ""right"" of some people to kill others, just as the courts protected the ""property rights"" of slave masters in their slaves. Moreover, by this method the State achieves a goal common to all totalitarian regimes: it sets us against each other, so that our energies are spent in the struggle between State-created classes, rather than in freeing all individuals from the State. Unlike Nazi Germany, which forcibly sent millions to the gas chambers (as well as forcing abortion and sterilization upon many more), the new regime has enlisted the assistance of millions of people to act as its agents in carrying out a program of mass murder. - [Being Pro-Life Is Necessary to Defend Liberty](http://www.l4l.org/library/bepro-rp.html)",DEYoungRepublicans,e96k3og,conservative
"If you are able to see that abortion is the murder of babies, and you apparently do considering you believe it's morally wrong, then how can you possibly believe that it should be legal? Should murder in general be legal? Why should murder inside the womb be legal, and murder outside the womb be illegal? ",GuitarWizard90,e96kbyg,conservative
"If you see abortion as revoking one’s right to life, then it should be seen as something far more severe than an individual choice. That’s where the divide is. 

And some pro-choice libertarians would even argue that yes, the fetus does have the right to live, but it’s the woman’s uterus and she has the right to her own body to not be “used” by an unwanted person. (I have literally heard this argument.) So they’d argue the baby’s right to live clashes with the woman’s sovereignty over her own body.",justhere2havefun,e96ke5r,conservative
"I don't think murdering an innocent child is something people should have a choice to do. Watch [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OZXQBhTszpU&index=9&t=1s&list=WL) video and see if your views change at all. Abortion, at any point, is murder",Mr_0pportunity,e96kpw5,conservative
"That's kind of saying ""I think slavery is morally wrong but I think the decision whether or not to own a slave is something every white man should make for himself.""",Martbell,e96nnw2,conservative
"Killing a baby is pure evil, and nobody should have the ability to choose when it's most convenient for them to have a baby.",theofficalstrangeman,e97w6sn,conservative
Bill Weld was openly endorsing Hillary late in the 2016 campaign.,Martbell,e96nk7a,conservative
"Wow, I've never seen this before. Thank you very much for posting it!",Mr_0pportunity,e96kgdl,conservative
Yeah that’s fair enough. I’ll have to think about that! Thanks for giving me something to chew on.,hajjr6,e96pd3k,conservative
"yea so was Gary Johnson pretty much. I always voted Libertarian. After they pulled that I held my nose and voted for Trump. I still consider myself a right leaning libertarian, but the party platform has become a joke. ",iwasthebeaver,e96o41x,conservative
Yea they’ve really been trying to manipulate people,ambearlino,e96uir4,conservative
Really hoping it passes,ambearlino,e96biia,conservative
"I got a mailer from COPS saying to vote no, to ""stop the attack on bridge and road safety"".  ",BrockLee76,e96ss0m,conservative
"Looks like a trump voter to me, damn white people /s",Tomcat_AL200,e96i44e,conservative
[deleted],,e96vroy,conservative
"Yes, as I bet most of the crazy people would agree that the sky is blue and water is wet, it does not make those facts any less valid.",Tomcat_AL200,e96wzb1,conservative
Saying he blew it kind of implies there was chance for him to win in the first place.,Martbell,e964rib,conservative
"> Texas Republicans believe Ted Cruz was beatable — if only his opponent paid attention to them.


As a Texas Republican, all I can say is if O'Rourke ""paid attention to me"" it wouldn't change my opinion of him one bit. 


> By offering a cause rather than a candidacy, O’Rourke convinced America that a Texas Democrat could win statewide for the first time since 1994. A staggering $70 million flooded into his campaign. Celebrities came calling on a first-name basis. LeBron James made the black-and-white “Beto” signage famous. National reporters took turns deifying the skateboarding, punk-rocking congressman. And all the while, O’Rourke was flatlining. 


This paragraph does a good job of describing how I view ""Beto"" and how inauthentic his campaign and leadership has been. ",kavanaugh1,e965vhh,conservative
"Oh course he blew it, he ran as a far leftist in Texas. ",Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e963s9y,conservative
Uh pretty sure election hasn’t happened yet,the-divine-comedy,e9664uq,conservative
Beta.,scungillipig,e96mow8,conservative
There was just no chance. Its election day and not one MSM outlet is talking about Texas as if it will flip or even could flip. ,Themusician67,e96spbt,conservative
I feel like the people who actually care about issues and more importantly actually vote are not the ones who need to be told by celebrities who to vote for.,an0nymous_bosch,e966o88,conservative
"That paragraph also kind of shows the issue with Beto's campaign. He appealed to Limousine Liberals, Californians and New Yorkers, not Texans.",XYZ-Wing,e9719e1,conservative
He Beto not! ,Themusician67,e96sr6j,conservative
Relevant https://twitter.com/ComedyCentral/status/1058010774990286849,XYZ-Wing,e971frm,conservative
I wish she had interviewed me,IsthatTacoPie,e95ni6r,conservative
At what point does “misstating facts” become outright lying?,justhere2havefun,e95rvau,conservative
It looked so nice when only 3 percent of the vote came in.,arogozine,e984yat,conservative
I'm in Nevada. We got destroyed too. ,ElfenSpice,e98faqk,conservative
"Do these people realize Georgia only voted for its first republican Gov since the war, in 2003 with Sonny Perdue. ",Zac1245,e96e2i8,conservative
The Civil War was over 150 years ago. They are quite a bit out of the civil war,molon-labe7,e96b6q6,conservative
Vote for the candidate from the pro-slavery party to prove you're not racist....,expendable_Henchman,e96bnct,conservative
"Of course they do. They are just playing the race card, as they always do, because they don't have anything to run on. They are banking on ""white guilt""",Mr_0pportunity,e96gdg4,conservative
Any dead relatives near Detroit?  They may offer their vote?,mattmcd20,e95suj1,conservative
Can I travel across state lines and vote without voter id?  Or are only Democrats allowed to do this?,DeeplyDisturbed1,e95nt67,conservative
Saved incase they’re correct,Dank_Cartographer,e960d1j,conservative
This is serious.  You show this and someone may not vote because of it.  Yes that is a stupid reason to give up and not vote but there are stupid people out there.,nooneuknow42,e96tt8w,conservative
Now they have to change it by a couple of votes so no one gets suspicious.  ,el_jay_sea,e963bf5,conservative
Time traveler playing pranks on us?,Martbell,e9622op,conservative
Can I vote twice or is that only a Democrat thing?,bitERRORrate,e95q4e2,conservative
Shit I voted like 2 weeks ago,IsthatTacoPie,e95n94u,conservative
"Don’t just vote, provide rides for other red voters too",PurpleHouseSlippers,e95nx9j,conservative
"It's only a Democrat thing.  You also can't take your dead great-grandma to vote either, Democrat thing.",1amF0x,e95t01m,conservative
"Well, if the Dems dont' take the House after he gave them an 88% probability of doing so then I think quite a few people will be surprised ... the rest will be relieved.",RoundSimbacca,e95j6bo,conservative
"I'm not really solid on probability.  It does seem like he's trying to have his cake and eat it too.  His own data points suggest it's highly unlikely R's will retain the House or lose the Senate.  Yet, he says stuff like the above.  ",Roez,e94twhm,conservative
Aaaand this is why polls are worthless. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9518l4,conservative
Pft. I’d be surprised if Dems net over 10,MattMeduri,e9573dw,conservative
"Remember 2016! Remember Israel vs Obama! Trump has unleashed the ultimate weapon: A nationalist platform, a platform that reaches across middle America, and resonates across the GOP and the Republican Party alike. 19 seat increase for the Democrats projected and not even a flip of the House nor the Senate?!?! The Blue Puddle is getting ready to be engulfed by a RED TYPHOON! The Conservative agenda is going go win and expand!",ENEB1487,e9548sa,conservative
"538 has always expressed its forecast in terms of probability, so I wouldn't call it hedging, so much as I would call it proper statistical analysis. He not some sort of talking head who just makes predictions based on a gut feeling. In 2016 I recall some Republicans claiming he was wrong about that election, because he had Clinton winning. Except in reality, he said there was a 70% chance she'd win, or slightly better than 2:1 odds, so it was well within the realm of probability that she'd lose, and he acknowledged as much in the lead up to the election. The same is true now. He's forecast a range as to how Democrats will fair, and he acknowledges that there is around a 30% chance that range will be wrong, split between and under- and overestimating Democratic performance.",gprime,e94zom4,conservative
"You have a 1/6th chance to roll a 1 on a 6 sided dice. You shouldn't be surprised when it does.

It's a way for him to cover his ass, as he and the polls do not cover every data point. And polls have a looping effect on voter enthusiasm and turn out. Predicting exact voter percentages which is what polls are attempting to measure is near impossible.",ultimis,e94xfi0,conservative
There is a reason he's Nate Silver and not Nate Gold,Emperor_Aurelian,e959avn,conservative
"Really wish I could be as optimistic as a lot of you guys. I'm a pessimist, especially when it comes to politics. ",GuitarWizard90,e958jsu,conservative
">Israel vs. Obama 

Uh what",TheXarath,e9587j5,conservative
"Interestingly, a lot of leftists went after him leading up to the election because they thought he was giving Trump too high of a chance even though, as you point out, he was saying Hillary was a 2:1 favorite. It was yet another example of the left demanding full agreement or else. ",frasierfonzie,e958sc9,conservative
The betting markets have him running scared imho.  They've consistently given the Republicans a higher probability of holding the house than his forecast has.,Reven1911,e95bqe2,conservative
"My issue with him isn’t that he’s a data journalist because the way he speaks about statistical modeling is correct. It’s not a way to cover your ass to say 1/6 of a time a die will be cast to a 1. Thats called a fact based on probability. 

> Predicting exact voter percentages which is what polls are attempting to measure is near impossible.

That’s why you get odds. No one knows the exact outcome before the votes are counted. That’s why people build models. These models measure certain variables and then build possible outcomes based upon the outcomes the model perceives as possible. 538 even uses multiple models to try and encompass varying levels of complexity.

It’s like you think that 538 is trying to say these things are easy or that they know the exact outcome. They don’t. That’s why they lay it out as odds. My issue with them is they pretend to be nonpartisan and they suck democratic shoe laces all the time but I think their modeling is very solidly done.",tshep16,e953sx6,conservative
"Especially when you have polls covering essentially the same time period showing R +1 and D +13. That difference is way outside the margin of error, so the pollsters are making fundamentally different assumptions about the makeup of the electorate and therefore the polls have a garbage-in, garbage-out effect based on those assumptions. We'll find out who's right tomorrow night.",PubliusVA,e94yyq9,conservative
Dad jokes are the best jokes.  ,Roez,e95oz5m,conservative
I would say he is the best of the bunch though this clearly seems to be him cover g his ass incase there is another upset. ,ReduxCoffee,e95i5pd,conservative
"I studied 2016 hard. I’m watching this one close. Trust me when I say that I’m not just optimistic for the sake of being that way. There’s a viable path to a Senate supermajority. Although unlikely, republicans will definitely grow their majority in the Senate and retain the House. 

I’m also not alone. There are thousands of pedes who read and watch and study and they see it too. ",MattMeduri,e959oge,conservative
"Years ago, Obama sent election ""advisors"" to both Bibi's camp and his opponent's camp in effort to disrupt the Israeli election. It was only with Bibi adopted a nationalist message that resonated across Israel to clinch a landslide",ENEB1487,e95m4zl,conservative
">That’s why you get odds. No one knows the exact outcome before the votes are counted.

You would have to have positive and negative feed back loops based in your models. The system becomes chaotic, and you also have to account for all data (which regarding humans is unlikely). Nate is good at guessing 90% of elections because 90% of elections are easy to guess. Nate and his groupies were busy patting themselves on their backs in 2012 when he guessed the election correctly, yet his guess hadn't fluctuated at all based on the current events of that time.

He does a data reduction of the various polls, applies weights and biases to each. But then his own bias comes into effect. And more often then not he errors on the side of the Democrats. When you consistently error in one direction, your methodology is questionable. Getting lucky when you don't even account for huge swings in the election doesn't make your models correct, it makes you lucky.

I didn't say that the 6 sided dice example isn't correct. I""m saying why he is emphasizing it is he wants people to know that when ""low probability"" comes up he was biased. The reality is he is biased, even if he is stating a fact that is irrelevant to his bias.

>It’s like you think that 538 is trying to say these things are easy or that they know the exact outcome.

No what I'm saying is he is a fortune teller with an agenda. Good fortune tellers use data to formulate their predictions, while they make up a bunch of crap.

>My issue with them is they pretend to be nonpartisan and they suck democratic shoe laces all the time but I think their modeling is very solidly done.

We can agree on that. It doesn't matter if 90% of your work is done correctly and is straight by the book, if the other 10% is a fudge factor with an agenda.",ultimis,e954b9x,conservative
"This is my problem. About a week ago I was seeing polls that were D+8, D+4, R+1, and R+7 all in the same time period. This shit is all over the place ",molon-labe7,e95ioye,conservative
People over estimate the predictive power of models ,Emperor_Aurelian,e95ynpc,conservative
"Well, I certainly hope you're right. ",GuitarWizard90,e959zhx,conservative
The kicker is that bibi's chief adviser in his reelection was David Axelrod. ,game46312,e95ssz6,conservative
I'm curious what methods they use to determine turnout.  I know in the past some of it was based on historical trends.  No clue how they go about it now.  Do they base it on respondents answering enthusiasm type questions?  Where they can bump up certain groups based on feedback?,Roez,e95pdj6,conservative
lmao that was quick,CentrismIsExtremism,e956z27,conservative
Smart move on HDT's part acting so quickly. Brenda sounds like a better fit for Vox or Buzzfeed anyway.,MooMooCudChew,e95hi28,conservative
"Lol wow, well they’ll just find some other “progressive” to replace her. ",xPineappless,e95chvt,conservative
"Lol wow, well they’ll just find some other “progressive” to replace her. ",xPineappless,e95ck4u,conservative
"Well fuck Brenda Battel right back, apparently. Lol loser ",ot4842,e95lxv0,conservative
"Hey Brenda, CNN is on line one with a job offer.",fifaislife206,e95pe0s,conservative
"She's like 50 years old.

Not hipster enough to mingle with the Vox / Buzzfeed hipsters.",Rakall12,e95ky0p,conservative
That's worth saying twice.,Mehnard,e95mizk,conservative
"Oh no shit? That's what I get for not researching. Just took for granted it was some immature 20 something fresh out of college. That makes it even worse.
",MooMooCudChew,e95nuov,conservative
"Lol wow, well they’ll just find some other “progressive” to replace her. 


Lol wow, well they’ll just find some other “progressive” to replace her. 

",doobsftw,e96ht8c,conservative
"I’m guessing she wasn’t what Obama meant when he said we need more women politicians.
",anon20202,e95v044,conservative
"If he really wanted more women in power, he should have dropped out of the 2008 election and endorsed the McCain/Palin ticket. ",soxfan90,e95wzyx,conservative
or maybe he should’ve just paid his women cabinet members the same rate he did the men. ,anon20202,e95xsk1,conservative
Literally put $200/mo back into my pocket. If that's not help idk what is.,cons_NC,e95rmq8,conservative
Yeah we're all morons and the gubment can do so much better with our money right?,ngoni,e95rpxd,conservative
Helped me.,the-divine-comedy,e95q39n,conservative
"Ok Bette, why don’t you “help” me and send me a cool million. I mean, you have a net worth of $230 million. What are you? Greedy?",Rabidraccoon76,e95t0zo,conservative
Just another Statist playing games for their government masters. Pathetic to the highest degree. ,McKnight36,e95rr2w,conservative
I want to know where she got her mind reading device!  My husband needs that!,nooneuknow42,e96uzlk,conservative
Thanks multimillionaire limousine liberal lady for enlightening us peasants on our economic situation.,XYZ-Wing,e971q7i,conservative
"So maybe it shouldn’t be the main source of energy. Maybe it should be used with other ones, but I think we should work away from Middle East gas and oil. It makes us beholden to bad actors like the Saudis.",AyyyGreens,e95z1so,conservative
That's why it's great how much oil we're extracting. ,chabanais,e9603lt,conservative
The Shale Revolution ,cbzdidit,e96arqv,conservative
Making fossil fuels great again. ,Rightquercusalba,e967211,conservative
“Alt-right nazis salute and pledge their allegiance to Donald Hitler” - r/politics ,OprahSwagfrey,e94svmx,conservative
I like how the pa system was almost entirely drowned out by the voices of the crowd. I don't like how this video got cut short.,Cr8er,e94iygx,conservative
That kind of widespread patriotism gives me a big rubbery one.,Do_u_ev3n_lift,e94rz9e,conservative
They love the President.,StephenScherer1,e94a3ea,conservative
/r/gifsthatendtoosoon,amightybeard,e94k6wx,conservative
The pledge is communist garbage change my mind ,TheTurrettesGuy,e94lfus,conservative
"I went to that rally yesterday, it was a good time.",Shubadada,e95tk8l,conservative
[removed],,e94soii,conservative
"It's ""One nation under God"", not ""One nation, under God""",infinitycore,e94yszz,conservative
I’m sure the IRS did not forget to mention that access doesn’t actually mean 74% households watch fox news. They’re not that clumsy,lerossignol77,e94vrcl,conservative
"They definitely turned it down after the first line. We did the same thing in high school, the desired effect is to emphasize the crowd. A side effect being that it seems like the crowd is drowning out the PA. I agree with the video being cut short though, there is something powerful about a large group of people reciting a creed they cherish. ",yllwjacket,e955uzi,conservative
And their country. ,OstentatiousSock,e94g4sw,conservative
I think they love their country. ,Nonsenseism,e95mcuc,conservative
I don’t think it’s quite communist garbage but I feel like the National Anthem is better for this setting. They probably played it as well but at that point it feels like over kill.,CountDeGucci,e955v4z,conservative
It's funny how liberals paint trump as this idiot but at the same time hes also this manipulative mastermind who is doing everything in his power to create self gain. ,Uncle_Utters,e94szfk,conservative
"Not surprising that a leftist can’t do math, claiming half a nation is brainwashed when Fox does not reach half the nation. And they never miss a beat to bring up identity politics lol",lerossignol77,e94tzdr,conservative
/s? If not you should go home and reevaluate your views on republicans. Look in a mirror and tell me that 50% of the US are racists and bigots with a straight face. ,yllwjacket,e95631l,conservative
Crazy how our last President was black huh... ,Church556,e94uely,conservative
One nation under Trump ❤,ardee2124,e955uga,conservative
"They are at a Trump rally, I think it’s both. ",OstentatiousSock,e95t7an,conservative
"I saw some article on politics saying Trump was a Confederate president ..... as he is having a massive monument dedicated to African American soldiers, lol. Its mind boggling",LordStoffelstein,e94xva9,conservative
There isn't any logic,goldrotmgonly,e956cdl,conservative
"For a highly educated woman, her lack of constitutional knowledge is worrisome. PS Radar detector bans didn't work. ",DBG1998,e93tb2f,conservative
"> I believe in common sense gun safety legislation.

Such an outright lie. If she *actually* believed that banning certain types of weapons would have any affect on crime then she'd be pushing for a handgun ban since the vast majority crimes committed with guns are with handguns. ",nateious,e945o31,conservative
But she allows armed Black Panthers at her voting locations? Kemp now has a 12 point lead thanks to them. ,be_quiet_roo,e93vgqw,conservative
Ugh. I live in Georgia. Her ads are so fucking annoying.,Worldly_Wisdom,e94yyxp,conservative
"You know what's funny. She can get this ban ""assualt weapons"" law passed. Hell she can even pass the law requiring people to turn them in. And not a single person will do so because not a single person owns one. So... what is she accomplishing here exactly? Well besides waiting time and tax payer money.",tanktakach,e94qyvu,conservative
Please keep saying this.,Dorian_v25,e93wyjt,conservative
"This is why most democratic candidates aren't honest because, most the time they don't know what they'll do because they are just figureheads for their party, they won't do what the constituency wants, they'll do what their party wants them to do. ",Clownshow21,e94abdg,conservative
"This just in: “weapons are more dangerous than radar detectors”

 Can’t argue with that. ",justhere2havefun,e94brgu,conservative
This crazy woman is probably going to win thanks to all the Yankees moving down after f’ing their own states. At least the Georgia General Assembly will block her asinine ideas.,Rabidraccoon76,e93xztu,conservative
"We can't have discussions when your initial position doesn't reside within reality.

If you're negotiating salary for mid-management, you don't start at CEO level pay. It says you're not intrested in a good faith negotiation.",Sideswipe0009,e959jmk,conservative
Georgia you better do the right thing and not elect this looney toon.,methos04,e94a963,conservative
If you are stupid enough to think Georgia residents will let you take their guns you should go back to grade school.,gdmcdona,e94zza3,conservative
"What she said makes exactly no sense. And she's trying to tip toe around the answer. What certain people is she talking about? Felons who are already not allowed to own a weapon?

She wants guns to be turned in as a start of a conversation? So there's a possiblity that people could get them back? How does that work?

And her idea of common sense is people turning in their weapons, having a conversation, then maybe returning them or possibly not.

Let's face it. She doesn't want y'all having an AR-15. Plain and simple. And if she gets her way, they will be confiscated. 

Hello, Georgia? Is this thing on?",MajesticMulva,e94p746,conservative
Fucking good luck with that shit in Georgia. What a joke. ,ledsdeadbaby,e94fdl7,conservative
Molan labe.,jamrev,e94qyjd,conservative
"Is there one of those long German words for ""committing political suicide via honesty?""",FelixFuckfurter,e93xh79,conservative
Gun grabbing and health care traditional swamp Democrat talking points.,postonrddt,e93ymfc,conservative
"https://twitter.com/PKsbpdl/status/1059228375435235328

^ and this is why she has a chance at winning

http://www.pewsocialtrends.org/2017/06/22/the-demographics-of-gun-ownership/

http://www.pewsocialtrends.org/2017/06/22/americas-complex-relationship-with-guns/

We can post Colion Noir and feel-good stories about minority gun owners all we want (I'm a minority gun owner), but the GOP's refusal to reckon with mass demographic change and its decision to eradicate anyone who articulates pro-white policy is what is tilting places like **Texas** and **Georgia** from safe GOP to competitive as the left continues its demographic assault on the American nation.

",lost_snake,e93z0je,conservative
"I wonder if she intends to remove arms from blacks as well as whites, or if this whole gun control drama is just about taking away the guns of the evil white man, but it's cool to keep the blacks armed, because well, slavery",Wanderlust_520,e94kaq0,conservative
I saw some liberal post how she would make a great Governor. No she woulsn’t.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9400ao,conservative
She’s done. ,ghostanddarkness,e94ex58,conservative
"Great, she's compromising her oath of office right out of the gate. If she wins, Georgians better beware.",wiredcrusader,e949dru,conservative
Grade A turd.,nomaslee,e949s98,conservative
"What a steaming, shapless brown pile of stinking Democrat.",TheComedianGLP,e94gf3e,conservative
"The constitution is a living, breathing document that is meaningless to our modern society.

-NPC #352 ",fifaislife206,e94c73y,conservative
"There's educated and then there's credentialed.  She has the credentials but I'm not entirely sure that there's much education to back them up.

As has already been pointed out, she doesn't seem to have a problem with her supporters having firearms.  But then, totalitarians never do.      ",Colonize_The_Moon,e93xqzn,conservative
"Hammers are used in more assaults and murders then guns, so if she were serious she'd ban hammers.

EDIT: I know, it's ridiculous but that's the point :)",wynhdo,e94svbk,conservative
"Here is the only ""common sense gun safety legislation, 100% supported by objective FBI and state crime statistics:

Ban Democrats from owning or using firearms.

Ever.

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e94grkn,conservative
"The Black Panther thing is true (although I have no issue with peacefully exercising their right to bear arms).

However, I’m pretty sure the race is still neck and neck. No idea where you heard this 12 point lead thing but I highly doubt it. ",gt4674b,e93xx48,conservative
Funny how that works.,Northernrebel56,e93wh79,conservative
Wait.  Is this for real?  Article?,callthereaper64,e93wztb,conservative
">allows

Would she have any way to prohibit them? They aren't *her* voting locations, they're state polling locations.",PubliusVA,e94f92u,conservative
And her 1049471617845937162 door hangers and flyers in my mailbox. ,HumbleRaspberry15,e95td0j,conservative
"”they won't do what the constituency wants, they'll do what their party wants them to do.""

Are you kidding? Both sides do that.",CaptainBaldBeard,e955d33,conservative
"I know it's not much, but I'm a yank from the north who brought down here by business along with others. Me, my coworker, his wife, his wife's parents, and another coworker all got brought down and. We're all voting straight R.

Coweta reinforcements, at your service! ",KrimsonStorm,e94dywb,conservative
I don’t think she’ll win. ,Wiseheart1,e948aj2,conservative
"This is frustrating, as a life long GA resident, Atl becoming the new ""thing"" and lefties moving their cancer to this state is frustrating",Mtitan1,e94cdvp,conservative
If it's any consolation the midwest is turning red because of this. ,New_Pea,e941leh,conservative
"Liberal Californians, too.  Although they’re more focused on Denver and Austin, I’ve been seeing Atlanta pop up in my California friends’ list of potential escapes more frequently, especially since that queer eye show on Netflix came out.  While a lot of the people leaving California aren’t liberal like myself, we’re still outnumbered by the liberals that are leaving to seek lower cost of living",acada,e942xw4,conservative
">At least the Georgia General Assembly will block her asinine ideas.

If elected she will pull a Maura Healey (MA AG) and just do it.  Unless the a large enough group is willing to call her out on it and take her to court she will probably get away with it.",WIlf_Brim,e9430xv,conservative
Haha.  Yeah.  Yankees are the problem.  Johhny Reb is the only true conservative.  Are you for real?,tehForce,e94kmqy,conservative
We are trying. Well I am. I work in the city but live outside. Everyone at my office roots for this nut job. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e94v6zp,conservative
"It's Georgia, she's not gonna sniff the governor's seat unless she gets hired on as a cleaning lady",glkerr,e94c75z,conservative
The part she is tiptoeing around is that she wants to go much further but she knows it is not politically expedient. If she were to be honest in that interview she would say that she wants it to apply to all firearms. Of course that would instantly lose her the state so she is wishy washy in her response.,JustAnotherJon,e959p6w,conservative
Right. Like going in to Texas and saying they are going to confiscate guns. ,Kcarp6380,e94oskd,conservative
Der speekinhonesthangintimen,TheComedianGLP,e94jgjn,conservative
"You're 100% right but good luck with getting the GOP to actually address the issue. Utter the phrase ""Hart-Celler Act"" or ""Massive demographic shift"" around a ""respectable"" conservative and they will start sweating bullets and try to change the topic to something else. ",Trevor_awesome,e94lo8d,conservative
Tell Whites to have more children then.,Roidciraptor,e94fs7x,conservative
"Sure she would, of almost any Chinese province.",TheComedianGLP,e94jv1y,conservative
"“It was written by dead white men over 200 years ago, why should we care about it?”",samurguy990,e94d69j,conservative
You're so correct.,DBG1998,e93ysar,conservative
">There's educated and then there's credentialed.  She has the credentials  but I'm not entirely sure that there's much education to back them up.

You are correct sir. Look up Rep. Shelia Jackson Lee. She was visiting NASA and they showed her footage from one of the Mars rovers and she asked it was going to where ""they planted the flag."" She graduated from Yale.

&#x200B;",frosty147,e94sp92,conservative
*indoctrinated*,krepogregg,e95btxa,conservative
"It’s a poll that came out - I had to go look it up because of his comment too. That said, I don’t believe it either. It’s far too much of an outlier for all the other polls that show a tight race.",Pyronot,e93y44s,conservative
"It's not 12 points but I do feel like Kemp is up. The AJC latest poll had them in a virtual tie. If Kemp is tied in the AJC, he has to be up.",BangEndedScoot,e949af2,conservative
https://townhall.com/tipsheet/bethbaumann/2018/11/04/ga-gov-armed-black-panther-party-campaigns-for-dem-stacey-abrams-video-n2534893,DEYoungRepublicans,e93xaf6,conservative
"Not a yankee, I’m from the west coast and just barely moved to ATL, but if I vote I’m voting all conservative. I’ve spent way too much time around leftists (Portland, OR) and I see what they’re doing to their community, I want no part in it. ",LeaderOfTheBeavers,e94f5d9,conservative
"She never has or will be a winner.

She may fail upward, however, which is the standard Democrat mechanism for advancement.",TheComedianGLP,e94jbw0,conservative
"Try Texas.

We've got this infection in spades.

No pun intended.",TheComedianGLP,e94guxd,conservative
Can the rest of the crazy leftists leave California so us sane people can reclaim our state?,The_Mighty_Rex,e94hidd,conservative
I've never been on a march or protest in my life but I'd be out there if this happened (in Georgia btw and yes voting Kemp),DirtyBirde32,e946h4y,conservative
"It's a very real phenomenon that migrants bring their politics with them.  I live in Charlotte where the influx of non native Charlotteans has influenced local politics. The poster is speaking in broad strokes which can be dangerous. The folks moving from north to south are individuals and each person changes the politics based on their individual beliefs/ideology.

The broad message is if you left a blue state to move to a red state why are you voting to turn your new state into what made you leave your old state? That argument is ridiculously simplified, but the broad strokes are more true than untrue.

I welcome people from all backgrounds to my state, but the effect they have on local politics is real. This sentiment is strangely common among Democrats as well who broadly benefit from the migration in increased political power.",JustAnotherJon,e959h7v,conservative
Hopefully. Inside the city there’s a ton of support but I don’t think it goes too far outside the city limits. Let’s hope rural Georgia can make up for it!,HumbleRaspberry15,e95tl15,conservative
I'm in.,TheComedianGLP,e94ji5x,conservative
" “It was written by dead slave owning white men over 200 years ago, why should we care about it?” ",Snicsnipe,e94s89j,conservative
"I found your last statement so incredulous I had to fact check you. I've always thought she is literally the stupidest person in Congress, and that's saying a lot. Color me absolutely stunned. My apologies for doubting you, but damn.",DBG1998,e9cexjy,conservative
"This is Georgia, and you are happy that he is *virtually tied* with a Democrat?

Man, Kemp is such a weak candidate.",Roidciraptor,e94fl2u,conservative
"Thank you.

Few questions:

Is GA a open carry state?

Why are they supporting someone who wants to take their guns....

Isnt this considered voter intimidation/ gerrymandering and even voter suppression.",callthereaper64,e93xouq,conservative
Somebody needs a cap bussed.,TheComedianGLP,e94gm23,conservative
">but if I vote I’m voting all conservative.

If you're registered VOTE!!!",IvankasFutureHusband,e94fm60,conservative
I’m in GA too.  She worries me.  Appears reasonable.  Is not.,WIlf_Brim,e94ewpk,conservative
"No, the point is it's an Atlanta poll done by an heavily left leaning Atlanta newspaper. Atlanta thinks they run they state and can influence everyone. Spoiler alert, they don't. We don't give a fuck what goes on up there and the rest of the State is the exact opposite view wise. Everywhere I go I see nothing but Kemp signs. Zero Abrams signs. Exact same thing I ran across in Pennsylvania for Trump when I spent a week there October 2016.",somerandomguy02,e958opu,conservative
Did... did you not read the rest of the comment?,BangEndedScoot,e94fn2z,conservative
"If you have a weapons carry permit you can carry either openly or concealed. If you do not have the permit you can't carry either way.  
  
Assuming they were all properly licensed, there's nothing illegal about it.  
  
Not to say they aren't stupid defending a gun grabber with their ""weapons of mass destruction"" as she puts it.",diehardgiraffe,e9457ck,conservative
">Is GA a open carry state?  
>  
>Isnt this considered voter intimidation/ gerrymandering and even voter suppression.

It is an open carry state, but it is also voter intimidation and probably illegal if it happens on election day.  As I recall polling places are posted no weapons.

&#x200B;",WIlf_Brim,e942wd6,conservative
[deleted],,e93yp28,conservative
What if they want guns illegal and don’t plan to turn theirs in?,Lepreco-Inc,e94fs8j,conservative
Yes vote! ,KrimsonStorm,e94fw9f,conservative
"I did. Kemp is tied with a Democratic candidate in the red state of Georgia. He should have substantial gains above Abrams. He is a weak Republican candidate clearly, since Trump won the state with 5+ points.",Roidciraptor,e94g4g0,conservative
"GA is *not* open carry; both open and concealed carry require a permit in GA.

Source: Live in GA.",haplogreenleaf,e9455p7,conservative
"That was the point of my comment. Kemp isn't tied with Abrams, except in the AJC which is heavily biased for the left. If they're admitting the candidate they endorsed is tied with someone they heavily oppose, that means Kemp is up is probably up. Taking these poll numbers at face value is giving far too much credit to the publication.",BangEndedScoot,e94ggjf,conservative
Trump has never been anti gay. These people love being the victim I swear.,HolsterOfNuts,e961900,conservative
"Well no shit, that's the Border Patrol's job. The troops deployed are in *support* roles.",DogBeersHadOne,e96ngph,conservative
Back to the standard quo with Kanye West.,thatrightwinger,e963yh4,conservative
Do remember that Trump gave to Democrats too.,zaiisao,e9644rg,conservative
So what ? But he still respects trump as our POTUS & that is IMPORTANT. He is not like Robert De Niro saying Eff Trump on stage. ,lonewolfsigma8917,e965how,conservative
Time to separate ourselves from Kanye West because he is known for being one way on Monday and another way on Tuesday. ,getupkid1986,e96558m,conservative
"This is purely speculation on my part, isn't it quite likely that his continued recording career was threatened if he didn't ""return to the Democrat plantation."" ",MarvinsBoy,e9657me,conservative
"> Kanye West wrote a six-figure check for Democratic Chicago mayoral candidate [Amara Enyia](https://amaraenyia.com/the-issues/) just less than a week after he said he was “distancing” himself “from politics.”


> “Celebrity endorsements are great, but in my view they have to be tied to something of substance,” Enyia told the Chicago Tribune after the October campaign event. “And the specific conversation was warranted with Kanye, to make sure there was alignment on the policy platform and issues I’ve advocated for.”


> “So we definitely had a conversation, and when we talk about what Chicago needs and what it will take to get us there, he sees this campaign as a vital part of that, and that is what prompted him to support us and get over this financial barrier we have had,” Enyia added.


> West has not yet publicly said why he is supporting Enyia for mayor of his hometown city.",kavanaugh1,e964lp8,conservative
I'm not sure why this article keeps getting posted.  ,DBG1998,e968f4d,conservative
"Conservatives - - - i.e. White Republicans - - - need to stop falling for the BASED Black Guy meme. 

White Christian America needs to learn to take its own side, without judging its survival and its ideas' worth based on the approbation of as many Others as possible.
",lost_snake,e967d45,conservative
"Well before the political climate was like this, and when he was a non-ideological businessman doing what they all do, trying to play both sides.
",lost_snake,e967han,conservative
"""Fuck Trump""

* thunderous applause *

What a brave poet. ",JimboJehosephat,e9680bs,conservative
He may also have gotten her to agree about the gun violence problem in Chicago and try and do something about.,Humptythe21st,e966ow1,conservative
"He’s big enough in notoriety and resources to create his own company if he hasn’t done so by now, no? 

Not a big music insider to know enough about the business, nor do I care, but I would think he wouldn’t need to sign with anybody if he could produce and distribute himself. ",mikeygio,e9685ld,conservative
">Conservatives - - - i.e. White Republicans

So Thomas Sowell, Walter Williams, Clarence Thomas, Alan Keyes, etc. aren't true conservatives?

>White Christian America needs to learn to take its own side

In Christ there is neither Jew nor Greek, slave nor free, male nor female.",PubliusVA,e96893g,conservative
Non-ideological? He’s been spouting political ideas since the 80s.,zaiisao,e96cto6,conservative
">So Thomas Sowell, Walter Williams, Clarence Thomas, Alan Keyes, etc. aren't true conservatives?

I dunno, is that what I said? 


You can go read what I -  - a non white conservative (btw, not Christian, either) - - wrote and go look for that.


>In Christ there is neither Jew nor Greek, slave nor free, male nor female.

And yet atheists like George Will and Jews like Ben Shapiro are perfectly happy for the United States to have its White Christian nation demographically replaced, belittled constantly by big tech (big tech we're never allowed to place strict regulations on) 

Simply put; neither the people, nor the ideas *almost entirely held by that people* will survive unless White Christian America stops apologizing for pursuing its own interests, without shame, and without being predicated on being moral **only** insofar as they have the endorsement of people who are not them.

If that seems like I'm saying 

>Thomas Sowell, Walter Williams, Clarence Thomas, Alan Keyes

aren't conservative, then trying reading again.
",lost_snake,e969a10,conservative
"> I dunno, is that what I said?

Yea, kinda

> Conservatives - - - i.e. White Republicans

That implies that ""conservatives"" are ""white republicans"", and anyone who isn't a white republican isn't a conservative. Clearly that's not what you meant, but it wasn't worded well.

",j3utton,e96a29m,conservative
"> That implies that ""conservatives"" are ""white republicans""

https://news.gallup.com/poll/160373/democrats-racially-diverse-republicans-mostly-white.aspx

>Non-Hispanic whites accounted for 89% of Republican self-identifiers nationwide in 2012, while accounting for 70% of independents and 60% of Democrats. Over one-fifth of Democrats (22%) were black, while 16% of independents were Hispanic.

The GOP has only whitened since then; https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2016/09/dissecting-donald-trumps-support/499739/

Trump's supporters are 90% white. 

Whites bifurcate their vote in the United States; minority groups **do not** - they vote overwhelmingly for Democrats (which is a much less white party as a result of non-white overall population share increasing massively). 

And GOP voters are almost entirely white (and Christian)

The GOP is implicitly the party of White Christian America, and conservatism and what it intends to conserve is essentially the heritage and traditions of White Christian America.

**THIS IS NOT A BAD THING**

>Clearly that's not what you meant, but it wasn't worded well.

It's worded well by specifically clarifying the definition with idem est, you just didn't parse that.


",lost_snake,e96dxuy,conservative
"*Idem est* is Latin for ""the same is,"" and is used to state the same thing in other words or provide a definition of a term that precedes ""i.e."" So if I say ""the two most popular pets, i.e. dogs and cats,"" that means the two most popular pets *are* dogs and cats. They're different ways of saying the same thing (*idem*).

However, i.e. is [commonly confused with e.g.](https://www.grammar-monster.com/easily_confused/eg_ie.htm), so perhaps you didn't really intend the traditional meaning of i.e.",PubliusVA,e98hx4o,conservative
"I still think the Republicans hold the Senate and the Dems take the House, but I hope I’m proven wrong. I agree, though, that after 2016, polls are pretty useless. ",SpikeC51,e95rhde,conservative
dude. Keeping the house would be huge. Don’t put out bad vibes. ,anon20202,e95t0w9,conservative
"Oh no, the court jester doesn't agree with our politics. What ever shall we do?",CoyoteBanned,e95yb3f,conservative
"The Left loves to draw parallels between Trump and Hitler.

Is that because he wants to protect sovereignty through proper border control while also letting Americans know that it's okay to think greatly of our nation while rejecting globalism?

I don't get it... their two go-to responses are either ""you're a Nazi"" or ""you're a racist."" Sometimes you're both.",GFZDW,e96ayw7,conservative
"You had me at ""Celebrities lose their minds.""",mtimjones,e976xvg,conservative
[Looks like the Top Minds decided to pay us a visit. ](https://www.reddit.com/r/TopMindsOfReddit/comments/9uf37n/top_minds_of_rconservative_with_the_election_eve) ,LumpyWumpus,e93wrjl,conservative
"I am sure his twitter account will be banned, right?",Dogfacedgod88,e93fcd9,conservative
"Uh, treason anyone?",justhere2havefun,e93gz1w,conservative
I have no idea how the left gets away with calling the right nazis but actually embraces a nazi sympathizer and nobody cares. ,dtscha,e93j7ve,conservative
"""You guys are misinterpreting the chanting! You just don't understand the intricacies of the Persian language""",guitmusic12,e93jbu2,conservative
[removed],,e93g8q8,conservative
"Someone should ask Ayatollah Ali Khamenei if he thinks Elijah Muhammad was the Mahdi, and if not, why he suffers the heretic and blasphemer Louis Farrakhan.",Griegz,e93lk4h,conservative
"""Louis Farrakhan wouldn't be a story if right-wing news organizations didn't spend any time on him.""

Which makes it OK, and totally means there aren't similar nobody slime balls the left-wing media outlets pour all their resources in scaring their base with.",SendixBunny,e94nvzs,conservative
And somehow this guy isnt banned from all social media,wigglin_harry,e93t2nd,conservative
" **Jeremiah Wrigh**t, **Saul Alinsky**,  **Bill Ayers** and now **Louis Farrakhan** 🤡

And we are fascists / nazis ? 🤯

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",Red_Falcon_75,e93jwu7,conservative
Looks like he went native,press2ifyouhate1,e93hw1v,conservative
I'll be damned if I'm not to believe lunatics like Farrakhan and Sarsour aren't being mainstreamed by Democrats. Screw neo-nazis and all the alt-right douchebags but especially screw this anti-semitic fuckhead who's been curiously given a platform by mainstream Dems.,greatatdrinking,e93ue41,conservative
Call in an airstrike ,indrid_colder,e93hxtn,conservative
[removed],,e93oafq,conservative
"Not just chants, but led the chant. ",ripecookies1,e93k7n9,conservative
"What's up with leftists and antisemitism?

My guess is that they're successful, and the left hates success, so the left hates Jewish people.",Undercovergeek24,e93ky6t,conservative
" Nothing to see hear folks! Just a big
misunderstanding perpetuated by those crazy conservatives!




#/s",TrumpwonHilDawgLost,e93pjq2,conservative
"But CNN told me when Iranians chant ""Death to America"" they dont actually mean ""Death to America"". What the really mean is ""Death to 'AMERICA'"". You know like, they are cool with LGBTqasdfghjkl rights, not oppressing women, abhoring antisemitism, freedom, democracy... But what they really are not down with is white people saying bad things about islam despite the massive amount of evidence supporting the truth that their concerns are justified.

How can the information that i got from the clearly unbiased CNN and generally bitchin guy Obama be wromg if orange man is bad?",freedomhertz,e94c2k9,conservative
"This is nothing new. He’s a racist, antisemitic, hateful, and disgusting human being that far too many politicians have a relationship with. ",1994spaceodyssey,e93njvh,conservative
"Its not the era of Trump that has me worried, its the ERA AFTER trump that scares me the most, because so many of these people are out of their ever living minds. And you know, no matter what the party is, they're probably going to start to push their personal agenda again. Safe to say Trump was certainly an eye opener, and hes stopped a lot of big problems that were coming our way cold. But once hes gone what do we have to stop the rest of these ridiculous attacks?",MinimumMonitor7,e93id2p,conservative
Looks like it time for the mothership to come pick him up. ,TearsForPeers,e93pf0z,conservative
He's a terrorist. ,d_grizzle,e93rfcw,conservative
Zero democrats disavow ,BeachCruisin22,e93vpkp,conservative
"Farrakhan is a shithead, for sure.

Remember how he shot and killed 11 jews praying in a synogogue after shouting that ""jews must die.""

Oh wait, that wasn't him....

Farrakhan is a fringe publicity hound, but has no base.  Can we please focus on actual hate crimes, involving murder and attempted murder, that happened a few days ago?",daroj,e93kl6n,conservative
[removed],,e93ukex,conservative
They aren't sending their best...,JeantheDragon,e949eyt,conservative
...kind of confused does their golden rule only apply to people that down vote their stuff but when their users brigade us it doesnt count?,callthereaper64,e94nn3o,conservative
Oh look a subreddit that hates conservatives. Where else would you find that on reddit?,wesmanchu,e94y7y1,conservative
"> Brainwashed Minds of Reddit.

FTFY",Moonthrower,e944lgc,conservative
Silly peasant rules don't apply to democrats!,TheMormanTrump,e949lg8,conservative
"I looked up the definition of treason, and unfortunately, LF's comments do not constitute treason. However, he is fomenting hatred, which could incite treasonous acts.",Quazimodal,e93prb2,conservative
[deleted],,e93jwdv,conservative
"Seems like protected free speech to me, but if it were up to me, I might not let him back in the country.",ThirdRook,e943rxm,conservative
"I'm 'left' and despise Farrakhan's ""Kill all white people"" rhetoric.",arduinonut,e93vqs4,conservative
"Because Rule 1A: Orange man Bad.

This Trumps all other rules on Reddit.",fifaislife206,e93jj49,conservative
They have double standards,NightFreak87,e93jhbs,conservative
bc they control the media and the schools,scrubking,e93m7bz,conservative
"Leftism is not an ideology, it's a strategy to gain power.  
  
The Constitution is based on the idea that I'm going to hamstring my own pursuit of power so you can't some day get power over me.  Along those lines, being anti-racist means I believe it should be socially unacceptable to express racist opinions, and I will forswear alliances with racists, even if it would help my position.  
  
Leftists, having no ideology except the pursuit of power, are perfectly happy to scream about how racist it is to build a border wall, and then go have dinner with Farrakhan.",FelixFuckfurter,e93v5p3,conservative
Farrakhan is extremely right wing in his economic and social politics tho? So confusing comment as he’s extremely anti left. Or do you think he’s “left” because he is black? Would you call a white version of him a leftist lol,chrmanyaki,e93tbe8,conservative
Because he's black lol. There's nothing black people can say that will cause them to face the same kinds of repercussions white people would when saying something far milder. We all know this.,atomicdiarrhea4000,e93uebb,conservative
Controlled opposition ,aDAMNPATRIOT,e93qlpp,conservative
"No joke, I've heard it explained on reddit as 'Iranians just say death to everything! It's a common saying! Death to slow cab drivers, death to bad weather, you name it.'

That makes it better.",Dwarmin,e93oaec,conservative
"But that's just exercising Freedom of Speech, right?",LrdCheesterBear,e93hpmf,conservative
"> why he suffers the heretic and blasphemer Louis Farrakhan.

Because why let petty theological disputes get in the way of hating Jews and Israel?",gprime,e9517u7,conservative
I love this post.,TheComedianGLP,e93wm2j,conservative
"Illinois ~~Nazis~~  Residents.

&#x200B;

I think they all happen to live in Obama's neighborhood in the South Side of Chicago too. No coincidence.",blaspheminCapn,e93lats,conservative
"Nothing ""curious"" about it, if you understand real neo-nazis and real Democrats.",TheComedianGLP,e93wqck,conservative
"Obama had his ""disposition matrix."" And all his lawyers said it was legal.

https://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/jul/14/obama-secret-kill-list-disposition-matrix",ngoni,e93i9bx,conservative
https://dailycaller.com/2018/11/05/louis-farrakhan-death-to-america-israel/,d_grizzle,e93rd02,conservative
"I think that's right, but it's not limited to the Left.  Anti-Semitism is present in any culture where the larger population is less successful than the Jewish population.  ",FelixFuckfurter,e93wase,conservative
"I’m pretty sure Ben Shapiro said something similar on Friday, denoting that they were trying really hard to appeal to Jewish voters with the Synagogue shooting. He went on quite the spiel talking about left-wing anti-semites.",DocMilk,e93m60c,conservative
What's up with Farrakhan and endorsing Trump?,lord_fairfax,e93q0yx,conservative
Can the mothership be a predator missile?,ThirdRook,e9440vd,conservative
"Lol “Louis Farrakhan isn’t an anti-Semite because he never literally murdered Jews”

That’s your standard for newsworthy anti-Semitism now? He’s not a literal mass-murderer, therefore he gets a pass for routinely demonizing Jews in front of giant crowds filled with liberal politicians? What’s next? You have to murder at least 15 Jews to be considered anti Semitic?

How about we call it out *whenever and wherever* it happens, instead of nitpicking who deserves to be called out and who gets a pass? I like that standard. ",tuba_jewba,e93pi1q,conservative
"[like James Polite](https://i.redd.it/3tpk34zxajw11.png) who lit a fire in a Synagog and left graffiti in it and2 other synagogues just the other day?
",tehForce,e93mhme,conservative
Why can't this be discussed as well? ,Thrice_the_Milk,e93lsjx,conservative
"What does that have to do with the article or the discussion? This article is not about hate crimes, it is about Farrakhan chanting death to America and Israel. ",FuriousChef,e93pqo4,conservative
"So we don't care about Trump's rhetoric either, right?

Because he didn't actually send letter bombs.",Moonthrower,e9450e7,conservative
"The monster who shot up the synogogue is a nobody and universally shunned.  Farrakhan has decades of hate behind him and gets to hobnob with Obama, Clintons, Ellision, the CBC and DNC.  He's mainstreamed by those associations.

Not an appropriate comparison, sorry.",BeachCruisin22,e96otoq,conservative
His Nation of a Islam has like 50k followers and he regularly hob knobs with the most important Democrat politicians,sumgidan,e949414,conservative
Also called *Communist scum*,TheMormanTrump,e949ki6,conservative
look up sedition ,Delta_25,e93rzfm,conservative
"https://www.algemeiner.com/2018/11/04/renowned-antisemite-louis-farrakhan-chants-death-to-america-on-solidarity-trip-to-iran/

actual video of him saying it ",Delta_25,e93mtsv,conservative
What about his anti-semitic rhetoric?,ThirdRook,e943vhj,conservative
Then you're not left enough.,TheComedianGLP,e93wifo,conservative
"I wish you were kidding, but as a reddit newb, I put my foot in the /poltics and /worldnews etc pond, and still have shit stains on my socks.",TheComedianGLP,e93wbk2,conservative
"Rule 34.2: If it exists and is bad, blame orange man for Orange man always bad. Always blame orange man even if the perp was anti-Trump!
",TheMormanTrump,e949ni6,conservative
"To be fair, both sides have double standards.  You lose every time you don't try and understand your opposition. ",Russilito,e93jzi7,conservative
"T-shirt, right there.",TheComedianGLP,e93whod,conservative
"lol no, he isn't. He's very liberal. He organized the million man march and famously helped the Obama campaign bring out the black vote. He's a hardcore leftist and a democrat, don't try to act like he's secretly been a republican all along because you don't like him. ",atomicdiarrhea4000,e93ukb1,conservative
"Ah. So this must be the new NPC programming. Because it is becoming well knows what a piece of shit he is, the leftists are going to try and say ""nah. He was a right winger the whole time"". It's a lie. A blatant and dirty lie. But when has that ever stopped the left before?",LumpyWumpus,e93waki,conservative
What do you consider right wing?  Or are we talking about a different Farrakhan?,callthereaper64,e93v9bg,conservative
Seems like there's a law against providing aid and comfort to the nation's enemies. It's on the tip of my tongue...,ngoni,e93i66h,conservative
"Well, Liberals love to spout off, ""freedom of speech but not from consequences"". It has a certain irony to it.",RightMillennial,e93irye,conservative
[deleted],,e93mcg9,conservative
"Yes, that is Free Speech. We protect our 1st Amendment RIGHT of Free Speech with the 2nd Amendment RIGHT to bear arms. 

The alternative to these RIGHTS is currently playing out in Europe where Muslim Invaders are working very hard to Rapebreed the Europeans out of Europe. They have already had great success.",StephenScherer1,e93kyxo,conservative
Evidence he endorsed him? (Note: he didn't)Now let's talk about Clinton and Farrakhan being buddy buddy and the CBC embracing him. ,latotokyo123,e93wkmw,conservative
He literally wrote a book on the role of the Jews in the Atlantic slave trade 😅,KanyeTrump2020,e94kiv9,conservative
They brigaded pretty hard on a political cartoon.,callthereaper64,e94n8cm,conservative
"Now THAT, he's clearly guilty of, along with many politicians of the Democratic persuasion",Quazimodal,e93sdfj,conservative
He said marg bar Israel which means death to Israel where’s the clip of him saying marg bar America?,teezer145,e93tpgd,conservative
"Not sure ""Rule 34"" is the best choice here... ",CamoAnimal,e94pxq8,conservative
"Too true.  If I ever hear another Republican talk about ""fiscal responsibility"" I'm going to scream.",FelixFuckfurter,e93swae,conservative
Would have to be a XXXL.,FelixFuckfurter,e93xn1n,conservative
"Eh, how is organizing a march and trying to encourage voting a liberal thing? You think that because he’s doing it for black people?",jemosley1984,e93wohn,conservative
"Alright, so context is important. There is no quote of him saying Death to America anywhere in the article. He does say something that *could* be translated to Death to Israel, but also stands for Down with Israel. In context this could refer to the politiical leaders of these nations and the government's they are running. 

Also, Iran is not an enemy. We are currently attempting to restore stability and infrastructure (or so we've been being told for the last 14 years).

Edit: *Political* leaders, not optical",LrdCheesterBear,e93jypd,conservative
"It’s treason, then.",Spartan-417,e93rh5v,conservative
"How can you believe in Freedom of Speech, but only when it's beneficial or isn't something you dislike?",LrdCheesterBear,e93sslo,conservative
Conservatives have increasingly distanced themselves the Republican Party exactly for this reason.  The granularity of your disdain is too course to be of value.,TheComedianGLP,e93weff,conservative
"No you doofus, because he did it for Obama, who is a left wing politician by American standards.",TheXarath,e93yxvi,conservative
"You are woefully uninformed:

http://www.arabnews.com/node/1273631/middle-east

https://www.nytimes.com/2007/02/10/world/middleeast/10weapons.html

https://abcnews.go.com/Blotter/IraqCoverage/story?id=1692347&page=1

https://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2018/feb/28/iran-reaches-new-stage-proxy-wars-iraq-syria/

https://www.haaretz.com/israel-news/the-four-battlegrounds-iran-uses-to-threaten-israel-and-the-middle-east-1.6049886",ngoni,e93yrjj,conservative
"Indeed.  

“There’s no history to show that Iran are aggressive people. When’s the last time they invaded a country? Over 200 years ago!” - Ron Paul

[Commentary](https://www.commentarymagazine.com/foreign-policy/middle-east/iran/iran-never-started-war/), source of this quote, disputes Paul, but I haven't face-checked either claim.  What I do know is that many US veterans are living on the streets and/or struggling with mental health, physical health, and poverty, while we continue to spend billions on foreign wars.",daroj,e93l4ka,conservative
"Let me give the issue serious consideration, all done.

IRAN IS THE ENEMY.",StephenScherer1,e93l4l0,conservative
Iran is absolutely our biggest enemy in the middle East right now.  We've basically been in a proxy war with them since 1979.  ,manbra,e93m72a,conservative
"You can say your shit here.  Different story if you are saying the same shit in a foreign country which is butt hurt over sanctions and which is also the leading source of terror funding.  King Louie is a racist POS.  If he hates the US so much, relocate to Tehran. Cancel his fucking passport.  ",GlenGanges,e93woi3,conservative
BabylonBee as usual just one step ahead of the lefts actual rhetoric.,Brandwins,e94ytou,conservative
BabylonBee you were supposed to be satire not actual news!,TheMormanTrump,e94aufw,conservative
I got stung.,MarioFanaticXV,e94kujk,conservative
I immediately “lol’ed” as soon as I saw the title. ,Church556,e94vmxw,conservative
"woooo, didn't see the satire tag at first...",Aviconus,e94zyl1,conservative
We love a good satirical piece haha I almost didn't see it,goldrotmgonly,e956f65,conservative
It’s labeled satire but you know Dems want those illegal votes,nooneuknow42,e953qd1,conservative
Is the Russian Collusion Investigation Voter Suppression? ,CreativeRoutine,e94o2fk,conservative
The dang bee stung me again! Holy crap I was about to go off. MUST.CHECK.SAUCES. ,AzzidReign,e958iog,conservative
"Nice try, but you didn't get me this time bee.",raccoonbandit13,e95nufe,conservative
The truly sad reality is the fact that I wasn't immediately sure this was satire.,AM_Kylearan,e95qsnw,conservative
"""If the GOP had their way, only American citizens would be able to vote for American political offices""

WTF?",R0binSage,e95vuei,conservative
How do people keep voting for her?,R0binSage,e95w9kv,conservative
I got taken by this article.,R0binSage,e96mkzw,conservative
The fact that this headline is pretty believable just goes to show how bat-shit crazy the left is.,XYZ-Wing,e971z5x,conservative
Not until Mueller abolishes the electoral college while wearing the constitution as his soiled undergarments.,elcuban27,e959jg4,conservative
42/41/17 FIGHT! ,Intimidator94,e95vx1i,conservative
Probably toxic masculinity privilege. ,BadCoachingAnalyst,e94fvji,conservative
"""Who hasn't considered assaulting someone, in our current political climate?"" ~ ABC, NBC (probably)",haplogreenleaf,e94s7eu,conservative
Of course. The SNL Trump poster child. They have hypocritical blood coursing through their veins. ,plastiqmanb,e95agh2,conservative
"We shouldn't forget the way he treats his daughter.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8J0-ZatDHug

""You don't have the brains or the decency as a human being, I don't give a damn if you're twelve years old, or eleven years old, or that you're a child, or that your mother is a thoughtless pain in the ass who doesn't care about what you do as far as I'm concerned, you have humiliated me for the last time with this phone. And when I come out there next week, I'm gonna fly out there for the day just to straighten you out.""",SaulPorn,e95dx7m,conservative
"He’s the only liberal male with any Alpha traits, so the left loves him regardless of safe spaces he crosses.",_BIG_BEAR_,e956es0,conservative
"Site won't work, what'd he say?",MyUsernameIsReallyOk,e94r7r7,conservative
"One day that buffoon will jump on the wrong person, and he'll get his.",BeauRyker,e957s3f,conservative
">Who can forget the time the ""30 Rock"" actor launched homophobic slurs at a photographer that was taking pictures of him on a public street, calling him a ""c**k-sucking fag."" And he called a British journo a “toxic little queen.""

>It's been a longtime habit of Baldwin, his homophobic rants. Way back in 1992, he called a horse-drawn carriage driver a ""faggot.""",thatrightwinger,e94rabm,conservative
"Let's not forget the way he speaks to his daughter. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8J0-ZatDHug",SaulPorn,e95dprr,conservative
No Nut November just got easier ,benhur217,e93jxu0,conservative
Pretty sexist to assume the only power a woman has is between her legs. Way to go CNN.,ThrillHo501,e93vux7,conservative
"I'd imagine the women who participate in this are the type of people who wouldn't fuck a conservative, so who're really the losers here?

I can tell you the winner here is humanity when they don't procreate.",Demplition,e93osyw,conservative
"This barely works with a spouse, much less strangers.",Explane,e93ixah,conservative
"Isnt this like, actual objectification of women? ",thereisasuperee,e93vufc,conservative
"Wait, what if I'm already not getting any?",puddboy,e9471sf,conservative
"So they presume only men need sex. I thought men and women were basically the same except for social constructs? Oh, wait, only when it's convenient for women... I forgot...",tenshon,e93jmii,conservative
"I think Bill Burr said it best, it's the most empty threat ever. Just rub one out and neutralize. Witholding sex is like putting a chain around the fridge when you got a sandwich in your pocket. ",MajesticMulva,e9464v1,conservative
What the hell is the context of Lena Dunham picture?,SuperFunMonkey,e93xa0q,conservative
"The kind of woman who would pull a stunt like this is the kind who would falsely accuse you of rape, so you should already be avoiding them anyway.",Telineye,e93wtxw,conservative
I love the way they assume that women are somehow inherently less conservative than men. This is not true. ,humanoid12345,e94fsg9,conservative
"I'm all for this, leftist women will stop having sex with their soyboy husbands/boyfriends and conservative women will keep on having a normal sex life. ",Trevor_awesome,e947htr,conservative
What would change? ,RDMgardy,e93ms2d,conservative
I wish a visibility strike were possible. What a flock of cunts.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e9405gw,conservative
"Well, it’s no nut November anyways. ",OstentatiousSock,e94dfbm,conservative
No nut November for the win!,tanktakach,e94er2a,conservative
"I just did some statistical analysis.

There are 2 conservative men who would put their penises within striking range of these hominid vectors.

&#x200B;

1 of them is a still-living blind and deaf torso.

The other is...scratch that one, bad data.

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e94ifnd,conservative
"Go ahead, go on a sex strike. 

I want to see how much Pornhub traffic increases.",psstein,e94769h,conservative
"I read this as ""what if liberals stopped breeding?""",doctorMcbob,e94ri32,conservative
3rd wave feminism: where being fat is considered a statement ,Stevienines,e95674l,conservative
"This is honestly really sexist of CNN to think that women just view sex as a transactional tool to get what they want out of men rather than something they do for pleasure with someone they love 

",duckfallasbdn,e95anf3,conservative
Well if the leftist women would only make it a lifelong pursuit we would have a lot less problems.,Oilfieldcowboy27,e95bcg5,conservative
"Upon seeing these Snowflake women; I am on a sex strike and will remain on strike.

Is it possible to become a Priest if you aren't Catholic?",StephenScherer1,e93z09r,conservative
RDR2,zcicecold,e94693x,conservative
"Lol, leftists suggest women go on a sex strike... during ""no nut November"".

LOL

Nevermind the fact that it's so out of touch with reality, as if conservative/republican/moderate/rational women don't exist, but the fact that it's far removed from the memeverse.

This is why leftists can't meme.",Saigunx,e93xw1p,conservative
is anyone else all kinds of grossed out by that first picture,Anti-Her,e94fs4y,conservative
No front holes mourned.,TheComedianGLP,e94hz3p,conservative
Just makes No-Nut November easy for us.,Pizzabungalow,e94i3pf,conservative
"I saw a pic of what's her face (upper right) when she was a college student.  She was actually very attractive at one time.  Yes, one time.  Her damn name is escaping me.  EDIT:  Ok, just remembered the name and Googled it.  Found the pic.  She was fairly attractive but not as nice as what I thought.  Had blond hair then.
",ShenandoahValley,e94jhwo,conservative
https://www.britannica.com/topic/Lysistrata-by-Aristophanes,CreativeRoutine,e94jos3,conservative
Does anyone actually like Amy Schumer? ,joeysuf,e94z51n,conservative
Furry pits and free bleeding....some how I think is survive.,sshevie,e950klx,conservative
"I'm married. I wouldn't notice the difference.


In reality though: My wife isn't a nut job liberal. I encourage her to vote but she won't.",chaotic_zx,e955h4w,conservative
So the women who get naked everywhere to prove something are the ones who are going to go on a sex strike? ,2Cor517,e959ytn,conservative
It sure did,Black-Market-,e93lmcu,conservative
Lmao it took me a second to realize this wasn't actually a NNN meme post,u1tralord,e94t3a0,conservative
And just like that I'm gay.,SuperFunMonkey,e93xcvb,conservative
[deleted],,e94ex5x,conservative
"They have no concept of consistency of beliefs/positions.

they are emotional, reactionary children who demand everything they happen to want at the time.",neville_bartos666,e94d0nm,conservative
"As good postmodernists, they believe all truth is merely power, and power is simply whatever can be wielded to get what you personally want.

After Kavanaugh, it should be abundantly clear that nothing is off-limits anymore.  After the weaponization of #BelieveWomen, everything is on the table.  They are now at the stage where they feel entitled to cash in their identity politics oppression points for real political power.

We'll see if sane, normal Americans allow it.  Too early to tell.",nited_states,e94djm0,conservative
CNN hates normal people.  It's why they are the #1 Trump Hate Derpvision channel.,TheComedianGLP,e94i1fc,conservative
Who're. I lol'd.,Kemaro,e93udx1,conservative
I thought of a bad joke about abortion but I'm not sure if it's permitted here.,RightMillennial,e93smpo,conservative
How to sabotage your relationship in one easy step!,leetchaos,e94j592,conservative
Welcome to Demcrats Unmasked.,TheComedianGLP,e94i7dy,conservative
"You are immune to their new advanced weaponry.

Advance!",TheComedianGLP,e94i9ly,conservative
"Trust me, you're still better off.",unibuckeye,e94sbhj,conservative
"Women have a penis, according to Target and the DNC.",TheComedianGLP,e94i5wc,conservative
"Dante's 10th circle of hell.  

That image is burned into your retinas - and its all you see for eternity.    Reserved for those who have committed the sin of not replacing the empty toilet paper roll.",parkowork,e9432jd,conservative
"""I'm barking mad, full of STDs, and regret being born"".",TheComedianGLP,e94i8q3,conservative
She's overweight and proudly eating cake on a toilet.  I think it's from her show Girls.,TallDad1,e941d8j,conservative
Maybe we can turn Planned Parenthood on older Democrat fetuses to keep their numbers up.,TheComedianGLP,e94ib3e,conservative
"They just take over the educational system and brainwash *your* kids........

......wait a sec....",unibuckeye,e94sgrr,conservative
"They probably don't do it for those reasons, so they don't understand how others could.",sozm89,e95onj5,conservative
Why not? At this point I'm not even sure the pope is Catholic.,unibuckeye,e94scvs,conservative
Yes. Everyone is.,FoxOnTheRun76,e94ilxq,conservative
Well thank goodness they only devised this genius plan with 4 days left until the election. Anyone can hold out that long.,sozm89,e95ojup,conservative
Gavin McInnes approves.,Godsdj,e940gzu,conservative
"My first thought when I say this was ""if I wasn't gay before I sure am now.""",NCSUGrad2012,e94tnuk,conservative
"I'm just piggybacking your comment to ask what the hell did I mess with the top-right girl. I mean, I totally agree with what your saying here. Let me add on top of what you're saying, their stance relies on women not needing love too. So not only are they reactionary, but they're actively making themselves more miserable.

&#x200B;

But seriously. Top right. Naked in a public bathroom. Eating in a bathroom. Cameras. Would someone please inform me? What the hell did I miss? 

&#x200B;",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e94ffib,conservative
"(stands, applauds, high five offered from across digital space)",TheComedianGLP,e94i38m,conservative
"Frank Reynolds, at it again.",Thebearjew115,e95twkw,conservative
"I'll allow it. Trust me, I'm a mod.",do_pm_me_your_butt,e945yii,conservative
Feminists HATE HIM. This conservative forces liberal women to never speak to him again with this ONE SIMPLE TRICK. ,Themusician67,e94rx9e,conservative
Fuck.........,unibuckeye,e94s8ow,conservative
"""And also I regret never having an abortion, but I don't regret preying on my little sister.""",unibuckeye,e94sa9m,conservative
"The Jesuits are all kinda fucked up truthfully. Anyone who knows what the politics inside the church are like isn't at all suprised at Pope Francis' stupidity. They're the crazy leftists of the church, and unfortunately they, like many other crazy leftists, control many of the teaching institutions in the church.",mcbosco25,e9535vb,conservative
I love the guy but my gaydar seems to go off a lot when he talks.,The_Highwayman_,e9426lr,conservative
It's top left and I thinks it's Lena Dunham on SNL when she was popular. ,Dial-1-For-Spanglish,e94huth,conservative
"Fortunately I have no Idea what that is, and don’t care, but I’m sure it sucks.",neville_bartos666,e94pvbv,conservative
Username checks out,FullConservative,e9465f6,conservative
"Is it because he [shoved a buttplug up his ass live on his show?](https://m.imgur.com/a/MQraN).  NSFW. It's exactly what you think it is.  He's one entertaining, but very weird dude.",manbra,e94yu70,conservative
Please. Lena Dunham was never popular.,unibuckeye,e94s4w2,conservative
"SNL? You've never heard of it? It does suck now, but it used to be funny a long time ago. Not Monty Python funny, but funny enough in its own way. A lot of stars had their start there. Try the Dana Carvey sketches.",MisterMouser,e94xc3h,conservative
Maybe it was the [time he made out with a dude?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q_2WkJSPOOs) ,ImagineAllTheKarma,e952r6c,conservative
Fair enough!,Dial-1-For-Spanglish,e95taaz,conservative
"lol, I know what SNL is...I meant that I don’t know where that pic is from.",neville_bartos666,e95133u,conservative
I believe it was Larry Elder who pointed out that we needed a Constitutional amendment to ban alcohol.  So where does the authority to prohibit marijuana come from?,FelixFuckfurter,e94a0ug,conservative
Great to hear! Send it back to the states and allow them to choose for themselves. All good news though,molon-labe7,e948osc,conservative
"Nationwide legalization of cannabis, period. The government has zero right to tell me what I can and cannot consume. If anyone other than me has the final say over what I can do with my own body, how then can I be said to be free? ",Odoacer476CE,e94vfr8,conservative
"66% of Americans support legalizing recreational weed, and that number will only go up as the older generation passes on. This is a slam dunk issue, I'm surprised Obama didn't push for it more.

https://news.gallup.com/poll/243908/two-three-americans-support-legalizing-marijuana.aspx",StanleyKubricksPenis,e951z8h,conservative
"This needs to happen like ten years ago. I mean seriously, anyone who argues that marijuana is in any way worse than alcohol is an idiot.",HolsterOfNuts,e94bdxj,conservative
Bro please just move with federal legalization. ,a93818,e949anf,conservative
"Good. I  believe that unless the government can present a valid argument that a substance is harmful it should be legal to use.

Things like PCP, which present a danger to society when people take it because it alters their mind so much, and that person can kinda go crazy.

But I haven't seen an argument as such for weed ",Stained-Glass-Window,e94urk9,conservative
This seems long overdue. ,Chickenbrother8,e94df42,conservative
"Medical? How about all of it already??

Christ almighty ",dubiousCabbage,e94zcv2,conservative
Long overdue. ,Jagoff86,e94h4gl,conservative
As someone who doesn’t drink anymore due to alcoholism in my family that found its way to me. I look forward to the day I can just light up a joint and relax. ,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e94tt1d,conservative
At the very least it needs be very reduced in terms of sentencing ,phantomcut3,e95815t,conservative
"Good.  Legalize it, tax it, and use the money in schools, on roads, in infrastructure, and then put the rest at the local and national debt.  Don't use it to fund yet more pork in budgets, or try to use it on crap that doesn't BENEFIT THE PEOPLE IN THE AREAS THE TAX IS BEING COLLECTED FROM.",bionic80,e94nojy,conservative
***Not enough.*** Nationwide recreational need to be legal.,,e94nsca,conservative
"So Boner waits until there are conferences for investors to change his mind...

I'm fine with it but wish they would have came to this decision for the right reasons.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e94hk1i,conservative
"And if 62% of the population says yes, put it on the fucking ballot and let’s be done with it. Jesus.",HolsterOfNuts,e94j14b,conservative
Oh shit here we go,Oh_No_Leon_Lett,e9492w3,conservative
"1) All Representatives are just that, there to represent the people whom elected them.  Our politics has allowed each party to have a generic. Meaning be vs representing the needs of their constituents.  Which is why I believe we should go back to a colonial style government where it isn’t a full time career but a civic duty one would perform.

2) There is a HUGE flaw in this article (if I missed it I apologize but I did NOT see it mentioned).  There is a MASSIVE reason John Boehner changed his mind about weed.  It is because he is on the Board of Directors for Acreage Holdings.  A US weed company that is hoping to go public later this year.  Of course he wants it legalized.  Dude is a snake, and it isn’t about people, or PTSD and all the other things he said, it is about him making more money.  Period.",mattmcd20,e94kayq,conservative
"I still have yet to see a good case for marijuana. If you want to make a prescription drug from the derived components, that can already happen, but use is always abused. 

My own state experienced the pot lobby dropping an unreal amount of money to buy votes for a measure that would put certain people in a monopoly of farming.  

They spent ~$500 million on lobbying and ads. Friggin corrupt.",DRKMSTR,e95c5ln,conservative
woohoo! About time! Just wish my state would come along with all that.,cons_NC,e94dio1,conservative
Trump needs to publicly support this so the Democrats will turn against it. Then they'll lose every single young voter they had left.,TomToonami93,e95ospq,conservative
"Considering what it's done to Colorado and other states that have legalized it (ignoring it's still illegal on a federal level in all 50 states), I'm not at all thrilled about this.    
Crime rates over the last few years have rising in Colorado, where the national trend has been dropping. The majority of the revenue made from marijuana sales (which typically drains from other sales anyway) goes toward policing and social services geared toward the health and dangers. Drugged driving has shot up dramatically. Minors are at record usage levels. And we're not even covering the wide range of social ills that are plaguing Colorado now.    
    
There's a range of good reasons Colorado Gov. John Hickenlooper is considering putting forth banning marijuana again.",Sarstan,e94uufa,conservative
That's a shame,KingOfTheP4s,e94i0tv,conservative
"For that matter, the ban on Kinder eggs comes from what part of the Constitution?",justhere2havefun,e94axt3,conservative
They use the interstate commerce clause of the Constitution to do whatever they want nowadays.  They basically say that the government could have made it illegal back then but they just didn't realize it at the time. Very stupid I know.  ,teardrop36,e94vs5w,conservative
Let each state ban or allow it on an individual basis. Isn't that what we are already doing now? Why do we need national legislation for this?,Martbell,e94atnh,conservative
Dropping the truth bombs! Keep it up. :-),blix88,e95pudm,conservative
"I never understood how, while it took a constitutional amendment to outlaw alcohol, after passing the 21st amendment, congress was able to outlaw a slew of other substances with no constitutional modification whatsoever. 

The inner conspiracy theorist in me thinks that the reason it was done that way with other controlled substances was to establish a precedent for governmental intrusion into people's private lives that was previously considered constitutionally off-limits for government regulation. I say so because the drug war has been a fantastic vehicle for carrying government intrusion into the realm of other constitutional rights ever since. ",Hirudin,e94jg2e,conservative
"Should hospitals have to treat someone who overdoses on a formerly illicit substance?

I’m not trying to be antagonistic, but this is one thing I think about as a healthcare provider. I highly doubt you’d have people like that on a wide scale level, but it’s something I think about. Would people be more inclined to at least try a substance knowing that if things go sideways, the ED is there to save you.",WebSliceGallery123,e94y7h4,conservative
Do you consider yourself a Conservative?,Nonsenseism,e95mmh1,conservative
"To extend your comparison . . . who drinks alcohol for ""medicinal"" reasons?",Martbell,e94ebe4,conservative
Maybe it could help with the opioid epidemic. ,joeysuf,e94zauk,conservative
My only argument against legalization (and overall I'm for) is compared to alcohol we don't have proper roadside detection for marijuana ,mattcruise,e94ibk0,conservative
"I wouldn't say worse, I think for people making that argument is that marijuana has a much more varied affect on people than alcohol does, there are sure signs someone has been drinking. Smoking pot is different some people hardly act different at all, so how do you regulate something like that. It can impair people on much less obvious level than alcohol. I know I'm generalizing but it's the point I've seen brought up in discussions like this.",The_Mighty_Rex,e94i00m,conservative
I never even knew there were some counties that you can’t buy alcohol I . I think it’s a good idea to do federal legalization then a sort of “opt out” situation like with alcohol. ,Patsrul,e94mvan,conservative
I would LOVE if a republican president would be the first to really push for legalization.. would be awesome to stick against my stoner liberal friends.,evesea,e957xud,conservative
"Uh, have you seen somebody really drunk? If your PCP argument logic was applied to alcohol, it would be illegal. It's one of the most powerful and addictive drugs used.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e95nfys,conservative
"STOP MAKING EVERYTHING NATIONAL LAW BECAUSE OF YOUR FEEFEES

No,  it needs to be left to each state
",notviolence,e95kj9n,conservative
"Fuck that, letting business people make money through entrepreneurship is 100% a legit reason to legalize something relatively harmless. ",eloquentnemesis,e94iad8,conservative
"I think it's up to 66% now, there was another round of polling recently.",StanleyKubricksPenis,e951u7d,conservative
You know that alcohol is one of the hardest drugs you can get right? It's also very addictive. Do you know any alcoholics personally?,fluffyfluffyheadd,e95nkul,conservative
It has a higher LD50 than caffeine,aboardthegravyboat,e95m34a,conservative
"As someone who moved fron CA recently to texas,  screw legalization.  I hope they makes it a state issue but dont allow it in texas. 

Weed is cancer and 2nd hand smoke sucks,  at least alcohol g takes a few to make you stupid,  potheads are stupid when and when they aren't high
",notviolence,e95kqm7,conservative
Why is a more free nation a shame? ,Grampyy,e94o0rq,conservative
"International commerce is a power delegated to the federal government.  It's stupid that it's used the way it is, but it is a power named to them.",a_bearded_man,e955gy2,conservative
Something about congress has the power to create laws?,Madstork1981,e94c8fg,conservative
"*Wickard v Filburn* needs to go, but entire federal agencies would be gone over night so that isn't going to happen anytime soon. Fuck FDR.",ElbowWhisper,e950a2e,conservative
"Banking.

The whole pot industry has had real issues with banks not serving them, which means that the industry has way too much cash floating around. Banks don't want to serve a federally illegal industry and open themselves up for legal action.

Full disclosure, liberal that usually lurks.",Whole_Roll,e94skgx,conservative
"It matters because it's still illegal at the federal level. I'm not necessarily for or against marijuana usage, but I am against the war on drugs in general. I think it causes a ton of violence and has given us such wonderful gifts as the Mexican cartels. I don't think any drugs should be illegal because illegalization hasn't stopped anyone from abusing drugs, but it has caused a bunch of other problems.",jhnmiller84,e94rvng,conservative
"Here is my example. I have a CCW.  
I have a debilitating injury which can lead me walking out of most doctors with painkillers. I would much rather have access to cannabinoids, which certain non psychoactive ones are illegal to get...I can't get a prescription in FL without losing my right to defend myself because of FED law.",TheCafeRacer,e94wdam,conservative
Because it's a harmless plant and because some states use their power to trample on other rights they dislike like the second amendment.,M6D_Magnum,e94lgwl,conservative
"Yeah a cop can say he ""smells weed"" and search your house or car. ",StanleyKubricksPenis,e951f07,conservative
"I'm pretty certain that's not a conspiracy theory, but just one was to read the history of what happened. When it came to banning alcohol, government intrusion was pretty much the whole point. It's no surprise that the people who voted to ban alcohol kept going and kept butting the government into other people's business. 

&#x200B;

 

*""Of all tyrannies, a tyranny exercised for the  good of its victims may be the most oppressive. It may be better to live  under robber barons than under omnipotent moral busybodies. The robber baron's cruelty may sometimes sleep, his cupidity may at some point be  satiated; but those who torment us for our own good will torment us without end for they do so with the approval of their own conscience. They may be more likely to go to Heaven yet at the same time likelier to make a Hell of earth.""* — [**C. S. Lewis**](https://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Creator/CSLewis) ",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e94lz79,conservative
"Weed was made illegal in the first half of the 19th century to justify deporting Mexican immigrants, it was argued that marijuana made people of color “sexually aggressive” towards white women. ",Kerlhawk,e95i80t,conservative
"I don’t know if it’s anything that elaborate, but at the very least I like to use prohibition as a demonstration as to why leftists or so called “progressives” shouldn’t be in control of government. Their most successful idea was prohibition and it sucked. And it ruined our beautiful constitution. ",McFreedomWithCheese,e9587zn,conservative
"Don't hospitals already treat people who overdosed on illicit substances? Also, making drugs illegal makes them more dangerous. The only reason drugs like bath salts exist is because coke is illegal. The reason the phentynal epidemic is happening is because it's cheaper and easier to get than actual heroin, which is far less dangerous. I'm not saying coke and heroin are safe, but making them illegal causes people to seek out easier and cheaper substitutes.",StanleyKubricksPenis,e951qyz,conservative
"> Should hospitals have to treat someone who overdoses on a formerly illicit substance?

Yes, and they have to accept and treat those people now.  Legalization wouldn't change that.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emergency_Medical_Treatment_and_Active_Labor_Act

Also, how often do you think hospitals treat ANYONE for marijuana overdose?",sahuxley2,e95wukc,conservative
Me,trelium06,e94i02f,conservative
"Don't you be putting down my hot toddies. Best cold medicine ever invented, suck it pseudoephedrine.",CatsGambit,e94njyj,conservative
I take it you’re not married! ,Rabidraccoon76,e94pv78,conservative
"Better than aspirin for a headache.. the headache caused from drinking the night before, but you get my point..",evesea,e957v22,conservative
"If you drink antifreeze, ethonal is the treatment. ",manbra,e958t9a,conservative
Why is something being roadside detectable the benchmark for individuals to exercise liberty to anyone?,PeeMud,e951og8,conservative
You're assuming that there is credible scientific evidence that Marijuana makes you a significantly more dangerous driver. That assumption is incorrect.,higmage,e957n8m,conservative
Did we have a method for alcohol detection when the 21st amendment was passed?,Hirudin,e94jhy6,conservative
"Nope, the reason the federal government exists is to prevent states infringing on individual liberty. Unless you support letting the state's decide it's okay to infringe individual liberty? In which case you should take a long walk off a short cliff.",,e96dx8n,conservative
"Sure, but individual freedom was enough a really long time ago.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e94isbv,conservative
Yeah that’s 2/3rds. Let’s do it.,HolsterOfNuts,e952uvu,conservative
"Oh look ma, a straw man!",DRKMSTR,e9a8e76,conservative
"And another straw man. 

Oh lawdy.",DRKMSTR,e9a8epy,conservative
Some of us here are conservatives and not libertarians ,KingOfTheP4s,e94od3h,conservative
"It would easily be 25-50% of the government gone. Could you imagine all those agencies just going ""poof"". Would be music to my ears. ",molon-labe7,e95josr,conservative
"The federal government’s war on drugs, like every war on whatever domestic issue the government created in the first place, has been an unmitigated disaster. ",Comntrinchief,e94yfjg,conservative
"Plus arresting people for drugs just seems cruel to me. It's bad enough someone might have a drug problem (or not), now they have a criminal record too. The police should be arresting people for crimes that have an actual victim. They shouldn't be ""protecting"" you from yourself.",StanleyKubricksPenis,e9517t1,conservative
Ideally the government shouldn't be in the business of issuing CCW permits to begin with. ,PeeMud,e954moh,conservative
"A cop can say they *think* that your money is intended to buy drugs and then literally/legally steal it from you with no evidence whatsoever. Then you'll have to prove that the money *wasn't* intended for that purpose to ever see it again. 

Hell, at one time your financial information was considered to be a part of your ""houses, papers, and effects"" as defined by the Constitution, and could not be accessed by the government without a warrant. The drug war was the wedge issue used to justify scrapping that precedent, so that now *you have to show damn near all your financial information whenever the government demands it, for whatever reason they can think of.* ",Hirudin,e951ka3,conservative
"Continuing that quote...

""This very kindness stings with intolerable insult. To be 'cured' against one's will and cured of states which we may not regard as disease is to be put on a level of those who have not yet reached the age of reason or those who never will; to be classed with infants, imbeciles, and domestic animals.”",Hirudin,e94mnya,conservative
"Yes we do. But I wonder if we’d see more people because you’d still have these people who are using it anyway, plus people who were only deterred because it was illegal.

The reason we have the opioid epidemic isn’t because heroin is expensive and people are switching to fentanyl by the way. It’s because people are buying heroin (which is already pretty cheap) and it’s laced with fentanyl.",WebSliceGallery123,e954vsv,conservative
"I am familiar with EMTALA. You did not answer my question. If someone has the freedom to take whatever drug they want because they are adults and free to make that decision, why do we require healthcare providers to treat those overdoses?

We sign waivers for all kinds of things. Is it that unreasonable to say If you wanna take a known dangerous substance then you accept the risks and consequences of that decision?

And I am not taking about marijuana. But disingenuous to use marijuana as an example. ",WebSliceGallery123,e96s3bc,conservative
"Me too, thanks",superAL1394,e957lki,conservative
"It's not, i still said I'm for. My only reasoning for struggling with it, is roadside detection is not there yet, and at least if it was still illegal they could book them on possession.

Again, i want it to be legal as my reasoning isn't strong enough. ",mattcruise,e952cqh,conservative
"You are still impaired. As bad as alcohol, i doubt it, but its an impairment. ",mattcruise,e959civ,conservative
"Unlikely, its why I'm mostly for, and I think the free market will create a solution. My only argument is, if it was still illegal at least you could bust a driver on possession. Not enough to justify keeping it illegal though",mattcruise,e94jr1g,conservative
"You forgot life and pursuit of happiness. Its not all about liberty,  were not libertarians
",notviolence,e96eiub,conservative
You better look somewhere other than Republicans for personal freedom.,,e94nqbt,conservative
I have no idea what you mean. ,aboardthegravyboat,e9ah7c7,conservative
What is conservative about denying liberty?,Odoacer476CE,e94vp4m,conservative
Legalization should be a conservative position considering we are the party of limited government and personal responsibility.  Sounds like you're a big government liberal to me. ,teardrop36,e94vhpg,conservative
"It's laced with fentanyl because it's illegal though. When alcohol was illegal, illegal liquor often was poorly made and could be dangerous to drink. If heroin was legal, it could be regulated and people  would be buying the medical grade stuff instead of the street heroin that contains fentanyl and possibly other dangerous additives. I don't think anyone should use heroin, but obviously the law can't stop people and making it illegal causes a whole host of other issues. 

You used to be able to buy strong drugs like heroin at a local pharmacy without a prescription. Yes people got addicted but it wasn't as bad as it is now.",StanleyKubricksPenis,e955mze,conservative
I have never tried marijuana because it is illegal. I'd definitely try edibles to see if they help my arthritis pain. But I have zero interest in being high or trying anything else. I just do not want to end up in the pokey. ,GladysCravesRitz,e95kp7u,conservative
"> Is it that unreasonable to say If you wanna take a known dangerous substance then you accept the risks and consequences of that decision?

I agree with this in theory.  However, in a situation where time is crucial, paramedics and doctors should not be trying to figure out whether they should treat someone or not.  Whether it's because they did something stupid, or they won't be able to pay for it, or even if they just murdered three people, the EMTALA exists because we want the *only* priority to be treating and saving these people.  It ensures that everyone that ""deserves"" the help gets it while erring on the side of also helping those that don't deserve it.  In a world where paramedics and doctors had instant perfect information, I would love to allow people to accept responsibility as you describe.",sahuxley2,e96spjz,conservative
I know you didn't say it but plenty of people feel that way. If it's illegal to drive while high it's illegal regardless. I don't think the government being able to line their pockets off of enforcement should be the deciding factor in what they allow us to do. ,PeeMud,e9538kv,conservative
"I agree. While I do think it would be nice to have a reliable means to prevent those under the influence from operating machinery, I don't think it's enough to justify the harm caused by its prohibition, including the (IMO) obvious constitutional problems. ",Hirudin,e94jxvg,conservative
"Umm like where? Democrats? I get it, repubs can really suck sometimes but the other choice is is anti freedom period.",abuigues,e95lcyp,conservative
"I'm a social conservative, my flair even says I voted for Cruz for Christ's sake.",KingOfTheP4s,e94yhlu,conservative
Let me suggest you do not start with edibles...weed edibles are super powerful. The effect is not even close to the same as smoking or vaporizing it.,fluffyfluffyheadd,e95nae6,conservative
"Yes but the methods to properly detect if the person is impaired on pot are so bad. It stays in your system for so long, and you need to provide urine or blood to properly test (which i feel is a huge invasion of liberty).

So ideally i would have liked to see something like a breathalyzer exist first, so cops aren't collecting dna from individuals. ",mattcruise,e953h5t,conservative
Cruz wants marijuana to be a state issue.,YourAverageNord,e9514oh,conservative
A social conservative against freedom. Sorry but I don't care what your flair says when you take liberal positions. ,teardrop36,e94yov4,conservative
"Hmm, well that is good to know. I’ll look at it more carefully if it’s ever legalized here. I know I can’t smoke it, the aroma gives me a headache.",GladysCravesRitz,e95njzz,conservative
"Again though, from a liberty loving American who believes the government derives its power from us that is putting the cart before the horse to me. Freedom first, whether or not cops can prove a crime was committed a very very very  very very distant second. ",PeeMud,e954i64,conservative
"Oh shoot, guess I better not vote for him because our views don't line up on one issue!",KingOfTheP4s,e9532xc,conservative
"Sure thing, fellow conservative ",KingOfTheP4s,e950ncj,conservative
"They just started allowing the use of CBD in my state. It comes from the cannabis plant just like the marijuana “flower”, but has no psychoactive properties. So basically there is no sensation of being high, and it helps treat pain and inflammation. My grandma uses the topical oil for arthritis in her hand, and says it does wonders compared to previous treatments/medication. ",DropBearRick,e96bmbh,conservative
That's not what I meant. I meant that there are social conservatives that would rather follow the Constitution first and then put their social values second.,YourAverageNord,e9548qy,conservative
Rino,teardrop36,e950rt4,conservative
My friend uses it to miraculous effect to combat seizures. ,GladysCravesRitz,e96cxmo,conservative
A rino that voted for Cruz. Yeah.,KingOfTheP4s,e950vo3,conservative
"Please read the mission statement. Your brand of conservatism isn't the only one that's welcome here. Social conservatives, many of whom don't support weed legalization, are welcome in this sub. ",GuitarWizard90,e954reb,conservative
Weird.,teardrop36,e954u9p,conservative
How's that weird?,GuitarWizard90,e954w5y,conservative
"That someone could call themselves a conservative and support government violence to prevent adults from consuming a plant.  It's mind boggling that liberals get this right more than conservatives when they're so wrong about everything else, but at least the comments here are overwhelmingly in favor of legalization.  ",teardrop36,e955ke7,conservative
"I'm just pointing out that conservatives who don't support legalization are still welcome in the sub, so don't insult them. Keep debates civil.",GuitarWizard90,e956b40,conservative
I never insulted anybody but I did call their conservative credentials into question.  If it was up to me I'd kick the authoritarians out of the freedom party but whatever. ,teardrop36,e956g7v,conservative
Is Gillum actually doing the soy smile in his picture?,smileimhigh,e95t4v0,conservative
woah! its almost like you cant impeach someone just because you dont like them,Anti-Her,e94fzip,conservative
but why would he have seen anything? he's not part of the investigation,pilotlight,e94obx4,conservative
"Maxine wants to impeach him for merely living! And she really likes saying, ""Impeach! Impeach! Impeach!""over and over and over again.",JFGFNY,e94oi0t,conservative
"“I mean, I was looking the other way, but I didn’t see him do it.”",senorbiloba,e94uzsv,conservative
[removed],,e9455oh,conservative
That’s not why they want to do it. They want to impeach because they hate him with everything they’ve got and because they do everyone else should and those who disagree are just awful scum that should be beaten down and cast aside.,Splickity-Lit,e94ghvu,conservative
"> its almost like you cant impeach someone just because you dont like them

well you can, it just wont fly. anything is a impeachable offense. its a completely political process.",JMB_was_a_god,e94o639,conservative
"If they had anything substantial, they would have leaked it so the leftists could have used it during the midterms.",mlmack,e94pk0z,conservative
The legendary Maxine!,r-magnificient,e950q1z,conservative
Not sharing his taxes?? Where is the legal requirement to do so?,PubliusVA,e94861n,conservative
Lol that's the best you could come up with? Why bother posting.,TheShakinBacon,e947dvo,conservative
">He lies constantly

Real lies? Political lies? Or biased media fake news lies?

>Nepotism 

You men like President Kennedy making his brother attorney general?

>Not sharing his taxes 

You poor baby. How do you stand it?",SilverHerfer,e948iz2,conservative
"They're also forgetting that Pence, a true conservative, would take his place, lol. ",Jagoff86,e94gx46,conservative
That doesn't sound like this investigation at all.,AnnualThrowaway,e95v5zo,conservative
[removed],,e948h6d,conservative
I’m sure at least a handful of leftists have thought about how to ruin Pence if they succeeded against Trump.,DocMilk,e94lneo,conservative
"They see him as weaker, they can’t beat Trump, Pence doesn’t have the abilities that make Trump so strong.",Splickity-Lit,e94p7wv,conservative
Ok. We will see the results and America's voice going forward tomorrow.,r-magnificient,e94990l,conservative
Muh emoluments. ,BenchSpyder,e94czn9,conservative
I'm sure they have. ,Jagoff86,e94m24g,conservative
"Pence wouldn't trigger them as much with his tweets, but they will still hate him because of some of his stances on certain issues. ",Jagoff86,e951u3y,conservative
"Yea, I wonder how much Pence would actually get done versus how much Trump has already gotten done.",ReformedBlackPerson,e94tykq,conservative
"They'll just impeach him too, and then the house speaker and so on until they hit a democrat",SlickDigger,e94rpjb,conservative
They aren't gonna have much luck with that strategy. ,Jagoff86,e951wbb,conservative
Yes,gtrdundave2,e96dj2h,conservative
"A Democratic activist who volunteered on Obama’s presidential campaign.

Oh, and he worked as an intern combating hate crimes. 

CNN has long forgotten how to report on the actual news and seems to specialize in the narrative. If Polite had been a Republican in any sense of the word (or even had a relative or a neighbor who voted for a Republican ONE TIME), they would be framing Polite as some evil, dangerous, violent Trump supporter.

FYI, CNN did eventually update their story to include the details that were originally lacking:

Update after the story has all but been forgotten.

Convenient.

&#x200B;

**""So in the 15th paragraph they say he had an internship with Quinn, then in the 20th they say he volunteered for the Obama campaign. As if anyone was going to read that far""**",SuperCharged2000,e93xa51,conservative
"https://www.cnn.com/2018/11/03/us/new-york-temple-antisemitic-messages/index.html
**Polite had been a volunteer for Obama's first presidential bid, registering voters and canvassing neighborhoods in New York, the Times reported. An Obama spokesperson declined to comment on Sunday.**
",turboderek,e94bidf,conservative
Same network that ignored the Awan brothers and DWS/computer theft.,postonrddt,e95c08d,conservative
And they wonder why people don't trust them.,theslimreaper2,e949equ,conservative
Tell a lie big and often enough and people will believe it to be true.,DocMilk,e94kq8v,conservative
Ha! They said 'deet'! xD,Godsdj,e940u45,conservative
i read that far.,turboderek,e94bkga,conservative
"Power, globalism, white guilt syndrome, and selfish exploitation of the poor for cheap labor.",Reven1911,e95mj04,conservative
Pay no attention to that man behind the curtain!,MajesticMulva,e95t3xv,conservative
Probably a test graphic.,mastaxn,e95u8j9,conservative
"> If we take one path, it will offer at least a chance for political redemption, for recovering America’s democratic values. If we take the other, we’ll be on the road to autocracy, with no obvious way to get off.

So the bad path is giving power to Democrats, right?  .... right?

> And even if Democrats do climb that tilted slope, anyone expecting Republicans to accept the result with good grace hasn’t been paying attention. 

Yes, I missed the part where the Republicans rioted in in the streets for years after Obama was elected in 2012, wore pussy hats, called repeatedly for Obama's assassination, and [swore that they would never be civil as long as they were out of power](https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/09/politics/hillary-clinton-civility-congress-cnntv/index.html).  

> And if and when a Democratic House tries to exercise its powers, you can be sure it will be met with defiance, never mind what the Constitution says.

It's ok, Trump has a pen and a phone and he'll use them.  After all, the Constitution is a living document written by old dead white men who could never have envisioned the exigencies of the 21st century, right?  .... right?  

> In fact, it’s not hyperbole to say that if the G.O.P. holds the line on Tuesday, it may be the last even halfway fair elections we’ll ever have.

*sips coffee calmly*  Not hyperbole, hm?  

> The lesson we learn from all these abuses of power is that today’s Republicans are just like their fellow white nationalists in Hungary and Poland, who have maintained a democratic facade but have in reality established one-party authoritarian regimes. 

Ah, one-party authoritarian regimes run by white nationalists.  So... the DNC?  Let's go down their leadership: Pelosi (white), Schumer (white), Hillary (white), Biden (white), Warren (white... lol)... hrm.  

> Everything we’ve seen says that Republicans will do anything they can to take and hold power, and Tuesday’s elections may be the last chance to stop them from locking in permanent rule.

And here we get into the actually worrisome part.  By spinning up Leftists with talk of a Republican coup and permanent disenfranchisement for their opponents (the inverse of which is, ironically, what the Democrats hope to accomplish), you give rise to more psychos like the Congressional baseball game shooter.  When the stakes are presented as so high and absolutist, it's going to unleash the crazies.  

> Meanwhile, the reality is that ordinary voters are more easily moved by issues that have a direct impact on their well-being

Like tax cuts?  Oh wait we can't speak of those.

> And until very recently, mainstream news media berated Democrats for running on nothing but opposition to Trump 

Um, what?  Mainstream media was and is leading the charge of pumping out nonstop opposition to Trump and Republicans.  Is the author in a fantasy world?  (Rhetorical question, I know.)

Paul Krugman has become completely unhinged.  I always mocked him as a Nobel prize winner with no understanding of actual economics - his panacea solution is eternally 'spend more money!' regardless of the circumstances - but he's gone beyond economic lunacy into nearly calling for a civil war.  

",Colonize_The_Moon,e962sfi,conservative
they are banking on people’s emotions. It’s  beyond desperate ,anon20202,e95ut24,conservative
Trump derangement syndrome at its finest. ,soxfan90,e95x0wt,conservative
i can't fathom how people are literally this stupid.,SKWM3000,e95w2af,conservative
At this point I wouldn't be surprised if Obama had asked North Korea to give is Iran nuclear fuel,sjwking,e9574kc,conservative
When do we charge that asshole with treason?  He was a manchurian candidate if there ever was one.,Hillary_For_Prison,e94r6ai,conservative
"The fact he sent 220 million dollars on his last day in office to Palestine, without telling anyone or saying anything is proof enough he wanted nothing but to weaken our country.",Hello_34,e95er18,conservative
The mild back up of the left media over the chances and this says there might be some strong internal polling in the GOP direction. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e94u6yl,conservative
Well he wasn't wrong last time. Here's to hoping that republicans gain some seats!,dsizzler,e94xf69,conservative
"Really hope you're right. I'm optimistic about the Senate, but I have no idea what's going to happen with the House. ",GuitarWizard90,e94zqvd,conservative
"It's a crapshoot. I have literally no idea what to expect, I'm going to vote tomorrow after work and let the chips fall where they may, but I am prepared for whatever outcome happens.",iwasthebeaver,e94vkb0,conservative
"I think the about face in the last 48 hours is less about strong polling in the GOPs favor, and more about the fact that the polling makes no goddamn sense right now. There's an absurd number of house races that are still considered dead heats right now, and with the apparent massive turnout predicted, quite literally *anything* could happen tomorrow. Last time we had that situation, Hillary lost.",superAL1394,e957ssj,conservative
"I hope that le Blue Wave crashes against the Red Wall, and dissipates so thoroughly that our Republican Congress starts to see merit in the concept of the Wall, and can finally be assed to fund a literal one. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e94xz82,conservative
"Lol, amen.",dsizzler,e94ydyp,conservative
She was hoping it wouldn’t be brought up. ,anon20202,e95sw0r,conservative
Don’t get complacent.,ManRAh,e9611uh,conservative
"Why would you put an economic system in the name of your party, if that economic system isn't one you support?",Themusician67,e953oxw,conservative
"1) Paywalled article with many upvotes but zero comments...almost as if people are upvoting without reading it.

2) It's just wrong. The Nazis were not socialists. This is one of the most basic, most debunkable, most historically illiterate comments you can possibly make.

The Nazis did not believe in workers owning the means of production. The Nazis detested actual socialists.

Just because National Socialism has socialism in the name doesn't mean anything. The Democratic People's Republic of Korea isn't a democracy for the people. ",BIknkbtKitNwniS,e94x758,conservative
Words and terms in 1939 don't seem to have the same definitions as 2018.,Doran902,e94y7wi,conservative
Democratic socialts = Nazis literally,krepogregg,e95d97p,conservative
It's right there in the name lol national socialist German workers party.,FistyMcBeefPunchy,e94x54y,conservative
Hitler was also a vegetarian greenie. ,johnmrson,e95fehw,conservative
"You defined communism — which the Socialists abhorred. 

They might not have been socialists, but they sure as hell were not conservatives. 

Above all, they were opportunists. ",VeggieHatr,e95hs8g,conservative
"Read ""the road to serfdom"". Even if you don't define them as socialist, it was socialism which gave rise to national socialism.",ItWasLikeWhite,e94z6dy,conservative
"The Nazis took over large companies and ran them a la Krupps.

So you're wrong.

They were also Collectivists and used labor for public works projects. 
",chabanais,e95z5z4,conservative
 the American Democrat party is not for the people either,krepogregg,e95db30,conservative
Neither is the American Democrat party,krepogregg,e95da9p,conservative
 the American Democrat party is not for the people either,krepogregg,e95dbb1,conservative
[removed],,e94zkrb,conservative
"NAZI is literally an English contraction of the word Nationalsozialist, or a member of the Nationalsozialistische Deutsche Arbeiterpartei, the national socialist German workers party. 

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nazi_Party",FistyMcBeefPunchy,e94zwpw,conservative
"Yes it's true, name's don't have to be accurate. However the Nazis were in fact socialist so...",FistyMcBeefPunchy,e94zmzq,conservative
[removed],,e95091l,conservative
"Why did the Bolsheviks kill the heroes of Petrograd, the Blacks in Ukraine, the Greens, and the Mensheviks before going after the Whites? The one thing a socialist hates the most is the wrong socialist being in charge. ",ElbowWhisper,e95a9ia,conservative
"Why did Trotskyists and Stalinists try to kill each other? Using your false logic, if one was a communist since they hated each other, the other would have had to be the opposite of a communist.

Of course that's not how it worked in reality. In real life, groups with very similar ideas are often trying to wipe each other out to gain power. ",ConsistentlyRight,e95dbkr,conservative
Just because they had a socialist economic system doesn't automatically make them allies with every other country that does. Why even ask a question like that?,FistyMcBeefPunchy,e950cco,conservative
[removed],,e950s6v,conservative
So government control of the economy isn't a staple of socialism?,FistyMcBeefPunchy,e950u31,conservative
[removed],,e951215,conservative
"It seems like you're maneuvering this conversation from whether or not the Nazis were socialist to whether socialism is beneficial. That isn't a conversation I want to have right now, so I'll just say goodnight.",FistyMcBeefPunchy,e9516tm,conservative
"This point was more to separate a connexion to polarity; states aren't either capitalist or socialist per se. Like most things in life, they are somewhere in the middle.",CIean,e951d5o,conservative
Really? She is actually suggesting that we pay people to invade our country?!? FTFY!,be_quiet_roo,e95tdz1,conservative
"Smug, flippant, biased moron who doesn't understand basic math or how incentives work.                                           

",tau_decay,e95wfo6,conservative
i'd rather pay democrats $1 million to leave.,SKWM3000,e9668me,conservative
The US has no duty to provide jobs for exiles from failed states.  These people are not asylum seekers and what she suggest amounts to paying off extortionists and terrorists.,ozric101,e95updy,conservative
True. These are GIMMIEgrants.,be_quiet_roo,e95yf2s,conservative
"The Democrats are deranged lunatics. That's the biggest reason. The American people were able to watch the Dem's insanity during the Kavanaugh hearings, and hopefully they remember that shit when they go vote. ",GuitarWizard90,e956o0r,conservative
"1. The democrats are hateful, bigoted liars that don't understand economics, morality, or american values and will stomp on anybody to get their way. 
2. see #1.",xJownage,e9513t2,conservative
[Midterm election outcome could be 'glowing good news' or 'disaster' for markets.   CNBC knows.  vote republican or risk the economy and your job.  ](https://www.cnbc.com/2018/11/05/midterm-outcome-could-be-glowing-good-news-or-disaster-for-markets.html) ,capoferrorocks,e953a66,conservative
"This was the first time in my life that I haven't voted a straight Republican ticket.

...because Michigan elects university regents and I voted for the crazy parties for U of M (Green & Natural Law).",user1492,e95muxj,conservative
Real talk but what the hell are American values anymore? I don't think anyone can agree anymore.,Bossmang,e95bubs,conservative
">don't understand economics, morality

Not just democrats, that is most of Reddit. Even ones who claim to be republican. ",Nonsenseism,e95kczc,conservative
Yeah I thought it was weird that he needed 5 whole reasons.,mikebets,e95axsa,conservative
"Life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.",Cr8er,e95qb70,conservative
"I love when /r/politics users who started following politics on 11/9/2016 stop by and drop their opinions. This was a miserable failure for the progressive movement, and the seats that were gained were largely by democrats who campaigned on working with Trump and finding compromise. Nancy Pelosi is going to fuck that all up by going after trump with investigation after investigation leading to most likely a democrat house loss once Trump is actually on the ballot in 2020. ",iwasthebeaver,e98edi7,conservative
"And yet I read it was only the 4th time in 250 years that the president's party gained in the Senate.

The author of this story is extremely anti-Trump so this is no surprise what he's writing.

https://www.newyorker.com/contributors/john-cassidy",chabanais,e98e0xd,conservative
"*checks user history*

*active user in /r/Politics*

>Can we please please PLEASE label Trump supporters as a terrorist group??? After all the violence the last few years, the the bombs, now this 

Ok",ltdshred,e98e5h3,conservative
>doubt,JMB_was_a_god,e98e31m,conservative
Would love to see their reaction to Obama losing the house.,gster50,e98dowr,conservative
"Make no mistake, a thin Democrat majority in the House is a political nonentity. As every other branch of government is controlled by Republicans, the House is trumped. ",Parsons37210,e98ehgm,conservative
">This was a miserable failure for the progressive movement

Thanks to moderates hamstring them. If it was any bit of win, it was thanks to those progressives. Of course people like Pelosi won't acknowledge that, but she will take credit for the win.",kutwijf,e99dg6s,conservative
"Can't we *please* throw people who disagree with me in jail? After all, they're literally fascists! /s",PubliusVA,e98imyn,conservative
1 step back for 4 leaps forward. I'll take it. ,Stormtideguy,e98gskp,conservative
Dido!,PerrisBueller,e968t9k,conservative
"I think you mean ""dittos""",r4d4r_3n5,e96lw6e,conservative
Democrats hate Israel and drool over Palestine so what is this bitch talking about.,McKnight36,e95rmkw,conservative
one of his best rallies. the crowd singing amazing grace for the sick woman was amazing. liberals were quick to mock that on twitter.,JMB_was_a_god,e958nze,conservative
I honestly thought this was referring to the band Rush and thought it sounded amazing.  Then I followed the link and was disappointed.  :(,justific4tion,e9578zg,conservative
I feel misled by the title,dibblythecat,e95fle5,conservative
With the link from rush Limbaugh .com I knew what I was getting haha ,Chapka69,e95hb58,conservative
"Well, the band Rush is Canadian.",fwt9287,e95lstw,conservative
"I think that there are some thought provoking arguments against abortion, but I don't think this is one of them. 

You could easily make the argument that abortions prevent rapists and murderers as well. There is an unlimited amount  of what-if scenarios to this because we're talking about natalism vs antinatalism.

Going by the same logic, it would be unethical for me not to have another child because I'm not creating another person, and therefore creating less utility, and it starts to get really convoluted, how we're supposed to morally weigh life vs potential life.

I think the most convincing argument against abortion is establishing that the fetus is worthy of moral consideration cause it's a person in its own right, and conservatives could argue this in a variety of different ways.

I'm very,VERY, reluctantly pro abortion in the early stages, but I understand why it makes people angry, and it's possible I'm super wrong.",Cucumbersomepickle,e94ohdv,conservative
How come children are killed inside PPClinics and I didn’t know about it? This sound fishy.,MusicError,e95418l,conservative
Tell them they are future democrats,CreativeRoutine,e9503bd,conservative
"The joke wasn't about abortion as much as it was about the media. The media is okay with horrible things until they happen to a journalist. Once the media is affected, free speech is threatened and it's not safe to report the ""truth."" So the joke was that journalists are so hypocritical when protecting each other that they would be pro-life if they were aborting journalists.",Drewbagger,e950zoj,conservative
"It was a joke, chill",unityrootts,e94r73y,conservative
Democrats don't have to be alive in order to vote.,sjwking,e9576z6,conservative
"I find it hilarious that the people who bitch endlessly about ""hate speech"" are the first ones to jump to ""THIS IS AN ATTACK ON THE FREEDOM OF THE PRESS"" anytime Trump pokes them.",Glochidiate,e95b2t9,conservative
"I see now, i've seen that argument used In The past.",Cucumbersomepickle,e9526lo,conservative
I'm guessing all of those people have been patriotic their entire lives.,Gnome_Sane,e942ne7,conservative
[removed],,e944ufz,conservative
Wow! Packed house! Brings a tear to my eye.,dragonenergy425,e93gg0g,conservative
[removed],,e945hzm,conservative
Thanks for the video!!!,koikatturtle,e93elmn,conservative
"Roughly half of America never stopped being patriotic.  Please note that it is only people on the Right who are waving American flags and cheering on American exceptionalism and pro-America foreign and economic policy.  The Left exists on a spectrum running from 'Death to America' (as we just saw in Iran with Farrakhan) to 'America was never great and is no different (and maybe slightly worse) than every other nation'.  

I'm not saying that there are no patriots on the Left, because of course there are.  They are mostly low-information voters, however, and their values are far out of touch with the Left's.  They are the sort of people that the Soviets derided as 'useful idiots'.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e93og85,conservative
"These crowds are crazy man. No president since i've been born, besides Obama when he first got elected can pull crowds like this when they're this deep into the presidency. ",checkingsumthin,e93ilnx,conservative
"Well, a bunch of us were always patriotic, but now the presidency is openly patriotic again. ",skarface6,e942f5k,conservative
Missouri rally will be lit as fuck.,ReaganTroll,e93d97c,conservative
This is fucking unheard of. World's most popular person. without question.,PathTo3Commas,e93gnej,conservative
Chills,AnchorsRipley,e93i2b1,conservative
That crowd though. 😮,Grandad76,e94d8hk,conservative
"Blue wave my ass. I've never seen anything like this ever. I can't remember any President, ever getting this level of support for a fucking midterm.",ll_Atlanta_ll,e93l99o,conservative
[removed],,e93lm5x,conservative
“Thrill up my leg”,mikeygio,e93jqve,conservative
That was awesome!  ,_glenn_,e93l4z8,conservative
I love this country...,Being_Libertarianish,e93q5n6,conservative
Trump made certain groups feel empowered that had been largely ignored.  They still get ignored but they feel better about it. ,touch0ph,e93xq2r,conservative
"This is what I always tell my undecided friends. Go look at the crowd at any Democrat rally and then go look at the crowd at any Trump/GOP rally.

Ask yourself which group of people love and want what's best for our country?

Just a simple Google image search will do ... filter the results to recent dates, and look at the crowds. There's only one political party that still believes in America.",PTS21,e93y5vk,conservative
Is there a link directly to the video?  ,_glenn_,e93lhv1,conservative
"Patriotism would be optimal if our country was united, glad to see all the supportive citizens.",goldrotmgonly,e956gww,conservative
"Singing songs about freedom and the great country we live in, and waving our country's flag, would and should qualify as patriotic.  I wouldn't disqualify Trump as a reason for their enthusiasm and patriotism either. Maybe not the one and only reason, but it's fair to suggest he's a big influence",longboardan34,e94qmms,conservative
">	Does singing songs and waving flags make you patriotic?

Sure does
",Tripline,e94u73o,conservative
Lol okay,N7_Starkiller,e94mq32,conservative
"Loosen up, friend.",ChopSuey2,e948qxs,conservative
"""What, you don't see all those empty seats?""

- New York Times",airforcefalco,e93q1cf,conservative
"They're synonyms for each other, no biggie. ",Ledcookey,e9498gx,conservative
"Dissent is patriotic IMO. I fly a 3x5 flag in front of my house and voted a straight blue ticket this year. In fact, I dissent BECAUSE I love this country.

There are so many good reasons to not support what is happening in this country. You don't even need to be a liberal to think so. 

If anything, wanting to go back to having decency in politics is *conservative*. ",KCchiefs88,e93ro2g,conservative
I want Josh Hawley to win so badly. Should’ve registered here when i came to college.,deepfeels96,e93mnfo,conservative
This is the one Rush will be at right? I would almost give my left nut to be there in the presence of those two. ,atltobna,e93pyyy,conservative
"The most talked about man in the world, for sure.

The right adores him, and the left can't get him out of their heads.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e93hpuw,conservative
It is Tennessee.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e93tvcf,conservative
"Haha, you’re too funny. 

Cop: “Do you know why I pulled you over today?”

You: “ don’t you have anything better to do with your time, why don’t you go catch a murderer or something”

I’d rather say make America great again than to chant “yes we can”
Can what exactly? 
Can share bathrooms? 
Can silence people who you disagree with? 

Thing is is that Obama was far more of a dictatorial leader than trump has been so far. Not saying Trump doesn’t have a personality that might give the average snowflake that feeling of oppression. But in actuality it’s the opposite for a lot of people. It’s an antidote to the division that the left and the right are partaking in. 

But yeah, good look with your identity politics and your soon to be broken home. ",xsladex,e93moac,conservative
Oh he has done more than enough actual work in the last 2 years alone. You wish to ignore facts of course.,Soldier2304,e93p5kt,conservative
"You’re so cute. He’s getting more work done than any other president WHILE doing two rallies per day. Suck it, loser! 

You, too, can #walkaway and join us. ",atltobna,e93q3mr,conservative
"Begone, thot! Back to politics with you!",VirulentVoid,e93pn7q,conservative
Oh look. Another npc. How cute. ,LumpyWumpus,e93vext,conservative
It's called being on the campaign trail during election season. It's what politicians do...,GodzRebirth,e93sn9j,conservative
"Its campaigning and every president since Washington has taken part. 

Just admit that you hate this man so much that you're willing to sacrifice the entire country out of spite. ",JaXXXuP,e93yfbx,conservative
What empty seats?,JingyBreadMan,e93yh51,conservative
"> If anything, wanting to go back to having decency in politics is conservative.

Yes.  So who is responsible for the shitshow that was Kavanaugh's confirmation process?  

Edit:  Also, who is encouraging their constituents to mob political opponents in restaurants and gas stations?  On the off chance you're posting here in good faith, think real hard about that one, and try to reconcile it with your desire for 'decency in politics'.",doireallywannadothis,e94t9g7,conservative
"Dissent is perfectly patriotic, I agree.  Everyone should have the right to speak their mind without fear of the consequences.  Of course, the Left disagrees with this and has been conducting a war on free speech for years now, so there's that...  Anyways.  

Equally good is wanting decency back in politics.  The caveat to that is that decency is a two-way street, and when 50% of the political class are rooting for Trump's assassination while seeking to punish or marginalize 50% of the electorate ('deplorables', 'bitter clingers', etc), decency will not return until that stops.  Trump - whom I presume you allude to with your non sequitor reference to 'decency' - did not appear ex nihilo; he's the culmination of almost a decade of building frustration on the Right.  He's a foil to the indecent, crude, and elitist Left.  If you don't like Trump, too bad, because until the Left returns to decency, Trump's politics will hold sway on the Right.  

Now, here's a challenge. Specify things that are happening in this country that you don't like, and that will be fixed by voting for Democrats.  Because off the top of my head, the biggest issues facing America - expanding national debt, deficit spending, border enforcement, trade imbalances abroad, and the rising threat of China - won't be resolved by putting Democrats in power.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e93tzlt,conservative
Voting for open borders loons and gun grabbers is far from patriotism.,Dorian_v25,e93xlxo,conservative
Keep voting blue and eventually you won't be able to dissent,davetn37,e94xhl2,conservative
"""Dissent is patriotic, I show this by voting for people who would love nothing more than to end other peoples right to be able to dissent"". ",JaXXXuP,e93y8cn,conservative
Rent free 👌🏼,dietcokehoe,e93i8eu,conservative
I feel like he's more popular among the right than Obama was among the left.,ChopSuey2,e948yx1,conservative
"yes, this video is of TN .. but I was talking more generally about the movement. Every state that trump rallies at .. packed house like this.",ll_Atlanta_ll,e942dr9,conservative
"Actually almost more work this year than any other pres. 2.7 million new jobs, biggest surge since 1997, big tax breaks for all income brackets, met with North Korea with bipartisan support, opened the first ever embassy in Israel (all while being an anti semite?) and actually bolstered education reform. It’s just too bad that people only listen to the media and you MUST fact check with your own research. That goes for any politician any story, anything. The modern media is the most divisive entity of our time. We really need corporations out of our politics ",Tekshow,e93ue5s,conservative
[removed],,e94c66l,conservative
"Not so sure about that.  A lot of folks on the left viewed Obama as something like the Messiah in 2008.  

Of course, they became disillusioned over time, whereas Trump's popularity has grown consistently since the beginning of his Presidency.  But hopefully we never view him as a savior of some sort; after all, he's just a man.",doireallywannadothis,e94tq3k,conservative
"> Trump has made that worse.

Oh, so we're blaming presidents?  I thought that Congress made the budget.  If we want to blame presidents though, let's talk about Obama, who doubled the national debt and spent as much as every single president before him - combined.  

> Illegal immigration in the US has been stable since 2009.

First off, that's not correct.  We are in a border surge that is [the highest since 2011](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/washington-secrets/border-surge-highest-since-2011-each-illegal-immigrant-costs-70-000-7x-deportation-price), and numbers have been increasing since 2011.  Second, the methodology there looks [extremely suspect](http://www.pewhispanic.org/2016/09/20/methodology-10/) to me.   To quote it, ""a residual estimation methodology that compares a demographic estimate of the number of immigrants residing legally in the country with the total number of immigrants as measured by a survey"".  Seriously?  So you expect illegals to report that they are not in the country legally.  That's a BRILLIANT strategy.  /s

> Immigration is a net gain for the United States and its economy

This is a hypothetical, not a certainty.  What is a certainty is that every illegal costs [$70,000](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/washington-secrets/border-surge-highest-since-2011-each-illegal-immigrant-costs-70-000-7x-deportation-price).  Illegals are coming here because of our welfare systems, our healthcare, and our schools.  An illiterate Honduran illegal is of zero benefit except maybe as a farmworker.  

> If this was not true, how could we have reached the position of unipolar hegemon with a history of consistently pro-immigration policies?

Post hoc ergo propter hoc.  We are only a unipolar hegemony because the Soviet Union imploded, and our economic dominance is largely due to WWII having literally destroyed the economies of almost every other nation in the developed world.  Immigration has largely been a non-issue in that.  ILLEGAL immigration is a (relatively) recent phenomenon, and has MASSIVELY exploded beginning in the 1980s. 

> running a trade deficit has been the standard US policy for decades.

At one point it was standard US policy to enslave black people.  Just because it's the status quo does not make it a good idea.  The idea behind running deficits with China was to hopefully liberalize them.  That did not occur.  It serves no purpose to continue to handicap the US economy in order to benefit a strategic adversary.  

> The results of Trump's actions here remain to be seen. 

What does Trump have to do with this?  China is a strategic threat. 

> That seems to contradict the fact that education level correlates in a fairly linear fashion with leftist viewpoints. 

You are aware that many of the intelligentsia during the Cold War were communist sympathizers, right?  Academia in the 1960s and 1970s was where most of our current crop of socialists were indoctrinated.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e94lh2r,conservative
[removed],,e94wn1v,conservative
"I don't disagree with you, but to be fair to the hondurans most of them are literate and it's mostly the older folk that never learned. ",davetn37,e94xsvi,conservative
I do not have time to play quote wars. Let’s agree to disagree. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e94z6t3,conservative
"Ok but at the very least you have to talk about moon colonization with me. 

Location: Natural caves due to radiation resistance.

Economy: Helium-3 & spaceport based to start with, with a more complex economy developing over generations.

The moon is a *way* better primary expansion candidate than Mars. I don't know what Musk is on about tbh. ",Insanely_Pale,e955ick,conservative
"It's early and coffee is still kicking in, so sure.  

Location: The idea of dome cities on the Moon is stupid, because of the sheer amount of radiation shielding plus impact protection (micrometeorites and not-so-micro ones) that you'd have to build in.  You're bang on to target caves; natural ones (lava tubes have been tentatively ID'd near the north pole) would be a good starting point, and could be expanded over time both laterally and vertically (downwards).  The main problem with the cave idea is that lunar regolith particulates are not great to breathe in, so you'd have to spray a sealant over the native rock surface and very carefully decontaminate all suits, rovers, etc that were in contact with the surface.  Other than that though, it's an pressure-stable radiation-hardened environment that doesn't require TOO much in the way of building supplies from Earth.  

Economy: He3 is still largely speculative until we have a good amount of prospecting/sampling done on the dark side.  It might be there, it might not be there.  The spaceport though is what I view as the main reason to colonize the Moon.  It's the natural gateway to the rest of the solar system, far enough out of Earth's gravity well that you don't have to worry too much about station-keeping, relatively debris-free so that there are no concerns about getting hit by a wrench from the 1970s or [paint chips moving at 3x railgun speeds](https://www.popsci.com/paint-chip-likely-caused-window-damage-on-space-station).  The ideal way to go about it would be to situate a space elevator with one end on the Moon and the counterweight being the orbital port.  Ships would dock at the spaceport and then shuttle up or down personnel and material as required.  

Of course, to get the materials to build that elevator, you'd either have to spend A LOOOOTTTTT of money boosting it into Lunar orbit, or you'd have to be mining asteroids or lunar ores.  (There are companies looking at that, e.g. Moon Express, Deep Space Industries, Planetary Resources, etc.)  

Don't get me wrong, we should colonize Mars eventually, but not yet.  Musk is premature, but likely picked Mars because no one's been there yet, so it would capture people's interest more than the boring ol' Moon would.  (The popularity of The Martian likely helped him.)  The Moon is the logical first stepping stone in terms of testing technology and systems.",Colonize_The_Moon,e95txs2,conservative
"A space elevator on the Moon is too efficient to pass up honestly. Hopefully by the time we can create one of those, we've learned enough during the process and our metamaterials have advanced to the point where we can get one going on Earth, as that's really the only way to lower the economic burden of launching things into orbit. 

He3 is speculative, but it'll be big news if it's there (and if we get this fusion thing off the ground). 

The glaring problem I see with Mars is the dead magnetosphere. It's going to take some kind of ingenuity/technology well beyond what we have now to ameliorate that issue. That, and the effect of gravity on developing fetuses. ",Insanely_Pale,e9638ez,conservative
gentle reminder that exit polls have been historically inaccurate and don't matter. Counted votes matter.,aCreditGuru,e96z1l7,conservative
"Drudge has lost the plot, he doesn’t need to be so damn depressing all the time. I swear to God he acts like a real “never Trumper” sometimes.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e96ynxr,conservative
i think it's good for us to remember that the odds favoring us keeping the house are long. we should prepare ourselves for the outcome going against us tonight.,SKWM3000,e96yvsv,conservative
"Dont care. Exit polls aren't always right. And more importantly, I MAY have clicked on Drudge's site 3 times in the past year. I used to do it every day. I avoid him like the plague for multiple reasons nowadays.  I dont care if he's always been a Republican, he just isn't the same as he used to be and it shows in his site. Im done, not looking back. I encourage others to do so as well.",MaddSim,e96yy6d,conservative
No matter what happens you will not find a single conservative sceeching at the sky tomorrow. ,ozric101,e978ykj,conservative
When are results out?,Bluteid,e970yf1,conservative
He's a drama queen. He's going to post whatever gets the most clicks. ,GuitarWizard90,e96z3wq,conservative
He is a nevertrumper.,StraightNewt,e96zpnq,conservative
And he is going on about Guam lol.,Zac1245,e96zv2b,conservative
"I agree. As much as I'd welcome us keeping everything, we should expect to only keep one of the two chambers, which is great in and of itself, considering what normally happens to the president's party in the first midterm. A blue wave would them be taking both chambers, not taking the house, that's predictable",Atallahnator,e96z4wg,conservative
"A Blue Wave is whatever the media deems a Blue Wave is unfortunately. Claiming the House will most certainly be declared a “referendum on Trump” and a Blue Wave. 

If we hold the House, it’ll be about how racist, xenophobic white women came out in droves to tip the scales in our favor in order to stop illegal immigration. ",mikeygio,e973xo2,conservative
"When can we stop referring to people as ""x of color""?",cavemanben,e960z1f,conservative
Ummmm....what?  “ I Ohio Voting”?,budado-head,e95xmv4,conservative
That's Ohio for you. 😅,lukethelogician,e95yx58,conservative
That’s actually a really good piece.,RightWingFreak,e96ahu1,conservative
Reading shit like this just makes me nauseous. Some say 10-20 seat Dem gain this site says 40. Some predict 60. Tired of paying attention to the analysis and polls. Just do your part everyone and we should be fine. ,latotokyo123,e94ud6e,conservative
"Just looking at recent history, the GOP seems to have an advantage with controlling the house. A lot of the toss ups are seats that have been GOP held for at least 6 years. The dems have controlled the house for  only 4 of the last 24 years. I expect it to be very close.  But I think I would rather be in the GOP’s position than the dem’s. They’ve done a great job of playing up the outrage and getting energized and I have no doubt they will take back some seats. If it’s enough to flip the house, that would indicate a pretty big shift on the local level and the GOP will need to take a look in the mirror and figure out what is going wrong. 

Probably healthcare. We had years of complaining about ACA and then finally got a majority and all we could muster is repealing the individual mandate. If we retain a majority, we need to come up with a serious plan for healthcare to thank the voters and help Americans. ",pk3maross,e94wl44,conservative
"I agree. I haven’t paid attention to any polls. I’ve listened to the candidates in my area and that’s it. 

I’m gonna do my part and see what happens ",Chapka69,e94usw3,conservative
Yeah like getting rid of a 1000$ fine for not having health insurance? Idk how hat works and why dems think it’s a great idea? Can anyone elaborate??,preston_garvey4,e9585l4,conservative
"There you go. Our individuals votes matter way more than a presidential election. One vote actually makes a difference. Vote straight Republican. My vote doesn't mean shit for the Presidency or the Senate, but I've sent one to one of the closest races in the country for the House. All of us have to do this. ",latotokyo123,e9510q5,conservative
Youre asking in the wrong place because I don't understand it either ,molon-labe7,e95ikn7,conservative
"It is supposed to encourage participation in health insurance by everyone. Insurance only works if you have an insured population that is made up of healthy individuals to offset the unhealthy individuals. The healthy individuals will be paying a lot more than they are taking from insurance companies and the unhealthy will be taking more than they pay. Health insurance has become so expensive probably due to insurance providers being required to cover pre-existing conditions. Individuals with a pre-existing condition can sign up for health insurance and health insurance companies know they will lose money on them. Health insurance companies need a healthy population to offset that loss. Premiums are so high, healthy individuals don't want to participate because they think they will be paying more than they will be getting. The individual mandate was supposed to encourage people to participate in health insurance. 

I'm all for getting rid of government mandates telling me what I should do, but getting rid of the individual mandate and not changing anything else fucks all this up. ",pk3maross,e95n71o,conservative
"If you are a diehard republican voting democrat to spite Trump, you’re worse than a fool. You’re sacrificing your own principles and ideals to spite a man you barely know. And the democrats will punish us all for your stupidity. ",Username4418,e95lq82,conservative
What does Never Trump have to do with Republicans though? People can support Republicans without being pro-Trump.,justhere2havefun,e945bae,conservative
Let the NeverTrump movement go. Most of them either accepted it when he won the presidency or turned into (effectively) democrats. No need to continue beating a dead horse ,molon-labe7,e944uv7,conservative
"Especially considering Trump had hardly been conservative most of his life. He was such a wild card, no telling what we would get. Hell, Trump is likely still close friends with the Clintons. 

I would have much rather had Cruz or Rand, but voted for and have since  accepted Trump as POTUS. ",uniquecannon,e948whh,conservative
I'm still gonna call Trump out whenever he does stupid shit like crushing our soybean exports and spending $6 billion bailing soybean farmers out with *my* money. Doesn't mean I don't accept him as our duly elected President.,GorathThorgath,e94hh7z,conservative
"The Republicans who have been discredited by their fanatically unrealistic predictions of doom under Trump basically had to keep moving left to find employment.  No conservative gives a shit what Jennifer Rubin thinks, so she has to re-imagine herself as a ""rogue conservative"" for the CNN viewer.",FelixFuckfurter,e947kpc,conservative
"When they stop calling themselves conservatives or Republicans, then the beatings can stop.",sendintheshermans,e947gs2,conservative
"I second the Cruz or Rand Paul sentiments. 

Ill also raise you a Ben Carson. He would have been a great president. ",Themusician67,e94qyc0,conservative
"That probably won't happen. It is significantly better for them to claim to be conservatives. For example, Joe Scarborough is *clearly* a Democrat, but it is much better for his show to claim to be a ""republican"" or a ""conservative"" because then Morning Joe can claim to be ""balanced"".

If the NeverTrumpers haven't shifted their focus, most have, like myself, then they won't and no amount of these articles will stop it from happening. ",molon-labe7,e947o6j,conservative
"These types of articles whether they intend to or not are best suited to remind people just how toxic Nevertrumpers are. So even if you find one that says things you agree with on non Trump related issues they are best  treated like the plague, because their Nevertrumpism will always leak out and infect others.  ",Rightquercusalba,e9686fv,conservative
"To be fair, this is the case for everyone, everywhere, and there is a 100% chance there are a lot of dead republicans on active voter rolls as well.  

Source: I used to help my dad go through the voter roles for our precinct to clear people off who have died.  ",Speedking2281,e94a2l1,conservative
Just because you're dead doesn't mean you can't still be useful... ^^/s,GFZDW,e93oo5k,conservative
Probably voted Democrat for the last 14 years.,cargopantspirate,e93jgyb,conservative
"But left wing voter fraud is a right wing conspiracy! ^that ^^keeps ^^^happening ^^^^...

Edit: do I need a /s?",sir_fenwick,e943szn,conservative
 Strange how dead people are always liberals.,StephenScherer1,e93zux8,conservative
"The investigation revealed that this person was on the list, but had not voted.

https://townhall.com/tipsheet/bethbaumann/2018/11/05/ohio-poll-worker-sees-her-dead-neighbors-name-on-active-voter-roster-n2534905",spice_weasel,e93vhqn,conservative
"They aren't.  I used to help clear my precinct's voter roles of deceased people, and I can promise you there are plenty of republicans that are also dead who are on voter roles.  I'm not saying that dishonest people couldn't ""game"" the system to leave dead people on there, but I am saying that even if everyone IS honest, there will be plenty of names missed. ",Speedking2281,e94a6c0,conservative
Well that's good .,cargopantspirate,e945rmx,conservative
Yet....had not voted YET.,mattmcd20,e93xqt4,conservative
My comment was that once DEAD they all vote DEMOCRATIC.,StephenScherer1,e94f3bn,conservative
Yes. They had not voted yet during the last 14 years.,spice_weasel,e93yfr1,conservative
"That's because mass immigration *destroys that 'us'.* 

",lost_snake,e96796a,conservative
"Quick reminder that polls on if people want more or less immigration are completely pointless, worse, they are propaganda since the respondents *don’t have any idea how much immigration there currently is*. 


And, those that might have an idea, are unable to put it as a percentage of the total pop, they don’t know about birth rates, and mostly base their opinion off of the immigrants they have personally met through school or work rather than the millions working menial jobs.


Ignore the polls.",scarmine34,e962gi0,conservative
"As usual, crickets in r/news",Hegemon_Alexander,e93dwkd,conservative
"This was immediately labeled a Trump supporter by the press, when it happened ",true4blue,e93dv6m,conservative
And the fake news media are dead silent on this story.  Journalism is nothing more than propaganda.  Stories are only stories when there is a clear message being pushed.  All other stories that break this agenda are ignored and honestly suppressed. ,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e93e15l,conservative
Looks like their latest false flag attempt got foiled by those pesky security cameras.  I wonder who the patsy was going to be?,mlmack,e93ed8x,conservative
"At the very least, I have a few  lib friends on Facebook talking about anti-semitism coming from the extreme left as well as the extreme right, and trying to get folks to recognize that fact. (They don't mention Trump at all in these posts, as that would provide some cover.)",xwhy,e93hasu,conservative
"I am sure /r/reeeedacted and CNN\MS EEEeeEENBC will cover this, right?",Dogfacedgod88,e93f6yj,conservative
Imagine my shock.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e93hqz0,conservative
"[Here](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/11/03/nyregion/anti-semitic-hate-crime-vandalism.html) is a NYT article from after James Polite's arrest, coming up with every excuse in the book about how this man is a victim of the system's failures on foster care, mental health, and drugs. Can anyone imagine the reaction if Fox News published an article like this about a right-wing anti-Semite?

It's not surprising that the NYT published this, though. They look rather ridiculous given [this article](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/12/14/nyregion/after-years-in-foster-care-intern-adopted-by-city-hall-catches-a-break.html?module=inline) from last December profiling this same guy as a success story, having ""defied the odds"" to go to college and be successful thanks to the generous help of a Democratic city councilwoman and his experience volunteering for the Obama campaign.",oren0,e94aqi6,conservative
Farrakhan would be proud,Spartan-417,e93rmvc,conservative
Obamaite in Action.,StephenScherer1,e93fjhm,conservative
"When the Left calls a terrorist ""right-wing"" or ""Republican,"" they are always making assumptions and classifying things that aren't right-wing as right-wing.

When the Right calls a terrorist ""left-wing"" or a ""Democrat,"" we are referring to someone that has literally been a part of Democratic campaigns.",Telineye,e93wndt,conservative
When will this right-wing terrorist be put behind bars for life?!?!?!,atomicdiarrhea4000,e940kv4,conservative
Why am I not surprised,VoinaYMir,e94cmo8,conservative
[there was this also...](https://nypost.com/2018/11/05/the-moment-teens-hurled-a-pole-through-a-synagogue-window/) ,prey4villains,e93szpl,conservative
The thread about it last week was pretty ugly. Tons of people blaming Trump for some reason. ,StanleyKubricksPenis,e93e6uo,conservative
"They just have to fact-check it first.
It’ll be top post with 70k upvotes in no time! ",danielsnelen,e93ired,conservative
">work on the Obama compaign

>do something wrong

>suddenly you're a far right Trump supporter

I've really come to hate the press.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e93hszl,conservative
Don't hold your breath,fifaislife206,e93k36l,conservative
"It's *obviously* his anti-semitic rhetoric, right? /s",justhere2havefun,e93h14g,conservative
Optimism is nice :D....*looks at r/news* ...oh,callthereaper64,e93w41e,conservative
Gobbles would've been jealous and would've wished to have a propaganda network similar to the democrats,TheMormanTrump,e941yxp,conservative
"> anti-semitic

This one I never understood. Aren't 100% of his grand children Jewish? 
",StanleyKubricksPenis,e93i3u8,conservative
"It’s because he’s a conservative, and we all know that the Nazis were really German conservatives too, right? /s",DocMilk,e93miur,conservative
Only a TRUE anti-Semite would move their embassy to Jerusalem!!,Xcrunner_1009,e93lege,conservative
"> It’s because he’s a conservative

Which is extra weird because haven't the Conservatives always been chastised for obsessing over Israel? ",bobcat_copperthwait,e93r8dq,conservative
It's the anti-Semitism that causes that obsession.,tehForce,e93uebl,conservative
"No one person could ever have that much power and not corrupt it.  Said person does not exist.  It's the same as them saying ""socialism would of worked if only they had a benevolent dictatorship.""  which is an oxymoron in itself.",callthereaper64,e94rjwy,conservative
"A lot of people point to places such as Venezuela as an example of what socialism does to a country, but you don't even need to do that. In France in 1981 a coalition of Communists, Socialists, and Labor Unions dominated in the elections taking the Presidency, Prime Minister and an overwhelming majority in the lower house. This was the first time the socialists were elected to power in the 5th Repulic's existence. They had a free reign to implement many socialists policy. They nationalized the banks, the insurance industry, and the defense industry. They implemented a wealth tax, increased minimum wage by 15%, reduced the work week to 38 hours, and increased housing subsidies for the poor. Within six months the economy almost collapsed. Inflation jumped, unemployment continued to grow, and the Franc was devalued three times. This ironically forced the Socialist government to adopt austerity measures. Socialism - not even once.",Kovics_Kool_Klan,e94zkk2,conservative
"Aside from the overwhelming evidence of market economies providing vastly superior standards of living for the people living within them (even Nordic countries are market economies), the best argument I personally have for Capitalism over Socialism is the following.

In order for socialism to work, you essentially need something that doesn't exist: a perfectly altruistic group of people running the country/economy you're living within. Such a person or group does not exist - it's against human nature. Socialists even admit as much when they explain why it has failed in the past - the leaders are corrupt, and they exploit the people they claim to work for and use the system against them. This is true, and will continue to be true for every single centralized socialist government that ever has or will exist. Even if you had the most perfect possible person in charge of such a system, there is no way you could find enough people to serve under them to keep the system running free of corruption, crime and inequality.

Capitalism, for all of its flaws, accepts this human truth that we're generally self-centered and greedy at our cores. Instead of ignoring this truth of human nature, Capitalism instead harnesses this truth and forces people to create things that are of value to others, in exchange for currency. Capitalism doesn't try to ignore or re-invent human nature. It recognizes that people want to acquire goods and wealth, spend their income on things they want, and it provides a system for them to do so at their own discretion while rewarding those who provide value to the system.

Socialism tries to cure the issue of inequality by forcing a top-down approach of redistribution that ignores basic human nature. Capitalism seeks to indirectly do the same via a bottom-up approach that works with the flawed human spirit to provide value to others.",lion27,e94s3m4,conservative
"The problem with Socialism (and any Leftist ideology) is that Leftists operate from the basic, foundational premise that, deep down inside, *inherently*, everyone is a good and decent person.

They believe that all of society's ills, indeed all the problems we face in life: greed, theft, lying...even murder are all due to external factors that cause otherwise good people to act opposite their natural inclinations.  Thus, if we could outlaw the negative factors that produce this bad behavior, we would all live in peace, harmony and prosperity with each other.

Every policy application designed by Leftists is built with the notion of eliminating things like: racism, poverty, sexism and so forth; which they do not believe are problems with *humanity* per se, rather they are all side effects of unenlightened forms of government (or economic mechanisms) which artificially create these negative factors.  Leftists believe in a sort of governmental alchemy that, with the proper application of just the right ingredients, they will be able to bring about a Golden Age in which everyone is able to live as their true, and noble selves.

Of course, Conservatives generally believe that mankind's natural inclinations are **not** noble or good.  That inherent and deeply ingrained self-interest (even selfishness) is the most prominent force driving the pursuits of every person on the planet.  Conservative philosophy recognizes that the external restraints of (fixed) morality and The Rule of Law are the only influences which bridle this self-interest and keep us all from devolving into anarchy.  More specifically, The American Founding Fathers believed not only that suppression of humanity's baser instincts was folly, but that *harnessing* them was the best way to drive progress.

Recognizing mankind's strong desire to pursue one's own happiness, The Founders established, within our Nation, some fairly wide boundaries of acceptable conduct in our interactions with each other.  We are free to pursue the type of career we want, the level of income we desire and to negotiate social and financial transactions in which both parties come away feeling more-or-less equally satisfied.  

For instance, if you're selling a car, you ask your price until someone willing to pay it comes along and buys it from you.  You've traded something you value for something else of equal or greater value to you.  You're happy; so is your customer.  The voluntary interaction between the self-interest of car sellers and the self-interest of car buyers sets the market and baseline value of cars, organically.

In a Socialist economy, to one degree or another, a *THIRD PARTY* is setting the price for things.  The government may take complete control of your automobile factory and artificially set the price to what it deems the ""most fair"" or it may just mandate caps (perhaps through taxation) on how much you could charge for one of your vehicles (in the interest of making sure that the maximum number of people who want one of your cars can buy one.)  This seems very nice for folks looking to purchase a new vehicle, but as the guy making the cars, this isn't likely to be one-hundred percent satisfactory.  To some degree, your self-interest as a car seller has been involuntarily suppressed by complete strangers in a far-distant capital.  Sure, they'll promise to compensate you in some way or another, but as they have never met you, they don't know anything about who you are or what you want, and so what they're offering automatically won't be as satisfactory as setting your own price.  

In short, the Socialist government robs its citizens of the opportunity to *voluntarily* negotiate their own contracts and set their desired prices.  They seek to **suppress** humanity's intrinsic self-interest in exchange for eliminating those external negative factors its practitioners believe are responsible for society's woes.  Unfortunately, for Leftists (and all their philosophies) mankind is *not* inherently good, and so all their endeavors for benevolent, wise control are for naught.  This fact is belied even by Leftists themselves, as demonstrated by their vitriol for specific people or groups.  To the Left, anyone who wishes to maintain a higher degree of autonomy than afforded by all their proposed forms of governance and economics, is someone who is inherently flawed and must be removed as a factor (whether physically or by exerting strict control over the free expression of ideas) in order for their plans to succeed.

However, in the end, human self-interest is a force too powerful to completely eliminate.  It first corrupts the governors who abuse their power to satisfy their selfish desires, which leads to the breakdown of the mechanisms of government, which leads to discontent in the populace; who eventually replace their gover**nors** if not their govern**ment**. 

The Left's refusal to acknowledge, much less *accommodate* the reality that all mankind is inherently flawed and selfish leads them into the folly of believing they can eliminate evil through better government and build a legislative tower to Heaven.  On the Right we recognize that evil cannot be eliminated (at least not by government) and that concentrated power, wielded by people who are inherently and hopelessly flawed, only leads to sorrow.  Better to disperse the power of government and thus allow the voluntary negotiations between self-interested parties to guide us safely forward.",robotoverlordz,e94ywvo,conservative
"If I remember correctly the old guard of the Soviet Union is probably the closest example of that happening in action, then Stalin came in and murdered them and their families. I would assume you could find examples like that in every socialist system. ",churninbutter,e94w6f6,conservative
"Our constitution wasn't written in a vacuum.  The drafters knew Locke, Blackstone, and Gibbon.  They learned from the failures of past governments, and they structured our republic to last.

Our system has withstood a civil war.  It embraced the Industrial Revolution and prospered.  It ended not one, but two, World Wars. It has weathered massive changes in social mores and economic conditions.  It set the standard for protecting the liberties of the individual.

And how many socialist regimes have managed even a fraction of that? None.

The ""oh, but it's never been done right"" argument might hold up if it only went wrong once or twice, but socialism has failed *every single time* it's been the basis of a government. ",LonelyMachines,e94ssc8,conservative
"As Margaret Thatcher once said, ""The trouble with Socialism is that eventually you run out of other people's money.""",mlmack,e94vzt8,conservative
"Easy.

Socialism is the idealology of entropy.

It's a race to the bottom. It discourages competition since those who excel don't get rewarded for efforts.

Human nature consists of taking the path of least resistance, and it is a horrid flaw to base a society on.

The end result is that you have people who don't want to excel, don't want to advance society, don't want to take risks, and just sit back, do the bare minimum, take their share of the pot, and get upset when everyone else does the same and there is nothing left in the pot


It's the reason group projects are despised by hard workers and loved by the lazy. It's so easy to do as little as possible and get full rewards but is infuriating to do all the work for the benefit of those who refuse ",Stained-Glass-Window,e94x5yx,conservative
"Everything works in theory, few things work in reality. ",smaug777000,e94smng,conservative
You don't get to take the things that I've earned and worked so hard for at the point of a gun.,Hayes_for_days,e94v4w2,conservative
"Remember that the burden of proof always lies on the ""accuser"" not the ""defendant"". It is not necessarily your responsibility to prove that Socialism doesn't work; it is, on the other hand, their responsibility (at least in cases like the example you provided) to prove that it does. In the end, without sufficient evidence and logic, their side cannot stand up to scrutiny.

When in doubt, let them describe what they think Socialism is. Then, take them through it step by step. If you have to, use analogies. In basic point of fact, Socialism does nothing to counter human nature. People are naturally lazy and will always choose the ""path of least resistance"" (unless they have reason not to). Socialism provides no incentive to work and rewards those who do less work, therefore work without significant oversight will come to a stand-still. This is why those countries had such ""bad"" leaders; it is a necessary inevitability (redundant?) that these despots rise to power in this situation, otherwise the system will collapse. Socialism, Communism, and Marxism have much more in common with Fascism than Capitalism and Democracy ever will. The reason that the American system (Capitalist Republic Democracy) has lasted for so long is that it forces people to go against their own nature without any oversight. They must hold themselves accountable for their own actions or face destruction.",infinitycore,e94xgr9,conservative
The market has been the best way to reduce cost of living and increase national wealth.,SendixBunny,e94u0nb,conservative
“Can you point to an instance where socialism has created wealth and freedom at the pace that capitalism has in the US?”,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9563kg,conservative
"To paraphrase President Gerald Ford, ""any government that is powerful enough to give you everything you want, is powerful enough to take away everything you have.""",Sylentor,e95q82i,conservative
"While I agree with the comments below about the corruption of power, etc., I want to make a different point, because I think that, even assigning the very best of intentions to men, socialism just doesn't work. 

It is worth noting that I, and many Christians, believe that, upon Christ's triumphant Second Coming, He will reign personally upon the earth; all things will be held in common, and everyone's needs and wants will be fulfilled (in the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, we know this as 'the law of consecration').  Why, then, do I not believe in socialism, even though it has some parallels to this wonderful future?

It is because you need a Divine leader to have such a world- not only one who is incorruptible and perfectly fair, but one is who is *All-Knowing* and miraculous. Even the best human leader is just that- human. Even with the very best of intentions, the government simply cannot figure out how many shoes to make, who will want to eat Italian on any given night, or how many brands of deodorant the market needs. Socialism is, in essence, the idea that the government will centrally plan all of those things, and then tell people where to work, and how much to make. How can a government fairly decide who is an opera singer and who is a plumber? Who decides, for that matter, how many  opera singers we even need? And how do you deal with things that are very popular but some people don't like (for example, I don't drink alcohol or coffee, but many people do. Do I get some kind of work remit?), or things that are very unpopular but necessary (someone needs to be the horse poop scooper)? What if someone just doesn't like their assigned job? All of these things would tax the mind of even the fairest and most benign people. 

In the end, socialism is not programs for poor people, or high taxes, or free college- it is governmental central planning over the means of production and the lives of its citizens. Such a system can not work today, and will never work, even with the best of intentions (which, as eloquently expressed in other comments, will never be what you have in our fallen world). ",Courtholomew,e95xdyw,conservative
"If there is something, anything, that the government can exploit.. they will. It’s best to never give them that option by heavily limiting what they can do.",_yuengling,e94s51c,conservative
"Depends.  It's amazing how quickly you can derail the democratic socialist stuff by showing them the average tax rates for middle and lower class individuals in their favorite European countries (45-60%).  There's this notion the rich are so rich there's money floating around out in the ether that will pay for everything.  There isn't.  Never has been.  

For real Socialism, define what Socialism means and start from there.  Most do not actually think of Socialism as a government owned and completely controlled economy.  They have this idea under such a system they will retain their rights, their choices.  They don't.  

In a Socialist system the Government decides everything.  Including where you work, what stores produce what goods, what type of goods, when and how much they produce, where.  They decide when you get medical care, what you have to do to get it (maybe not be fat).  Most of your life choices go back to the Government making the choice, by definition.  This includes how much education you get. 

Why this is important: the more government controls you have, the closer you get to this situation, the less rights and freedoms individuals have.  This is why Socialist systems are corrupt, abusive, unproductive and have killed millions.  ",Roez,e94uvm9,conservative
"If there were a ""good"" person as the semi-totalitarian/dictator of the strong-government socilist utopia..a ""bad"" politician will just use dirty tricks (or violence) to oust that good leader and replace them. A ""good"" leader cannot survive. The ""bad"" leader can't then be voted out and replaced with a new ""good"" leader because the bad leader will end elections... only temporarily, of course. ;)

See: Bernie getting sabotaged by Hillary.

I don't think Bernie is ""good"", but the socialist you ar trying to convince probably does.",jade_crayon,e94v39f,conservative
Wait for them to get their first job and realize that they could spend their own money a thousand times better than the government does and that more government is pretty much the worst idea in the history of human civilization.,Yosoff,e94znad,conservative
">There are strong reasons for believing that what to us appear the worst features of totalitarian systems are not accidental byproducts but phenomena which totalitarianism is certain to sooner or later produce.

>Just as the choice architect who sets out to plan economic life will soon be confronted with the alternative of either assuming dictatorial powers or abandoning his plans, so the totalitarian dictator would soon have to choose between disregard of ordinary morals and failure.

>It is for this reason that the unscrupulous and uninhibited are likely to be more ""successful"" in a society tending toward totalitarianism. 

-[F.A. Hayek](http://www.savageleft.com/poli/rts-ten.html)",eeeeeeeeeepc,e95062i,conservative
"Some of the things required to make socialism work -  
- government redistribution of private property  
- a police state  
- re-education camps  
- price controls  
- giving total power and control to a single political party that will eventually decide whether people who disagree should live or die.

The only thing required to make capitalism work -  
- an agreement between two parties.",UltraSurvivalist,e95066a,conservative
"From a religious standpoint, total depravity. Humans are sinful in nature and will often sin to achieve desires, e.g. being lazy or lying to earn handouts. ",GGtheBoss17,e9559ec,conservative
"Unfortunately, it’s hard to do. Because it is appealing to a lot of people. However, the only real way to beat it is to let it die itself, unfortunately, every time you point to a prime example of why socialism fails(even the earliest colonies of America) you’re always countered with “that’s not real socialism” but usually, they just argue that said socialist system is beautiful and it was the American capitalist that made it a shit hole. ",rebamerican,e94y7gu,conservative
"People who advocate socialism (who aren’t politicians) are people with nothing to lose.  Once they’ve earned anything they’ll change their tune.  Now the politicians are nefarious; they are preying on the laziness and stupidity of the young and poor.  The democrats nowadays know that success in life is the enemy of socialism, so they are on a perpetual mission to kill opportunity.",booblitchutz,e950tn5,conservative
"Their argument ultimately fails because the whole point of hating capitalism is that ""people are greedy.""

 If you get socialism, somehow all of a sudden people are not going to still be greedy assholes?

",Spysix,e953sdz,conservative
"The only means to achieve a 'socialist future' is to equip a state with totalitarian power; that is a recipe for inevitable failure;  the problem isn't that 'Socialism hasn't been tried',  but that it has been tried in innumerable guises, under endless schemes to protect the people, and has always failed, because of the fundamental requirement that everything is subject to the power of the state.
",ErieHog,e954gc7,conservative
"Think of the purest, most altruistic person you can imagine. Bernie Sanders, the Pope, Trudeau, whoever. Put them in charge of the Socialist Utopia that you have in your mind. Puppies and rainbows and paid vacation for all.

Now, what are you supposed to do when that person *steps down?*",GameShowWerewolf,e955pii,conservative
"Hopefully I can articulate this well enough. I'm no Hayek. 


In short, socialism has a knowledge problem. 


Resources are scarce. If they weren't, then none of our problems would exist. Therefore, we need to know how to allocate them most efficiently in order to satisfy as many needs and wants as possible for as many people as possible. Socialism isn't very effective at doing that. 


Think of all the economic decisions you make in one day: what groceries to buy; what mode of transportation you use; what hobbies you spend your money on. Then imagine that on a national scale— no, a global scale. No one person has perfect information on all things he buys and sells, let alone that information for others. So how do we convey information? Or in other words, how do we convey people's preferences? The answer is price signals in a market economy. Prices, set by supply and demand, tell us what people want produced. In addition, entrepreneurship and economic calculation are also critical in determining resource allocation. We need entrepreneurs to calculate returns on investments. If an endeavor isn't worth it, then they'll employ their capital elsewhere. This helps order people's preferences (i.e. people want both bread and shoes, but which do they want more of).


The public ownership of production would struggle with this. In a private system, the ownership of production is heavily divided: in other words, people specialize in what they do best, and they deal specifically with information necessary for their industry. But a system consisting of central planners will be forced to process tons of information (fragmented, imperfect, even contradictory information possessed solely by individuals), and it will be harder for central planners to determine people's preferences. Even when they know what people want, how will they know the order of preferences? There's no more profit motive— i.e., no more calculation of economic return. It'll be hard to know how much to produce of what. Everyone needs shoes; everyone needs food; everyone needs housing; a nation needs to defend itself. But you can only employ resources in so many areas. And getting that right is important. Otherwise, you might end up with some Soviet-like famines. And whatever policies do get implemented will likely come with a major lag like we often see with the Fed's monetary policy. 


There is too much uncertainty, too many little changes as well as large, that make it impossible for any centrally planned economy to work. You'll end up wasting resources and with a poorer populace. 


Now, if you just want to talk about redistributing wealth, well, this causes a gross perversion of incentives and disincentives that often creates unproductive outcomes. You're effectively encouraging people to produce less. And there's nothing moral about requiring someone to give away excessive amounts of their wealth at gunpoint. ""Oh, but it's only fair."" Fairness is subjective, and only socialists are so condescending and pompous to believe that their definition of fairness holds more weight than others based off nothing but emotional appeals. 


Or, if you just want practical examples, then look at the decline in absolute poverty worldwide as more and more nations' economies liberalize (i.e. become more market friendly). 


EDIT: Btw, I appreciate the question because so often conservatives just spout off, ""It's immoral."" And it is, at least in my opinion. But liberals often operate on a separate moral plane than us. We can't explain why it's immoral to them; we have to explain why it doesn't work. 


EDIT 2: ahh, are the socialists brigading again? ",RPwhitefrost,e956exg,conservative
"Even if the first ruler was good just ruler, the amount of power needed for a socialist state means future leaders who won't be so good will have that power too.

Don't allow any government even those who you trust to have a power you wouldn't give your worst enemy ",mattcruise,e958560,conservative
"To defeat any argument, try the Socratic method. Feign ignorance and ask simple, pointed questions about your opponent's beliefs. If their position is not defensible, they will eventually contradict themselves or be unable to answer you.     

The beauty of this strategy is that you are not directly contradicting their beliefs, soyour opponent will not resent you or ""dig in their heels"". Instead, you are causing them to paint themselves into a corner, whereupon they will hopefully realize the absurdity of their position and rethink it.",Rawhide_Steaksauce,e958h8o,conservative
"Many fine answers have been given in this thread, but I want to step back and look at an assumption of this discussion:

>but how do you defeat the leftist argument

Before going further, are we trying to defeat this argument among ourselves, or are we trying to defeat this argument in a debate against a leftist?

If its the former, all this discussion is great. But if its the latter, all of this is meaningless talk. You have to keep in mind that a leftist debates using tactics of Alinsky, and the only way you win that debate against them is to use the same tactics.

So to answer your question on ""how to defeat the argument"", you have to first describe who specifically who the audience is and who you are debating. As of now, there isn't enough information to completely answer the question.",vacuu,e95h2rd,conservative
Ask them if Nazism could have worked with a better leader. ,TheReaper9456,e951852,conservative
Vote.,mlmack,e953nlm,conservative
"I recommend listening to and watching Yaron Brooks. He makes some of the bast capitalism vs socialism arguments. Basically, the moral case is the strongest argument against Socialism. However, you don't have to settle on that. You can point to the results. The results of capitalism far outweigh the contributions to global advancement than Socialism has. Yaron Brooks also has a few books out that are great reads as well. Especially listen to his Q & A's. Many of the speeches you can find on YouTube of him will have Q & As that are entertaining but also highly informative.",-Kerosun-,e95a979,conservative
"This is my favorite story about gov spending... I read it everytime I vote

https://www.constitution.org/cons/crockett.htm",freedomhertz,e95eosg,conservative
"Ask them to consider implementing the same exact systems, just putting the Church as the ones in control since they're so moral. That might get some gears turning. ",Lionstriker2,e95goet,conservative
"Each of us is intimately familiar with our own individual wants and needs. Moreover, each of us is uniquely placed to pursue those wants and needs effectively. At the same time, we know the desires and needs of others only imperfectly, and we are not well situated to pursue them. Therefore, it is reasonable to believe that if we set out to be 'our brother's keeper,' we would often bungle the job and end up doing more mischief than good.",VeterisScotian,e95gt6k,conservative
"Power corrupts. 

There is zero chance that a socialist state can be utopian. Those leaders cannot help but use their absolute power to make themselves “more equal”.",Racheakt,e95iqfq,conservative
"You can’t argue with people who’s favourite comeback to any point you prove is “you’re a Nazi” or “you wouldn’t understand you have white privilege “

But if your fully committed to arguing with these thick skulled sub humans I’d comment on the outstanding situation Venezuela is in? Or any other country that’s attempted the disgusting group ideology that’s called socialism.  ",Harryfwd,e95lozz,conservative
Facts.,fluffyfluffyheadd,e95m05n,conservative
Go to /r/debatecommunism and take your best shot.....,GingerRoot96,e95dzb3,conservative
"“Socialism is when the government does stuff. The more it does stuff, the more socialist it is.” -carl marks.

It’s like you guys have never heard of libertarian socialism. ",Dukakis_And_Tank,e95vdj5,conservative
Even if this rise of communism is helmed by a real nice guy with the best intentions. Someone will kill them. Then erase them from history. ,AYLWARD0100,e94uwqz,conservative
"In the wise words of Lord Acton, “Power corrupts and absolute power corrupts absolutely.”",_xNova,e951450,conservative
"Only give as much power to your government as you'd be willing to give to the most evil individual you can imagine.  
  
Even with the greatest of intentions socialism is bound to attract bad actors who will abuse their power.",OrwellianLiberty,e95169x,conservative
"> it's against human nature

I really like this part.  It's my understanding Marx believed the human mind was a total blank slate.  His ideas hinged on this notion.  He believed you could shape humans to eventually remove the bad and make them into whatever you wanted them to be.  

We know this isn't true.  Genetics is connecting various personality traits with the genes people are born with or without.   That evil capitalist that rises to the top and takes control of a large company? It's very likely they will be the same type of person who rises to the top in a Socialist system.  Except, in a Socialist system they have a lot more power.",Roez,e94wd0s,conservative
"Leftist here, and I’ve got to tell you that your comment is legit the most compelling explanation I have ever heard for conservatism. I’ll leave it at that. ",senorbiloba,e957f2f,conservative
"I've seen a lot of good answers on this thread, but yours was really accurate and clear and stands out above all the rest in my opinion. Capitalism harnesses humanity's inherent desire be selfish and forces individuals to make decisions on the basis of their future. Socialism makes everybody a cog in a machine with equality of outcome. Very well said. ",xJownage,e950t2t,conservative
"Humans aren't naturally selfish. Perhaps self-centred and greedy, but humans have only survived this long by cooperating with each other for their mutual benefit. Human beings are not even close to being fast or strong enough to survive without working together.",Rawhide_Steaksauce,e955ybg,conservative
beautiful writeup. saved for sure,adlp,e95cjzu,conservative
"I upvoted you.  What you said makes a lot of since.

&#x200B;

[Wealth vs % Population](https://www.statista.com/statistics/203961/wealth-distribution-for-the-us/)

&#x200B;

How do we fix this \^ without being classified as ""Leftists"" who can't see their socialists folly?

&#x200B;

It makes no sense for so few to have so much, and then act like they can't run their businesses because we ask them to help (via higher taxes) the less fortunate with things as basic as healthcare, or reduction of the deficit.

&#x200B;

I understand there is a slippery slope argument to be made here, but how do we help the less fortunate without being socialists?

&#x200B;

If your assumption of greed is accurate, charity will never accomplish what increased taxes will, but I am also truly confused as to how to limit the taxation in a broader perspective.

&#x200B;

I'm just thinking out loud here.",reddit_user_52,e95ks4t,conservative
"They weren't all murdered some merely ""disappeared""....then found with ice picks in them....",callthereaper64,e94y7kp,conservative
"The old guard were just about as murderous as Stalin.  They were willing to murder for economic reasons, Stalin was willing to murder for political ones.",user1492,e95j01m,conservative
"That's pretty much it. Capitalism allows wealth creation so that governments find it more difficult to run out of money. And when they do, capitalism allows the economy to recover and once again begin to create wealth. ",Rightquercusalba,e9690xa,conservative
They are called Democrats. ,Rightquercusalba,e968k9x,conservative
It's called anarchy and it doesn't work. ,Rightquercusalba,e968csk,conservative
"This is what I dont get with people who think socialism is good.  They think Trump is Hitler, racist, biggoted, homophobic, totalitarian, dictitorial, etc. and yet they are willing to set up a government that could give a person who actually thinks like that absolute power.  It's the same with them on gun control.  If they could they would ban guns with this ""evil Hitlarian dictator"" in office.  It hurts my head trying to understand leftist logic.",flippy76,e95k0nq,conservative
"Very well put.

I think one of the interesting things if I remember correctly Marx was a philosopher and not an economist...its like if we had a bunch of people follow the ideas of Plato and tried to structure a government around it.

Oooh even better Nietzsche.  Nihilism would be the best form of government haha.",callthereaper64,e94xu4d,conservative
"Yeah the classic leftist, being subscribed to /r/conservative. ",Axoma,e95juo4,conservative
Greed is good.,XYZ-Wing,e973j34,conservative
"To be fair, it’s pretty easy to slip and stab yourself through heart twice while trying to break some ice off the ice block. ",churninbutter,e94z27m,conservative
"That’s fair, and I almost revised my comment to clarify I wasn’t trying to paint them in a good light or anything, I was just trying to convey that even if these people thought they were ushering in the communist revolution for the good of the people they would probably be murdered by someone who was worse. ",churninbutter,e95lccw,conservative
I’m sure that you can explain how Anarcho-Communism doesn’t work to be ,Dukakis_And_Tank,e969g87,conservative
"Watch Klavan's leftese dictionary, it helps with translation and makes things so much more clear.",callthereaper64,e961c0n,conservative
"Yes, I’ve been making more of an effort to understand opposing viewpoints and value structures. ",senorbiloba,e961llq,conservative
Its simple physics the momentum of his fall plus the angle of decent causes him to slam so hard into the pick that the body bounces off the pick and then back down.  Science /s,callthereaper64,e960u3f,conservative
"I agree.  Even if we were to find Friedman's angels, there's no guarantee that they would stay in power.

The 20th century was rife with examples of what socialists would say is ""the right people"" getting into power for ""the right reasons"" and those people committing massive atrocities.

Those atrocities are often seen as a benefit to socialism, not a complaint against it.",user1492,e95mgha,conservative
"I'm sure you can explain how it does work. But then you would have to cite examples from hundreds if not thousands of years ago. Meanwhile, billions of people have seen their living standards rise year after year over the last century. But hey, I bet communism works just great in some tiny village that nobody has ever heard of. Tell me more about communist success stories throughout history! ",Rightquercusalba,e96ausy,conservative
"I do have a tiny village, actually. Barcelona. Revolutionary Catalonia stands as an example of how collectivization and syndicalism can work, and would work if it wasn’t for the boot of the fash and the counter revolutionary USSR.",Dukakis_And_Tank,e96dc58,conservative
"Lol... yeah civil war and militant workers killing the opposition is a great example of how socialism ""works."" No sorry, blaming fascism for the failures of collectivism is bullshit. ",Rightquercusalba,e96n7kh,conservative
It was entirely successful in collectivization up until the point that the USSR and nazi backed Francoist forces jailed and slaughtered every last trade unionist. You should read Orwell’s *Homage to Catalonia* to see Revolutionary Catalonia before and after the clampdown.,Dukakis_And_Tank,e96nwlz,conservative
Shocking.,xJownage,e9514g8,conservative
National polls don’t mean much. You have to look at individual races. Still it’s crazy how the polls are all over the map. ,the-divine-comedy,e943rnu,conservative
Everyone looking forward to voting tomorrow?,paulbrevik,e943ywv,conservative
Rasmussen is accurate in cases of high republican turnout. ,Brandwins,e94yxdq,conservative
"“The latest Rasmussen Reports national telephone and online survey of Likely U.S. Voters finds that 46% would choose the Republican candidate if the elections for Congress were held today. Forty-five percent (45%) would vote for the Democrat. Three percent (3%) prefer some other candidate, and six percent (6%) remain undecided,” [reports Rasmussen](http://www.rasmussenreports.com/public_content/politics/mood_of_america/generic_congressional_ballot_nov05).

Republicans have gained 4 points on Democrats in comparison with the same poll taken a week ago.

Rasmussen also points out that Democrats are typically more vocal in telling pollsters who they will vote for, leading to the question, “Is it possible that another silent red wave is coming?”

The results are surprising because they contradict every single other poll which shows Democrats are likely to take the House.

According to the Real Clear Politics [average](https://www.realclearpolitics.com/epolls/other/2018_generic_congressional_vote-6185.html), Dems are 7.3 points ahead, leading Republicans 49.7 to 42.4.

An ABC News/Washington Post poll has Democrats 8 points ahead, while a CNN poll has them leading Republicans by a whopping 13 points.

According to Nate Silver’s [polling](https://projects.fivethirtyeight.com/2018-midterm-election-forecast/house/), this gives Dems an 87% or 7 in 8 chance of winning the House.

However, given that all the same polls were spectacularly wrong in 2016, nobody is taking anything for granted.",SuperCharged2000,e9431b0,conservative
"Polls = used Toilet paper

Ignore and vote!",TheMormanTrump,e94ad1p,conservative
"We are just now finding out what the real polls were all along. After all, these guys have to be close enough to the final vote to actually get people to hire them again next election.",SilverHerfer,e949fmq,conservative
Trump 2024!,rojindahar,e9430iv,conservative
"The polls being all over the map tells me one thing; no one has any fucking idea what is going to happen tomorrow. There is unprecedented turnout predicted for tomorrow, possibly reaching presidential election levels. I informed my team today that I was voting in the morning before I come in and that I may be late. Knowing New York, the polling place will be horrendously under-provisioned and I'm gonna miss the whole morning.",superAL1394,e953hwz,conservative
I'll be at my polling station at 7:00 am.,Hillary_For_Prison,e94ltvb,conservative
I already voted early in florida. ,ArctiClove,e94ikkk,conservative
I mailed in my ballot 3 weeks ago,Mormonster,e948s0i,conservative
I’m probably going after a 9 o’clock meeting.,skarface6,e94m53q,conservative
"Rasmussen is the only one of these major polls that is entirely computerized. People are talking to a computer when they take the poll. If even a small percent of Trump supporters don't want to tell a stranger over the phone that they support Trump, that can make a big difference in close races.

I'm not sure if that makes a big difference or not. I guess we'll see!",LibertyTerp,e94sax8,conservative
Me too!,lion27,e94oagl,conservative
"Ger there as early as possible. I voted 2 days ago and the polls were blasted. Have never seen anything like it, particularly for a midterm",GIMME_TENDIES_PLS,e94ps9d,conservative
"I am, my polls open at 7 but I’ll be getting there around 6:30 since that’s when I’d normally leave for work.",lion27,e94ptwa,conservative
"In Indiana, Visclosky gets over 90% of his money from out of district and the vast majority of that comes from out of state.",GlenGanges,e94spvw,conservative
It makes economic sense. Safe blue states and districts don't need the money so they distribute it to those areas where the money is needed. ,Rightquercusalba,e969bfh,conservative
The Cold War is ongoing. ,paulbrevik,e94tmeq,conservative
Or at least it should be.,tom-the-snake,e94u9c4,conservative
">Regardless of party affiliation, citizens need to take a stand now, and voting remains the surest way to send a clear message.  It’s time to repudiate mob rule and high level corruption -- the latter having severely harmed the FBI, the Justice Department, the Senate, the Supreme Court, and Constitutional due process. 

>Although not on the ballot, the most important issue this midterm election is less the candidates and more where political parties stand on rule by Constitutional Law vs. rule by deep state elites and mob rule. Make that determination and help other like-minded folks who might stay home to get out and vote!  

Don’t just **VOTE** ... bring at least one other person with you to the polls.  

# MAKE SURE YOU ARE *READY* TO VOTE !!!  

* Have you checked to see if your polling place has changed?   

* Do you have the appropriate ID required to vote? ARE YOU SURE? SOME STATES HAVE NEW VOTER ID LAWS!",Clatsop,e93ds1s,conservative
"People are sleeping on the importance this election has in regards to China. China is trying to wait out Trump so they don't have to make concessions. They have no elections so they can hold out pretty well. If Democrats win, China will be reinvigorated, but if the GOP retains control, then China will realize it needs to capitulate sooner rather than later.",___-III----III-___,e93dppx,conservative
"I’m watching Fox. I don’t believe the polls but I’ve been sitting here asking myself why does the media believe these polls.  They don’t. They are pushing this like the Super Bowl because this is their ratings bonanza. 

They just had Ted Cruz on, and kept asking him why it’s so close.  They are just driving their narrative. Have they ever been to Texas?  I realize we have the transplants, the nutty libs, and the Hispanic voters but this is Texas. 

Do they not understand that the moment those Beto signs started hitting the yards the silent majority mobilized?  It’s like poking a hornets nest. ",Kcarp6380,e94ommk,conservative
[deleted],,e94d49c,conservative
"Should we be worried? I know polls are basically just megaphones for the media to try to get their desired outcome, but everything I've heard from the last couple days has Dems up big coming into tomorrow.",royallprick,e93r76a,conservative
"Considering the mob is being organized and paid for by these elites, they seem to be the same. These are not organic or natural mobs, similar to how Benghazi was not a reaction to a YouTube video.",ultimis,e93i939,conservative
"We have become so desensitized by the lying media that we forget the lack of equal justice.  If you need another reason to vote, then just remember if we hold Congress the day after the election Trump will start the blood bath at fbi and doj.  People will be put in charge who are constitutional patriots and not deep state hacks.  And then finally the grand juries and indictments will begin.",stancrouch,e93helu,conservative
"i live in Brooklyn the only person I'm bringing is my based wife, I don't know any other conservatives. ",IvankasFutureHusband,e94en75,conservative
"Thank you for recognizing this.  China, Iran, and other adversary nations are all trying to wait out Trump and the Republicans, with the hope that the Democrats can either regain power entirely or weaken Republicans (and thereby Trump) sufficiently in order to stymie the Right's foreign policy endeavors.  .  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e93ml2l,conservative
"> everything I've heard from the last couple days has Dems up big coming into tomorrow.

Really? Everything I've seen is that everything is extremely close, with undecideds and independent voters holding the swing votes one way or another.",lion27,e93trhm,conservative
"It's probably close. People like to vote for a winning team so if the liberal controlled media keeps shouting that they are BLUE WAVING that will help the democrats. Plus democratic cheating. Always a biggie. 

The republicans have a superior ground game, so they have that huge advantage. 

It is my personal belief that the democrats will take more seats by any means necessary because they need it for their image so they don't look like whipped dogs two years from now. 


* it is refreshing to see other comments worrying about policy and issues as opposed to Orange Man Bad. 
",GladysCravesRitz,e93u6qd,conservative
Trump has been the president for two years. What makes you think he has to wait until after the midterms?,cetamega,e93hw5a,conservative
"> adversary nations

Whatever do you mean? We are all one people and everyone just want's to live in peace with each other

-t. lefty idiot",Caeleb_Candon,e93wf73,conservative
"Keep in mind that yes they will cheat but Trump has been on the job 2 years. They will cheat considerably less. 

",Kcarp6380,e94ooy9,conservative
"> What makes you think he has to wait until after the midterms?

Because he wasn't going to give the lying media another issue to bash him on.  ""Oh NO....he is firing all the people who were protecting hillary and the rest of the criminals""",stancrouch,e93j0fu,conservative
He has been bashing the media for the past 2 years as well.  What makes you think he cares about what they think now?,Sonics_BlueBalls,e93rrqj,conservative
"I hope the family sues the snot out of the police department and the city/state, before anyone goes he shouldn't have resisted, they shouldn't have been at his house, this is just like the precrimes bullshit from minority report. ",Delta_25,e94swlr,conservative
Just another attempt at gun confiscation,dwallen65,e94yqys,conservative
Where does it say it was an exparte? And even if it was an exparte he still cant have a gun. Police werent targeting him. They were enforcing a law. The guy was obviously a mental. His dumb actions got him killed. ,Kc4551,e95u67y,conservative
The guy had a protection order against him. You’re not allowed to posses a gun while being a respondent. Not to mention playing with a gun when police are standing on your front step. Some people are meant to leave this planet sooner than others. ,Kc4551,e953nvx,conservative
"The family and the police should sue. Those officers could have gotten killed. The police didn't make the law, so sue those who did.",DBG1998,e94u67x,conservative
Agreed,dwallen65,e94ynou,conservative
The hearing was ex-parte; he had no idea he was being targeted until they arrived on his doorstep at 5:17 am.,richardguy,e9593n7,conservative
Absolutely. You can't punish someone before they've been convicted of a crime.,FistyMcBeefPunchy,e94x2xt,conservative
Who is still doing a registered voters survey 2 days before the election. Lol..,hipsterdufus84,e93cr3t,conservative
"FYI, this was released at the same time as a CNN D+13 poll.

Then again, CNN had Democrats leading by 21 points a week before 2006's election...",1wjl1,e93ir0b,conservative
"They have to start releasing polls that show the numbers tightening, that way, if the GOP retains the house, they can say they caught it in their polls, and the ‘shift’ happened just a few days before the vote. Trying their best to not be shown with their pants down, as they were in 2016.

Though I think they have to also walk a fine line of trying to look credible, and using their polls to influence opinion, rather than accurately report on it.",chandypants,e93gv4j,conservative
"I don't trust any of these articles whether they're saying were winning or losing I don't care. Look at the election. This shit *sucks* and the most important thing is simply that you voice your opinion as a citizen of this country, and you vote.",PathTo3Commas,e93gs3r,conservative
"Rasmussen has it tied.  The problem with the broader polling is, just like with Trump and Hillary, it doesn't address individual swing districts which matter.  Hillary was ahead in the popular vote and lost, for this reason. Most of the polling I've seen lately from the local Congressional races is not good for R's in Congress.  

Aside, I'm going to assume people won't let positive or negative news about polling affect whether they vote or not.  Polls aren't absolute.  Turnout matters.  Go vote.    

    ",Roez,e93mdxs,conservative
"Polling is a propaganda tool used by politicians for fundraising purposes. Look at Texas. Beto has literally ZERO chance of flipping Texas blue, and as such, the Democrats there would not nearly be as enthusiastic, and donate money and support him.

However, if you start saying that the race is close, they just need a little help to push him over the top, claim that there's only a 3% gap and so on, then all of a sudden the money starts flying in. Beto has raised something like 80 or 85 million dollars. This never would have happened if the polls didn't lie and claim he had a chance. Another thing about polls is if you show it is closer than it really is, you encourage turnout, which helps your chances.

Considering all the leftist media organizations are the ones behind the polls, you know they are going to be used as a manipulation tool.

So, the reality is just IGNORE THE POLLS ALWAYS. Just VOTE VOTE VOTE!",GeneticsGuy,e93n151,conservative
"The vast majority of polls have their lead at 7 or 8 points. They are going to turn out and likely win the House.

I hope every single person reading this is voting tomorrow.",Colorsinthevoid45,e93he0j,conservative
"D +3 is a Republican victory. Democrats are always, *__ALWAYS__* oversampled in any ordinary pollster's matrix. Democrats need a near universal +6 or better to perform at or near par. The CGB has been in the 5 or 6 pt range steadily for a month now after having been as high as +20 less than 10 months ago. 

Nothing is certain until all the votes are counted. I'm inclined to think the polls over the last two or so months have been artificially inflated. Now that the election is here, they have to bring the expected results back in line with reality or be discredited. Again though, nothing is certain until all votes are counted. So get out and vote. Get your family and likeminded friends to vote. Vote like your livelihoods and your very lives depend on it. Because they do. Vote.",Odoacer476CE,e93ndgj,conservative
"This is why parties beg people to vote ahead of time, so if new information comes up their vote is already locked in. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e93hulq,conservative
What’s the point of polling if all the polling contradicts.,the-divine-comedy,e93grv1,conservative
"With 18% undecided, I don't think we can put too much stock in this.",RoundSimbacca,e93s3l9,conservative
Doesn't matter: keep getting informed people to vote,Vrael22,e93m40c,conservative
"The media think we're stupid. All of us have seen the crowds Trump draws vs the crowds Obama drew this election cycle. Trump is filling the Houston Rockets arena and their parking lot. He's filing stadiums. Obama can't fill a high school gym. Only place he filled seats was Gary, Indiana---and he had to pay black folk there to show up.   


Trump is popular. His policies are popular. Black people are starting to wake up to the Dems plan to replace them with Hispanics, and they're starting to #BLEXIT.   


I think Republicans hold the House and Senate, win the Governorship in FL/GA, and the Dems have to drastically come back to the middle or face becoming the next Whigs. ",myerbot5000,e93fukd,conservative
Petition to start a thread after the election that makes fun of all the shitty polls.,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e93sqss,conservative
"""Polls"" = used toilet paper 

They're worthless. Ignore and vote!",TheMormanTrump,e9423g0,conservative
"+3 is within the margin of error, so its dead even. ",Manchurainprez,e945wll,conservative
It was never high... they are just trying to be more honest in the polls now that election is here lest their poll receives a terrible rating.,GeneticsGuy,e93mq78,conservative
"I don't usually put much stock in these generic ballot polls for various reasons.

The obvious reason is that they are generic and make assumptions about turnout.

Secondly, are these polls weighted/sampled at a national/state level or on a district level.  It becomes harder to parse out what will happen in individual districts when you're weighting to the national population.

Basically, what I'm getting at is that a random person from God knows where may *prefer* a Democratic candidate especially if they over sample Democrats.

Also, what it doesn't consider is that Trump ran as a ""money and jobs"" candidate, in doing so, basically snagged a bunch of the Regan Democrats in the rust belt.  If Republicans in those districts tap into that strategy, then things may be a lot closer than the general ballot.

",bigdaveyl,e93r4ll,conservative
"So a study involving 1,945 people accurately represents 235M people in America that can vote?  Statistically speaking they have captured 0.000008% of the population in this pole.  In a scientific study, this would be considered insignificant.",mattmcd20,e93xhie,conservative
"if its only D + 3 among registered voters, I wonder what it looks like if they polled Likely Voters...",iwasthebeaver,e93dxfs,conservative
Seems like a way to blow money away.,Enzo_SAWFT,e93dr0s,conservative
"They probably had to widen the poll ao they could say dems were still ahead.

I'm looking forward to Wednesday morning. ",Hillary_For_Prison,e93ggto,conservative
"So basically they polled everyone in the newsroom, right?",fifaislife206,e93jlgu,conservative
Something something fake news network,dtlv5813,e945nc0,conservative
"This is how it used to be.  It always led me to believe pollsters knew their reputation was on the line when their predictions could be tested, hence why they would get tighter. 

I have zero evidence for that, but I've always considered it a real possibility.  ",Roez,e93mm14,conservative
"This exactly.  The generic ""Republican"" can look more competitive on a generic ballot depending on the random people ACTUALLY sampled.  This can skew results (like with Hillary and Trump in 2016).  Individual races matter way more when it comes to polling, and those don't look nearly as good for us.",TBSportsFan1254,e941zvv,conservative
UT of Tyler ran their own poll a few days ago in regards to Cruz vs Beto. Basically just surveying people on campus and then said that based on just the people they surveyed on campus that Cruz only had a 4+ lead on Cruz in the state poll. ,TxScarletRaider,e949swi,conservative
This is a really good point and something I'd never considered. ,GladysCravesRitz,e94sum4,conservative
"Well for Republicans, money spent on Beto's hopeless campaign means money that is not going to House races in Houston or Dallas Suburbs. ",,e94xzgs,conservative
"Yeah, nothing surprises me in politics anymore.  I can't wait to come in here on Wednesday.  If we win, it will be more ""fuck the polls, they are all made up"" instead of criticizing methodology, and if we lose it will be a bunch of ""it is the squishy RINOs fault along with all the illegal ballots cast by dead people"".  This sub can be rather predictable. ",TBSportsFan1254,e9424lw,conservative
"I can’t... 

because I voted two weeks ago ",robopolis1,e9424ae,conservative
RemindMe! 2 Days,TBSportsFan1254,e941vm3,conservative
They need to have these “it’s closer than we thought” polls so that they can have some credibility when it’s closer than they claimed the previous ten months. ,llIllIIlllIIlIIlllII,e93id4g,conservative
"I like your prediction! I’m not feeling as confident about the House and FL/GA, but I also felt the same way in 2016. Didn’t even bother watching the coverage after I voted because I figured it’d be a blowout for Hillary.",Wiseheart1,e93kj5w,conservative
"RemindMe!  Two days  


(have to see how good this hot take ages)",TBSportsFan1254,e9427g6,conservative
"So you don't understand how sample size polling a large population works?

https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/howcan-a-poll-of-only-100/",lastbastion,e943ivq,conservative
"Pollsters have never figured out how to measure voter enthusiasm.

A lot of them are more transparent about this after 2016, where they’ll basically say “if enthusiasm is equal between both parties, these are our results.”",Savant_PSU,e94vh2n,conservative
It all depends on turnout. Republicans can either hold the house or get wiped out. ,hipsterdufus84,e93gw37,conservative
Sounds about right.,1wjl1,e93lgtp,conservative
I'd give this a 60% chance that is what happened.,airforcefalco,e93q7k8,conservative
"> ""fuck the polls, they are all made up""

Polls are just another way to push propaganda. to believe anything else is stupidity.",JMB_was_a_god,e94o9hg,conservative
"I am feeling nervous/apprehensive as well, but the one thing to consider is the generic ballot surveys may be flawed in their design and methodology.

",bigdaveyl,e93rff7,conservative
"Im not worried about GA, I think Kemp will pull it off. Im not confident about Florida, they may go full in and elect a socialist. ",Zac1245,e94cog4,conservative
"Oh I totally understand.  However, numbers show they are very flawed which the article you posted would agree with.  ",mattmcd20,e943vzu,conservative
Gotta go vote!,Hillary_For_Prison,e93gyhe,conservative
"60% of the time, it works every time.",DeLuman,e93vk8h,conservative
Guess we will see if you were right at the end of today. ,TBSportsFan1254,e95m2yu,conservative
You say 'flawed' while statistics and my article say 'margin of error',lastbastion,e94j6jl,conservative
I can't ... because my ballot has already been submitted and received.,anuser999,e93twup,conservative
Margin of error is a flaw in calculation.,mattmcd20,e94j8oy,conservative
Forgot to absentee vote last Friday. Rest assured I will be driving the 4 hours there and back tomorrow to help oust McCaskill.,tim_tebow_right_knee,e93ylbr,conservative
Nice.,TheXarath,e93uh9l,conservative
"you just brought a tear to my eyes, patriot. ",tmone,e9461gh,conservative
Hey! Everyone! Climb in the back of my elco! We gotta get down there and vote! Let's go!,Cr8er,e95r0sf,conservative
Run is better but walk if you must.,StephenScherer1,e942xgb,conservative
We have to hope that during this election cycle the insanity has gone so far that significant numbers will walk away.  And if not how much more of the lies and insanity will we need for people to wake up.  We can't possibly have half the country composed of idiots and nuts.,stancrouch,e93k982,conservative
[Children vs National Security](https://i.redd.it/46i64ma77kw11.jpg),Oliwan88,e948yvi,conservative
I’m seriously confused which party you’re talking about.  ,BobTheBarbarian,e9493wg,conservative
"Oh yes we can, you saw how the votes went in 2016. Plenty of people working against actual progression.

&#x200B;

\*Edit, I can't spell today.",peacekeeperBrew,e93xvvc,conservative
Idiocracy anyone :D?,callthereaper64,e93ww6d,conservative
"I've literally heard no one say that refugee kids aren't people.

That said, I've heard lots question whether some *are in fact* refugees.  I've also heard lots question why if they are truly refugees, they aren't seeking asylum in the first country they come to (which is almost **never** the US), as per standard rules for asylum-seeking.


...

But way to make your own argument look bad by arguing in bad faith, attempting to construe your opponents as racist hypocrites, all while using as a straw man an argument that your opponents don't actually use. ",rf-engineer,e94cz2m,conservative
"You should be having this conversation with the 9th Circuit Court. They ruled on this under Obama's administration. Trump can't do much about it, aside from let people just walk in. This should be common knowledge by now.",Sideswipe0009,e94d0qn,conservative
"WaPo too.  Seems like they're already crafting the narrative that should the GOP keep the Senate and even the House, it's clearly just due to racism.  Probably their strategy for 2020 as well.

How many times though can even the furthest people on the left read yet another article about how evil and racist conservatives are without yawning?  ",puddboy,e93ja1k,conservative
NYT = NPC,Otto-Carpenter,e93jaij,conservative
"Racism is bad, thats why you shouldn't vote Democrat",jake_fordyce,e93gb1j,conservative
The irony that the minority of white people who have had a vice grip on discourse are telling me to be afraid of a minority of other white people is not lost on me.,superAL1394,e93kq4t,conservative
"These same articles which signal the alarm on racism/racist ideologies will probably simultaneously say it's out of some sense of not repeating history's mistakes; that they're so bad that anyone even remotely inching to it must be utterly opposed.

That’s fine I guess.

Too bad they don't display the same vigor in regards to Communism and any of its sympathizers (100 million dead just wasn't enough to care about all that much, I guess).

In fact...they kind of seem [to like it themselves.](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/04/30/opinion/karl-marx-at-200-influence.html)",Bigbluebuttonman,e947pr0,conservative
When intimidation hasn’t worked... BOOM! Drop the race card. ,mikeygio,e93jg8u,conservative
I'm glad Sarah Jeong is working hard to combat racism over that the NYT's.  ,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e93wfyh,conservative
What we really need us an ⏰ identifying FAKE NEWS.,StephenScherer1,e93s6eu,conservative
Still trying to figure out why Nationalism is a terrible thing....,peacekeeperBrew,e93xsa1,conservative
The eight people who read that magazine will shocked to hear about it.  ,MojoHand052,e947jg2,conservative
"CNN included the pulse nightclub shooting with "" white men terrorism"". ",Emperor_Aurelian,e959xeg,conservative
Isn't this tact failing in Europe country by country. ,postonrddt,e93stqt,conservative
"This is what's called a ""strawman"" in rhetoric. They're literally fighting ghosts. Anytime you hear ""Nazis"" or ""White Supremacists"", call it out for being a strawman.

There is not a single White Supremacist or Nazi elected official in America. They have ZERO power. It's worse than their bizarre obsession with Russian collusions, after the DNC, Obama, Hillary, and the FBI colluded to steal the election.

It's easy to be better than Nazis. It's hard to be better than everyday Americans who just want to keep their hard-earned money and do what they want as long as they aren't hurting anyone else.",LibertyTerp,e94qo48,conservative
"Weird, but America isn't a country founded on ethnicity, skin color, or even geography. It's founded on core values, which ignore skin color. Nationalism? Sure. White nationalism? That seems to be something that occurs in countries which are founded based on ethnicity. 

&#x200B;

If your great grandparents immigrated to Germany from Turkey, today you are probably referred to as the Turkish family down the street. If your parents immigrated to Chicago from Honduras, you are referred to as the American whose mom makes great olla...",Romarion,e94g1qy,conservative
Revving up the commies ,indrid_colder,e93xuhu,conservative
I thInk “voter suppression” is the line for this specific election. Racism is just always part of their narrative of is.,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e93pzea,conservative
"> Seems like they're already crafting the narrative that should the GOP keep the Senate and even the House, it's clearly just due to racism. Probably their strategy for 2020 as well.

Considering how """"""effective"""""" this strategy is for them I, for one, encourage them to keep it up forever.",anuser999,e93u20v,conservative
"When the gun grabbing Jabba the Hutt lookalike in Georgia loses, it will 100% be blamed on Whites and their wayyycism.",Dorian_v25,e93yf3k,conservative
">WaPo too. Seems like they're already crafting the narrative that should the GOP keep the Senate and even the House, it's clearly just due to racism. Probably their strategy for 2020 as well.

White Americans will become a national minority in about 2036 before they become an electoral minority (in about 2044), and GOP candidates who win the White House from then, until 2044 when it becomes essentially impossible to win, barring actual white nationalism and ethnic-bloc voting by whites, will all be called illegitimate for having won via 'minority rule' 

You can google 'Joy Ann Reid + minority rule' and see that she and others are already rhetorically shifting to this stance, away from White Christian America as an oppressive majority, to an illegitimate minority ruling class.

",lost_snake,e94d1rd,conservative
It's two pronged. They keep their radicalized base that way and they also buy into their own bullshit except for maybe the ones at the very top. ,Brandwins,e94zaow,conservative
R/world news is pushing environmental stuff pretty hard right now as well ,ShwiftyRickC137,e949wle,conservative
"If you ever hear, ""I just treat people of all races equally."" you can be 100% sure he/she/zhir/it is not a liberal Democrat.",LibertyTerp,e94rbgz,conservative
"There is literally no difference between socialism and communism. They love communism. They just can't say it, just like they couldn't say they were actually socialists until now, with Millennials being brainwashed into thinking it's OK to be socialist.

Same fucking word:
https://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/communism
https://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/socialism

**Communism**

a system in which goods are owned in common and are available to all as needed

a theory advocating elimination of private property

**Socialism**

a system of society or group living in which there is no private property

a system or condition of society in which the means of production are owned and controlled by the state",LibertyTerp,e94rn2m,conservative
The ends always justify the means to these people.,Reven1911,e949p6p,conservative
"It's ironic how the left hates the nationalism part of ""national socialist yet loves the socialist part",TheMormanTrump,e942peu,conservative
"And South America! Venezuela is about the only Left-wing country left. This is South America, it's almost always Leftist!",LibertyTerp,e94rr93,conservative
Yeah that seems to what is being set up around reddit.,TheShakinBacon,e93z0fr,conservative
God help us if she wins.,XGuntank02X,e94hwgs,conservative
"As though Hitler would be any better if he did what he did for international socialism, like the Soviet Union.",LibertyTerp,e94rpq1,conservative
Screams confidence in the election to pull that this close ,Enzo_SAWFT,e93swg5,conservative
"Have the Event anyway, i'm willing to bet 100% its intimidation tactics from the democrats and their supporters.",MinimumMonitor7,e93uyse,conservative
What's even the point of calling in a threat to the building next door instead of the venue itself?,GorathThorgath,e94gje5,conservative
"Daily reminder these people want you dead, they want your families dead, they want everything you believe in and hold dear to be pulverized and eliminated from this earth. And they want to laugh while doing it. ",AmericanYidGunner,e94a1qt,conservative
"Relax guys, it's just a false flag. /s",ConservativeBrit,e95c7x7,conservative
They don’t want a huge crowd. ,yeroldpappy,e940qd5,conservative
Cause it increases the scope.,Youthinasia-,e94letq,conservative
Ignorant voting is why populism and the media have so much power. It's also why our incumbency win rate is so high. Democrat get out the vote campaigns rely upon this.,ultimis,e95u3ee,conservative
Poll obsession is dumb. It's very smart for voters to ignore them.,ultimis,e94vreo,conservative
probably going to be 100 million plus voters tomorrow. historic.,JMB_was_a_god,e94wfp9,conservative
I hope he's right.,mastaxn,e951d54,conservative
"Agreed. I’ll never forget the “Hilary Clinton has an 85% chance of winning” NYT poll, the day before the election. ",hungryhungryhadrian,e957a4j,conservative
ILLEGAL immigrants. Lol fucking spin I swear.,HolsterOfNuts,e944kgh,conservative
Laws are racist against law breakers.,svengalus,e945b6c,conservative
So we can't use the legal definition to describe the literal actions to which the law applies?  ,Jizzlobber42,e946uye,conservative
Why is right wing media not blasting CNN for this trash? This is our so called objective media blatantly trying to influence the results of an election.,sendintheshermans,e945fyp,conservative
This is nonsense.  So said that even Fox did this.  It is not a racist ad.  It is reality.  The only people who should be offended are the victims of this slime.  Offended that he was ever allowed into our country.,stancrouch,e944jb7,conservative
"This article, Politifact, and many others seem to be ignoring that this guy was in a ""sanctuary city"" and that's where he killed two cops.

He left Utah in 2009/2010 when Utah agreed to cooperate with ICE.

That's enough for me to be okay with the ""They let him stay"" part.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e94ip7u,conservative
*Controlled Opposition*,TheMormanTrump,e94anhr,conservative
TIL the concept of law is racist.  /s,BrighamYoung,e94dbfb,conservative
Fuck Fox News for caving.,anewleafthrowaway5,e94gko6,conservative
">Why is right wing media not blasting CNN for this trash? This is our so called objective media blatantly trying to influence the results of an election.

There isn't any. Not any that has a platform equal or even close to what the left-wing media has. ",r4d4r_3n5,e947rvu,conservative
"The entire concept of a 'sanctuary city' is a slap in the face to rule of law. I really couldn't give a flying fuck where you're from, but if the first thing you did when stepping foot on American soil is break the law, I'm not confident you'll follow the rest of the norms, rules, and laws that govern our society.",superAL1394,e959sli,conservative
"I don't buy the conspiracy angle, but it doesn't matter, because the only truly effective way to go after cancerous mod/admin would probably break a bunch of reddit's sitewide rules.
",gabrielmodesta,e950h26,conservative
Democrats still praise him for how articulate he is when he lies.,Yosoff,e93fvlr,conservative
[removed],,e93kunc,conservative
Most presidents make stuff up. Trump is next level though. ,flashce,e94miae,conservative
Even when he is not president he is lying,hmnmmm,e93iyzy,conservative
You can keep your doctor,tehForce,e93w35y,conservative
"Still running for President.

To be fair - he is the DNC's best shot at beating Trump!",Gnome_Sane,e942pto,conservative
Fake Facts and blends so well with Fake News! Probably has the hots for Anderson.,StephenScherer1,e93h18d,conservative
"FWIW, I agree with you. I blame 24/7 news media for ratcheting up the rhetoric to get viewers. We used to give people the benefit of the doubt. If you did 99.9% of things right, we looked past the .1%. Now all we do is focus on the .1%.",fifaislife206,e93pku6,conservative
How do you feel about the political hit job that was just attempted on the new scotus.,pumpjackORGASM,e93uezh,conservative
"Name for me more than two times when Obama actually told the truth...

Because I can only think of two, and both times it was bad.",SideTraKd,e94yo68,conservative
"Best to read the article before posting, no? Or was that just a general opinion on the guy? 

Though the article was less comfortable to read than David Foster Wallace, syntax-wise",Or_That,e93rwns,conservative
Scandal free!  /s,lastbastion,e943lwv,conservative
"24/7 news media is only a thing because people watch it.  Match that with a viewer that doesn't have the critical thinking to recognize when something someone says is an opinion or fact, and you get where we are now.

&#x200B;

Education is a bigger issue than the current news atmosphere.",Sonics_BlueBalls,e93si0g,conservative
"Maybe my opinion could actually be interesting here. I was watching this through the lens of left-leaning satire and late night talk shows, as well as left leaning media like reddit, international media etc.

While going through the process, I followed the majority opinion of those places, rejecting Kavanaugh.

But in the end, I felt dirty about the whole process, and appalled by what had happened.

I do not know Kavanaugh as a judge. I cannot judge him on his judicial accomplishments. I think his testimony in the senate was too emotional for a prospective member of SCOTUS. But he was going through an assassination attempt on his character, while the process should have been about other things.

In hindsight it is ludicrous to accuse someone of a crime that he supposedly committed over 30 years ago, without showing any evidence. But that is what you do in the USA if you want to kill someone's career in politics: you pin a sex crime to them.

The motive behind all this was of course to delay the nomination until after the midterms. Which is even worse than if his accusers thought that he was actually guilty of the crime.

What little I saw of Kavanaugh did not endear him to me as a person. But I think a supreme court judge should be judged on his judicial record, which I hear in his case was flawless.

I don't think any citizen wants politics to work in such a fashion.

In short, I think the affair around Kavanaugh was atrocious.",Malakay_sun,e93xx7g,conservative
"Yeah, kinda jumps around. ",J-Vito,e93v9i2,conservative
"""It's amazing how clean my administration was, but clean administrations are normal when you lie and have the media and DOJ in your pocket""",burtmaklin1,e94el1v,conservative
"I want to agree with both of you here. Of course an individual has an agency. But we are also part of a society, and our surroundings influence us.

Even if you oppose someone, then this mix of shrieking hysteria, personal attacks and relentlessness is bad. It takes any valid criticism and throws it in a bag with a boatload of lies and exaggerations, where you cannot tell one from the other.

It is hard to avoid it. But at the same time people should be smarter.",Malakay_sun,e93t6cw,conservative
"A lot of folks are in your same situation. We had a rash of left leaning people posting #WalkAway posts on our subreddit, for instance, directly because of what Democrats did to Kavanaugh.
",skarface6,e941xuz,conservative
">  It takes any valid criticism and throws it in a bag with a boatload of lies and exaggerations, where you cannot tell one from the other.

You hit the nail on the head",Jizzlobber42,e948hz3,conservative
This kind of partisanship is the problem. Proportional voting is needed.,Malakay_sun,e942iz5,conservative
You mean like is done for the House of Representatives?,skarface6,e943iqb,conservative
Damn Alt right white neo nazis! ,BeachCruisin22,e93wjfw,conservative
"""Perpetrator was a white African-American...""",kempff,e9433ws,conservative
If Obama had a son...,volcanicpale,e949g7q,conservative
"Are attacks and acts of vandalism against synagogues becoming a wider trend, or are we merely seeing more of these due to the interests of the mainstream media?

Either way, I feel for the worshippers and the people who have to pay for the property. Props to anyone anywhere who donates money to fix damages.",Godsdj,e943vqv,conservative
so thats 3 different anti semitic attacks by blacks in a few days?,sleasyPEEmartini,e95d0bz,conservative
Alt-white fascists!,tehForce,e93wvxi,conservative
"With the Bombs papadopolous has been dropping on twitter about the set up, I can't wait to hear what Flynn has to say. There's a reason they keep pushing his sentencing back. ",iwasthebeaver,e93z4hv,conservative
"January 24, 2017",tau_decay,e940ljb,conservative
I just listened to Bongino's interview with Papadopolous. Absolutely insane the people that tried to set him up. There had to be something like 5 or 6 legitimate attempts to incriminate or get him to say he was involved with criminal activities or involved with Russians. ,molon-labe7,e93zgw7,conservative
"They even gave him 10k hoping they could bust him coming back through customs with undeclared cash, but he was smart enough to leave it with somebody in Greece. ",iwasthebeaver,e93zjzt,conservative
He left it with lawyers in Greece I believe. Extremely smart. ,molon-labe7,e93zm4o,conservative
">but I am absolutely certain of one thing: Not one of them will see the name “Donald Trump” on the ballot.  
  
I wonder if there's some unrelated guy named like Donald O'Shaughnessy Trump running for dog catcher of Las Cruces.",FelixFuckfurter,e94erwl,conservative
gg ez,ll_Atlanta_ll,e93lewh,conservative
About time.,political_bunny,e94acys,conservative
History of U.S./Iran relations shows that such sanctions can significantly reduce Iran’s oil revenues - production volumes have always depended on the political situation around the country: [Total Crude oil production in Iran - 1971 to 2016](https://www.reportlinker.com/data/series/UTEIUoXuk4E),thumbsdrivesmecrazy,e95guz0,conservative
"... no, still islamists.",SKWM3000,e9652ex,conservative
"> pop·u·lism
> 
> /ˈpäpyəˌlizəm/
> 
> noun
> 
> noun: populism
> 
>    support for the concerns of ordinary people.

Sounds terrifying.",justific4tion,e967cbo,conservative
Evidence is a rough thing to come by these days for the dems...,peacekeeperBrew,e93y0xm,conservative
"He looks like a pirate and served our country well

If I could I’d vote for him",TenRedBullsANite,e94n5ru,conservative
Wouldn't you take the eye patch over the glass eye any day? Rather look like a bad ass than wearing a glass eye and look like you have a lady eye.,johndeer89,e958y8t,conservative
The eye patch makes him look badass. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e95an91,conservative
lol the left would be drooling over his coolness and touting him as the coolest thing ever if he was on their side. Instead they get pretty boy Beto.,Terra_green2,e94r5ag,conservative
"It depends. Your glass eye could have the words ""Dems suck"" written on it. ",chaotic_zx,e95jigl,conservative
Mark Warner has a net worth around $200 million from a company he founded with the benefit of American capitalism. ,frasierfonzie,e95aa93,conservative
"I feel like Socialism is the ""every kid gets a trophy"" philosophy on a sweeping, grand scale. It redistributes value to everyone degrading it and it produces losers instead of promoting winners.",Doran902,e955xri,conservative
"This guy knows what socialism actually is, and he knows that a country with social services does not equal socialism, so that leaves one option:  he's pandering.",fuck_im_dead,e95iai4,conservative
"Because we all know that socialism works for everybody. If you kill enough people everybody's quality of life goes up, right?",xJownage,e958hie,conservative
"No, you don’t understand, that’s HIS money..,",Rabidraccoon76,e95hnqp,conservative
Socialism(communism) is a race to the bottom...  Socialism NEVER worked historically.  ,ozric101,e956ax1,conservative
Did you ever consider that if the media actually told the truth the democrats would never win another election.  It's amazing the lies they have to tell since they cannot stand on the actual insane policies that they advocate.,stancrouch,e93g60w,conservative
"Asian here, I switched to Republican 2 years ago for the exact reason we see here. The Democrats are liars and cheaters and I will never vote for them again. If you wanna know what really made me switch, it was Obamacare. ",Saigunx,e93yjn0,conservative
"The Washington Conpost is full of bigots, they dont get to point fingers ",buffalo_chum,e93g5l4,conservative
The objective news media,phantomcut3,e93llsv,conservative
Fake news. Totally fake news. Distorters of reality.,sjwking,e93oq0f,conservative
And yet the only times people have actually said racist things to me was whenever I disagreed with Democrats on political issues. ,MoistElephant,e942yh1,conservative
"This is all they have now. ""Agree with us or you too shall be accused of racism!""",svengalus,e94506a,conservative
"Since many leftist are very easily offended by words and love to make false comparisons this should be no surprise. Their choice of words-racism and name calling in general. They're really not addressing the details of the issues.

But since they are easily offended they're hoping many fence sitters and RINOs will be shamed/think the same and vote for them",postonrddt,e93zxma,conservative
"> That's like a weatherman saying it might rain four inches tomorrow, or be sunny and 72 all day. 

In Colorado that is a perfectly valid weather prediction.  For that matter, so is having both happen in that same day.",anuser999,e94mdzn,conservative
"> The contentious hearings for Supreme Court Justice Brett Kavanaugh, in which a Senate Democrat hid uncorroborated sexual allegations against him until the 11th hour, were a disaster for Democrats. 

Why so coy? It was [DIANNE FEINSTEIN](https://nypost.com/2018/09/22/how-feinstein-is-conspiring-to-destroy-kavanaugh/).",r4d4r_3n5,e9485uy,conservative
"Pray, my friends. ",paulbrevik,e94gmd1,conservative
"Omg another article where idiots dont understand polling.  There are 30 tossup races where there is less than 3 points.  The reason for the split is that usually tossups break the same way.  If 20+ out if thirty break d, then it will be a huge wave. If less than 10 do, repubs hold then house.   How dont people understand that. ",hipsterdufus84,e94dca1,conservative
"Because the pollsters have done nothing to change the way they poll since the 2016 election debacle. Pollsters are now scrambling to walk back projections left and right because they don’t want their credibility jeopardized any further than what it already is. 

Nate Silver just pretty much rescinded his projection by stating that we shouldn’t be surprised if the DEMs flip 51 seats or the GOP keeps the House. That’s a pretty wide net to cast. WTF is that? 

It basically means that nobody really knows anything, and that the polls have been utilized this whole time to influence the election, not to measure or predict it. ",mikeygio,e94pi64,conservative
Politico did the same thing House now “leans dem” on their site. The Hill did the same thing; they didn’t a whole article on how there may not be a blue wave. ,Zac1245,e94y66y,conservative
I bet he passed 3 or 4 ok parking spots that were willing to accept him on the way to the really good parking spot too. ,Nonsenseism,e93bsjy,conservative
How is this even related?,BlackSapper,e92x3gj,conservative
"I'm a liberal, and even I know this guy is a smarmy fucking POS.
",theangryfurlong,e92k6x7,conservative
"I completely agree, but...


Boomer tier meme.

I'm getting kinda tired of them here and on r/Republican",Natanyul,e92rjt0,conservative
"""was that fight really over a parking space?"" ""No.""",teddyrooseveltsfist,e92tc3j,conservative
"I dare you to post this to that ""humor that pertains to politics"" subreddit. ",Yumyum95,e92jnxl,conservative
"Say's he's for open borders.

Can't remember if his own daughter is 11 or 12.",theinfamousjosh,e92hjfk,conservative
Fuck this piece of shit ,JimboJehosephat,e92j2ei,conservative
Come on in to my country everybody but don’t fucking park in MY spot....,keepitreal51,e92r4zz,conservative
Mostly I feel pity for him. People with happy lives don't go around assaulting people over parking spots.,vitrael2,e92sxq4,conservative
Yeah but he was great in Beetlejuice,puddboy,e93iyig,conservative
"What kind of moron tries to ""save"" a parking spot?  It's one of the biggest douche moves there is.  Does he have trouble walking from his car?  Get a handicapped permit you asshole.  Self entitled narcissist prick.  I'd like to thing the guy he hit would have kicked his ass had he took a swing at him.  But apparently he's the smarter of the two and did the right thing....",Rip_Van_Finkle,e93dgns,conservative
"Well, those Baldwin's are a trash family.",ZOMBIE_N_JUNK,e92tssa,conservative
[deleted],,e932htp,conservative
Isn’t this the evil guy in Fun With Dick and Jane? ,Clypsedra,e92qjg7,conservative
That's not the important thing. He's advocating for open borders but (probably) lives in a gated neighbourhood. He's not going to feel the effects of the policies he advocates. His wages aren't stagnating thanks to mass migration. Same with multiculturalism. You live in a monoculture of Hollywood champagne socialists who will likely never see \[members of a certain religion of peace\] demanding their religious laws imposed on others.,Undercovergeek24,e93ls6k,conservative
100% tool,Tilt23Degrees,e93xj5a,conservative
Unhinged ,Slippery____Pete,e92u3ff,conservative
Total douchebag,MyBestVersionOfMe,e9386gx,conservative
Celebrities are retards.,Caucasoid_Supreme,e92u6ez,conservative
HYPOCRITE,StephenScherer1,e92pmb0,conservative
[deleted],,e92op2i,conservative
This guy is an ultra douche. Super liberal showing his true bitch colors. ,i-b-spankinit,e92u5ze,conservative
I had this same thought. ,billbobb1,e92z2f9,conservative
I had this same thought. ,billbobb1,e92z2pf,conservative
"A person advocating something while seemingly ignorant of the concept of scarcity reacted in the opposite manner when actually confronted with scarcity.
",Briguy28,e935wi6,conservative
"If borders should be open for anyone to cross, parking spaces should be open for anyone to take",Moritzroth,e937reh,conservative
It is funny. Baldwin is an all around shitty person even before you take his shitty political beliefs into account. ,AgrosLastRide,e93aany,conservative
Idk it's funny to me. Sure I would roll my eyes if I was 16 again.,Truth_And_Freedom,e93b9a2,conservative
"But it really is great showing off the hypocricy of the left. These snowflakes can't handle the memes.

Edit: wow, so much brigading here... The downvotes are proof enough that you libs are getting triggered ",Knowsekr,e92xuju,conservative
I got that reference ,booblitchutz,e92ufz7,conservative
"Oh, one of those subs with an innocuous, neutral sounding name because liberals are all about tricking Americans into thinking their ideology is ""normal,""  instead of making an honest name like r/liberalPoliticalHumor?  Must have some pretty shitty ideas if they have to fall back on fuckery like that.

I'm happy to see r/libertarian didn't succumb to the liars who were trying to infiltrate them the last time I was active.",nonamenoslogans2,e92wfhe,conservative
"Which one in particular, I wanna do it!",AskTheRealQuestion81,e934kab,conservative
"Mocks Middle America as inbred dummies for voting for Trump.


Sexts own 12 years old daughter.",dtlv5813,e92vg8w,conservative
"Must've had a big bowl of chili for lunch...

Partial /s",S0rtah,e92v8yc,conservative
Boom!,d_42,e93a2hl,conservative
All the Baldwin's are trash??!!??,theinfamousjosh,e92xbis,conservative
Logical fallacies usually have some sort of implied (false) logic or correlation. This is just two things.,RedditIsNeat0,e935a84,conservative
How?,chabanais,e93e7xz,conservative
He's too much of a Snowflake for Satan. Think. Hillary for #1 daughter.,StephenScherer1,e92pqdk,conservative
Thank you.,madbae3030,e937368,conservative
Any proof of that?,ExultantSandwich,e9358tk,conservative
[removed],,e9307rt,conservative
"Nah, I think the youngest one and the unrelated one are good. Especially the unrelated one.",freetogoodhome__,e92xdkr,conservative
"IOTBW, NPC, and so on are fairly decent examples of liberals getting exceptionally angry over relatively harmless memes.",NotaInfiltrator,e9383ao,conservative
">More of a reflection of the demographics of the website than an effort to change the discourse. 

More accurately, it's a reflection of the demographics of the moderators and admins. ",SamuraiBandit,e9328qu,conservative
"I can see where you are coming from, but I've had encounters with people, and for awhile on r/libertarianism there was an outright invasion of people who were claiming to be conservative or libertarian but they didn't talk like that or hold those views.  When you engaged with them they would say your post history is disturbing or racist, but would be unable to produce anything that actually showed that.    There is an online forum called [rpg.org](https://rpg.org) that has recently banned any language in support of the president or conservatives or something along those lines.  Not politics, but a single side of the political spectrum.

This is not just online.  My now fiance used to play D&D at our local hobby store.  We don't talk about our politics in general in public, and especially not in a place like that because we are there to roleplay and have fun.  We stopped going because the manager's wife rolled up a character in the game we were playing that was a complete characiture of Trump named Drumpf and would not shut the fuck up about politics.

I laugh at people today talking about how uncomfortable they feel because of ""right wing violence.""  I have felt uncomfortable for years, especially here in Wisconsin with Walker, revealing my political ideology.",nonamenoslogans2,e930q2q,conservative
I’ll be in my bunk,GroovyJungleJuice,e930f38,conservative
"I was attempting to half quote south park. 

I can't find a clip of Mr Garrison saying ""all the baldwins are dead"" but it happens right after this scene:

https://youtu.be/9P8wa7cUueg",theinfamousjosh,e931x4e,conservative
Most of the unrelated ones are good... It's mostly the related ones who suck.,casualToad,e92z26k,conservative
IOTBW?,Slixem,e93e4pc,conservative
"Chicken and egg really. Liberals still outnumber conservatives on this website so the default and massive subreddits are still going to skew left.

 It’s not like if whoever happened to have made the political humor subreddit was a fascist the whole community would be upvoting posts of Mussolini. ",GroovyJungleJuice,e938svo,conservative
"""Hey Alec, do you know what sucks about being a Baldwin?""",full_of_stars,e9363rk,conservative
"It's okay to be white.

Made by 4chan like a year or so ago since, in theory it's not a supremacist slogan and seems pretty innocent. Though when they put up posters with the message then people will jump on them saying ""We won't have this kind of hate speech!"" Or ""This is not ok!"".

Implying, intentionally or not, that it's not okay to be white.",NotaInfiltrator,e93pszt,conservative
This is simply not true...posting anything conservative there will be deleted...keep trying and you get banned.  No dissension allowed.  One giant echo chamber.  Reddit is one the biggest example of confirmation bias on the internet.,d_42,e939zk7,conservative
"Definitely though it was something like ""I'm old enough to remember when"" but the letters didn't match up.",Slixem,e93rm70,conservative
"Bush refused to do it because he thought it was wrong how Clinton and Carter acted as former Presidents.

So you can say that either it's normal for Democrats or Bush was just the one classy exception for recent Presidents.",Yosoff,e93ftf4,conservative
"Not only is it not normal...

 

Many former presidents normally go out of their way to NOT do it.

 

Obama is a media whore piece of crap who’s afraid of his “legacy” being entirely erased and his “historic” presidency fading into forgotten obscurity as a footnote in US presidential history.",ClippinWings451,e93h12p,conservative
"Not for nothing, but Presidents usually start looking a little better after they leave office because the stress on them isn't as great anymore. However Obama looks like he has aged 10 years over the last year. He looks more stressed out now then in 2016. ",iwasthebeaver,e93fyt9,conservative
No. He is breaking tradition of former presidents not criticizing current sitting presidents ,hipsterdufus84,e93fp9k,conservative
"He probably feels guilty for fucking everything up for Hillary's ascension.  If he hadn't been such a disaster as President, she might have made it.",mlmack,e948i97,conservative
No.,chabanais,e93km3o,conservative
"No, it’s a complete lack of decorum but that’s the new left.  It’s assholes all the way down.",BrighamYoung,e93q1pd,conservative
"No. It's not. It has been historically deemed as disrespectful and unprofessional. But *that's* today's left. Spit at, kick, beat, push, yell at, degrade, bully, stalk, destroy, threaten, intimidate, terrorize, injure. Anything under-handed. Doesn't matter to them. They view all this as par for their higher moral ground course.",NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e940s9a,conservative
"Did we honestly expect anything less? History, depending on how we vote for the next few elections, will remember him as the worst president of the 21st century.",HolsterOfNuts,e93jvk6,conservative
"I understand the frustration this thread is showing toward Obama. At the same time, this seems like it's fair game. By that I mean, other than Trump, has any other president ever been so vocally opposed to the previous president that *he he was not running against*?",defertoreptar,e94297c,conservative
"No, in modern times quite unusual.  The Democrat party has nothing left in the tank though, pulling out all the stops.
",CCPCanuck,e93z5bf,conservative
"It has always been tradition for the previous president to exit stage left and leave the new president to his work. Carter was the first to occasionally criticise, Reagan did not, George HW Bush did not, Clinton was the first president to refuse to leave, George W Bush did not, Obama is following in Clinton's footsteps and refusing to leave.",SilverHerfer,e943yag,conservative
Last i can think of is teddy and taft,notviolence,e93i6p7,conservative
"I feel like a lot of former presidents go on ""tour"" because there is a lot of money you can get from doing tours. I don't know exact amounts, but I swore former presidents earn millions per visit. ",Harp2143,e93yv9o,conservative
"Even Clinton stayed mostly shut-up during Bush years. The 2 Presidents I can think that were very vocal is Jimmy Carter, who constantly criticized Reagan, and of course, Obama. Funny how  it's the Democrats that always are noisy.",GeneticsGuy,e94cx6w,conservative
Reagan did not.  Bush 41 did not.  There’s a whole host of Presidents who’ve respected this tradition.  ,Rogdaddy,e93i8ly,conservative
He was classy up until Trump. Apparently humiliating his brother was enough to get him to violate that rule.,ultimis,e93odiq,conservative
"Obama's Legacy:

Was elected because of people who wanted to vote for skin color over substance. 

Made America look weak 

Traveled the globe telling other nations how terrible Americans were

Had many scandals and a media to cover his ass, at least two of those scandals (sending guns to Mexican gangs and the Lois Learner emails) should have gotten him impeached. 

Beat the woman who wanted to be president in the nomination process,  an amazing feat considering that he was a nobody from Chicago and she was a former first lady and senator from New York. 

Post Presidental life dedicated to bad mouthing the guy who followed him. ",GreatJanitor,e93hpvf,conservative
Obama gotta stroke that ego though,burtmaklin1,e94eu3r,conservative
He will be remembered as the worst Non-US born President to ever hold the office.,csaduck,e94ijr5,conservative
"He just ditched the hair coloring, I think.",Otto-Carpenter,e93ly04,conservative
Yeah Obama looks like shit now. I saw one of his speeches recently and his voice was Shakey and he stuttered a lot. Compared to 2008 campaign Obama it was a totally different guy. Maybe he's going through some personal or family issues or something? He should be way more chill now that he's basically retired and rich and can kick back and do whatever he wants.,StanleyKubricksPenis,e93yap5,conservative
Obama blamed Bush constantly for 8 years for anything bad that happened. ,SBC_packers,e945y98,conservative
Literally all of them. Pay attention to politics more than an election cycle. ,greeneyedunicorn2,e94svm3,conservative
There’s something they have in common. I can’t quite put my finger on it...,skarface6,e941f8p,conservative
He barely violated the rule though. It’s not like he went on the campaign trail.,trelium06,e93v1sw,conservative
"Yeah that kinda ticked me off.  Eight years of Obama's crap and Bush stays silent, even while Obama badmouthed his presidency.  As soon as Trump takes office the gloves are off.  Bush was definitely the result of having to pick the lesser of 2 evils.",flippy76,e93v0p7,conservative
">Obama

Whos that now? I've all but forgotten him and his legacy has been destroyed.",sir_fenwick,e944rgb,conservative
And Trump.  Obama’s true legacy is Trump. ,Mawaukey,e95wpxy,conservative
No qualifier needed... worst president ever to hold office.,ClippinWings451,e94xn8m,conservative
his eyes are looking a little sunken in too though. ,iwasthebeaver,e93oqqg,conservative
Now I *feel* for Obama!,Godsdj,e941fzw,conservative
And now he's constantly trying to take credit for everything good Trump is doing. Funny how that works.,Littlebigman34,e94pcem,conservative
"You're saying that out of all the presidents who came directly after a president who served his second term, Trump is *literally* less or equally opposed to the one before him in comparison? Seems like we could easily disprove that. Wasn't H. W. Bush Reagan's running mate and vice president? I don't remember hearing him regularly and publicly bad-mouthing Reagan while serving as president.",defertoreptar,e94uzew,conservative
"They’re racists, obviously.

/s",justhere2havefun,e94c96p,conservative
I'll give you that. ,ultimis,e93w5rx,conservative
"Bush and obama are friends. Trump isn't friends with obama.

So not exactly the same situation... and dont forget bush rallied against trump.

What we are seeing is what happens when someone who is from outside the club joins up. Both dem and rep tried to stop trump, and we are finally getting a taste of what happens if politicians actually work on their promises. ",mysql101,e93zme7,conservative
Michelle’s not feeding him.,Otto-Carpenter,e93ovoy,conservative
That must be what the R stands for. ,skarface6,e94dsis,conservative
"* Dylan Turner has joined the sandbox
* Billy O'brien & Georgianni Borsch do not like the new kid in the sandbox
* just another day at the kindergarten",Godsdj,e9413pb,conservative
That's nothing new. She spent 8 years starving school children. ,Aldumot,e9471ak,conservative
She's probably  beating him again...,Littlebigman34,e94p7jc,conservative
"Calling him disabled is pretty far from accurate, though.",LandHouston,e952wqp,conservative
"I don’t want Pete to apologize. I just want this shit on blast for another few weeks so more people wake up and realize how much of a steaming pile of garbage SNL is.

Seriously, I stopped watching it _long_ before it turned into the Democratic Messaging and Narrative Show. It’s just not funny. The fact that they’re resorting to mean-spirited “jokes” at the expense of war heroes just shows that they’re grasping at straws.",HuluForCthulhu,e94n52z,conservative
You can see where this is going. Anything posted positive about guns will become grounds for banning.,Coolbreezy,e94n4zo,conservative
They are perverting the 1st Amendment to violate the 2nd Amendment. ,mikeygio,e94n9mt,conservative
1984 in 2018,VoinaYMir,e94r2bg,conservative
"The point here isn't to disqualify people from purchasing a gun by making up some bullshit interpretation of their social media history, it is to make it take SO LONG to get a gun, there's no point even trying. The state of New York loves to use these tactics to stop things that aren't so ordered by His Royal Majesty Andrew M. Cuomo, not to mention all the people who wanna be greased a bit to get it done as well.",superAL1394,e954qxp,conservative
"This is a violation of the first amendment, the government is punishing people for their speech by taking away their rights.",BrighamYoung,e955y7w,conservative
Decisions Decisions,StephenScherer1,e943smx,conservative
[removed],,e94832w,conservative
[removed],,e93icju,conservative
"Can you please link to actual news instead of Far left democrat propaganda/fake news?

Considering WashCompost and how literal DNC campaign runners operate it, you should just link Shareblue and Thinkprogress while you are doing this.",TheMormanTrump,e949ym0,conservative
Somebody gonna get a hurt real bad,GorathThorgath,e94c2oo,conservative
">That would be the Democrats

They hate white men.

>For 2 years republicans have sat on their hands while Russia meddled in our elections.

One shred of evidence?

>Republicans let the president clown around in rallies calling for hate on the media.

I hate to break it to you but conservatives have hated the media far longer than Trump has been President. They didn't start calling CNN the Clinton News Network because of Hillary.

>And this year alone, dozens of people were killed due to right-wing violence that Trump instigated, while Democrats are the only ones out there trying to put a stop to the bleeding.

Where do I even start with this? How about we try an experiment? Wear a MAGA hat in any large city with a liberal population and get back to me on how you were treated or you could escape your bubble and look at compilation after compilation on Youtube for violence perpetrated by leftists.",rjohnson99,e93mzz7,conservative
"All elections - especially midterm elections - are local.
  
Trump can be taken or left, but is not the primary concern for many going into tomorrow.  Furthermore, Russian meddling did not begin or end with Trump, this much is certain.  So it is odd to hear such a sky-is-falling cry only now when politically convenient.
  
I'd suggest you pick up another cause or rallying cry, because this one falls on deaf ears - even more so when presented with a lack of any evidence.",keilwerth,e93kfaa,conservative
Wow! You’ve singlehandedly managed to make me convert to a Democrat using the same argument I’ve heard for the 100th time. Well done!,Dental_Spider,e93jgm1,conservative
Thanks for quoting this guy as his post was removed.  He has all the NPC talking points down.,flippy76,e93tyfl,conservative
"Wow, that guy was out of touch af, you can search Antifa or mobs assaulting conservatives on YT. Takes less than a minute of research.",Saigunx,e93y9bt,conservative
"Didn't it come out that Obama knew about Russian interference and didn't do anything about it, other than a stern ""Knock it off?""",mlmack,e94euij,conservative
It always blows my mind when I hear that Republicans and conservatives are violent because Trump says mean stuff sometimes but then they completely ignore the assault of innocent people by their minions and Democrats admitting they pay people to start trouble at rallies.,rjohnson99,e93ynw7,conservative
"Isn't this fraud? I guess it's a donation, so it might not matter. ",molon-labe7,e94cp17,conservative
Does anyone find it odd that a bunch of white nationalist would donate to this girl?,gster50,e94brqy,conservative
I guess she isn't scared that these folks support 2a,grovelmd,e94tf0l,conservative
"Fraud is fraud, doesn’t matter if it’s a donation. (It’s why Bernie was giving money back to anyone who asked.)",alltheamendments,e950qxj,conservative
This is wire fraud. ,frasierfonzie,e95a3h6,conservative
[removed],,e94j7y5,conservative
"I don't think a ""pick up artist's"" (particularly a rapey one like Roosh) website really has much to say that should interest conservatives.",archamedeznutz,e94povd,conservative
"&#x200B;

35. [Discredit](http://www.returnofkings.com/117722/3-pieces-of-kgb-propaganda-americans-still-believe-today) and eventually dismantle the FBI.

36. Infiltrate and [gain control](http://archive.frontpagemag.com/readArticle.aspx?ARTID=5188) of [more unions](http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2011/dec/7/labor-unions-and-communism/).

37. Infiltrate and gain control of [big business](http://www.returnofkings.com/114295/what-is-virtue-signalling).

38. Transfer some of the [powers of arrest](https://www.cga.ct.gov/2008/rpt/2008-R-0670.htm) from the police to social agencies. Treat all behavioral problems as psychiatric disorders which no one but psychiatrists can understand \[or treat\].

39. Dominate the psychiatric profession and use mental health laws as a means of gaining [coercive control](https://infogalactic.com/info/Political_abuse_of_psychiatry) over those who oppose Communist goals.

40. [Discredit the family](http://www.frontpagemag.com/fpm/240037/marxist-feminisms-ruined-lives-mallory-millett) as an institution. Encourage [promiscuity](http://www.returnofkings.com/48312/the-deregulation-of-the-sexual-marketplace) and [easy divorce](http://www.returnofkings.com/114357/how-we-can-fix-the-problem-with-western-marriage).

41. Emphasize the need to raise children away from the [negative influence of parents](http://www.parentalrights.org/20things). Attribute prejudices, mental blocks and retarding of children to suppressive influence of parents.

42. Create the impression that [violence](http://www.returnofkings.com/98620/the-culture-war-is-being-transformed-into-a-hot-war) and [insurrection](http://www.returnofkings.com/114177/what-the-university-of-california-berkeley-riot-means-for-america) are legitimate aspects of the American tradition; that [students and special-interest groups](http://www.returnofkings.com/116255/the-stories-of-two-domestic-terrorist-groups-that-were-dropped-in-the-memory-hole) should rise up and use “united force” to solve economic, political or social problems.

43. Overthrow [all colonial governments](http://www.returnofkings.com/122037/nelson-mandela-has-left-a-legacy-of-utter-failure-in-south-africa) before native populations are ready for self-government.

44. Internationalize the [Panama Canal](https://infogalactic.com/info/Torrijos%E2%80%93Carter_Treaties).

45. Repeal the [Connally reservation](http://scholarship.law.marquette.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=2871&context=mulr) so the United States cannot prevent the World Court from seizing jurisdiction \[over domestic problems. Give the World Court jurisdiction\] over nations and individuals alike.

#### Does any of this sound familiar?",SuperCharged2000,e94j8eb,conservative
"The site name reminds me of those douchy ""KINGS are born in (your birth month here)"" t-shirts I see advertised on Facebook.",PubliusVA,e94zkqp,conservative
"I don't care if I like what it says, the only poll that matters is what happens tomorrow. ",iwasthebeaver,e93evkp,conservative
"VITE VOTE VOTE

Edit: don’t vite, VOTE",PurpleHouseSlippers,e93fiqr,conservative
This is the first time all year Republicans have been ahead in ANY generic ballot polling. Good timing.,LibertyTerp,e93mqpd,conservative
"I'm kind of surprised he actually shows a small R advantage when most of the big polling orgs are ranging from D+6 to D+8 and the furthest outliers so far to the R side were D+2 and D+3. Tomorrow night we will find out who is correct.

Rasmussen was the closest pollster in 2016 but he's not the closest every time. Here's hoping he can make it 2 elections in a row.",Martbell,e93fzve,conservative
"Veni, vidi, voti.

I think it'd be *votavi*, actually, but whatever.",PubliusVA,e93nerg,conservative
Can I both Vite and Vote if I vote before I vite? ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e93gjkf,conservative
"I’m pretty sure the issue with Rasmussen is that they only call landlines, not mobile which cuts off a large demographic especially younger people ",phantomcut3,e93p0cu,conservative
"The IBD/TPP poll tends to be very reliable, as it surveys the same group of voters each time. It has the Democrats up 8, with a 3.3% margin of error. 

I'm curious about the Rasmussen outlier myself. ",psstein,e9472fu,conservative
"I am pro freedom, so yes.",PurpleHouseSlippers,e93ic1l,conservative
They have recently added an online survey tool to supplement the landline calling. I don't know how much of a difference it makes but it's something.,Martbell,e93q3ct,conservative
"> The latest Rasmussen Reports national telephone and online survey 

&#x200B;",ReaganTroll,e93ptsp,conservative
Young people don't vote.  Every election the Dems talk about turning out large numbers of young people and every election they don't vote.,StraightNewt,e93uy5i,conservative
"Unfortunately, it's not just young people who don't have a land line any more.",tectalbunny,e941ikt,conservative
"I think you’re probably good to cast a provisional ballot, just let your voting location know the circumstance",MarioandLuigiMemes,e95xfj2,conservative
info on [provisional ballots in PA](https://www.votespa.com/Voting-in-PA/Pages/Voting-by-Provisional-Ballot.aspx),SKWM3000,e95zfty,conservative
"I like the fact that Trump has made the other republican politicians learn how to be fun again, i.e. Graham and Cruz ",i_floop_the_pig,e93ixf9,conservative
"The GOP will never be _____'s party. Trump is just showing Republicans that trying to fight fair with Democrats is a losing proposition. Hopefully, they learn from this longterm. RINO's are the real issue with the party.

Guys like Kasich who think you can ""be nice and play fair & the Dems will come around"" haven't been paying attention. ",fifaislife206,e93jvbc,conservative
But will Trump possibly win 400+ electoral votes? I doubt it.,superdude411,e93doc7,conservative
Whatever keeps the liberals on the sidelines is good.  We had centrist conservatism.  How much was bush hated and thought of as stupid?  Doesn’t work.  Best to go hard right do as much repair work as you can and weather the storm of the left tearing it apart as fast as they can,polerize,e93pqgd,conservative
"Why, oh why can’t the GOP go back to being the spineless bunch of pussies that kowtowed to us and let us walk all over them?

Why???

>	The Trump coalition seems so impermanent, after all, a motley mix of Southern evangelicals, businessmen who think like the Chamber of Commerce and disaffected white voters from the Rust Belt.

This is why they are going to lose. They fabricate a new reality that portrays them as not actually falling apart... but then they go around and believe it themselves. You can’t get high on your own supply.",HuluForCthulhu,e94miiq,conservative
Those comments are hilarious. Just random morons crying about racism and lying about wage gains not materializing,1wjl1,e94ihff,conservative
"Yeah, He actually took ACTION.",StephenScherer1,e9432rf,conservative
"But I don’t think there are other Republicans that can motivate people like Trump, none of the never Trumpers or Establishment types can replace him. Some reject his style or policy, others simply do what they must to get votes, they’ll mimic him but I don’t think it will be successful.",AdmiralAlluahAkbar,e94716m,conservative
It's called giving a damn. ,kavanaugh1,e94edh6,conservative
Right? It seems like they're actually enjoying themselves now.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e93kkbo,conservative
"Trump beat an exceptionally terrible candidate. Reagan won by unifying the country behind him. Republicans won't beat a good democratic candidate by doubling down on ""all base mobilization all the time"" strategy. We need to win Democrats and independents like Reagan did. That doesn't mean diluting your conservatism, a la Kasich. But rhetoric can go a long way.",Glsbnewt,e94a01t,conservative
"I disagre, trump has dragged the party kicking and screaming into a nationalist/libertarian type of dichotemy essentially leaving the socail conservative and compromising RINO contingency in the dust. 

Unlike the DNC who is now locked in a civil war between its elite backed neo-lib center (clinton, Obama, Schumer) and its far left progressive/comunist wing. 

The middle has nowhere to go becasue they arent fond of either of those.  Something similar could have occured to the republicans but Trump is such a strong personality and pressense his nomination and solidified the Republicans ont heir new focus and we lost several big GOP donors, thinkers and figures as a result. ",Manchurainprez,e941nkm,conservative
No. And demographics have changed quite a bit since Reagan.,DogBirdLizard,e93f2vz,conservative
"The fact that it is an almost statistical impossibility is mostly Reagan's fault, ironically enough. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9406o3,conservative
MAX \~350,ReaganTroll,e93f6b1,conservative
That will likely never happen again barring some sort of national catastrophe or one of the candidates gets hauled in for murdering somebody the night before the election.,TBSportsFan1254,e941l7c,conservative
"They got redpilled and realized it’s all a joke anyways, and people just wanna laugh. No more taking the MSM seriously; they’ve taken themselves too seriously for too long",Flip-dabDab,e93tr34,conservative
"In some ways he is bring social conservatism back, primarily in not fearing political correctness, merry christmas, protecting religious liberty, pro-life policies, etc. And I think he's pushing the party in a direction that makes more sense like on LGBTQ.",ChopSuey2,e94c6yx,conservative
"I don't disagree with a word you said. It's still not ""Trump's Party"" and we fall into a trap if we believe this because:

1. The Dems WANT the Republican party to be ""Trump's Party"".
2. When Trump leaves office, what happens to the party? ",fifaislife206,e944ct7,conservative
"The most frusterating thing about republicans pre-Trump was their insistence that the DNC would live up to their promises and play fair. 

How many times was that lesson relearned, how many times will it be learned again before the GOP stops being duped?",Manchurainprez,e941s4j,conservative
"That's not true at all, most Hispanics are one policy away from being 100% Republican.",ChopSuey2,e94c9cl,conservative
There are enough trumps to be in office for the rest of the century my man. ,Manchurainprez,e945mq3,conservative
"Agreed; conservatism is about principles, not a cult of a personality.",MarioFanaticXV,e94kyuc,conservative
"Come on man look at the numbers, what goes through your head to post something like this? They vote for Dems in droves, even if the numbers are slightly shrinking. ",AmericanYidGunner,e95oljd,conservative
"Trump Trump's Trump.

I love it.",fifaislife206,e945wt4,conservative
"Trump got about 1/3 of the Hispanic vote, Bush got over 40% in 2004. They vote Democrat mostly because they are sympathetic towards illegal immigrants. Take that issue away and you have hard working, religious, family oriented people that want to be left alone.",ChopSuey2,e96ti4j,conservative
"So, like I said, the reason Trump can't get over 400 electoral votes is due to Reagan amnesty. ",AmericanYidGunner,e981vi2,conservative
Who said he can't win the Hispanic vote?,ChopSuey2,e98swi8,conservative
*concertina wire.,JMB_was_a_god,e93qbiv,conservative
"And you can BET that, even in the BEST case, if just ONE of those ""refugees"" gets a cut from
that concertina wire, the ~~MSM~~ ""Democrat Party Propaganda Department"" will have a
field day with it....
",LVDave,e93xizz,conservative
"I've got a bad feeling about this. 

It's basically impossible to turn 5000 people with no where to go around without injuring a few of them. And those pictures/ short video clips are going to be shown out of context, in an overly sympathetic light and dominate headlines. 

I don't think they should be allowed in, but I think any sane execution of sane policy will be bad publicity. ",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e93wcq0,conservative
Razor wire isn't inaccurate. Beats calling it barbed wire.,GorathThorgath,e94ie6g,conservative
"From what I read, by the time the caravan gets to the border, the Election will be over.  On November 1st, it was still in Southern Mexico south of Cancun.  And it's only moving 20-30 miles a day.  tomorrow is election day.  ",jedichric,e9494wf,conservative
"i think the idea is to convince them to steer themselves towards authorized ports of entry, if not turn around entirely.",SKWM3000,e955xhc,conservative
20 - 30 miles a day is an incredible pace. ,Herbivore4Life,e94s59r,conservative
They literally forced their way over a fence on a bridge in Mexico while tear gas was being fired by 500 Mexican federales. ,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e956tm7,conservative
"in addition to our razor wire and tanks, we're building trenches.",SKWM3000,e956yml,conservative
"""Nobody I know is voting for him, how is he still winning?""",Colonize_The_Moon,e940eq1,conservative
"Uh, have you seen his approval ratings? They are as high, if not higher, than Obama's at the same time during his presidency, despite the constant, consistent negative bias news.

That should be a clue...guess y'all need Scooby and the gang to solve this mystery for you.",Sideswipe0009,e94ddmn,conservative
Maybe because *gasp* people actually like him and r/politics is just a liberal bubble which doesn't represent real life?,TheMormanTrump,e94as45,conservative
"""I've asked everyone in this building and no one likes him...""",mastaxn,e94hpip,conservative
"He's unpopular on a personal level, but his policies make the most sense compared to the nothing that the dems are bringing to the table. ",iwasthebeaver,e93z7bz,conservative
"They are so trapped in their bubble. They KNOW he is drawing record crowds everywhere he goes. They know he's polling better with blacks and Hispanics.   


They just don't like him because he's undoing what their Commie God accomplished....",myerbot5000,e9400fl,conservative
"""Why aren't I 50 point's ahead"" redux.",anuser999,e94mhgi,conservative
George Stephanopoulos is a little cunt,STFU_Donny724,e94u2os,conservative
"> Why aren't I winning by fifty points, you may be asking yourselves!",Martbell,e93za92,conservative
Nobody goes to that restaurant anymore. It's always too crowded. ,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e944ctd,conservative
"Shit, I *wish* the Democrats were offering nothing.  ""Nothing"" would be a serious improvement over a $33 trillion tax hike.",FelixFuckfurter,e9429jj,conservative
"> He's unpopular on a personal level

What? everything I have seen or read about him says personal level wise hes a great person. Have you not seen the video of him stooping to greet the doctors and nurses at a hospital he was visiting.",Delta_25,e947n4n,conservative
"Well the truth is, she didn't know either. At all. 

God that was such a glorious election year. ",Themusician67,e955chu,conservative
"Yogi meant that nobody he knew went there anymore because everyone else went there.
",chabanais,e94r26m,conservative
Dorsia? ,ConsistentlyRight,e95f26v,conservative
I meant as far as his confrontational style. ,iwasthebeaver,e9494yp,conservative
"1) no shit

2) I found it an amusing semi - parallel about blindly accepting a false confirmation bias because the folks around you do

3) don't ban me for saying no shit to a mod",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e94u3fw,conservative
"> I found it an amusing semi - parallel about blindly accepting a false confirmation bias because the folks around you do

If you have 20 friends and none of them go to a certain restaurant anymore it's not""confirmation bias.""
",chabanais,e94wgq7,conservative
"Yeah, but it's whatever idiot thinking leads sheltered college students to think no one i know votes Republican so there aren't any. 

Sorry I don't know the exact name of the logical fallacy",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e94z3ib,conservative
Tardology.,chabanais,e94z4y3,conservative
"Like him or not, eye patch guy is probably going to win, his district is R+11 according to Cook PVI.",still_studying,e947qjy,conservative
Yeah he was like in the army or whatever. ,googleitup,e948zj1,conservative
"Didn't he get made fun of my some loser comedian, or whatever?",BrockLee76,e94hot1,conservative
"5) We're not changing our name to the ""United Socialist States of America""

&#x200B;",JFGFNY,e94omde,conservative
4) Humiliate the media.,eeeinator,e94l36g,conservative
https://www.breitbart.com/midterm-election/2018/11/03/democrat-lauren-underwood-faked-nurse-experience-report/,motherofmalinois,e94p1wd,conservative
How can this guy possibly bring in crowds like this and lose elections? It doesn’t compute.,the-divine-comedy,e94vkjj,conservative
The person I wanted to win an election didn’t win many times. I need some disability pay by now. ,justhere2havefun,e94oq76,conservative
"Taking a position on an issue does not requiring pretending one is technically qualified to do a job, this is just deceit. ",searanger62,e937aoq,conservative
"She is running in my district which traditional votes Republican.

It was +4 for Trump this past cycle.

Presidential voting in favor of was:

Bush
Bush
Obama
Romney
Trump

She also just moved back to Naperville to live with her parents last year specifically so she could run against Hultgren... She still has a residence in DC lol. 

Apparently the spots she is running with her in the office was at local dentist office near where she lives lol. ",RansomedAmbassador,e937kqe,conservative
"I read this as Lauren Southern in a nurses outfit and my brain immediately hit a blue screen of death

Goddamnit ",teezer145,e93tubs,conservative
I see No-Nut November is treating you well,GorathThorgath,e94htu6,conservative
Lol I’m Catholic I’m like a sexual camel,teezer145,e94joy4,conservative
"Of course, I don’t see this being widely announced on CNN, MSNBC, ABC, CBS, etc.",aaronholliday,e940zy7,conservative
Shocking. ,BuSpocky,e941eoy,conservative
This is how it starts. With murder. ,JackHazardous,e93wl9q,conservative
"2nd Amendment trumps state laws.

""The law that applies to situations where state and federal laws disagree is called the supremacy clause, which is part of article VI of the Constitution. The supremacy clause contains what's known as the doctrine of pre-emption, which says that the federal government wins in the case of conflicting legislation.""",AcidicMentality,e94hr9g,conservative
">be woman

>brother ""likes to speak his mind"" 

>call police one month after ""red flag"" laws go into effect knowing he's a proud bastard and might actually die

modern america everyone",richardguy,e93vu88,conservative
"In any case - this is a gross failure of justice. Either an unfounded claim was made, and they came to confiscate his weapons without any process, or someone may have been concerned that he was suicidal and the cops did the deed for him.",AddictedToGlue,e94857f,conservative
This is why I don't trust cops.  Too many of them are willing to enforce unconstitutional laws and illegal orders and use lethal force to do so.,Hillary_For_Prison,e94s73d,conservative
"He was justifiably outraged, but he should not have resisted. The proper place to dispute the law is a courtroom.

Police were just doing their jobs faced with an angry man fighting for a firearm.
",gster50,e93vt6c,conservative
"It’s not murder.

I might be downvotes for saying it, but if you struggle for a firearm with a police officer, you can’t be surprised if you get killed. 

I agree the fire arm confiscation without due process was horrific.

That said, we should wait to get all the details about what happened before jumping to conclusions, which is what I have always said to people on the left who flip out over this kind of stuff.",gster50,e94i2e8,conservative
"well, setting aside whether red flag laws are even constitutional, we don't know whether it was unfounded or not because

> A spokeswoman for the Maryland Judiciary denied a request to see any and all requests for protection orders made at the residence on Linwood Avenue, citing the law, which states that *anything related to an order is confidential unless the court rules otherwise.*",SKWM3000,e958m7b,conservative
"> He was justifiably outraged, but he should not have resisted. 

While in this particular case you are likely correct, I submit to you that in the bigger picture, the 2nd Amendment was created precisely so that civilians *could* resist their government.  Passive compliance writ large would have resulted in the disarmament of the militias at Lexington and Concord and the continuance of the 13 Colonies under the British Empire.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9415p4,conservative
"absolutely wrong on every point

here in FL the cops will take your arms, ammunition and ccw potentially indefinitely until a court date comes where you can petition the court for your guns back

the party that asked for the guns to be removed can petition to have the seizure extended

there is no legal way to prevent this- no such thing as speeding down to the local court with your favorite lawyer to stop the SWAT team.

When your stuff eventually comes back, your expensive relic or tactical guns scuffed and damaged from the evidence room, your ammunition missing, and your reputation destroyed, there is still no legal recourse.",richardguy,e93w60l,conservative
Taking away people's guns puts both officers and citizens at risk. ,JackHazardous,e961qja,conservative
Unfounded was a poor choice of words I suppose. Unproven charges.,AddictedToGlue,e95geqw,conservative
"The colonist made numerous attempts to avoid going to war with England, the last of which was the Olive Branch petitition in 1775. Violence was a last resort, not the first resort. And they were up against a true tyrant, not a constitutional republic.",gster50,e94j36q,conservative
"Difference being the colonists didn't have a judiciary that was separate from the executive for whom to redress grievances; any appeal with regards to government overreach had to go through the executive, who had 0 incentive to acquiesce.
   ",smokejaguar,e941uog,conservative
"I agree it’s a travesty, but you can’t struggle for a firearm with the police. We can’t support vigilantism.

The law is the law, you can’t choose which ones you follow, and disputes have to be handled in a courtroom.

",gster50,e93wx6w,conservative
This isn't vigilantism. This is someone protecting their own rights... not doling out justice against someone else without a fair trial.,GFZDW,e93z2v2,conservative
Not very polite of him,EngieBengiee,e93z36y,conservative
"""""trying to start a conversation""""",4KDoritos,e93t4vz,conservative
Trump’s rhetoric made him do it -MSM,Enzo_SAWFT,e93pwzi,conservative
Behaving like an Obomaite.,StephenScherer1,e947vj3,conservative
No but we need to repeat 2016 to win the Governor and other cabinet races. ,LillyEpstein,e94ae3s,conservative
Thoughts on the data heading into tomorrow? ,molon-labe7,e9450gd,conservative
What is your opinion on Michigan?,anewleafthrowaway5,e94fmov,conservative
Florida's early vote looks very similar to 2016.  The question is which way independent voters go.  They could go strongly Dem.,Reven1911,e94asn9,conservative
"My thoughts are that I'd rather be in Republicans shoes right now.  We're banking an enormous turnout of elderly and high school graduates in Florida for example.  These two demographics were key to Trump's victory.  It's a tight election, and I feel if the Dems do take the house it will be just barely.",Reven1911,e945777,conservative
"54% of early voters lack a college degree, I'd say that's good news for us.  African American turnout is also down relative to 2014 on a percentage basis.",Reven1911,e94j0jw,conservative
THIS,LillyEpstein,e94euew,conservative
"I've been reading that Florida early voting has Republican voting up 60k-70k over the 2016 results. 

Edited for clarity. ",Natetendo83,e94c3l0,conservative
"In Florida:

D’s took a 20,000 vote lead yesterday on the last day of early voting. 

These statewide races will likely be decided by less than 100,000 votes out of 7 million+ cast. 

There are just under 200,000 more GOP super-voters who have not voted yet than D super-voters. GOP had more new voters vote in early voting than D’s. Looks like D’s converted my Election Day super-voters into early voters than R’s did. R’s need a small turnout tomorrow. ",LillyEpstein,e946r0n,conservative
Awesome! Thank you! ,molon-labe7,e945g6w,conservative
It's very close but I don't see how the Dems are doing well enough to create a blue wave.  The election is going to be very close.,Reven1911,e94cgdr,conservative
"Keep in mind 2014 was a blowout year for Republicans, where they won the House popular vote by 5.7% and won 247 seats.  We don't need to do as well as 2014 to win 218.",Reven1911,e947hdv,conservative
I don't see it either. Republican voting is up over 2016 so far. Voter enthusiasm for Republicans is very high. ,Natetendo83,e94cnn5,conservative
"Also, even though overall turnout is up for all demographics, black turnout is down 20% as a percentage of the overall early vote in 2018 versus 2014 in states like Texas, Michigan, and North Carolina. This is horrible for democrats.",Reven1911,e94d5ca,conservative
Look at the voting of people without a college degree.  It's nearly 50% of all early voting in every state.  This demographic went HUGE for Trump in 2016.  Trump's base is treating this election like it's 2016 all over again.,Reven1911,e94ctb2,conservative
poll workers in black districts will just do what they did in 2012. They will start punching ballots for people who didn't show up that day and stuff the box. ,iwasthebeaver,e94f8rh,conservative
"If you visit the main homepage of Reddit, you will be inundated with ""vote Democrat"" posts or just  anything to go against the President, conservatives or Christians. ",lazerpantherr,e94olrz,conservative
And it doesn't stand out either. You might not really notice it if you were engrossed in the game. Almost like it's meant to be picked up on subliminally ^^^^^^vote ^^^^^^republican,MisterMouser,e94v2dr,conservative
"Just for anyone who isn’t aware, Google feud is not owned or operated by Google. It was created by one of the writers from Bobs Burgers.",Pyronot,e9506dv,conservative
Yeah what the hell? It doesn't look like an ad or anything - it looks completely hard coded. ,ch3000,e94ubvn,conservative
I've never heard of Google Feud,bjivy,e94ljml,conservative
Google Feud has nothing to do with the search engine. The creator of Bob's Burgers made the game. Has nothing to do with the media so it doesn't matter if its biased. ,Dunkeliness,e95b0yp,conservative
vote Cthulhu no lives matter ,Delta_25,e94qkjd,conservative
Wow I’m so surprise that google is partisan/s,giraffe-zackeffron,e94pmw5,conservative
[this game man](https://imgur.com/a/mefmYKO) ,birdman4_president,e95ad8p,conservative
And white people. ,OstentatiousSock,e94ykxw,conservative
"Democrats can't tell the difference- they'll call Ben Carson and Ben Shapiro ""white supremacists"" without batting an eye.",MarioFanaticXV,e95f167,conservative
ThErE wErE jEwIsH nAzIs!!! /s,molon-labe7,e95ivmc,conservative
Funny that the people that say such seriously never call out George Soros...,MarioFanaticXV,e95j6m2,conservative
I don't understand how people get so left. ,thecitylimits1,e959hk6,conservative
So what are the actual chances a democrat wins a seat in texas? I've actually not followed this race whatsoever. ,xJownage,e959z61,conservative
The Spurs huh? Pfffft lololol,Intimidator94,e95bh7q,conservative
Does anyone care about a NBA coach’s politics?,Otto-Carpenter,e95pn58,conservative
I’m shocked i tells ya.,Enzo_SAWFT,e95mc69,conservative
Why do celebrities keep drooling over this Beta O’Rourke?,McKnight36,e95sxsm,conservative
0,tja_1478,e95ay84,conservative
That's up to you.  But good to know.,chabanais,e9605s8,conservative
Because of the (D) by his name.,cragnathor,e95vlec,conservative
"They believe people who drive drunk and flee the scene deserve a second chance. 

He can't be a true Ted Kennedy though because he didn't murder anyone.

",chabanais,e96075i,conservative
"Figured, that's part of the reason I paid no attention to it. ",xJownage,e95azzi,conservative
Cruz should win by about 10 points,tja_1478,e95b1o1,conservative
Say it with me: *CONTROLLED OPPOSITION!*,TheMormanTrump,e941v29,conservative
CC: Everyone who gets ass blasted when Trump correctly calls the media the enemy of the people.,sendintheshermans,e94433e,conservative
"Is it comparing illegal immigrants to this psycho or is it saying we run the risk of letting someone like this guy in? Cause we run that risk letting anyone in, legal or illegal. This ad strikes me as either a little racist or moot. ",dookie_shoos,e9504nc,conservative
">Upon further review, Fox News pulled the ad yesterday and it will not appear on either Fox News Channel or Fox Business Network,” ad sales executive Marianne Gambelli told Mediaite.

And what made you come to that conclusion? CNN yelling and NBC balling so you did it so that they won’t say mean things at you?",Enzo_SAWFT,e942pkh,conservative
[removed],,e948m8v,conservative
"add Drudge to that, the things he prioritizes lately...yeesh",BeachCruisin22,e943gdg,conservative
That ad was terrible though.  And factually incorrect in it’s message. Native born citizens commit more crime than immigrants. Even illegal ones. ,KawhiDidNothingWrong,e942t97,conservative
Or maybe because they realized the ad was terrible and pushed a factually incorrect message? Idk just a guess,KawhiDidNothingWrong,e942yc7,conservative
Which is odd because it's not a racist add. It uses an example of the terrible people that come into the country as a reason not to support open borders and instead support more border security.,Ledcookey,e94axjy,conservative
">That ad was terrible though. And factually incorrect in it’s message. Native born citizens commit more crime than immigrants. Even illegal ones. 

Every single illegal immigrant committed a crime. And it's not racist in any way at all. ",sendintheshermans,e9440l0,conservative
"They have a 100% crime commital rate, highest in nation
",notviolence,e9473pa,conservative
Illegal immigrants. Its in the name. I have never commited a crime that is even comparable?,dayman35,e94lrk0,conservative
"lol 

Illegal aliens are inherently criminal.",Dorian_v25,e94guma,conservative
The conclusion I made from the ad is that there are violent criminals that come in as illegal immigrants. It doesn't say *ALL* of them are violent criminals but they are all criminals because they are circumventing the immigration process.,cavemanben,e947x5m,conservative
[removed],,e94bizx,conservative
The fuck when did I mention racism? And yes sure they committed a crime by being there ... but there is such a thing as lesser crimes. Traffic violations are also crimes. Vandalism is a crime. No one would equate those things to rape/murder though. ,KawhiDidNothingWrong,e9448su,conservative
Do you commit traffic violations? ,KawhiDidNothingWrong,e9477tl,conservative
"It's never fair to blame the group for an individuals actions, but Democrats (as a political party) support the idea of open borders, or at least something close to it, so throwing out an add like this is an effective way to get the point across that it'll harm the country. 

It's most certainly an exaggeration, as not all illegal immigrants are like this asshole (and as you said, not all Democrats agree with open borders). But it's still a very real threat and should be treated like one. ",Ledcookey,e94fjwi,conservative
">The fuck when did I mention racism?

You didn't, but that's the rationale for pulling the ad. Did CNN not make that clear?

> And yes sure they committed a crime by being there ... but there is such a thing as lesser crimes. Traffic violations are also crimes. Vandalism is a crime. No one would equate those things to rape/murder though. 

Even if I were to grant you illegal immigrants commit serious crimes at lower rates than the general population, [which for the record I don't](https://cis.org/Report/Immigration-and-Crime), every single crime any illegal immigrant commits is one in excess of acceptable because they should never have been here in the first place.
",sendintheshermans,e944kqo,conservative
Do you allow homeless bums to better their life by living In Your house,TheMormanTrump,e94915g,conservative
strawman,Delta_25,e947ql1,conservative
Not intentionally ,notviolence,e947h2y,conservative
[removed],,e94hlq7,conservative
No and of course there should be strict immigration policy and border protection. ,KawhiDidNothingWrong,e94a9vp,conservative
I do. I just dont get caught.,BlacktasticMcFine,e94tnuj,conservative
"Im using it as a simplistic term to describe the fairly recent push by Democrats to make it/keep it easy for citizens of the other countries to enter the US illegally and stay here illegally. 

This includes everything from those who call for truely open border to sanctuary cities and free healthcare coverage/IDs for Illegals to drastically reducing the vetting and naturalisation process. ",Ledcookey,e94j2gc,conservative
Soon these accidents will become more frequent and then they'll just outright ban all Pro-Life ads and content from their site.  ,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e93wnp6,conservative
"More like facebook said: ""We apologize we got caught""",TheMormanTrump,e94afeg,conservative
"Trump uses the hysterics of the MSM to his advantage. Not long ago the media was insisting Trump was going to shoot everyone who crossed the border. Even illegal aliens aren't going to walk into gunfire to get a higher paying job.
",svengalus,e944rye,conservative
"Wouldn't refusing Mexico's offer of asylum hurt their case for US asylum? 

While it's not mandated that you seek asylum in the first safe country, I don't think it helps ones case to be picky about the country that does accept your claim.",Sideswipe0009,e947dbb,conservative
